© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, a Nb-containing grain-oriented silicon steel was chosen to investigate the effect of different slab reheating temperatures on the microstructure and texture of primary recrystallization and secondary recrystallization by optical microscope (OM), field emission scanning electron microscope (FE-SEM) equipped with electron backscatter diffraction (EBSD) system and transmission electron microscope (TEM). The magnetic properties of finished product were also measured. The results show that Nb(C,N) can be formed and worked as the main inhibitor after adding Nb into the traditional grain-oriented silicon steel to lower the reheating temperature of the slab. At different low slab reheating temperatures, primary recrystallization takes place in all decarburized specimens, and at 1220 °C, the microstructure is the most fine and uniform. The types of primary recrystallization texture are consistent composed of strong {4 1 1}〈1 4 8〉 texture, dominated γ-fiber texture {1 1 1}〈1 1 2〉 and {1 1 1}〈1 1 0〉, weak α-fiber texture and some Goss components. The proportions of HEGB and Σ9 boundary are the highest at 1220 °C after decarburization annealing, which is beneficial to the grain growth of primary recrystallization. After high temperature annealing, the specimen of 1220 °C slab reheating temperature can be fully recrystallized to obtain secondary recrystallization grains on the centimeter scale, and the texture component is characterized by a single Goss texture. The magnetic properties of finished product are the best, and B800 = 1.88 T, P1.7/50 = 1.31 W/kg.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nd-Fe-B nanoparticles with a particle size below 50 nm and excellent magnetic properties were obtained via a novel route which makes use of both spray drying and reduction-diffusion processes. Uniform Nd-Fe-B particles were formed by the optimization of Ca amount as a reducing agent and additional washing by milling in ethanol media. Especially, we implemented a two-step washing process which contributed to the excellent magnetic properties with high remanence and coercivity. After the removal of CaO by novel washing process, the maximum energy product (BH)max of the particles showed 22.1 MGOe. This value is superior to those reported in reduction-diffusion process. We used Henkel plot to assume the mechanism of magnetic interactions of the Nd-Fe-B nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization dynamics of a soft layer (SL) with in-plane anisotropy and under a spin transfer torque (STT) from a perpendicularly magnetized reference layer is investigated. The thickness t of the SL is varied from 1 nm to 4 nm. It is found that uniform and damped oscillations of SL magnetization could be seen at both positive and negative applied current values. The range of each type of magnetization dynamics and the frequency values could be adjusted by changing the current density. The results obtained show the importance of optimizing the SL thickness in addition to its intrinsic properties for spin torque oscillator application with low applied current, high frequency and wide operation range.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Droplet solitons are strongly nonlinear, dynamic structures in ferromagnets with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. For experimental observation of such structures a nanocontact spin torque oscillator (NC-STO) where spin polarized currents act as a gain source to counteract magnetic damping is utilized. We analyze eigenmode of this droplet excitations in a simplest case of conservative droplet solitons, when both Gilbert damping in magnetic films and energy gain due to spin-polarized current can be neglected. As a result of such analysis eigenmode frequencies of conservative droplet are obtained. Among main features of conservative droplet eigenmode is azimuthal degeneration of mods and localization of mode frequencies in a finite region.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.To realize magnetic hyperthermia as an alternate stand-alone therapeutic procedure for cancer treatment, magnetic nanoparticles with optimal performance, within the biologically safe limits, are to be produced using simple, reproducible and scalable techniques. Herein, we present a simple, one-step approach for synthesis of water-dispersible magnetic nanoclusters (MNCs) of superparamagnetic iron oxide by reducing of Fe2(SO4)3 in sodium acetate (alkali), poly ethylene glycol (capping ligand), and ethylene glycol (solvent and reductant) in a microwave reactor. The average size and saturation magnetization of the MNC's are tuned from 27 to 52 nm and 32 to 58 emu/g by increasing the reaction time from 10 to 600 s. Transmission electron microscopy images reveal that each MNC composed of large number of primary Fe3O4 nanoparticles. The synthesised MNCs show excellent colloidal stability in aqueous phase due to the adsorbed PEG layer. The highest SAR value of 215 ± 10 W/gFe observed in 52 nm size MNC at a frequency of 126 kHz and field of 63 kA/m suggest the potential use of these MNC in hyperthermia applications. This study further opens up the possibilities to develop metal ion-doped MNCs with tunable sizes suitable for various biomedical applications using microwave assisted synthesis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPION), as a kind of nanophase materials, are widely used in biomedical application, such as magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), drug delivery, and magnetic field assisted therapy. The magnetic property of SPION has close connection with its crystal structure, namely it is related to the ratio of Fe3+ and Fe2+ which form the SPION. So a simple way to determine the content of the Fe3+ and Fe2+ is important for researching the property of SPION. This review covers a method for determination of the Fe3+ and Fe2+ ratio in SPION by UV–vis spectrophotometry based the reaction of Fe2+ and 1,10-phenanthroline. The standard curve of Fe with R2 = 0.9999 is used for determination the content of Fe2+ and total iron with 2.5 mL 0.01% (w/v) SPION digested by HCl, pH = 4.30 HOAc-NaAc buffer 10 mL, 0.01% (w/v) 1,10-phenanthroline 5 mL and 10% (w/v) ascorbic acid 1 mL for total iron determine independently. But the presence of Fe3+ interfere with obtaining the actual value of Fe2+ (the error close to 9%). We designed a calibration curve to eliminate the error by devising a series of solution of different ratio of [Fe3+]/[Fe2+], and obtain the calibration curve. Through the calibration curve, the error between the measured value and the actual value can be reduced to 0.4%. The R2 of linearity of the method is 0.99441 and 0.99929 for Fe2+ and total iron respectively. The error of accuracy of recovery and precision of inter-day and intra-day are both lower than 2%, which can prove the reliability of the determination method.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic field-induced magnetostructural transformations taking place in MnCoGe-based alloys attract considerable attention due to their associated multi-magnetoresponsive effects. The key to maximising these effects across a wide working temperature range is to increase the magnetisation difference during the transformation and simultaneously sustain the Curie temperatures of the Ni2In and TiNiSi phases. In this work, we achieve the above goals by importing additional Ge atoms into the MnCoGe alloy, as the increase in Ge content sharply decreases the transformation temperature but does not influence the Curie temperatures in the system. As a result, magnetostructural transformation between paramagnetic Ni2In and ferromagnetic TiNiSi phases is realised within a Curie-temperature window of 70 K. The magnetostructural transformation can be induced by the magnetic field, bringing about considerable entropy change.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Pr0.8Na0.05K0.15MnO3 sample was prepared by solid-state reaction method. Refinement of the X-ray diffraction patterns shows that the sample is single phase and crystallizes in the orthorhombic structure with Pbnm space group. This result was confirmed by using the electron diffraction pattern for the sample using the [0 0 1] orientation. Analyzing temperature and field dependences of magnetization around the ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition reveals the sample undergoing the second-order magnetic phase transition. The isothermal entropy changes ΔS as a function of temperature in different magnetic fields were determined. A phenomenological model is used to calculate magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of Pr0.8Na0.05K0.15MnO3 compound. The maximum values of ΔSmax and the relative cooling power (RCP) increase with increasing applied magnetic field. Landau theory and phenomenological universal curves of entropy change confirm the second order phase transition.© 2017 Elsevier LtdSwitched capacitors are widely used in integrated circuits for discrete-time signal processing. Metal-Insulator-Metal (MIM) capacitors and MOSFET switches are commonly used for switched-capacitor circuits. They impose limitations in the power consumption and the bandwidth of the circuits. For instance, the switched-capacitor digital-to-analog converter (DAC) is the critical circuit block that determines the performance in a successive approximation register (SAR) analog-to-digital converters (ADC). In this paper, a design using the detect-and-skip (DAS) algorithm to break through the device limitations of switched-capacitor-based DACs is analyzed in a coarse-fine SAR ADC architecture. When it is shown that compared with the state-of-the-art Vcm-based capacitive DAC (CDAC), the DAS algorithm reduces 55% of the energy and extends the valid bandwidth from 2 MHz to 16 MHz with a 6-bit resolution under the same setting and technology. Besides, a time-to-digital converter (TDC)-assisted pipelined SAR ADC architecture using the DAS algorithm is proposed. Implemented in a 180 nm CMOS process, the 10-bit 10-MS/s prototype measures an energy efficiency of 57.8 fJ/conv.-step.© 2017The interaction area and defect sites play important roles in determining the gas sensing properties of graphene. In this work, steam etching is exploited to fragment large graphene sheets on 3D graphene hydrogel (GH) to small pieces with increased defect sites. The obtained steamed graphene hydrogel (S-GH) displays three and ten times higher responses to NO2 and NH3, respectively, compared with its unmodified GH counterpart before steaming treatment. Furthermore, the S-GH-based NO2 sensor exhibits a low limit of detection (LOD) of 57 ppb, which is much lower than that of a GH-based NO2 sensor (178 ppb). This work demonstrates a facile hydrothermal steaming method to enhance the performance of graphene-based gas sensor by combining 3D structural design and defect modulation of graphene materials.© 2017 Elsevier LtdBy dissolving gallium chloride (GaCl3), indium chloride (InCl3), zinc acetate dihydrate [Zn(OAc)2·2H2O] and monoethanolamine (MEA) into a solvent of 2-methoxyethanol, the IGZO ink was synthesized. Five types of IGZO ink were prepared with different molar ratios of In:Ga:Zn, which can be used for ink-jet printing process. The thermal behaviors of IGZO ink with different formulas were investigated and the ideal annealing temperature for film formation was found to be ∼450 °C. Based on the prepared ink, amorphous IGZO thin films were directly printed on the glass substrate with a FujiFilm Dimatix ink-jet printer, followed by a thermal annealing at 450 °C for 1 h. The surface morphology, crystal structure, optical transmittance, electron mobility and carrier concentration were characterized and investigated. The ink-jet printed amorphous IGZO thin films fabricated in this work can be used as switching medium in flexible resistive random access memory devices.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn0.52Al0.48As/In0.7Ga0.3As metamorphic high-electron-mobility transistors (mHEMTs) on GaAs substrates have been demonstrated. The devices feature an epitaxial structure with Si-doped InP/In0.52Al0.48As Schottky layers, together with an atomic layer deposition (ALD) Al2O3 passivation process. In comparison to the GaAs mHEMTs with plasma enhanced chemical vapor deposition (PECVD) SiN passivation, the devices with ALD Al2O3 passivation exhibit more than one order of magnitude lower gate leakage current (Jg) and much lower contact resistance (RC) and specific contact resistivity (ρC). 100-nm gate length (Lg) In0.52Al0.48As/In0.7Ga0.3As mHEMTs with Si-doped InP/In0.52Al0.48As Schottky layers and ALD Al2O3 passivation exhibit excellent DC and RF characteristics, such as a maximum oscillation frequency (fmax) of 388.2 GHz.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis research proposes a germanium (Ge)-based n-channel MOSFET with Ge0.93Si0.07 S/D stressor. A simulation technique is utilized to understand the layout effect of shallow trench isolation (STI) length, gate width, dummy active of diffusion (OD) length, and extended poly width on stress distribution in a channel region. Stress distribution in a channel region was simulated by ANSYS software based on finite element analysis. Furthermore, carrier mobility gain was evaluated by a second-order piezoresistance model. The piezoresistance coefficient of Ge nMOSFET varies from that of Si nMOSFET. The piezoresistance coefficient shows that longitudinal and transverse stresses are the dominant factors affecting the change in electron mobility in the channel region. For Ge-based nMOSFET, longitudinal stress tends to be tensile, whereas transverse stress tends to be compressive. Stress along channel length becomes more tensile when STI length decreases. By contrast, stress along the channel width becomes more compressive when gate width or extended poly width decreases. Electron mobility in Ge-based nMOSFET could be enhanced under the aforementioned conditions. The enhanced electron mobility becomes more significant as the device combines with a contact etching stop layer stressor. Moreover, the mobility can be improved by changing the STI length, gate width, dummy OD length, or extended poly width. This investigation systematically analyzed the relationship between layout factor and stress distribution.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe demonstrate that the light output power of deep ultraviolet light-emitting diodes (DUV-LEDs) can be improved by introducing an intrinsic last quantum barrier interlayer to a high quality AlN template. The light output power of the DUV-LEDs can be doubled by substituting the last quantum barrier with an intrinsic last quantum barrier (u-LQB)/Mg-doped LQB for only pure u-LQB in the same thickness with a 35 A/cm2 injection current. It is believed that the improved performance of the DUV LED could be attributed to the decreased diffusion of Mg tunneling into MQW and the reduction of sub-band parasitic emissions.© 2017 Elsevier LtdSome of the modern aspects of field emission based electron sources have been collated in a short and comprehensive review. The usually overlooked peculiar aspects in this research field have been particularly emphasized in order to increase the interest in further fundamental studies and technological applications. The vast material was roughly split in two main branches which occasionally overlap: the electron emission devices based on chemically homogeneous nanostructured surfaces and the more complex nanocomposite emitting surfaces.© 2017 Elsevier LtdAntidot nanostructures were fabricated on Ni films by a single-step anodization process of magnetron-sputtered Al/Ni/W trilayers. Coercivity and saturation magnetization of the Ni layer were tuned by controlling the anodization time. Transmission electron microscopy was used to investigate the mechanism of the antidot formation process. The present study provides a simple and direct route for the fabrication of magnetic antidot nanostructures for device applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we implemented a micro-encapsulated CLC electronic paper that is optically addressed and electrically erasable. The mechanism that forms spot diameters on the CLC films is discussed and verified through various experimental parameters, including the thickness of CLCs and Poly(2,3-dihydrothieno-1,4-dioxin)-poly(styrenesulfonate) (PEDOT:PSS), pump intensity, and pumping time. The opto-thermal effect, brought on by the PEDOT:PSS absorbing layer, causes the spot diameters on the cholesteric liquid crystal thin films to vary. According to our results, the spot diameter is larger for a sample with a thinner cholesteric liquid crystal layer with the same excitation conditions and same thickness of the PEDOT layer. The spot diameter is also larger for a sample with a thicker PEDOT under the same excitation conditions and same thickness of the cholesteric liquid crystal layer. We proposed a simple heat-conducting model to explain the experimental results, which qualitatively agree with this theoretical model.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the clamped inductive turn-off failure of the Silicon-on-Insulator Lateral Insulated Gate Bipolar Transistor (SOI-LIGBT) with multiple fingers under high-voltage and high-current conditions is investigated. First, the measured turn-off waveforms combining with the on-state I-V characteristics of the failed device are discussed to distinguish the probable cause of the failure. Then, two-dimensional (2-D) electrothermal simulations are performed to reproduce the failure by using Sentaurus TCAD. The failure is originated from an inhomogeneous depletion behavior among the paralleled fingers during the turn-off, which gives rise to the non-uniform current-sharing and the subsequent current crowding in single finger. As a result, the latch-up of the device takes place. The simulation indicates that the current crowding is formed mainly through an internal path in the silicon. In order to verify the failure mechanism, an improved device with deep-oxide trenches arranged between the adjacent fingers is fabricated. The measured results demonstrate that no failure occurs when the improved device turns off under high-voltage and high-current conditions.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe investigated the degradation mechanism of a-InGaZnO TFTs under simultaneous gate and drain bias stress. Gate and drain bias of 20 V were applied simultaneously to induce current stress, and abnormal turn-around behavior in transfer characteristics with a hump phenomenon were identified. Hump characteristics were interpreted in terms of parasitic current path, and the degradation itself was found to be caused dominantly by the electrical field and to be accelerated with current by Joule heating. The mechanism of asymmetrical degradation after current stress was also investigated. By decomposing the curves into two curves and measuring the relaxation behavior of the stressed TFTs, we also found that abnormal turn-around behavior in the transfer characteristics was related to acceptor-like states.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA physics-based drain current compact model for amorphous InGaZnO (a-InGaZnO) thin-film transistors (TFTs) is proposed. As a key feature, the surface potential model accounts for both exponential tail and deep trap densities of states, which are essential to describe a-InGaZnO TFT electrical characteristics. The surface potential is solved explicitly without the process of amendment and suitable for circuit simulations. Furthermore, based on the surface potential, an explicit closed-form expression of the drain current is developed. For the cases of the different operational voltages, surface potential and drain current are verified by numerical results and experimental data, respectively. As a result, our model can predict DC characteristics of a-InGaZnO TFTs.© 2017 Elsevier LtdDC characteristics of AlGaN/GaN on Si single finger MOS-HEMTs, for different gate geometries, have been measured and numerically simulated with substrate temperatures up to 150 °C. Defect density, depending on gate width, and thermal resistance, depending additionally on temperature, are extracted from transfer characteristics displacement and the AC output conductance method, respectively, and modeled for numerical simulations with Atlas. The thermal conductivity degradation in thin films is also included for accurate simulation of the heating response. With an appropriate methodology, the internal model parameters for temperature dependencies have been established. The numerical simulations show a relative error lower than 4.6% overall, for drain current and channel temperature behavior, and account for the measured device temperature decrease with the channel length increase as well as with the channel width reduction, for a set bias.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA very low peak voltage GaAs/AlAs resonant tunneling diode (RTD) grown by molecular beam epitaxy (MBE) has been studied in detail. Excellent growth control with atomic-layer precision resulted in a peak voltage of merely 0.28 V (0.53 V) in forward (reverse) direction. The peak current density in forward bias is around 15.4 kA/cm2 with variation of within 7%. As for reverse bias, the peak current density is around 22.8 kA/cm2 with 4% variation which implies excellent scalability. In this work, we have successfully demonstrated the fabrication of a GaAs/AlAs RTD by using a conventional optical lithography and chemical wet-etching with very low peak voltage suitable for application in low dc input power RTD-based sub-millimetre wave oscillators.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper reports a fully-integrated, batch-fabricated electromagnetic actuator which features micro-patterned NdFeB magnets. The entire actuator is fabricated through MEMS-compatible laminated surface micromachining technology, eliminating the requirement for further component assembly processes. The fabrication strategy allowed the entire volume of the actuator to be reduced to a small size of 2.5 × 2.5 × 2 mm3, which is one of the smallest NdFeB-based electromagnetic actuators demonstrated to date. The magnetic properties of NdFeB thin films are further investigated and optimized using different types of lithographically-defined micromolds. By altering the direction of the input current, actuating displacements of approximately ±10 µm are achieved during both the attraction and the repulsion operations. This work demonstrates the viability and compatibility of using polymer-bonded magnets for magnetic MEMS applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdAmorphous indium tin oxide (ITO) thin films were deposited on polymethylmethacrylate and polyethyleneterephthalate substrates by radio frequency magnetron sputtering at room temperature. An interesting substrate morphology effect of ITO films on the conductivity, optical transition type and energy band structure was observed. A simplified film system model with a square potential for surface morphology was employed to explain the difference of conductivity. The energy band structures were also calculated based on the theory of amorphous semiconductor. The conclusion demonstrated the width of optical band gap, as well as the relative position of the Fermi level and mobility edge, which can easily be extended to the band structure determination of other transparent conductive films.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe downsizing of CMOS technology into the decananometer range has called for the redesign of the ESD protection devices because of the constraints of lower operation voltage and smaller breakdown voltage of the ultrathin gate oxide. In this work, we had developed a two-dimensional diode-triggered silicon-controlled rectifier (TD-DTSCR) structure to cope with the narrowed ESD design window in the 28 nm CMOS technology. A sufficient large SCR trigger voltage was obtained by directing the triggering current to both longitude and lateral directions, through two parasitic diodes and the P-Well, so as to save the chip area for realization. Optimization was done by varying several device parameters and the best ESD robustness obtained was 53.7 mA/μm which was about 65% larger than that of a simple SCR with the same width of 30 μm and realized using the same technology. Failure analysis was also conducted to identify the possible weak spots of the proposed structure.© 2017In this paper, Self-Heating Effect (SHE) according to depth of STI was analyzed and STI thickness optimization was performed in the plate-shaped vertical field effect transistor (VFET). In case of a VFET, the path of leakage current (Ioff) is different from that of a lateral FET (LFET). As a result, Ioff of VFET is not influenced by STI depth. For this reason, the STI depth of the VFET is not needed as much as the depth needed to reduce Ioff in the LFET. As a result, if the STI depth of the VFET is reduced from 100 nm to 20 nm, which is the drain region depth doped with Arsenic, thermal resistance (Rth) is expected to be reduced by 32.19% and on current (Ion) is expected to be increased by 1.54% without affecting the Ioff as compared with STI depth of 100 nm in VFET.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe report on the characterization of the interfaces of Al2O3/InAlN/GaN HEMT structure grown on 200 mm diameter silicon using conductance dispersion technique. Irreversible threshold voltage (VTH) shift of up to +∼2.5 V was observed due to the gate stress induced activation of acceptor states. Further, frequency dependent VTH shift during capacitance voltage measurements were also recorded due to the presence of slow traps at InAlN/GaN interface. The conductance dispersion indicated the presence of acceptor traps of the order of ∼4 × 1012 to 7 × 1013 cm−2 eV-1 with a time constant of ∼10 to 350 μs at the InAlN/GaN interface. Trap density at the Al2O3/InAlN was found to be in similar range but with a time constant of ∼2 µs. The presence of high density of traps at InAlN/GaN interface is attributed to the unavoidable growth interruption before the start of InAlN growth.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe paper presents a theoretical study of the p+BpnN+ design based on HgCdTe(1 0 0) layers, which significantly improves the performance of detectors optimized for the mid-wave infrared spectral range. p+BpnN+ design combines the concept of a high impedance photoconductor with double layer hetero-junction device. Zero valence band offset approximation throughout the p+Bpn heterostructure allows flow of only minority holes generated in the absorber, what in a combination with n-N+ exclusion junction provides the Auger suppression. Modeling shows that by applying a low doping active layer, it is possible to achieve an order of magnitude lower dark current densities than those determined by “Rule 07”. A key to its success is a reduction of Shockley-Read-Hall centers associated with native defects, residual impurities and misfit dislocations. Reduction of metal site vacancies below 1012 cm−3 and dislocation density to 105 cm−2 allow to achieve a background limited performance at 250 K. If the background radiation can be reduced, operation with a three- or four-stage thermo-electric-cooler may be possible.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe propose in this study a practical nonlinear model for the AlGaN/GaN high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) to extract DC intrinsic transconductance (gmDC), output conductance (gdsDC), and electron mobility from the intrinsic parameter set measured at high frequencies. An excellent agreement in I–V characteristics of the model with a fitting error of 0.11% enables us successfully extract the gmDC, gdsDC, and the total transconductance dispersion. For this model, we also present a reliable analysis scheme wherein the frequency dispersion effect due regional surface states in AlGaN/GaN HEMTs is taken into account under various bias conditions.© 2017 Elsevier LtdAn analytical model is developed for the fluctuation of the electrostatic potential induced by a charged trap in the gate oxide in tunneling field effect transistor (TFET). The model is applied to get the fluctuation of the drain current induced by an interface trap in TFET. A low frequency noise model based on the current transportation through the tunneling and the channel is proposed. The dependency of the normalized power spectra SId/Id2 on the frequency f and the gate bias Vg for TFET is obtained. The noise spectra in TFET are found to be very different from those of conventional MOSFETs, and have the superposition of Lorentzian and 1/f lineshapes with the former associated with tunneling and the later with channel transportation. The potential and current models are compared with TCAD simulation. The calculated IdVg and the noise spectra are also compared with our experimental observations. The results show that the normalized spectra of the current noise due to the tunneling are more significantly affected by Vg than that due to the transportation through the channel. The results also show that the noise from the channel is dominated by the mobility fluctuation rather than the carrier number fluctuation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Thermodynamic and magnetic properties of a trilayer nanostructure of hexagonal lattices described by the spin-1/2 Ising model are investigated by the use of the effective-field theory (EFT) with correlations. The results for the magnetization, the free energy, the internal energy, the entropy, the specific heat and the critical frontiers were obtained. The critical temperature and the compensation temperature are investigated with a negative interlayer coupling, in order to clarify the distinction between the ferromagnetic and ferrimagnetic behaviors. From the thermal variations of the total magnetization, the six compensation types can be found, i.e., L-, Q-, R-, S-, P-, and N-types.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A theory of tunneling spectroscopy of ferromagnet/ferromagnet/ferromagnet junctions was studied. We applied a delta-functional approximation for the interface scattering properties under a one-dimensional system of a free electron approach. The reflection and transmission probabilities were calculated in the ballistic regime, and the conductance spectra were then calculated using the Landauer formulation. The magnetization directions were set to be either parallel (P) or anti-parallel (AP) alignments, for comparison. We found that the conductance spectra was suppressed when increasing the interfacial scattering at the interfaces. Moreover, the electron could exhibit direct transmission when the thickness was rather thin. Thus, there was no oscillation in this case. However, in the case of a thick layer the conductance spectra oscillated, and this oscillation was most prominent when the middle layer thickness increased. In the case of direct transmission, the conductance spectra of P and AP systems were definitely suppressed with increased exchange energy of the middle ferromagnet. This also refers to an increase in the magnetoresistance of the junction. In the case of oscillatory behavior, the positions of the resonance peaks were changed as the exchange energy was changed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Feasibility of realizing a noise suppression sheet (NSS) coping with the low SHF band such as the 5 GHz band was investigated, which was composed of soft magnetic metal flakes dispersed in a polymer. For suppressing noises, the higher frequency one of the bimodal frequency dispersion (lower frequency one: Dispersion DII, higher frequency one: Dispersion DIII) seen in the imaginary permeability (μ″; magnetic loss component) spectrum of the NSS was aimed to utilize. Referring to the previous finding that Dispersion DIII is originated from a magneto-elastic effect, several magnetic composite sheets were prepared using various alloy flakes with different saturation magnetostriction (λs), and their frequency (fr(DIII)) and magnitude (μ″(DIII)) of Dispersion DIII were investigated. It was found that the NSS containing flakes with higher λs exhibited higher fr(DIII) and higher μ″(DIII)/μ″(DII), which was ratio of μ″(DIII) to the magnitude of Dispersion DII (μ″(DII)). The fr(DIII) for the NSS having the highest λs containing Fe-Co alloy flake reached 7.45 GHz and μ″ in the 5 GHz band was approximately twice as high as the conventional NSS containing Fe-Si-Al alloy flake. For transmission attenuation power ratio (Rtp) when an NSS was placed on a microstrip line with characteristic impedance of 50 Ω, NSS with larger fr(DIII)2 · μ″(DIII) ∝ Ms2 (Ms: saturation magnetization), which theoretically gave the frequency limit of imaginary permeability for a thin film, exhibited larger Rtp in the low SHF band. These results suggested that an NSS containing a magnetic flake material with both large λs and Ms was suitable for suppressing low SHF band noises.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a new method for the design, modelling and optimization of a uniform serpentine meander based MEMS shunt capacitive switch with perforation on upper beam. The new approach is proposed to improve the Pull-in Voltage performance in a MEMS switch. First a new analytical model of the Pull-in Voltage is proposed using the modified Mejis-Fokkema capacitance model taking care of the nonlinear electrostatic force, the fringing field effect due to beam thickness and etched holes on the beam simultaneously followed by the validation of same with the simulated results of benchmark full 3D FEM solver CoventorWare in a wide range of structural parameter variations. It shows a good agreement with the simulated results. Secondly, an optimization method is presented to determine the optimum configuration of switch for achieving minimum Pull-in voltage considering the proposed analytical mode as objective function. Some high performance Evolutionary Optimization Algorithms have been utilized to obtain the optimum dimensions with less computational cost and complexity. Upon comparing the applied algorithms between each other, the Dragonfly Algorithm is found to be most suitable in terms of minimum Pull-in voltage and higher convergence speed. Optimized values are validated against the simulated results of CoventorWare which shows a very satisfactory results with a small deviation of 0.223 V. In addition to these, the paper proposes, for the first time, a novel algorithmic approach for uniform arrangement of square holes in a given beam area of RF MEMS switch for perforation. The algorithm dynamically accommodates all the square holes within a given beam area such that the maximum space is utilized. This automated arrangement of perforation holes will further improve the computational complexity and design accuracy of the complex design of perforated MEMS switch.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Herein, we report the synthesis of M−type nano-strontium hexaferrites co-doped with hetrovalent cations (Dy-Ni) having composition Sr(1−x)DyxFe12−yNiyO19 (x = 0.00–0.20, y = 0.00–0.80). The synthesized compounds were analyzed by XRD, FE-SEM, VSM, along with electrical resistivity and dielectric property analyses. XRD peak patterns revealed the magnetoplumbite-type hexagonal crystal structure of the synthesized materials. The SEM micrographs reflected the spherical and hexagonal shaped particles with an average size 40–50 nm. The magnetic squareness ratio (Mr/Ms) of the synthesized nano-ferrites particles lies in the range of 0.60–0.68 assuring their single magnetic domain nature. The rise in the values of saturation magnetization, remanence and coercivity reflect that the fabricated compounds can be beneficial for the perpendicular magnetic recording media. Both the electrical resistivity increment and decrease in dielectric energy loss with increasing Dy-Ni substitution level authenticates that such materials can find applications in magnetic recording media and microwave device fabrication.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents a new methodology for detection and evaluation of mild steel (MS) can material embedded into oxide dispersion strengthened (ODS) steel tubes by magnetic Barkhausen emission (MBE) technique. The high frequency MBE measurements (125 Hz sweep frequency and 70–200 kHz analyzing frequency) are found to be very sensitive for detection of presence of MS on the surface of the ODS steel tube. However, due to a shallow depth of information from the high frequency MBE measurements, it cannot be used for evaluation of the thickness of the embedded MS. The low frequency MBE measurements (0.5 Hz sweep frequency and 2–20 kHz analyzing frequency) indicate presence of two MBE RMS voltage peaks corresponding to the MS and the ODS steel. The ratio of the two peaks changes with the thickness of the MS and hence, can be used for measurement of the thickness of the MS layer.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Four novel polycrystalline magnetoelectric composite systems: S1, S2, S3 and S4 having composition [90 wt% Na0.5Bi0.5TiO3 (NBT) – 10 wt% BaFe12O19 (BaM)] considering the variation of grain size of both the phases [NBT(Lg)-BaM(Lg)-[S1], NBT(Lg)-BaM(Sg)-[S2], NBT(Sg)-BaM(Lg)-[S3] and NBT(Sg)-BaM(Sg)-[S4]] are successfully synthesized by using solid state reaction method. Here, Lg is larger and Sg is smaller grain size respectively. The pure phase formation of desired composite systems is verified by Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction pattern. The Field Emission Scanning Electron Micrograph (FESEM) and Transmission Electron Micrograph (TEM) provided the information about the variation of grain size of both the phases. Room temperature ferromagnetic and ferroelectric properties have been estimated by VSM & PE loop tracer. Magnetoelectric coupling coefficient (αME) measurements has been performed by in-house ME setup. From the multiferroic and magnetoelectric data, it is surprisingly found that the composite system having a smaller grain size of NBT matrix and larger grain size of BaM disperse shows highest magnetoelectric coupling (αME) and remnant polarization (Pr) than others. It is also very interesting to observe that the drastic increase (more than 60%) of remnant magnetization (Mr) for composite systems which have smaller grain size of NBT matrix phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Giant magnetoresistance (GMR) behavior in electrodeposited NiFe/Cu multilayers was investigated as a function of non-magnetic (Cu) and ferromagnetic (NiFe) layer thicknesses, respectively. Prior to the GMR analysis, structural and magnetic analyses of the multilayers were also studied. The elemental analysis of the multilayers indicated that the Cu and Ni content in the multilayers increase with increasing Cu and NiFe layer thickness, respectively. The structural studies by X-ray diffraction revealed that all multilayers have face centred cubic structure with preferred (1 1 0) crystal orientation as their substrates. The magnetic properties studied with the vibrating sample magnetometer showed that the magnetizations of the samples are significantly affected by the layer thicknesses. Saturation magnetisation, Ms increases from 45 to 225 emu/cm3 with increasing NiFe layer thickness. The increase in the Ni content of the multilayers with a small Fe content causes an increase in the Ms. And, the coercivities ranging from 2 to 24 Oe are between the soft and hard magnetic properties. Also, the magnetic easy axis of the multilayers was found to be in the film plane. Magnetoresistance measurements showed that all multilayers exhibited the GMR behavior. The GMR magnitude increases with increasing Cu layer thickness and reaches its maximum value of 10% at the Cu layer thickness of 1 nm, then it decreases. And similarly, the GMR magnitude increases and reaches highest value of pure GMR (10%) for the NiFe layer thickness of 3 nm, and beyond this point GMR decreases with increasing NiFe layer thickness. Some small component of the anisotropic magnetoresistance was also observed at thin Cu and thick NiFe layer thicknesses. It is seen that the highest GMR values up to 10% were obtained in electrodeposited NiFe/Cu multilayers up to now. The structural, magnetic and magnetoresistance properties of the NiFe/Cu were reported via the variations of the thicknesses of Cu and NiFe layers with stressing the role of layer thicknesses on the high GMR behavior.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the room temperature ferromagnetic properties of graphene adsorbed by cobalt oxide using electrochemical method. The cobalt oxide doping onto graphene was carried out in 0.1 M LiCoO2/DI-water solution. The doped graphene thin film was determined to be a single layer from Raman analysis. The CoO doped graphene has a clear ferromagnetic hysteresis at room temperature and showed a remnant magnetization, 128.2 emu/cm3. The temperature dependent conductivity of the adsorbed graphene showed the semiconducting behavior and a band gap opening of 0.12 eV.© 2017 Elsevier LtdSource-to-drain (SD) tunneling decreases the device performance in MOSFETs falling below the 10 nm channel length. Modeling quantum mechanical effects including SD tunneling has gained more importance specially for compact model developers. The non-equilibrium Green's function (NEGF) has become a state-of-the-art method for nano-scaled device simulation in the past years. In the sense of a multi-scale simulation approach it is necessary to bridge the gap between compact models with their fast and efficient calculation of the device current, and numerical device models which consider quantum effects of nano-scaled devices. In this work, an NEGF based analytical model for nano-scaled double-gate (DG) MOSFETs is introduced. The model consists of a closed-form potential solution of a classical compact model and a 1D NEGF formalism for calculating the device current, taking into account quantum mechanical effects. The potential calculation omits the iterative coupling and allows the straightforward current calculation. The model is based on a ballistic NEGF approach whereby backscattering effects are considered as second order effect in a closed-form. The accuracy and scalability of the non-iterative DG MOSFET model is inspected in comparison with numerical NanoMOS TCAD data for various channel lengths. With the help of this model investigations on short-channel and temperature effects are performed.© 2017 Elsevier LtdBoron indium oxide (BIO) is studied for thin-film transistor (TFT) channel layer applications. Sputtered BIO thin films exhibit an amorphous phase over a wide range of B2O3/In2O3 ratios and remain amorphous up to 500 °C. The band gap decreases linearly with decreasing boron content, whereas device performance generally improves with decreasing boron content. The best amorphous BIO TFT exhibits a field-effect mobility of 10 cm2 V−1 s−1, turn-on voltage of 2.5 V, and sub-threshold swing of 0.72 V/dec. Decreasing the boron content to 12.5% leads to a polycrystalline phase, but further increases the mobility up to 20–40 cm2 V−1 s−1. TCAD simulation results suggest that the reason for higher performance after increasing the anneal temperature from 200 to 400 °C is due to a lower defect density in the sub-bandgap region of the BIO channel layer.© 2017The interface formation in epitaxial MgO/Co2MnSi(001) films was studied using in-situ X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). MgO was deposited on single crystal Co2MnSi(001) layers using e-beam evaporation: a technique which is expected to oxidize the Co2MnSi layer somewhat due to the rise in oxygen partial pressure during MgO deposition while leaving the deposited MgO oxygen deficient. Not unexpectedly, we find that e-beam evaporation of MgO raises the oxygen background in the deposition chamber to a level that readily oxidizes the Co2MnSi surface, with oxygen bonding preferentially to Mn and Si over Co. Interestingly, this oxidation causes an elemental segregation, with Mn-Si effectively moving toward the surface, resulting in an MgO/Co2MnSi interface with a composition significantly differing from the original surface of the unoxidized Co2MnSi film. As MgO is deposited on the oxidized Co2MnSi, the Mn-oxides are reduced, while the Si oxide remains, and is only somewhat reduced after additional annealing in ultrahigh vacuum. Annealing after the MgO is grown on Co2MnSi causes oxygen to move away from the oxidized Co2MnSi interface toward the surface and into the MgO. This observation is consistent with an increase in the tunneling magnetoresistance ratio with post-growth annealing measured in fabricated magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJs). The findings are discussed in light of fabrication of MgO/Heusler based MTJs, where the exponential decay of tunneling probability with contact separation exemplifies the importance of the ferromagnet/tunnel barrier interface.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanocomposites of CoFe2-CoFe2O4 were synthesized using the borohydride reduction process in a chitosan solution of FeCl2·4H2O and CoCl2·6H2O. The chemical crosslinking favored the formation of cobalt ferrite in the nanoparticle synthesis process. The phase structure, particle size, morphology and magnetization of the nanoparticles were investigated by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Mössbauer spectroscopy (MS), scanning electron microscopy, and vibrating sample magnetoscopy, respectively. The XRD results showed that the samples are mostly made up of amorphous phases and MS shows that the phases are Fe-B. The average size of the nanoparticles obtained varied within a range of 4–13 nm. Different magnetic behavior such as ferromagnetism, spin glass and exchange-spring were observed in the nanocomposites depending on the quantify of CoFe2O4.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In magnetic fluids the viscosity can depend on an external magnetic field. We theoretically investigate the influence of this magneto-viscous effect on the thermal convection thresholds for viscoelastic ferrofluids, which are described by a linear Oldroyd model. Such a system is influenced by a static magnetic field not only via the Kelvin force, but also through the magneto-viscous effect. In particular, we find that these two contributions compete oppositely when the threshold for the oscillatory instability is considered. While the Kelvin force tends to decrease the critical Rayleigh number, the magneto-viscous effect increases it. The critical properties at the onset of the oscillatory instability are discussed as a function of the viscoelastic parameters, the external field strength, and the magneto-viscous coefficient. The transition between the stationary and the oscillatory instability is only slightly affected by the magneto-viscous effect. Examples for codimension-2 lines are given.© 2017The paper presents a compact D-band monolithic sub-harmonic mixer (SHM) with 3 μm planar hyperabrupt schottky-varactor diodes offered by 70 nm GaAs mHEMT technology. According to empirical equivalent-circuit models, a wide-band large signal equivalent circuit model of the diode is proposed. Based on the extracted model, the mixer is implemented and optimized with a shunt-mounted anti-parallel diode pair (APDP) to fulfill the sub-harmonic mixing mechanism. Furthermore, a modified asymmetric three-transmission-line coupler is devised to achieve high-level coupling and minimize the chip size. The measured results show that the conversion gain varies between −13.9 dB and −17.5 dB from 110 GHz to 145 GHz, with a local oscillator (LO) power level of 14 dBm and an intermediate frequency (IF) of 1 GHz. The total chip size including probe GSG pads is 0.57 × 0.68mm2. In conclusion, the mixer exhibits outstanding figure-of-merits.© 2017 Elsevier LtdHysteretic current-voltage (I-V) characteristics are quite common in metal-insulator-metal (MIM) devices used for resistive switching random access memory (RRAM). Two types of hysteretic I-V curves are usually observed, figure eight and counter figure eight (counter-clockwise and clockwise in the positive voltage sweep direction, respectively). In this work, a clockwise hysteretic I-V curve was found for an MIM device with polystyrene (PS)/ZnO nanorods stack as an insulator layer. Three distinct regions I ∼ V, I ∼ V2, and I ∼ V0.6 are observed in the double logarithmic plot of the I-V curves, which cannot be explained completely with the conventional trap-controlled space-charge-limited-current (SCLC) model. A model based on the energy band with two separate traps plus local energy variation and trap-controlled SCLC has been developed, which can successfully describe the behavior of the clockwise hysteretic I-V characteristics obtained in this work.© 2017We have designed and implemented a dual-cantilever magnetometer, in which the coupling magnetic forces between the two cantilevers can be switched on/off by an external magnetic field. The coupling is realized by a pair of ferromagnetic ellipses, located on the cantilevers. One of the ellipses is “narrow” – it bears only a single domain magnetic state independently of the applied external field. The other one is “wide”, and can be either in single- or closure-domain states depending on the applied field. In such configuration, the interacting force between the cantilevers can be attractive (both ellipses are in single domain state conforming to the external field), repulsive (both are in single domain states, but the narrow ellipse is in a meta-stable state, with magnetization opposite to the field) or switched off (when the closure domain state appears in the wide ellipse). We found that the coupling between the ellipses directly corresponds to the phase shift of the vibrating cantilevers. In this manner, the cantilever phase detection can be used to read out the magnetic state of the ellipses, which depends on the applied magnetic field. Moreover, we study how the magnetic state of the wide ellipse influences the flipping field of the narrow ellipse. Our observations are supported by micromagnetic simulations and by additional magnetic force microscopy experiments. We also discuss sensitivity and potential application of the magnetometer in future experiments.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study the propulsion of superparamagnetic particles dispersed in a viscous fluid upon the application of an elliptically polarized rotating magnetic field. Reducing the fluid surface tension the particles sediment due to density mismatch and rotate close to the low recipient confining plate. We study the net translational motion arising from the hydrodynamic coupling with the plate and find that, above a cross over magnetic field, magnetically assembled doublets move faster than single particles. In turn, particles are driven in complex highly controlled trajectories by rotating the plane containing the magnetic field vector. The effect of the field rotation on long self assembled chains is discussed and the alternating breakup and reformation of the particle chains is described.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nature of Gd3Co is investigated using detailed measurements of temperature and field dependent magnetization. The antiferromagnetic phase is field-instable due to prevailing ferromagnetic exchange correlations above Néel temperature TN∼130K. Below TN, with gradually increasing magnetic fields, the compound undergoes a quasi-first order phase transition from AFM to spin-flop over region and eventually acquires ferromagnetic phase in higher fields. Further the point at which the quasi-first order transition ends and second order transition sets in is the tricritical point, TTCP∼125.6K, HTCP∼4.4kOe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanoferrites of general formula Ni0.5 Zn0.5 Alx Fe2−x O4 (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8, 1.0, 1.2, 1.4, 1.6, 1.8 and 2.0) synthesized by sol-gel auto combustion technique can be characterized by dielectric behaviour and AC conductivity studies with the help of LCR impedance meter. This paper gives an insight on variations in dielectric constant, dielectric loss with reference to frequency, temperature and Al3+ ion substitution and also the determination of DC resistivity, activation energy and Curie temperature by two probe experimental set-up.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have prepared a composite of ferrimagnetic ferrite Co1.75Fe1.25O4 and non-magnetic oxide BaTiO3. The ferrite composition Co1.75Fe1.25O4 has been prepared by chemical co-precipitation and subsequently heated at different temperatures. The heat treated ferrite powder has been mixed with BaTiO3 powder with mass ratio 1:1 and the mixed powder has been finally heated at 1000 °C to form composite material. Structural phase of the composite material has been confirmed by high quality Synchrotron X-ray diffraction pattern and Micro-Raman spectra. The grain surface morphology and elemental composition have been studied by Scanning electron microscope and Energy dispersive X-ray analysis. The distribution of magnetic exchange interactions and blocking behavior of the ferrimagnetic grains in composite samples has been understood by analyzing the temperature and magnetic field dependence of dc magnetization. Finally, information on modified micro-structure and ferrimagnetic parameters in composite samples has been obtained as the variation of annealing temperature of the ferrite component before making composite.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The electronic, magnetic and transport properties of oxygen or magnesium vacancies at the FeRh/MgO/FeRh (0 0 1) magnetic tunnel junction are studied within first principles. Configurations with one O or Mg vacancy per C(2 × 2) surface unit cell, which is located in the MgO interfacial layers, are investigated. We observed that the O and Mg vacancies defect have a very little influence on the magnetic state of the spacer. Very interestingly, the Fe atoms exhibit an enhanced magnetic moment in the case of Mg-vacancy, this latter was found to decrease in the case of O-vacancy. The variations in the spin polarization and magnetic moment values for Fe and Rh atoms at the interface were found to be larger in presence of Mg vacancy. An analysis of the charge densities of our systems was also performed; large variations in the Mg-vacancy system were observed. This affects more the t2g states of the interfacial Fe atom. Moreover, we present an ab initio calculated transmission and I-V characteristics for FeRh/MgO/FeRh (0 0 1) magnetic tunnel junction and we compare results to those of O and Mg-vacancy at the interface using the TRANSIESTA code, which combines the DFT electronic structure calculations with the non-equilibrium Green function formalism (NEGF) for transport properties. The results show that the zero-bias minority spin transmission is much larger than the majority spin transmission for all structures. In all systems and for all magnetic configurations, minority spin currents are higher than majority spin ones, this means that transport properties are, mainly, determined by minority spin channel.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A great number of fine and dispersive NbC precipitates were obtained in Fe82Ga4.5Al13.5 sheets by rolling process consisting of hot rolling at 900 °C, warm rolling at 500 °C and intermediate annealing at 650 °C for 15 min. The mean size of precipitates in primarily recrystallized sheets is ∼45 nm. Grain growth in final sheets was investigated to study the influence of fine precipitates on the promotion of abnormal grain growth (AGG). Fully developed AGG of Goss grain was observed in samples with the heating rate during continuous process of 0.5 °C/min, 1 °C/min and 2 °C/min. In contrast, AGG in samples of 0.25 °C/min and 4 °C/min were partially developed. The influence of heating rate on the development of AGG was examined by the investigation of precipitates and grain configurations during continuous heating process. With the fine precipitates, sharp Goss orientation was developed in Fe82Ga4.5Al13.5 sheets annealed at Ar atmosphere. A maximum saturation magnetostriction of 170 ppm was obtained in sample of 2 °C/min.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Zn-Sn co-substituted M-type hexaferrite with compositions of Ba(ZnSn)xFe12−2xO19 (x = 0–1.2 in step of 0.2 and x = 1.0–1.2 in step of 0.04) were synthesized via a solid reaction method. Pure M phase was observed by XRD analysis for all samples. With increase of substitution contents, morphological features exhibited a shrinkage tendency in grain size. Meanwhile, the structure of samples also became more homogeneous and compact due to the enhancement of samples’ densities (ρ). In terms of magnetic properties, the saturation magnetization (Ms) decreased slightly from 57.62 emu/g to 45.57 emu/g as x increased from 0 to 1.0, and then it reduced sharply to 26.23 emu/g when x reached to 1.2, which might be attributed to occupancies of partial Zn2+ ions on 2b sublattice. The Curie temperature (Tc) decreased remarkably from 432 °C to 230 °C. Moreover, oriented BaM with a high squareness ratio (0.81) was achieved to match the applications in microwave devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nd-doped ZnO (ZnO:Nd), have been synthesized by coprecipitation method, x-ray diffraction (XRD), and Magnetic Properties Measurement System (MPMS) techniques were used to characterize crystal structure and magnetic properties. Wurtzite structure of single phase is obtained according to XRD results. Magnetic measurement indicates that the sample is paramagnetic at room temperature. However, a large increase in the magnetization is observed below 50 K. By density functional calculations, we have investigated the electronic structures and magnetic properties of Nd doped ZnO with and without oxygen vacancies (VO) and for different Nd positions. The results suggest that the VO and disorder effect of Nd positions play a critical role in the activation of ferromagnetism in Nd doped ZnO.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic composites (1 − x) BaTi0.9Zr0.1O3 + (x) Li0.5Fe2.5O4 (x = 0.0, 0.05, 0.10 and 0.15) were synthesized using conventional solid state reaction method. The structural, morphological, functional groups, dielectric and magnetic properties of undoped and doped composites were studied by XRD, FESEM, FTIR, Impedance analyzer and VSM respectively. The magneto-electric voltage coefficient was measured using dynamic lock in technique. The XRD analysis confirmed the formation of tetragonal structure. The percentage of phases in the composites and ratio of c/a values are tabulated. The SEM images confirm the dispersion of Li0.5Fe2.5O4 (LF) in BaTi0.9Zr0.1O3 (BTZr). The formation of strong absorption bands in FTIR confirms the perovskite structure in unsubstituted BTZr. The dielectric constant increases with increase of Li0.5Fe2.5O4 content. We have determined the transition temperature from the Magnetization – Temperature curves which vary between 331 K and 506 K. Electromagnetic coupling gives an interface between ferroelectric and magnetic phases due to strain observed by using magneto-electric properties.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, design and fabrication of Glass/Ni/Au nanoparticles (NPs)/ZnS magneto-plasmonic nanostructure have been investigated in order to develop biological sensors. The Au NPs were synthesized by a co-precipitation method, and a vapor deposition technique was used to fabricate the multi-layer nanostructure. The longitudinal Kerr signal (LKS) of nanostructure has been measured and tried to be enhanced, thereby improving sensitivity. The results show that adding the Au NPs surrounded by ZnS layer on Ni magnetic thin film leads to an increase in the Kerr signal up to 84% without altering the magnetic properties significantly. In fact, the LKS of Glass/Ni/ZnS has increased due to the localized surface plasmon resonance (LSPR) by Au NPs in the interface of Ni/ZnS, thus increasing light interaction with both the dielectric layer and magnetic layer.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The relationship between structure and physical properties such as magnetic moment and Curie temperature is studied theoretically for the recently synthesized equiatomic quaternary Heusler alloy CuNiMnSb, which is found to crystallize in the LiMgPdSb structure. Calculations are performed for various different possible structural phases within the framework of the D03-type structure (space group F4¯3m) by changing the sequence of the atoms along the body diagonal of fcc lattice that characterizes the structure of this alloy. Total energy, magnetic moment and the Curie temperature results, in particular the latter two, suggest that the correct order of the atoms along the body diagonal is most likely Ni(0,0,0), Mn(0.25,0.25,0.25), Cu(0.5,0.5,0.5) and Sb(0.75,0.75,0.75) in contrast to (disagreement with) the conclusions of a recent experimental study. Neither the sequence Ni-Cu-Mn-Sb nor Ni-Mn-Cu-Sb shows a large spin polarization at the Fermi level.© 2017 The AuthorsMIL-53(Fe) linked to superparamagnetic γ-Fe2O3 nanoparticles was created using time-efficient microwave synthesis. Intermediates as well as the final product have been characterized by Dynamic Light Scattering (DLS), Infrared Spectroscopy (FTIR) and Thermal Gravimetric Analysis (TGA). It is found that this route allows the production of Fe nanoparticles with typical sizes of about 80 nm that are embedded inside the metal-organic structures. Detailed magnetization measurements using SQUID magnetometry revealed a nearly reversible magnetization loop indicating essentially superparamagnetic behavior.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In consideration of importance of enhancing the magnetic anisotropy in ferromagnetic two-dimensional materials for their applications in magnetic data storage and spintronic devices, the structural stability and magnetic stability of FeCl2 monolayer in the 1T phase (1T-FeCl2 monolayer) under different strains and the influence of strain on magnetic stability and perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) of the 1T-FeCl2 monolayer are investigated using first-principles calculations. It is found that 1T-FeCl2 monolayer under different strains are stable at the room temperature by calculating the phonon dispersion and ab initio molecular dynamics (MD) simulations. Ferromagnetic is always the ground state of the unstrained and strained 1T-FeCl2 monolayer under different strains and the ferromagnetic stability can be enhanced by applying compressive strain. The magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE) of the unstrained 1T-FeCl2 monolayer is positive and the magnetization axis is perpendicular to the 1T-FeCl2 layer. As compressive strain increases, the positive contribution to MAE from SOC interaction between dx2-y2(dxy) and dyz(dxz) states increase, which lead to the MAE of the 1T-FeCl2 monolayer can be enhanced. On the contrary, the tensile strain can make the MAE of the 1T-FeCl2 monolayer weaken. Our results show that strain engineering is an effective approach to enhance PMA of 1T-FeCl2 monolayer.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.It is discussed that the magnonic black hole analogue of a gravitational black hole does not completely resemble the properties of a gravitational black hole.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ce17Fe78−xB6Hfx (x = 0–1.0) alloys were fabricated by a melt-spinning technique in order to study their magnetic properties and microstructure. Magnetic investigations of Ce17Fe78−xB6Hfx (x = 0–1.0) alloys show that the room-temperature coercivity increases linearly from 352 kA/m at x = 0 to 420 kA/m at x = 1.0. The Curie temperature (Tc) decreases monotonically from 424.5 K to 409.1 K. The Ce L3-edge X-ray absorption near edge structure (XANES) spectrums reveal that there is more Ce4+ in ribbons under total electron yield (TEY) than fluorescence yield (FY). Hf addition has no effect on the weight of Ce3+ and Ce4+ in CeFeB-based alloys. The grain refinement and microstructure uniformity are essential for improving the magnetic properties of Hf-doped alloys. This paper may shed light on the further development of the Ce-based magnets and offer a feasible way for using the rare earth resources effectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The addition of additives to soft-magnetic carbonyl iron (CI)-based magnetorheological (MR) suspensions is a popular method for solving the intrinsic sedimentation problem. In this study, synthesized magnetite nanoparticles were added to a CI suspension and its enhanced MR properties were investigated using a rotational rheometer. Based on an analysis of the variance, two models were introduced to assess the yield stress and shear viscosity in terms of the CI concentration, additive concentration, and magnetic field strength. The validation of the model was proven statistically through a supplementary experiment. The shear stress of the CI-based MR fluid versus the shear rate could be predicted properly using the proposed models.© 2017The crystal structure and magnetic properties of hexagonal YMn0.9Cu0.1O3 single crystal are systematically investigated. The refinement results of XRD show the lattice constant decreases, which is unusually due to the doped Cu2+ ion has a larger ionic radius than the Mn3+ ions. The XPS results show that the coexistence of Mn2+, Mn3+ and Mn4+ ions in YMn0.9Cu0.1O3 single crystal. Magnetization measurements show that Cu doped YMn0.9Cu0.1O3 and parent YMnO3 have almost the same antiferromagnetic transition temperature TN, which indicates the AFM interaction is robust in the geometry frustrated system. Because doping directly destroy some of the Mn3+ ions nets, the relaxation of frustration of Mn in-plane 2D triangular geometry network leads to the significantly decrease of Mn3+ ions AFM interaction. In addition, the coexistence and competition between the ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic interactions among the Mn2+, Mn3+ and Mn4+ ions lead to a complicated and irreversible magnetization behavior in YMn0.9Cu0.1O3 single crystal.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Metastable magnetic phases in α-Dy2S3 induced by rotation of the single crystal in a magnetic field have been investigated. The compound α-Dy2S3 possesses an orthorhombic crystal structure having two crystallographically inequivalent Dy sites and shows successive antiferromagnetic transitions at TN1 = 11.4 K and TN2 = 6.4 K associated with various steep responses in physical properties. Anomalous enhancement of the a-axis magnetization from 5.4 to 8.4 μB/Dy-atom has been found after a certain process of rotating the single crystal at 6 K around the b-axis in the magnetic field of 7 T perpendicular to the b-axis. This magnetic phase induced by rotating the single crystal has been considered as the same phase induced by cooling in the strong magnetic field of 18 T, which had been found in our previous work. Moreover, a certain process that combines rotating with cooling of the single crystal in the magnetic field gives rise to exchange of the features of the magnetization curves for the a- and c-direction. Consequently, the easy magnetization axis in the ac-plane switches to the c-axis from the a-axis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nd–Fe–B oxide powders with various pH were prepared using chloride and nitrate precursors including NdCl3·6H2O, FeCl3·6H2O, H3BO3, Nd2O3, Fe(NO3)3·9H2O, HNO3, citric acid (CA), ethylene glycol (EG) by Pechini type sol–gel method. The pH of chloride and nitrate base sols were 0 and 2.2, respectively. Mixed oxide powders were obtained by calcination and annealing the gels. These oxides by using a reduction-diffusion process under high vacuum and employing CaH2 as reducing agent at 800 °C were hated to prepare Nd2Fe14B nanoparticles. The role of pH on phase, morphologies, microstructure, and magnetic properties of the powders were investigated. The results show that with a decrease in pH, the average particle size and coercivity of Nd–Fe–B oxide powders were decreased and increased, respectively. Nd2Fe14B nanoparticles were formed successfully after reduction process. The average particle size of reduction treated products were 30 and 65 nm for powders which made of chloride and nitrate base metal salts, respectively. Final powders which made of chloride and nitrate base metal salts had a saturation magnetization of 127.7 emu/g and 122.8 emu/g while the coercivity of samples were 3.32 kOe and 1.82 kOe, respectively. The experimental results in the angular dependence of coercivity indicated that the normalized coercivity of the permanent magnets Hc(θ)/Hc(0) obeys the 1/cosθ law and intermediate between the 1/cosθ law and Stoner-Wohlfarth formula for different Nd2Fe14B magnets which made of nitrate and chloride base metal salts, respectively. Also, the results show that different Nd2Fe14B magnets which made of nitrate and chloride base metal salts had the maximum energy product of 5 and 16 MGOe, respectively. The Henkel plot showed that magnetic phases in synthesized NdFeB magnets which made of chloride and nitrate base metal salts were coupled by exchange and dipolar interactions, respectively. Different average particle size, morphology and microstructure were the reasons for variation of magnetic properties.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.NiWO4 exhibits a spin chain structure built by magnetic Ni2+ ions, which may be considered as a one dimensional S = 1 system. In this work, large-sized single crystals of NiWO4 were successfully synthesized by a flux method and the crystal quality was confirmed by X-ray diffraction. Magnetic properties of obtained single crystals were studied by means of magnetic susceptibility and high field magnetization along crystallographic axes. The results demonstrate that NiWO4 is highly magnetic anisotropic and possesses a three-dimensional long range ordering below 60 K, where a spin flop transition can be observed at 17.5 T in applied magnetic fields along the magnetic easy axis (c-axis).© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A comparative magnetic study was conducted on Fe3C and Fe3C/CoO for potential enhancement in magnetic properties due to exchange interaction in ferro/antiferromagnetic systems. X-ray diffraction confirmed the presence of iron carbide and CoO while XPS determined presence of a CoFe2O4 and a small percent of FexCoxC at the interface. Transmission electron microscopy showed a polydispersed network of 47 nm of Fe3C coated with 17 nm CoO nanoparticles. Due to the intrinsic nature of the interface an enhanced coercivity (600 Oe) above the blocking temperature was observed in comparison to the bare Fe3C nanoparticles (450 Oe). Upon cooling below the Néel temperature and Verwey temperature for CoO and CoFe2O4 a maximum exchange bias of 150 Oe occurred at 50 K. Results have shown a plausible way to enhance the anisotropy of the iron carbide while broadening its potential applications for spin valve systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.NiAlxFe2−xO4/SiO2 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1.0) nanocomposite films deposited on Si(1 0 0) substrates were prepared by a sol–gel spin-coating method. The influences of Al3+ content and annealing temperature on the structural and electromagnetic properties of the nanocomposite films were investigated. The results indicated that NiAlxFe2−xO4 in the nanocomposite films crystallized after annealing at 1073 K and above. When the doping content x increased from 0 to 1.0, the lattice constants and the average crystallite sizes of the NiAlxFe2−xO4 nanoparticles decreased. The saturation magnetization and coercivity of the films were inversely proportional to the Al3+ content. The maximum value of saturation magnetization (361.6 emu/cm3) and the minimum value of coercivity (18.6 kA/m) were obtained for x of 0.2. When the annealing temperature increased from 1073 to 1473 K, the lattice constant and the average crystallite size of the NiAl0.2Fe1.8O4 nanoparticles increased from 0.8322 to 0.8349 nm and 4 to 28 nm, respectively, and the saturation magnetization and coercivity of the films increased from 214.8 to 464.5 emu/cm3 and 8.2 to 26.9 kA/m, respectively. Moreover, the DC resistivity of the films increased with increasing Al3+ content and annealing temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We studied the magnetic properties of biocompatible ferrofluids containing magnetite nanoparticles stabilized by polyelectrolyte shell. These materials have many potential medical applications, where the fluid is interacting with biological tissues. We measured the force acting on ferrofluid droplets in inhomogeneous magnetic field of varying strength, in order to estimate the forces arising between the magnetic fluid and the surrounding tissue inside a living body. The results were compared with theoretical calculations.© 2017Particulate magnetoelectric (ME) ceramics constituted by (1-x)(80Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3-20Bi0.5K0.5TiO3)-xCoFe2O4 [(1-x)BNKT-xCFO] (x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4 and 1.0) were synthesized by an powder-in-sol precursor hybrid processing method and their structure, magnetic, ferroelectric, magnetodielectric (MD) and ME properties have been investigated. Results showed that the ceramics consisted of only two chemically separated phases and had homogeneous microstructure. The introduction of CFO into BNKT matrix led to the weakening of ferroelectric and dielectric properties whereas the strengthening magnetic and MD properties. The observation of the MD effect revealed the evidence of the strain-induced ME coupling and the MD value is well scaled with M2. A maximum value of ME output of 25.07 mV/cm·Oe was achieved for the 0.7BNKT-0.3CFO composite. The improved ME response together with the linear MD effect makes the ceramics promise for use in magnetic field controllable devices or magneto-electric transducers.© 2017We report the effect of partial substitution of Dy-site by rare-earths (R = Gd, Er and La) on the magnetic and magnetocaloric behavior of a mixed metal oxide DyFe0.5Cr0.5O3. Structural studies reveal that substitution of Dy by R has a minimal influence on the crystal structure. Magnetic and heat capacity studies show that the magnetic transition around 121 K observed for DyFe0.5Cr0.5O3 remains unchanged with rare-earth substitution, whereas the lower magnetic transition temperature is suppressed/enhanced by magnetic/non-magnetic substitution. In all these compounds, the second order nature of magnetic transition is confirmed by Arrott plots. As compared to DyFe0.5Cr0.5O3, the values of magnetic entropy change and relative cooling power are increased with magnetic rare-earth substitution while it decreases with non-magnetic rare-earth substitution. In all these compounds, magnetic entropy change follows the power law dependence of magnetic field and the value of the exponent n indicate the presence of ferromagnetic correlation in an antiferromagnetic state. A phenomenological universal master curve is also constructed for all the compounds by normalizing the entropy change with rescaled temperature using a single reference temperature. This master curve also reiterates the second order nature of the magnetic phase transition in such mixed metal oxides.© 2017Mn3-xFexSn system (0.00 ≤ x ≤ 3.00 with Δx = 0.25) alloys present the Curie temperature (TC) or transition temperature (TT) tuneable by the Fe content. A piece-wise linear profile for TC,T as a function of x is observed in a two wide temperature ranges, between 155 K up to 759 K and 259 K up to 155 K. Their equations are TC,T = (59 ± 15) + (240 ± 7)·x and TC,T = (257 ± 1) − (206 ± 4)·x, respectively. The alloys are low cost and easy manufacturing, rare earth free, with second order magnetic transition (SOMT), and have good magnetic properties. These features suggest an immediate application of the material in cascade thermomagnetic motors that operate with a large temperature range between hot and cold sources. Furthermore, SOMT Mn-Fe-Sn system materials are also reported with advantages that could make alloys of the Mn3-xFexSn system, (0.88 ≤ x ≤ 1.20), promising candidate for magnetic refrigeration. The typical ferromagnetic behaviour is achieved only by samples with x ≥ 1. The samples with x between 0.00 and 0.75 do not show the saturation magnetization even using fields up to 13 T.© 2017The influence of cycle rapid cooling treatment on the giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) properties in Co-based amorphous alloys was investigated. Hysteresis loops show that the saturation magnetization of ribbons has been improved by cycle treatment. It can be found that the GMI ratio was increased from 89% to 130% at 1 MHz by the thermal cycle (TC) treatment. Moreover, GMI ratio of TC treatment sample increased up to 321% at 5 MHz. It is considered that internal thermoelastic stress leads to surface roughness, magnetic domain structures and saturation magnetization changes of the ribbons during different cycle processes. It was also found that the asymmetric GMI (AGMI) phenomenon occurred in the Co-based alloys with TC treatment after annealing, which can be regarded as a new method to get GMI-valve to improve GMI sensitivity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles are promising systems for biomedical applications and in particular for Magnetic Fluid Hyperthermia, a therapy that utilizes the heat released by such systems to damage tumor cells. We present an experimental study of the physical properties that influences the capability of heat release, i.e. the Specific Loss Power, SLP, of three biocompatible ferrofluid samples having a magnetic core of maghemite with different diameter d = 10.2, 14.6 and 19.7 nm. The SLP was measured as a function of frequency f and intensity H of the applied alternating magnetic field, and it turned out to depend on the core diameter, as expected. The results allowed us to highlight experimentally that the physical mechanism responsible for the heating is size-dependent and to establish, at applied constant frequency, the phenomenological functional relationship SLP = c·Hx, with 2 ≤ x<3 for all samples. The x-value depends on sample size and field frequency, here chosen in the typical range of operating magnetic hyperthermia devices. For the smallest sample, the effective relaxation time τeff ≈ 19.5 ns obtained from SLP data is in agreement with the value estimated from magnetization data, thus confirming the validity of the Linear Response Theory model for this system at properly chosen field intensity and frequency.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Based on sol-gel method, the Dy0.5(Sr1−xCax)0.5MnO3 (x = 0 and 0.3) manganites were synthesized. Orthorhombic distortion was presented in both samples via X-ray diffraction patterns with Pnma as a space group. Magnetic measurements of both systems illustrate anomalies at around TN(Mn) ∼ 27 K for the x = 0 sample and 40 K for x = 0.3, showing antiferromagnetic coupling among Mn-spins. Then, the AC magnetic susceptibility of these systems was investigated to demonstrate the existence of spin glass state. In order to check if these samples can be good candidates for magnetic refrigeration, relative cooling power was determined depicting that the sample with a Ca content x = 0.3 can be useful for magnetic refrigeration at cryogenic temperatures with about 133.89 J/kg under a magnetic field of 5 T. The experimental magnetic entropy change was then treated via Landau theory showing a big discrepancy between the measured and the theoretical magnetic entropy change under 1 and 5 T. The antiferromagnetic behavior, which is governed by the super exchange interactions, describes also the insulating character, thus, we discussed the electrical properties and examined the conduction mechanisms. Based on Hall effect measurements, charge careers type was determined to be electron for both samples. Eventually, both systems can be investigated also as good candidates for bolometer applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Employing the all electron augmented plane wave + local orbital (APW + lo) method based on the density function theory (DFT), we have performed ab-initio calculations of electronic structure and magnetic properties of transition metal impurities doped in semi-metallic CaB6 host. Here, we present our results on the density of states (DOS), local magnetic moment and hyperfine field of 3d (Sc–Ni), 4d (Y–Pd) and 5d (La–Pt) in CaB6. Our results reveal strong localization of impurity d electrons yielding high local moments for most of the transition metal atoms, including the 5d atoms Ta, Re, Os and Ir. The results presented here would be useful towards a comprehensive understanding of the origin of weak ferromagnetism observed in CaB6. We believe that besides B or B6 vacancies which have been argued to be the main source of magnetism in CaB6, the local moments associated with different transition metal impurities can interact via conduction electron polarization and give rise to the weak ferromagnetism observed in this material.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The layered oxysulfide Sr3Fe2O5Cu2S2 was prepared, and its crystal structure and magnetic properties were characterized by synchrotron X-ray diffraction (XRD), powder neutron diffraction (PND), Mössbauer spectroscopy measurements and by density functional theory (DFT) calculations. In addition, the spin exchange interactions leading to the ordered magnetic structure of Sr3Fe2O5Cu2S2 were compared with those of its selenium analogue Sr3Fe2O5Cu2Se2. The oxysulfide Sr3Fe2O5Cu2S2 adopts a G-type antiferromagnetic (AFM) structure at a temperature in the range 485–512 K, which is comparable with the three-dimensional (3D) AFM ordering temperature, TN ≈ 490 K, found for Sr3Fe2O5Cu2Se2. Consistent with this observation, the spin exchange interactions of the magnetic (Sr3Fe2O5)2+ layers are slightly greater (but comparable) for oxysulfide than for the oxyselenide. Attempts to reduce or oxidize Sr3Fe2O5Cu2S2 using topochemical routes yield metallic Fe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.Magnetic nanofluids or ferrofluids exhibit extraordinary field dependant tunable thermal conductivity (k), which make them potential candidates for microelectronic cooling applications. However, the associated viscosity enhancement under an external stimulus is undesirable for practical applications. Further, the exact mechanism of heat transport and the role of field induced nanostructures on thermal transport is not clearly understood. In this paper, through systematic thermal, rheological and microscopic studies in ‘model ferrofluids’, we demonstrate for the first time, the conditions to achieve very high thermal conductivity to viscosity ratio. Highly stable ferrofluids with similar crystallite size, base fluid, capping agent and magnetic properties, but with slightly different size distributions, are synthesized and characterized by X–ray diffraction, small angle X–ray scattering, transmission electron microscopy, dynamic light scattering, vibrating sample magnetometer, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy and thermo–gravimetry. The average hydrodynamic diameters of the particles were 11.7 and 10.1 nm and the polydispersity indices (σ), were 0.226 and 0.151, respectively. We observe that the system with smaller polydispersity (σ = 0.151) gives larger k enhancement (130% for 150 G) as compared to the one with σ = 0.226 (73% for 80 G). Further, our results show that dispersions without larger aggregates and with high density interfacial capping (with surfactant) can provide very high enhancement in thermal conductivity, with insignificant viscosity enhancement, due to minimal interfacial losses. We also provide experimental evidence for the effective heat conduction (parallel mode) through a large number of space filling linear aggregates with high aspect ratio. Microscopic studies reveal that the larger particles act as nucleating sites and facilitate lateral aggregation (zippering) of linear chains that considerably reduces the number density of space filling linear aggregates. Our findings are very useful for optimizing the heat transfer properties of magnetic fluids (and also in composite systems consisting of CNT, graphene etc.) for the development of next generation microelectronic cooling technologies, thermal energy harvesting and magnetic fluid based therapeutics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.The present work is focused on the replacement of Fe3+ ions by rare-earth Nd3+ ions and their influence on the cations distribution, structural, magnetic and Mössbauer properties of Mg-Mn nanoferrites. Nanosized Nd-doped Mg-Mn nanoferrites, Mg0.9Mn0.1NdxFe2–xO4, where x = 0.1, 0.2 & 0.3, were successfully synthesized for the first time through solution combustion technique. X-ray diffraction studies confirmed the formation of single phase nature of the synthesized nanoferrites. Williamsons-Hall plots were used to obtain the particle size and strain while the lattice parameter was obtained from Nelson-Riley plots. The particle size was observed to decrease (19.2–13.5 nm) while lattice parameter was observed to increase (8.373–8.391 Å) with the incorporation of Nd3+ ions. Cation distribution between the tetrahedral (A-site) and octahedral (B-site) was estimated by using the X-ray diffraction method & magnetization technique. The estimated cation distribution was used to investigate the detailed structural parameters. Room temperature M–H study revealed a decrease of saturation magnetization (10.15–1.83 emu/g) and an increase in coercivity (22.86–27.19 Oe) with the increasing substitution of Nd3+ ions. Magnetic results obtained in the present study indicated that the synthesized nanoferrites can be a useful candidate for electromagnet applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic anisotropy (MA) of Mo/Au/Co0.9Fe0.1/Au/MgO(0.7–3 nm)/Au/Co0.9Fe0.1/Au heterostructure has been investigated at room temperature as a function of MgO layer thickness (tMgO). Our studies show that while the MA of the top layer does not change its character upon variation of tMgO, the uniaxial out-of-plane MA of the bottom one undergoes a spin reorientation transition at tMgO of about 0.8 nm, switching to the regime where the coexistence of in- and out-of-plane magnetization alignments is observed. The magnitudes of the magnetic anisotropy constants have been determined from ferromagnetic resonance and dc-magnetometry measurements. The origin of MA evolution has been attributed to a presence of an interlayer exchange coupling (IEC) between Co0.9Fe0.1 layers through the thin MgO film.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this work, the charge storage based split floating gates (FGs) enhancement mode (E-mode) AlGaN/GaN high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) are studied. The simulation results reveal that under certain density of two dimensional electron gas, the variation tendency of the threshold voltage (Vth) with the variation of the blocking dielectric thickness depends on the FG charge density. It is found that when the length sum and isolating spacing sum of the FGs both remain unchanged, the Vth shall decrease with the increasing FGs number but maintaining the device as E-mode. It is also reported that for the FGs HEMT, the failure of a FG will lead to the decrease of Vth as well as the increase of drain current, and the failure probability can be improved significantly with the increase of FGs number.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this article, the magnetocaloric effect on thermally reduced CoFe2O4/CoFe2 composite was reported. Co-precipitated CoFe2O4 nanoparticles were thermally reduced at 500 and 800 °C for 2 h under H2 atmosphere. The reduction process resulted in different fractions of soft and hard (CoFe2O4/CoFe2) magnetic composites and the products were characterized through various procedures. The structure of CoFe2O4/CoFe2 composites was found to be cubic with an average crystallite size of 31 and 30 nm for the samples reduced at 500 and 800 °C, respectively. The stoichiometry of the composites confirmed that the percentage of soft CoFe2 magnetic phase was increased to 87% with temperature up to 800 °C for 2 h, besides showed accumulation of nanoparticles. The room temperature saturation magnetization of the CoFe2O4/CoFe2 composites increases from 184 to 190 emu/g as a consequence of high concentration of CoFe2 phase. Conversely, the sample reduced at 800 °C attained the maximum magnetization of 200 and 221 emu/g at 300 and 5 K, respectively. Field cooled (FC) and zero field cooled magnetization (ZFC) and the isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔSm) on the CoFe2O4/CoFe2 composite (with 87% of soft CoFe2 magnetic phase) were estimated. The composite showed the interesting positive and negative magnetic entropy change (ΔSm) of 0.923 and −0.923 J/kg.K−1 near room temperature at around 310 and 290 K, respectively.© 2017The controlled growth and tailorable magnetic properties of FeNi thin films are of critical importance for controlling the magneto-impedance (MI) effect. In this study, a Ti layer was introduced to eliminate thickness-driven perpendicular anisotropy in thick FeNi films and thereby preserve their magnetic softness. Furthermore, the temperature-driven anisotropy determined the in- and out-of-plane magnetization behavior in FeNi/Ti-based multilayers, and so dominated the MI properties of these films. The oriented (1 1 1) texture of the out-of-plane crystal structure was enhanced with increasing annealing temperature. This supported the formation of perpendicular anisotropy in FeNi films, and reduced their magnetic softness. The in-plane texture changed from a dominant (1 1 1) orientation to a (2 2 0) orientation with increasing annealing temperature. This appear to be related to magnetic properties of FeNi thin films, because a minimum in coercivity occurred at the critical temperature of the texture transition. Thus, the largest MI effect was obtained in the FeNi-based multilayer at this critical temperature. Moreover, the interdiffusion at higher temperature between the Ti layer and the FeNi layer should be considered, because the coercivities and saturation magnetization of permalloy films increase and decrease sharply at 520 °C.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on the anisotropy of the effective damping (αeff) in the sputtered β-Ta(6 nm)/2D-epitaxial-Py(tPy = 3–10 nm) bilayers. In-plane field orientation dependent FMR measurements revealed a prominent anisotropy in αeff, which is ascribed to the spin wave induced spin pumping from Py to β-Ta in β-Ta/epi-Py system. The results especially suggest that at lower tPy a relatively larger αeff and its anisotropic nature are present in β-Ta/epi-Py bilayers as compared to bare epi-Py, which are unlikely at higher tPy. This is possibly due to both spin pumping which stems from in-plane spin waves associated with two magnon scattering mechanism and interface induced anisotropy from heavy metals like β-Ta at β-Ta/Py interface. The in-plane Hr vs. φ reveals clear anisotropy behavior at tPy ≤ 4 nm.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The spin-gapless semiconductors with parabolic energy dispersions [1–3] have been recently proposed as a new class of materials for potential applications in spintronic devices. In this work, according to the Slater-Pauling rule, we report the fully-compensated ferrimagnetic (FCF) behavior and spin-gapless semiconducting (SGS) properties for a new inverse Heusler compound Zr2MnGa by means of the plane-wave pseudo-potential method based on density functional theory. With the help of GGA-PBE, the electronic structures and the magnetism of Zr2MnGa compound at its equilibrium and strained lattice constants are systematically studied. The calculated results show that the Zr2MnGa is a new SGS at its equilibrium lattice constant: there is an energy gap between the conduction and valence bands for both the majority and minority electrons, while there is no gap between the majority electrons in the valence band and the minority electrons in the conduction band. Remarkably, not only a diverse physical nature transition, but also different types of spin-gapless features can be observed with the change of the lattice constants. Our calculated results of Zr2MnGa compound indicate that this material has great application potential in spintronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study the interaction of microwaves with dielectric spherical particles covered by conductive shell was modelled. Dependencies of effective permittivity and permeability of powders, consisting of core-shell metallized dielectric particles, on frequency, radius and permittivity of core, as well as thickness and conductivity of metallic shell were obtained. The present paper introduces a novel technique for calculation of effective permittivity and permeability based on results of direct finite element method simulations of electromagnetic fields within the model. Equations for calculation of effective electrodynamics parameters were derived from a combination of surface impedance equations and impedance values for an ideal conductor and an ideal magnetic mirror. The contribution of electric and magnetic losses was evaluated and compared for completely conductive particles and dielectric particles with a conductive shell. It was identified that for completely conductive particles and for metallized dielectric particles the imaginary part of effective permeability is orders of magnitude greater than the imaginary part of effective permittivity. In addition, the imaginary part of effective permeability of core-shell metallized dielectric particles can be nearly twice as greater than the one of completely conductive particles. Moreover, the maximum of dynamic magnetic losses is reached when the conductive shell thickness is less than skin depth. Therefore, we can conclude that dynamic magnetic losses is the main mechanism of microwave heating of such particles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Recently, MnNiGe and MnCoGe intermetallic compounds have received a considerable attention due to the coupled tunable martensitic and magnetic transitions as well as giant magnetocaloric effect (MCE) they exhibit. In this work, by doping with Cr and varying of the annealing regime, a merged magnetostructural transition between a ferromagnetic orthorhombic and a paramagnetic hexagonal structure was received near room temperature in Mn1−xCrxCoGe melt-spun ribbons with x = 0.04 and 0.11. Structural and magnetic characterizations have been performed by X-ray diffraction, differential scanning calorimetry and magnetization measurements. It is found that, in ribbons with x = 0.04 (0.11) annealed at 1148 K, the peak value of the magnetic entropy change and the refrigerant capacity through the orthorhombic to hexagonal transition strongly increase with the annealing time from 7.3 (9.4) Jkg−1 K−1 to 10.6 (13.7) Jkg−1 K−1 and from 182 (235) Jkg−1 to 214 (267) Jkg−1, respectively, at 5 T for the time increase from 4 h to 8 h. Compared to bulk alloys of similar composition, the fabricated melt-spun ribbons show much broader working temperature range and a higher cooling efficiency.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we use the exact diagonalization and Monte Carlo calculations to study magnetic behaviors of the 3d-4d double perovskite Sr2CrMoO6. The model is described by a quantum Hamiltonian induced by the hybridization mechanism in Sr2CrMoO6 via the double exchange, considering the transition metal Mo5+ (σ = 1/2, 4d1) cation totally non-magnetic and classical core spins S = 3/2 located at sites of Cr3+ (S = 3/2, 3d3) cations. We have defined a Hamiltonian matrix and determined eigen-energies which are functions of core spins interactions. At ground state, we have found that the ferromagnetic phase of core spins stabilizes the system for the electronic density n = 0.25. To study magnetic properties at finite temperature, we have defined an effective magnetic Hamiltonian for spins, approving the Monte Carlo simulations for systems of high sizes. Thus, the exchange coupling effect, the magnetization and the magnetic susceptibility are investigated for different sizes, and the critical temperature is determined.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Muon spin rotation/relaxation (μSR) and specific heat measurements are presented for polycrystalline LnCuGa3, with Ln = La–Nd, and Sm–Gd. All materials undergo magnetic ordering transitions, apart from non-magnetic LaCuGa3, and PrCuGa3, which shows the onset of short range correlations below 3 K but no long-range magnetic order down to T = 25 mK. While magnetic order in the Ce and Nd compounds is incommensurate with the lattice, the order is commensurate for the Sm and Eu compounds. The strong damping in GdCuGa3 prevents us from determining the nature of magnetism in that system. SmCuGa3 exhibits two precessional frequencies, which appear at different temperatures, suggesting inhomogeneous magnetic ordering or a second magnetic/structural phase transition.© 2017Phase transition in quantum many-body systems inevitably causes changes in certain physical properties which then serve as potential indicators of critical phenomena. Besides the traditional order parameters, characterization of quantum entanglement has proven to be a computationally efficient and successful method for detection of phase boundaries, especially in one-dimensional models. Here we determine the rich phase diagram of the ground states of a quantum spin-1/2 XXZ ladder by analyzing the variation of bipartite and multipartite entanglements. Our study characterizes the different ground state phases and notes the correspondence with known results, while highlighting the finer details that emerge from the behavior of ground state entanglement. Analysis of entanglement in the ground state provides a clearer picture of the complex ground state phase diagram of the system using only a moderate-size model.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work the design and characterization of an omnidirectional in-plane magnetic field sensor are presented. The sensor is based on the Giant Magneto Impedance (GMI) effect in glass-coated amorphous microwires of composition (Fe6Co94)72.5Si12.5B15. For the first time, a circular loop made with a microwire is used for giving omnidirectional response. In order to estimate the GMI response of the circular loop we have used a theoretical model of GMI, determining the GMI response as the sum of longitudinal sections with different angles of incidence. As a consequence of the circular loop, the GMI ratio of the sensor is reduced to 15% instead of 100% for the axial GMI response of a microwire. The sensor response has been experimentally verified and the GMI response of the circular loop has been studied as function of the magnetic field, driven current, and frequency. First, we have measured the GMI response of a longitudinal microwire for different angles of incidence, covering the full range between the tangential and perpendicular directions to the microwire axis. Then, using these results, we have experimentally verified the decomposition of a microwire with circular shape as longitudinal segments with different angles of incidence. Finally, we have designed a signal conditioning circuit for the omnidirectional magnetic field sensor. The response of the sensor has been studied as a function of the amplitude of the incident magnetic field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In an attempt to investigate the effects of punching process on crystal orientations, magnetic and mechanical properties in non-oriented silicon steel, the steel sheet was punched for circular shape of Φ40 mm. The crystal orientations and small-angle grain boundaries were characterized by electron backscatter diffraction (EBSD). The results indicated that the initial crystal orientations within a distance of 200 μm away from the sheared edge were significantly changed after the punching process. In this area, the fractions of the directions with a high value of magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy Ea, 〈1 1 1〉, 〈2 1 2〉 and 〈1 1 2〉 can reach up to 0.619. However, the fractions of the directions 〈0 0 1〉 and 〈1 1 3〉 accounts for only 0.096, which have a lower value of Ea. Moreover, the fraction of small-angle grain boundaries markedly increased in the area of about 200 μm from the sheared edge, which is mainly attributed to the dislocations multiplication and dislocations motion. The magnetic domain structures were characterized by an optical microscope according to the Bitter method. The results showed that the width of magnetic domain in the sheared edge was much larger than that in the center and the patterns also existed a big difference. The Vickers HV0.1 method was employed to measure the microhardness of the sheared edge. It was found that the values of microhardness within a distance of 400 μm away from the sheared edge decreased from 259 to 167 due to the effect of work hardening, which is mainly caused by the dislocations pile-ups near the grain boundaries.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A method is presented for directed transport of superparamagnetic microbeads (SPBs) on magnetic antidot patterned substrates by applying a rotating elliptical magnetic field. We find a critical frequency for transport, beyond which the bead dynamics transitions from stepwise locomotion to local oscillation. We also find that the out-of-plane (HOOP) and in-plane (HIP) field magnitudes play crucial roles in triggering bead motion. Namely, we find threshold values in HOOP and HIP that depend on bead size, which can be used to independently and remotely address specific bead populations in a multi-bead mixture. These behaviors are explained in terms of the dynamic potential energy lansdscapes computed from micromagnetic simulations of the substrate magnetization configuration. Finally, we show that large-area magnetic patterns suitable for particle transport and sorting can be fabricated through a self-assembly lithography technique, which provides a simple, cost-effective means to integrate magnetic actuation into microfluidic systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the ferromagnetic properties of Y3Fe5O12 (yttrium iron garnet; YIG) nanowires deposited on a highly ordered pyrolytic graphite (HOPG) substrate. YIG nanowires with a diameter around 70 nm were formed on the edges of terraces of the HOPG substrate using the step-edge decoration technique and pulsed laser deposition of the YIG. The magnetic field of the YIG nanowires was investigated; a ferromagnetic hysteresis loop was observed in the direction parallel to the nanowires, whereas anti-ferromagnetic hysteresis loops were observed perpendicular to the nanowire growth direction. Vertical and lateral magnetic force microscopy images of the ferromagnetic YIG nanowires revealed that the magnetization directions of the nanowires were parallel to the nanowires, which showed a single ferromagnetic domain.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Iron nanostructures (chains and particles) were prepared by a simple reduction method. The effects of adding NaOH, PEG or PVP, changing c(Fe2+) can lead to different results of microstructure on iron nanochains/nanoparticles. The directional controlled preparation was researched. Their magnetic properties at normal (300 K) and low (5 K) temperatures have been measured, and influences of OH−, polymeric dispersant PEG/PVP, and c(Fe2+) have been investigated in detail. The magnetic properties of nanochains/nanoparticles were studied by controllable microstructure through the adjustment of sort of dispersant and ferrous concentration, which can accomplish the fabrication in accordance with magnetism applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Stripe domains or any other type domain structures with part of their magnetic moments deviating from the film plane, which usually occur above a certain film thickness, are known problems that limit their potential applications for soft magnetic thin films (SMTFs). In this work, we report the growth of micrometer thick c-axis oriented hcp-Co84Ir16 SMTFs with their magnetic moments restricted strictly in plane by negative magnetocrystalline anisotropy. Extensive characterizations have been performed on these films, which show that they exhibit very good soft magnetic properties even for our micrometer thick films. Moreover, the anisotropy properties and high-frequency properties were thoroughly investigated and our results show very promising properties of these SMTFs for future applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic refrigeration based on the magnetocaloric effect has attracted much attention due to its high energy-efficiency, compactness and environmental benignness. Many research activities were devoted to explore a range of potential magnetic materials with large magnetocaloric effect. Here, we report a giant magnetocaloric effect in CoEr2 compound. Magnetic measurements show that the sample exhibits a second order magnetic transition with a TC of 16 K. At a magnetic field change of 5 T, large values of magnetic entropy change (−ΔSmax = 21 J kg−1 K−1) and relative cooling power (RCP = 526 J kg−1) below 16.5 K were observed. The CoEr2 compound with excellent magnetocaloric effect is expected to have effective applications in low temperature range.© 2017 Elsevier LtdDriven by the Internet of Things (IoT), flexible and transparent smart systems have been intensively researched by the scientific community and by several companies. This technology is already available for consumers in a wide range of innovative products, e.g., flexible displays, radio-frequency identification tags and wearable electronic skins which, for instance, collect and analyze data for medical applications. For these systems, thin-film transistors (TFTs) are the key elements responsible for the driving currents. Solution-based materials such as nanoparticle dispersions avail the fabrication on large-area substrates with high throughput processes. In this study, we discuss the integration of ZnO nanoparticle thin-film transistors and inverter circuits on freestanding polymeric substrates enclosing the main issues concerning the transfer of the integration process from a rigid substrate to a flexible one. The TFTs depict VON between −0.2 and 1 V, ION/IOFF > 104 and field-effect mobility >0.5 cm2 V−1 s−1. Additionally, in order to enhance the transistors and inverters performance, an adaptation on the device configuration, from an inverted coplanar to an inverted staggered setup, was conducted and analyzed. By employing the inverted staggered setup a considerable increase in the contact quality between the semiconductor and the drain and source electrodes was observed. As the integrated devices depict electrical characteristics which enable the fabrication of electronic circuits for the low-cost sector, inverters were fabricated and characterized, evaluating the circuit's gain as function of the applied supply voltage and circuit's geometric ratio.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Equilibrium magnetization states in spherical shells of a magnetically soft ferromagnet form two out-of-surface vortices with codirectionally magnetized vortex cores at the sphere poles: (i) a whirligig state with the in-surface magnetization oriented along parallels is typical for thick shells; (ii) a three dimensional onion state with the in-surface meridional direction of the magnetization is realized in thin shells. The geometry of spherical shell prohibits an existence of spatially homogeneous magnetization distribution, even in the case of small sample radii. By varying geometrical parameters a continuous phase transition between the whirligig and onion states takes place. The detailed analytical description of the phase diagram is well confirmed by micromagnetic simulations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structural, thermal, magnetic, magnetocaloric, and magnetotransport properties of the Heusler alloy Ni50Mn35In13.9B1.1 were studied using room temperature X-ray diffraction, differential scanning calorimetry (DSC), field dependent magnetization, and electrical resistivity measurements. Ni50Mn35In13.9B1.1 exhibits inverse and direct magnetocaloric effects in the vicinity of its magnetostructural transition (MST) and at its Curie temperature (TC), respectively. A maximum magnetic entropy change of 16 J/kg K was observed at 295 K for a magnetic field change of 5 T. The values of the refrigeration capacity (RC) at the MST and at TC were found to be 140 J/kg and 230 J/kg, respectively, at μ0ΔH = 5 T. The values of the latent heat (L = 10.8 J/g) and total entropy change (ΔST = 31 J/kg K) have been determined through DSC measurements. The magnetoresistance associated with the martensitic transformation was found to be 56% for a magnetic field change of 5 T at room temperature. The maximum value of the adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad) was found to be 2.2 K/T as estimated from experimental data. The relevant parameters affecting the value of magnetocaloric effects are discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work presents a parametric analysis of the performance of nested permanent magnet Halbach cylinders intended for applications in magnetic refrigeration and heat pumping. An analytical model for the magnetic field generated by the cylinders is used to systematically investigate the influence of their geometric parameters. The proposed configuration generates two poles in the air gap between the cylinders, where active magnetic regenerators are positioned for conversion of magnetic work into cooling capacity or heat power. A sample geometry based on previous designs of magnetic refrigerators is investigated, and the results show that the magnetic field in the air gap oscillates between 0 to approximately 1 T, forming a rectified cosine profile along the circumference of the gap. Calculations of the energy density of the magnets indicate the need to operate at a low energy (particular the inner cylinder) in order to generate a magnetic profile suitable for a magnetic cooler. In practice, these low-energy regions of the magnet can be potentially replaced by soft ferromagnetic material. A parametric analysis of the air gap height has been performed, showing that there are optimal values which maximize the magnet efficiency parameter Λcool. Some combinations of cylinder radii resulted in magnetic field changes that were too small for practical purposes. No demagnetization of the cylinders has been found for the range of parameters considered.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have systematically investigated the exchange bias (EB) effect and low-temperature magnetic state transition in Mn42Cu6Ni42Sn10 Heusler alloy by means of AC and DC magnetization measurements. Experimental results suggest that the martensitic phase is in the state of superparamagnetic (SPM), following that the particles turn into the ferromagnetic (FM) state at the martensitic Curie temperature, and the moments are frozen as the temperature is below 150 K. In addition, EB effect was observed in the phase separated martensitic state, which can achieves about 536 Oe under the field of 500 Oe after field-cooled (FC) to 10 K. First-principle investigations indicate that such a small value is originated from nonmagnetic Cu atoms substitution. The appearance of EB effect can be ascribed to the competition between the FM martensitic phase and spin glass (SG) phase due to the impact of Mn atoms, whereas the nonmagnetic Cu atoms doping would hinder the magnetic aggregation, resulting the small EB value eventually.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Halbach type hollow spherical permanent magnet arrays (HSPMA) are volume compacted, energy efficient field sources, and capable of producing multi-Tesla field in the cavity of the array, which have attracted intense interests in many practical applications. Here, we present analytical solutions of magnetic induction to the ideal HSPMA in entire space, outside of array, within the cavity of array, and in the interior of the magnet. We obtain solutions using concept of magnetic charge to solve the Poisson's and Laplace's equations for the HSPMA. Using these analytical field expressions inside the material, a scalar demagnetization function is defined to approximately indicate the regions of magnetization reversal, partial demagnetization, and inverse magnetic saturation. The analytical field solution provides deeper insight into the nature of HSPMA and offer guidance in designing optimized one.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Severe sensorineural deafness is often accompanied by a loss of auditory neurons in addition to injury of the cochlear epithelium and hair cell loss. Cochlear implant function however depends on a healthy complement of neurons and their preservation is vital in achieving optimal results. We have developed a technique to target mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) to a deafened rat cochlea. We then assessed the neuroprotective effect of systematically delivered MSCs on the survival and function of spiral ganglion neurons (SGNs). MSCs were labeled with superparamagnetic nanoparticles, injected via the systemic circulation, and targeted using a magnetized cochlea implant and external magnet. Neurotrophic factor concentrations, survival of SGNs, and auditory function were assessed at 1 week and 4 weeks after treatments and compared against multiple control groups. Significant numbers of magnetically targeted MSCs (>30 MSCs/section) were present in the cochlea with accompanied elevation of brain-derived neurotrophic factor and glial cell-derived neurotrophic factor levels (p < 0.001). In addition we saw improved survival of SGNs (approximately 80% survival at 4 weeks). Hearing threshold levels in magnetically targeted rats were found to be significantly better than those of control rats (p < 0.05). These results indicate that magnetic targeting of MSCs to the cochlea can be accomplished with a magnetized cochlear permalloy implant and an external magnet. The targeted stem cells release neurotrophic factors which results in improved SGN survival and hearing recovery. Combining magnetic cell-based therapy and cochlear implantation may improve cochlear implant function in treating deafness.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The presented results of first principles calculations show that the tetragonal deformation of Mn2NiB with inverse Heusler structure (Hg2CuTi) leads to a decrease in the total energy of the system. Two minima in the dependence of the total energy of the compound on the c/a ratio are found for c/a = 0.94 and c/a = 1.33. The results indicate that the c/a ratio of 1.33 yields the smallest energy at T = 0 K. The total energy difference between the states of Mn2NiB at c/a = 1.33 and c/a = 1.0 is estimated to be of about 345 K. The Mn2NiB transition from cubic to tetragonal structure can help to avoid a singularity at the Fermi level in the density of states of the parent compound with the cubic Hg2TiCu structure. Martensitic (tetragonal) and austenitic (cubic) phase of Mn2NiB are found to be ferrimagnetic with antiparallel aligned Mn spin moments. The contributions of 3 d states from Ni(C)-eg, Mn(A)-eg and Mn(B)-t2g to the minority peak near the Fermi level are discussed. These states in DOS for minority spins is shifted towards higher energy with the tetragonal distortion c/a > 1.0. Upon the martensitic transition, the intensities of peaks corresponding to the DOS change, taking mutually reversed values.© 2017The critical exponents around the ferromagnetic–paramagnetic (PM-FM) phase transition and the magnetocaloric effect in the nanocrystalline (NC) Cu50Ni50 powders have been investigated. The alloy powder exhibits a second order magnetic phase transition. For a field change of 1 and 7 T, -ΔSMpeak increases from 0.30 to 1.54 J/kg.K, respectively, and the relative cooling power values were found to vary between 43.6 and 271.9 J/kg. The critical behavior has been studied in details by using the modified Arrott plots and critical isotherm plots. The obtained critical exponent values β=0.505, γ=1.062 and δ=3.037 are close to those predicted from the universal theory of mean-field model. This suggests that the magnetic interactions are long range around the Curie temperature, TC. Low cost magnetocaloric NC CuNi powders are good candidates for magnetic cooling applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of hole doping on magnetic properties of LaFe0.5Mn0.5O3 have been investigated. All the ceramics samples La1−xAxFe0.5Mn0.5O3 (A = Ca, Sr and Pb; x = 0 & 0.25) were synthesized at 500 °C by sol-gel method and the particles size were found to be in nanodimension. The samples were characterized by X-ray and electron diffraction, HRTEM and both dc and ac-magnetization measurements. The X-ray and electron diffraction patterns were indexed by cubic Pm-3m space group. The particle size of the LaFe0.5Mn0.5O3 is ∼100 nm, whereas the Pb-doped sample is ∼50 nm and for Ca or Sr doped samples the size is ∼10–30 nm. Both dc and ac-susceptibility measurements suggest that the effect of hole doping and A-site cationic radius in LaFe0.5Mn0.5O3 have no significant role on magnetic properties. However, the particle size plays an important role on magnetic property due to the development of surface ferromagnetic cluster at nanoscale. The competing interactions lead to magnetic phase separation where local ferromagnetic clusters coexist within the antiferromagentic matrix in all the samples.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Integration of ferrite thin films of CoFe2O4 with silicon was an essential step for the development of magnetic and microwave micro-electro-mechanical system (MEMS) devices. This paper reports about the integration of Zn and Mn co-doped CoFe2O4 (Co0.6Zn0.4Fe1.7Mn0.3O4) thin films on silicon wafer surface. The films were deposited by spin coating technique and subsequently annealed at 600 °C (thickness ∼200 nm) and 700 °C (thickness ∼150 nm). Higher values of in plane remanance ratio (33–35%) compared to out of planes (5–13.5%) ones indicate the in plane orientation of the easy axis of magnetization driven by the shape anisotropy of the thin film structure. Upon rise in annealing temperature, coercivity for longitudinal Kerr hysteresis loop increases from 164 Oe to 227 Oe and that for the transverse hysteresis Kerr loop increases from 244 Oe to 586 Oe.© 2017The magnetic insulator Fe3O4-modified flaky Fe85Si9.5Al5.5 (FeSiAl) powders with significantly enhanced electromagnetic wave absorption properties in the frequency range of 2–8 GHz were prepared by chemical co-precipitation. X-ray diffraction (XRD) and scanning electron microscopy (SEM) have confirmed the formation of nanoparticles Fe3O4 precipitated on the flake-shaped FeSiAl. The electromagnetic measurements of the modified flakes presents a nearly invariable complex permeability and decreased complex permittivity in the 2–8 GHz, as well as improved impedance matching performance. More importantly, an excellent microwave absorbing performance with the bandwidth (RL <−10 dB) of 5.36 GHz is achieved in modified sample with the thickness of 1.5 mm, which is a promising microwave absorbing material in 2–8 GHz.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Chromium oxide (Cr2O3) thin films have been synthesized on glass substrates by the spray pyrolysis technique. The structural, morphological and optical properties of the sample have been studied by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Raman spectroscopy, FTIR spectroscopy, scanning probe microscopy and UV–vis spectroscopy respectively. X-ray diffraction results reveal that as deposited film is polycrystalline with a rhombohedral corundum structure and a preferential orientation of the crystallites along the (1 0 4) direction. IR and Raman spectra were recorded in the 100–900 cm−1 range and the observed modes were analysed and assigned to different normal modes of vibration. The direct optical band gap energy value calculated from the transmittance spectra of as-deposited thin film is about 3.38 eV. We employ first principles calculations based on density functional theory (DFT) with the B3LYP hybrid functional and a coupled perturbed Hartree–Fock/Kohn–Sham approach (CPHF/KS). We study the electronic structure, optimum geometry, and IR and Raman spectra of ferromagnetically and antiferromagnetically ordered Cr2O3. The computed results are consistent with the experimental measurements, and provide complete vibrational assignment, for the characterization of Cr2O3 thin film materials which can be used in photocatalysis and gas sensors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the effect of Al3+ substitution on the electrical and dielectric properties of Ni0.25Cu0.20Zn0.55AlxFe2-xO4 ferrites with x = 0.0, 0.05. 0.10, 0.15 and 0.20, synthesized by solid state reaction has been reported. Using two probe method, the DC resistivity has been investigated in the temperature range from 30 °C to 300 °C. Activation energy was calculated from the Arrhenius plot. The electrical conduction is explained on the basis of the hopping mechanism. The frequency dependent dielectric properties of these spinel ferrites have been studied at room temperature by measuring AC resistivity, conductivity (σac), dielectric constant and dielectric loss tangent (tan δ) in the frequency range between 1 kHz and 120 MHz. The study of dielectric properties showed that the dielectric constant and dielectric loss increased with increasing non-magnetic Al ions. The dependence of dielectric constant with frequency has been explained by Maxwell-Wagner interfacial polarization. Cole-Cole plots show semicircular arc(s) for the samples, and equivalent RC circuits have been proposed to clarify the phenomena involved therein. The analysis of complex impedance spectroscopy has been used to distinguish between the grain and grain boundary contribution to the total resistance.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The yttrium nitrate effect on FeSiCr alloy insulating layer thickness and magnetic properties after annealing treatment is investigated in this study. The results showed that a continuous chromium oxide layer was observed on the FeSiCr alloy powder surface after annealing at 800 °C. The addition of a minor amount of yttrium nitrate can significantly slow the FeSiCr alloy powder oxidation rate. However, excessive yttrium nitrate addition accelerated the oxide layer growth. The FeSiCr alloy sample magnetic properties depend strongly on the chromium oxide layer thickness. The saturation magnetization and initial permeability increased with increasing yttrium nitrate and reached the maximum at 0.02 wt% and then decreased as the addition amount was increased to 0.5 wt%. The addition of 0.02 wt% yttrium nitrate into FeSiCr alloy powder can effectively improve the saturation magnetization, initial permeability, quality factor and magnetic loss, which provides a promising candidate for power chip inductor applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of amorphous and crystalline Tb0.67Au0.33 were compared. Amorphous Tb0.67Au0.33 alloy exhibits a spin glass state with a prevailing ferromagnetic behavior with a Curie temperature of 130 K, while the crystalline alloy presents an antiferromagnetic behavior with a Néel temperature of 42 K. Arrott plots show that the amorphous alloy presents a second order magnetic transition while the crystalline state exhibits a field induced a metamagnetic transition. Under magnetic field change of 20 kOe, the maximum magnetic entropy changes were found to be 1.38 and 2.03 J/kg.K, with corresponding relative cooling power of 153 and 40 J/kg for the amorphous and crystalline Tb0.67Au0.33 alloys, respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a ternary sandwich structure of FeCo@RGO@PPy was successfully fabricated by a three-step method. The structure and morphology of samples were characterized by XRD, FTIR, XPS, TEM and FESEM. TEM and FESEM images indicate that FeCo particles with a size of about 20–40 nm are grown on surface of RGO@PPy, between RGO and PPy. VSM results reveal that FeCo@RGO@PPy composite possesses a ferromagnetic behavior, and the electromagnetic wave absorption properties of its were investigated at 2–18 GHz. The maximum reflection loss of ternary composite can reach −40.7 dB at 4.5 GHz and the absorption bandwidth with the reflection loss exceeding −10 dB is 5.7 GHz (3.1–6 GHz and 12.8–15.6 GHz) with the thickness of 2.5 mm, which shows an improved microwave absorption properties compared with FeCo. The microwave absorption mechanisms were also investigated in detail.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ferrite-garnet films of submicron thickness were investigated by ferromagnetic resonance method. It was found that the magnetization of the sample in perpendicular to the surface of the film magnetic field showed an abnormal change in the magnetization and also rotation of the magnetic axis. This behavior of a ferromagnetic material in the presence of a magnetic field can be explained by the expressions for the linear magnetostrictive effect, and the piezomagnetic effect arising from the para-processes operating within a “weak” rare-earth magnetic sublattice which is located inside a unidirectional exchange field of “strong” iron sublattice.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Spontaneous exchange bias can be observed at 5 K after zero-field cooling in Mn0.7Fe0.3NiGe alloy. More interestingly, its sign can reverse from positive to negative with the increase of maximum measurement field. Such results indicate a coexistence of ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic coupling formed at the ferromagnetism/spin glass interface during the initial magnetization process. Hence, the sign reversal would be resulted from the relative strength change of these two types of exchange coupling, which can be tuned by measurement field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The results of investigation of specific heat, thermal diffusion, thermal conductivity, and magnetocaloric effect in manganites Pr0 . 6Sr0 . 4Mn1− xFexO3 (x = 0 and 0.1) in the temperature range 80–350 K and in magnetic fields of 0 and 18 kOe are presented. When the atoms of Mn are replaced by Fe (x = 0.1) atoms, TC shifts toward low temperatures at about 167 K, while the MCE varies insignificantly with ΔSm = 2.05 J/kg K and 2.31 J/kg K for x = 0 and 0.10, respectively, which implies the possibility of regulating the area with a maximum MCE. The phonon mechanism of heat transfer is dominant in the samples studied.© 2017The microstructure, magnetic and millimeter-wave properties of high oriented barium hexaferrite (BaAlxFe12−xO19) thin films with Al doping level x from 0 to 2 are reported. The films were grown on Pt/TiO2/SiO2/Si substrate by Sol-gel method. It is found that with increasing x from 0 to 2 the hexagonal grain disappear, together with Curie temperature dropped from 449 °C to 332 °C and saturated magnetization (4πMs) decreased from 3.8 kG to 1.9 kG, it is attributed to the fact that the Fe ions were substituted by non-magnetic Al ions, leading to the Fe3+-O-Fe3+ super-exchange interaction became weak. The ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) measurement showed that the FMR linewidths is as low as 113 Oe @ 58 GHz, and the FMR frequency shifted to higher frequency range when increasing Al doping level. These result offer the potential application of barium ferrite thin films in tunable millimeter wave devices such as filter, circulator and isolator.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effective anisotropy of Co-based nanowires such as CoFe, monocrystalline hcp Co and polycrystalline Co with a mixture of fcc and hcp grains has been evaluated through micromagnetic modeling based on the magnetization torque simulations. We retrieve the experimental profile of the torque curves and show that the non-harmonic forms observed at low fields correspond to the presence of open vortices at the nanowire ends. Our results show that strong hcp anisotropy of Co cannot overcome the uniaxial character of the effective anisotropy which always remains parallel to the nanowire axis, even in the case of magnetocrystalline easy axis perpendicular to the nanowire. We evaluate effective anisotropy values for monocrystalline Co nanowires with different easy axis orientations and polycrystalline Co nanowires with different mixtures of hcp and fcc grains.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Samples of nanocrystalline iron, promoted with hardly reducible oxides (Al2O3, CaO, K2O), with different average nanocrystallite sizes (20–35 nm) and different distributions of sizes were subjected to magnetization measurements. The measurements in 4–300 K range in field-cooled and zero-field-cooled modes and isothermal (at 2 K and 300 K) magnetization in magnetic fields up to 70 kOe of these samples provided many magnetic characteristics that have been correlated with very complex samples morphologies. Additional magnetic properties of the investigated nanocrystalline material were obtained by studying the ferromagnetic resonance spectra taken at room temperature. The spectra were decomposed on dysonian components and analyzed in terms of different possible magnetic structures that might be responsible for their appearance. The complex morphology and strong interparticle interactions seem to be the main factors that determine the magnetic characteristics of the analyzed samples.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Half-metallic behavior and ferromagnetism are predicted in strained MoS2 with different light elements adsorbed using density functional theory. We find that strain increases the density of states at the Fermi energy for Y doping (Y = H, Li, and F) at the S sites and strain-driven magnetism develops in agreement with the Stoner mean field model. Strain-driven magnetism requires less strain (∼3%) for H doping as compared with F and Li doping. No saturation of the spin-magnetic moment is observed in Li-doped MoS2 due to less charge transfer from the Mo d electrons and the added atoms do not significantly increase the Spin–orbit coupling. Half-metallic ferromagnetism is predicted in H and F-doped MoS2. Fixed magnetic moments calculations are also performed, and the DFT computed data is fitted with the Landau mean field theory to investigate the emergence of spontaneous magnetism in Y-doped MoS2. We predict spontaneous magnetism in systems with large (small) mag netic moments for H/F (Li) atoms. The large (small) magnetic moments are atttributed to the electronegativity difference between S and Y atoms. These results suggest that H and F adsorbed monolayer MoS2 is a good candidate for spin-based electronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe ESD robustness of the lateral insulated gate bipolar transistors based on SOI substrate (SOI-LIGBTs) with two typical latch-up immunity structures, including P-sink well and P++ doping layer beneath the emitter, are compared and discussed. The SOI-LIGBT with P-sink well has the strong ESD robustness and fails at the collector side due to the concentrated current density. The SOI-LIGBT with P++ doping layer fails before it is triggered due to the large surface electric field at the PN junction between P-body and N-drift regions. Considering the comprehensive performances of both devices, the SOI-LIGBT with P-sink well is suggested as the output device, which guarantees high latch-up immunity ability and strong ESD robustness simultaneously.© 2017This paper is to study the flow of heated ferro-fluid over a stretching sheet under the influence of magnetic field. The fluid considered in the present investigation is a mixture of blood as well as fluid-dispersed magnetic nano particles and under this context blood is found to be the appropriate choice of viscoelastic, Walter's B fluid. The objective of the present work is to study the effect of various parameters found in the mathematical analysis. Taking into account the blood has zero electrical conductivity, magnetization effect has been considered in the governing equation of the present study with the use of ferro-fluid dynamics principle. By introducing appropriate non-dimensional variables into the governing equations of unsteady two-dimensional flow of viscoelastic fluid with heat transfer are converted to a set of ordinary differential equations with appropriate boundary conditions. Newton's linearization technique has been employed for the solution of non-linear ordinary differential equations. Important results found in the present investigation are the substantial influence of ferro-magnetic parameter, Prandlt number and the parameter associated with the thermal conductivity on the flow and heat transfer. It is observed that the presence of magnetic dipole essentially reduces the flow velocity in the vertical direction and that helps to damage the cancer cells in the tumor region.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report the structural and magnetic properties of nanocrystalline Cu1−xZnxFe2O4 mixed ferrites synthesized using novel combustion method. The prepared samples are spinel structured and the secondary phase α-Fe2O3 is also present in CuFe2O4. The size of the crystallites ranges between 9.6 nm and 31 nm and the lattice constant increases from 8.342 Å to 8.435 Å. The FTIR absorption bands of CuFe2O4 are observed at 571 cm−1 and 409 cm−1 for tetrahedral and octahedral sites, respectively. These bands are shifting to 547 cm−1 and 397 cm−1 for Zn substitution. Raman spectra show the change in local environment of tetrahedral and octahedral interstitial sites with Zn. The FE-SEM images show that the prepared samples are nano sized and the substitution of Zn decreases the agglomeration. The magnetic study reveals that the saturation magnetizations initially increases from 21.45 emu/g (x = 0) to 44.16 emu/g (x = 0.2) and then decreases at 300 K. The superparamagnetic behavior is observed for samples of x ≥ 0.4 concentration. The temperature dependent zero field cooled and field cooled magnetic measurements confirm the superparamagnetic nature and the observed blocking temperature decreases from 120.4 K to 32.3 K. The hysteresis curves measured at 20 K show the coercivity and it varies from 663 Oe to 70 Oe for increasing Zn content.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a novel step gate-overlapped lightly doped drain (GOLDD) with raised source/drain (RSD) structure (SGORSD) is proposed for TFT electronic device application. The new SGORSD structure could obtain a low electric field at channel near the drain side owing to a step GOLDD design. Compared to the conventional device, the SGORSD TFT exhibits a better kink effect and higher breakdown performance due to the reduced drain electric field (D-EF). In addition, the leakage current also can be suppressed. Moreover, the device stability, such as the threshold voltage shift and drain current degradation under a high gate bias, is improved by the design of SGORSD structure. Therefore, this novel step GOLDD structure can be a promising design to be used in active-matrix flat panel electronics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.NiCrO3 has been proposed as a likely candidate for antiferromagnetic half metallic behaviour. A sample prepared at high pressure adopts the corundum structure with Ni/Cr cation disorder, and is found to have off-stoichiometric composition Ni0.80Cr1.20O3. This material shows complex local magnetic ordering phenomena at temperatures below 120 K but without any long range spin order observed by neutron diffraction. The transition to local ferrimagnetism occurs at 50–100 K, with two distinct regimes at TC1 = 95 and TC2 = 53 K evidencing electronic phase separation driven by variations in local composition. At low temperature the system undergoes a further transition at TC3 = 22 K, assigned to potential freezing of a cluster glass-like state, that results in a substantial increase in magnetic anisotropy. Ni0.80Cr1.20O3 is a bistable relaxor ferrimagnet where magnetic properties are linked to the lattice strain manifold that is determined by the peculiarities in the local chemical composition.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we report a promising approach for the gate recess process with a suppressed current collapse in GaN-based high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) by means of neutral beam (NB). A recessed gate structure has been widely studied as a way to realize normally-off operation in GaN, InP, and GaAs-based HEMTs. Since GaN-based materials are usually etched by dry process, plasma-induced damage is a serious concern. NB is free from electrical charges and UV photons, resulting in an accurate control of etching depth and less plasma-induced damages. In this work, we introduce NB irradiation to the gate interface and measured DC and gate-pulsed output characteristics. The results suggest that NB is applicable for the gate recess etching with suppressing the current collapse.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological (MR) materials are of growing interest for a development and realisation of adaptive components and damping devices. The influence of the magnetic field orientation on the rheological properties of smart materials like MR fluids or magnetic hybrid composites is a key aspect which still is not fully understood, but occurs in almost every real life MR application. To cope with the practical needs and efficiently utilise these smart materials while taking into account their material phenomena experimentally validated practice-oriented models are needed. The authors use a coupled phenomenological approach to adjust and discuss a developed theoretical model based on experimentally obtained data. In addition the data helps to get a better understanding of internal processes and interrelations in MR suspensions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Half tetragonal ZnMnS crystal based on three single layers of Zn, S and Mn was investigated by including spin–orbit coupling in full potential linearized augmented plane waves method. We show that the magnetic anisotropy exhibits a strong dependence with structural cleavage, which induces an out-of plane magnetic easy axis. The perpendicular magnetic anisotropy was calculated to be 1890.9 µeV. The anti-ferromagnetic behavior is displayed between Mn atoms having a magnetic moment of ±3.57 μB with c(2 × 2) magnetic configuration. The results indicate that ZnMnS compound has interesting optical and magnetic properties for spintronics applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We used the mechanical milling to prepare orthorhombic Sm0.12Ca0.88MnO3 samples with the average crystallite size (d) changing from 100 to 139 nm. Their magnetic and magnetocaloric properties were then studied upon magnetization data versus the temperature and magnetic field, M(T, H). The results revealed the samples undergoing the ferromagnetic-paramagnetic (FM-PM) phase transition at the Curie temperature TC ≈ 110 K. Around this transition, the magnetic-entropy change (ΔSm) reaches the maxima. The maximum |ΔSm| values are about 2–4 J·kg−1·K−1, corresponding to relative cooling power of 35–60 J·kg−1, for an applied field H = 30 kOe. The assessments based on Banerjee's criteria and constructing a universal curve for |ΔSm(T, H)| data indicate the samples having the nature of a second-order phase transition. Also, the detailed analyses based on the Curie-Weiss law and magnetic-order exponent prove the existence of the Griffiths phase and magnetic inhomogeneity in the samples. These properties would be changed by changing d.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work proposes the use of tower-like structures (small diameter cylinders) embedded on nanodiscs in order to reduce the minimum size of disc diameter to sustain a vortex as ground state. By simulating the dynamics of nanostructured discs of Py-79, we demonstrate that the geometric modification of piling smaller diameter cylinders on top and bottom of a larger diameter disc, introduces a large out-of-plane anisotropy, which in turn allows for the tailoring of stable vortices, even as the diameter of disc and cylinders are greatly reduced, down to dozens of nanometers. This geometric modification is in contrast to the same result (of decreasing the overall size of structures containing vortices) if we introduce vacancies inside a nanodisc, turning it into a ring shaped structure. Such ring structures, while experimentally easy to achieve and also allowing for a stable vortex to form with a well defined chirality, act as an attractive site for vortices, effectively diminishing or completely eliminating the polarity component of the vortex. The proposed tower structures, however, are shown to not only preserve both vortex chirality and polarity, but also exacerbates the polarity, thus increasing the stability of the vortex ground state by pinning. This result introduces the possibility of creating devices that require a reliable magnetization profile, in the sense that the vortex becomes strongly pinned to the tower, which also has a well defined magnetization, rather than being bound to a vacancy which may potentially collapse the ground state. Upon constructing magnetization phase diagrams for regular discs and discs that contain these tower-like structures, we conclude that the latter are appropriate candidates for a high density, high reliability device, suitable for potential applications that require vortex pinning, such as in biomedicine and computation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The metal magnetic memory signals were measured during dynamic tension tests on the surfaces of the cladding coatings by plasma transferred arc (PTA) welding and the 0.45% C steel. Results showed that the slope of the normal component Hp(y) of magnetic signal and the average value of the tangential component Hp(x) reflect the magnetization of the specimens. The signals increased sharply in the few initial cycles; and then fluctuated around a constant value during fatigue process until fracture. For the PTA cladding coating, the slope of Hp(y) was steeper and the average of Hp(x) was smaller, compared with the 0.45% C steel. The hysteresis curves of cladding layer, bonding layer and substrate were measured by vibrating sample magnetometer testing, and then saturation magnetization, initial susceptibility and coercivity were further calculated. The stress-magnetization curves were also plotted based on the J-A model, which showed that the PTA cladding coating has smaller remanence and coercivity compared with the 0.45% C steel. The microstructures of cladding coating confirmed that the dendritic structure and second-phase of alloy hinder the magnetic domain motion, which was the main factor influencing the variation of magnetic signal during the fatigue tests.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetoelectric coupling of xNiFe2O4–(1-x)HoMnO3 (x = 0.1 and 0.3) multiferroics nanocomposites prepared through low temperature chemical pyrophoric reaction process has been investigated at room temperature. The signature of magnetoelectric coefficient of these nanocomposites is mainly due to the magnetostriction and magnetodielectric properties of the materials. These nanocomposites show the ferroelectric behaviour at room temperature. AC electrical properties of nanocomposites have been studied with applied magnetic fields and temperatures. Nyquist plots at different magnetic fields and temperatures have been fitted using parallel combinations of resistance-capacitor circuits. Moreover, we have estimated activation energy of those composites using Arrhenius relation, which indicates that same kinds of charge carrier are responsible for relaxation process in grain boundaries and grain of the sample. Furthermore, from the analysis of ac conductivity data as a function of frequency is attributed to the large polaronic hopping in the conduction process in the system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the temperature dependence of the spin-torque (ST) driven ferromagnetic resonance in MgO-based magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) nanopillars with a perpendicularly free layer and an in-plane reference layer. From the evolution of the resonance frequency with magnetic field, we clearly identify the free-layer resonance mode and reference-layer mode. For the reference layer, we demonstrate a monotonic increase in resonance frequency and the effective damping with decreasing temperature, which suggests the saturated magnetization of the reference layer is dominant. However, for the free layer, the frequency and damping exhibit almost no change with temperature, indicating that the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy plays an important role in magnetization dynamics of the free layer.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Majority studies on magnetic hyperthermia properties were carried out by modifying the saturation mass magnetization (Ms) of the samples. Here efforts were made to enhance the specific heat generation rate (SHGR) of single domain superparamagnetic (SP) material by modifying its magnetic susceptibility. Well crystallined, inverse spinel structured and close to monosize Fe1−xMgxFe2O4 (x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, & 0.5) compounds with nanosphere geometry (diameter 10 nm) were synthesized by solvothermal reflux method at ≈300°C. In the literature it is reported that magnesium ferrites synthesized at high temperatures yield mixed (normal & inverse) spinel structures. The inverse spinel structure was confirmed by X-ray powder diffraction (XRPD), lattice vibrations and magnetic characteristics of the compounds. The Ms of the compounds decrease with increase of substituent Mg2+ concentration. Under high excitation energy the inter-valance charge transfer whereas under low excitation energy the intra-valance charge transfer process were predominant. The as-synthesized nanospheres were encapsulated by hydrophobic oleic acid and were exchanged by hydrophilic poly(acrylic acid) by chemical exchange process. Estimated magnetic hyperthermia power or SHGR of the x = 0, 0.3 & 0.5 were 11, 11.4 & 22.4 W per gram of respective compounds, respectively, under 63.4 kA m−1 field amplitude and 126 kHz frequency. The SHGR enhances with Mg2+ concentration though its Ms reduces and is attributed to reduced spin-orbital coupling in the compounds with enhanced Mg2+ concentration. This may pave a new way to develop magnetic hyperthermia material by modifying magnetic susceptibility of the compounds against to the reported Ms modification approach. The obtained high SHGR of the biocompatible compounds could be used in magnetic hyperthermia applications in biomedical field.© 2017The structural and magnetic property of amorphous Fe78Si9B13 alloy at different pressures up to 282.1 GPa were investigated by ab initio molecular dynamics simulations. With the pressure increasing, the structural evolution of amorphous Fe78Si9B13 alloy can be approximately divided into three regions, and the reduction of the interatomic distance leads to the exponential decrease of the average magnetic moment per Fe atom. Further, to establish the relationship between structure and atomic magnetic moment at a constant pressure, we focus on two types of polyhedra centered by Fe atoms in amorphous Fe78Si9B13 alloy at 0.0 GPa. The result shows that the magnetic moment of central Fe atom is also influenced by the chemical composition besides the interatomic distance. For central Fe atom, more surrounding Fe atoms correspond to a larger magnetic moment, while the surrounding Si atoms is not conducive to the magnetic moment.© 2017 The AuthorsWe present multiscale calculations to describe the spin transport behavior of the Co/Cu bilayer structure including the effect of the interface. The multiscale approach introduces the connection between the ab initio calculation used to describe the electronic structure of the system and the generalized spin accumulation model employed to describe the spin transport behavior. We have applied our model to atomically smooth and diffuse interfaces. The results demonstrate the huge importance of the use of first principle calculations, not only due to the interfacial coordinates optimization but also the magnetic and electronic properties obtained through the electronic structure. The system including the effect of interface with and without the charge fluctuation are studied. The results indicate that changes of electronic structure at the Co/Cu interface give rise to an interfacial resistance distributed over several atomic planes, similar to the effect of interface diffusion. We argue that even atomically smooth Co/Cu interfaces have properties analogous to a diffuse interface due to the variation of electronic structure at the interface.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In our recent studies inverse spin Hall voltage (ISHE) was investigated by ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) using bilayer FeSi3%/Pt thin film prepared by pulsed laser deposition (PLD) technique. In ISHE measurement microwave signal was applied on FeSi3% film along with DC magnetic field. Higher magnetization value along the film-plane was measured by magnetic hysteresis (M-H) loop. Presence of magnetic anisotropy has been obtained by M-H loop which showed easy direction of magnetization when applied magnetic field is parallel to the film plane. The main result of this study is that FMR induced inverse spin Hall voltage 12.6 µV at 1.0 GHz was obtained across Pt layer. Magnetic exchange field at bilayer interface responsible for field torque was measured 6 × 1014 Ω−1 m−2 by spin Hall magnetoresistance. The damping torque and spin Hall angle have been evaluated as 0.084 and 0.071 respectively. Presence of Si atom in FeSi3% inhomogenize the magnetic exchange field among accumulated spins at bilayer interface and feebly influenced by spin torque of FeSi3% layer. Weak field torque suppresses the spin pumping to Pt layer thus low value of inverse spin Hall voltage is obtained. This study provides an excellent opportunity to investigate spin transfer torque effect, thus motivating a more intensive experimental effort for its utilization at maximum potential. The improvement in spin transfer torque may be useful in spin valve, spin battery and spin transistor application.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electronic and magnetic properties of intrinsic defects in anatase-type ultrathin TiO2 nanotube have been investigated systematically by first-principles calculations. The neutral Ti vacancies (VTi0) could induce a large magnetic moments and long-range ferromagnetic coupling, nevertheless, it is difficult to create a significant amount of VTi0 in nanotube due to its higher formation energy. The neutral oxygen vacancies (VO0) are more easily to form than VTi0 vacancies, and the type of their magnetic coupling is related not only to the kinds of oxygen vacancies but also to the distance of vacancies, and their antiferromagnetic couplings are stable in most cases. Thus, the monovalence positively- and negatively-charged vacancy defects (VO+, VO-, VTi+, and VTi-) in nanotube are predicted. By comparing the formation energies of these neutral and charged vacancies, the VO+ vacancies are more easily formed in nanotube under O-poor condition, and their ferromagnetic couplings are energetically favorable. The VTi- vacancies are more stable under O-rich condition, and they prefer to couple in a antiferromagnetic way. Our work offers a possible route toward high Curie temperature ferromagnetism in TiO2 materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt doped M-type strontium hexaferrite nanoparticles (SrCoxFe12-xO19, x = 0.2–1.2) is synthesized and used as inclusions in Linear Low Density Polyethylene (LLDPE) matrix for developing nano-composites with 60 wt% of these nanoparticles. Absorption performance of the developed nano-composites is evaluated in the X-band. The thickness optimization is carried out for obtaining maximum reflection loss by using the transmission line model (TLM), with measured values of permittivity and permeability of the composite. The best reflection loss is observed experimentally for x = 0.8 with an absorber thickness of 3 mm for which a wide −10 dB bandwidth covering almost the entire X-band is obtained. The composites are light weight and not affected by exposure to water.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A method has been developed in this work for the mechanical manipulation of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs). A helical curve was designed as the capture path to pick up and remove the target nanoparticle on a mica surface by a magnetic probe based on the magnetic force microscope (MFM). There were magnetic, tangential and pushing forces acting on the target particle during the approaching process when the tip followed the helical curve as the capture path. The magnetic force was significant when the tip was closer to the particle. The target particle can be attached on the surface of the magnetic probe tip and then be picked up after the tip retracted from the mica surface. Theoretical analysis and experimental results were presented for the pick-up and removal of MNPs. With this method, the precision and flexibility of manipulation of MNPs were improved significantly compared to the pushing or sliding of the target object away from the corresponding original location following a planned path.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Structural-phase composition and magnetoresistive properties of as-deposited three-layer film systems based on ferromagnetic alloy FexNi100−x (F-layers) and Cu (N-layer) obtained by the method of layer-by-layer condensation are studied. It is shown that spin-dependent electron scattering occurs in the layer thickness range of dN = 5–15 nm and dF = 25–40 nm (cNi < 90%) for as-deposited three-layer films. It is established that the maximum value of the isotropic magnetoresistance at room temperature is observed for three-layer Fe50Ni50/Cu/Fe50Ni50/S films with dF ≈ 30 nm and dN ≈ 6 nm that corresponds to the minimum concentration of Ni in magnetic layers, at which their phase composition conforms to the fcc-FeNi. With decreasing sample temperature from 293 K to 120 K, the value of the isotropic magnetoresistance increases 1.2–2.2 times depending on the concentration of components in magnetic layers.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The coercivity of sintered Nd-Fe-Cu-B magnets is markedly enhanced from 12.57 to 21.70 kOe while the remanence decreases from 13.80 to 13.49 kGs by grain boundary diffusion of TbF3 powder for 2 h. Microstructure analysis suggests that, during the diffusion process, F diffuses into the magnets easily and forms a new F-rich phase. The enrichment of F in grain boundary near the surface leads to the Cu movement into the interior and the Cu reduction in the surface of magnets. Diffusion of Tb leads to an increase of local total rare earth elements content. Under the combined effect of Cu reduction and increase of local total rare earth elements content, grain growth area is formed and further diffusion is suppressed. That excessive Tb diffuses into matrix phase leads to a decrease in remanence. When the grain growth area is removed, the deterioration of remanence recovers to 13.80 kGs without any reduction of coercivity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The alternation of dynamic magnetic characteristics with operating temperature and magnetizing frequency in annealed Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si15.5B7 nanocrystalline alloy core was systematically studied by AC B-H loop tracer and complex permeability approach. It is found that the operating temperature below 160 °C has little influence on core loss when the induction (B) is less than 1.1 T. As B becomes higher, core loss measured at higher temperature becomes larger. The B and remanence (Br) at 80 A/m under power frequency both decline slightly as the temperature goes up. Furthermore, the real part of permeability (μ') increases at first and then decrease with the rise of temperature. The peaks of the imaginary part of permeability (μ'') shift to higher frequency side with decreasing μ’ over operating temperature. In addition, the variations of permeability dispersion with the elevated in the operating temperature of the annealed nanocrystalline core are explained by fitting to Havriliak-Negami (H-N) model, revealing that temperature impact on the magnetic relaxation time.© 2017FeCoB films with gradient B doping were deposited by a composition gradient sputtering method under different sputtering pressure. Good soft magnetic performances with magnetic anisotropy field of 142 Oe and ferromagnetic resonance frequency of 4.82 GHz were obtained at zero bias field. It is interesting to note that the magnetic anisotropy of the films rotates by 90° by changing the sputtering pressure from 0.2 to 0.5 Pa, which can be attributed to the stress transition from compressive to tensile. This provides a possible method to in-situ construct complex magnetic anisotropy by controlling the sputtering pressure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the molecular beam epitaxy growth, the structure and the magnetic properties of the exchange coupled CoO/Fe bilayers on Ag(0 0 1). In situ X-ray scattering shows that Fe grows in registry with Ag(0 0 1) with an out-of-plane lattice parameter that varies with the Fe layer total thickness. The growth of CoO to build an exchange coupled CoO/Fe system impacts the Fe layer even at room temperature. Two different bilayers grown under close conditions are studied. They differ by the ratio of the oxidized Fe layers over the 7 initial Fe monolayers (30% and 40% respectively). Low temperature exchange magnetic coupling with a blocking temperature TB of about 180 K–150 K and similar thermal behavior are observed for the two samples. We studied one sample with synchrotron X-ray resonant magnetic scattering confirming that the magnetization was perpendicular to the surface below TB. Noteworthy, we found that the magnetic easy axis was lying in-plane at room temperature, above TB. These results point to another example of perpendicular ferromagnetism in an ultra-thin film due to an exchange mechanism with an antiferromagnetic layer that rotates the magnetic easy axis from in-plane to perpendicular below TB.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we present a detailed study on the magnetic property and critical behavior in the austenitic phase of Ni43Mn46Sn8X3 alloys with X = Cr and In, which were prepared by an arc-melting method in an argon ambience. The M(T) curve of the Cr sample (X = Cr) exhibits a single magnetic phase transition at the Curie temperature of the ferromagnetic (FM) austenitic phase with TA C = 303 K. In contrast, the In sample (X = In) exhibits multiple magnetic phase transitions, including a magnetic phase transition from a FM state to weakly magnetic state at TM C = 165 K of the martensitic phase, a martensitic transition from the weakly magnetic to the FM austenite phase at TM-A = 259 K, and a magnetic phase transition from the FM to paramagnetic (PM) at TA C = 297 K of the austenite phase. Based on the Landau theory and M(H) data measured at different temperatures, we pointed that the FM-PM phase transitions around TA C in both samples were the second-order phase transition. Our results suggest an existence of the long-range FM interactions in the austenite phase. A small deviation from the mean-field theory of the critical exponents has been also observed pointing out an existence of the inhomogeneous magnetism that could be associated with the presence of the anti-FM interactions in these samples. Besides, their effective exponents βeff(ε) and γeff(ε) have been also calculated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Multilayered Ni80Fe20/Cu film shields were obtained via electrochemistry method with different thickness and number of partial magnetic layers. Magnetic properties and shielding characteristics were investigated as well as function of thickness and number of layers. Difference in magnetic properties for Ni80Fe20 films with different thickness is due to formation of defect layers on the top and bottom film surfaces during electrodeposition processes. These layers can be characterized as layers with high density defects (as a result poor iron content). Main deviation in magnetic properties is typical for thinner films. It was measured DC and AC shielding and results discussed. Maximal value of DC-shielding effectiveness was observed for multilayered samples with small number magnetic layers with large thickness (80–400 μm). The minimal value of DC-shielding effectiveness was observed for the multilayered sample with the minimum thickness of the magnetic layer (5 μm) and maximal number of the layers (80 layers). It is in good agreement with shunting mechanism. In low frequency range maximal values of AC-shielding effectiveness were observed like in case of DC-shielding for samples with small number magnetic layers with large thickness. With frequency increasing the situation was radically changed and AC-shielding effectiveness was higher for samples with maximal number of layers. In the frequency range above 40 kHz AC-shielding effectiveness was sharply decreased due to sharply decreasing of permeability value. As a result it leads to decrease of absorption loses (SEabs.). It was discussed the main shielding mechanisms for multilayered Ni80Fe20/Cu film samples under different external influences. Main contribution in electromagnetic shielding in the range 300 Hz–20 kHz is absorption and reflection processes. In the range 20 kHz–50 kHz main shielding mechanisms are reflection and re-reflection. For 300 Hz–50 kHz frequency range most appropriate to use multilayered structures with large number of thin layers with cardinally different values of magnetic permeability and electrical conductivity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on resistivity and Hall effect in MnGa thin films grown by molecular beam epitaxy on GaAs substrates. Highly (1 1 1)-textured MnGa film with L10 structure exhibits hard magnetic properties with coercivities as high as 20 kOe and spin disorder mechanisms contributing to the Hall conductivity at room temperature. Density functional theory calculations were performed to determine the intrinsic Berry curvature in the momentum space with chiral spin structure that results in an anomalous Hall conductivity of 127 (Ωcm)−1 comparable to that measured at low temperature. In addition to residual and side-jump contributions, which are enhanced by thermal activation, both anomalous Hall conductivity and Hall angle increase between 100 K and room temperature. The present results reinforce the potential of Mn-Ga system for developing Hall effect-based spintronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier LtdMonitoring of soil nutrients is very important in precision agriculture. In this paper, we have demonstrated a micro electro mechanical system based lab-on-a-chip system for detection of various soil macronutrients which are available in ionic form K+, NO3−, and H2PO4−. These sensors are highly sensitive piezoresistive silicon microcantilevers coated with a polymer matrix containing methyltridodecylammonium nitrate ionophore/ nitrate ionophore VI for nitrate sensing, 18-crown-6 ether for potassium sensing and Tributyltin chloride for phosphate detection. A complete lab-on-a-chip system integrating a highly sensitive current excited Wheatstone's bridge based portable electronic setup along with arrays of microcantilever devices mounted on a printed circuit board with a liquid flow cell for on the site experimentation for soil test has been demonstrated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The natural convection heat transfer of a magnetic nanofluid in a differentially heated cavity is investigated with and without an applied external magnetic field. The effects of volume fraction, magnetic field configuration, and magnetic field strength are investigated. Spherical Fe2O3 nanoparticles with a diameter of 15–20 nm are used in the nanofluids. Volume fractions ranging between 0.05% and 0.3% are tested for the case with no magnetic field, while only a volume fraction of 0.1% was tested in an externally applied magnetic field. The experiments were conducted for a range of Rayleigh numbers in 1.7 × 108 < Ra < 4.2 × 108. The viscosity of the nanofluid was determined experimentally. An empirical correlation for the viscosity was determined, and the stability of various nanofluids was investigated. Using heat transfer data obtained from the cavity, the average heat transfer coefficient and average Nusselt number for the nanofluids are determined. It was found that a volume fraction of 0.1% showed a maximum increase of 5.63% to the Nu at the maximum Ra. For the magnetic field study, it was found that the best-performing magnetic field enhanced the heat transfer behaviour by an additional 2.81% in Nu at Ra = 3.8 × 108.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Methods improving the chemical and physical stability of magnetic nanoparticles are important in diverse research disciplines such as catalysis, magnetic resonance imaging, biomedicine, and bioseparation. It is essential that defined nanomaterial characteristics remain unchanged from the start of the nanoparticle production to their final application. A simple, fast and reliable strategy based on a thermal decomposition approach was established to design highly and uniformly loaded iron oxide-shell silica-core nanocomposites. They are formed by maghemite nanoparticles (8.4 ± 1.0 nm) uniformly deposited on mesoporous silica nanoparticles (381 nm ± 111 nm). Their magnetic properties as well as chemical, and mechanical stability were verified by SQUID magnetometry, Raman microspectroscopy, and electron microscopy (SEM and TEM), respectively. The produced superparamagnetic nanocomposites were stable over several months. The coating with organosilanes enables the transfer from nonpolar to aqueous phase which makes the magnetic nanocomposites also applicable for life sciences.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report changes of coercivity, induced magnetic anisotropy, magneto-optical domain structure and frequency dependencies of coercivity and energy loss (up to 10 MHz) associated with the structural modifications produced by thermal treatments under applied magnetic field (field annealing) in toroidal wound cores of Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si15.5B7 amorphous alloy. The thermal treatment (535 °C, 1 h) leads to the typical nanocrystalline structure of α-Fe(Si) nanograins (60–65% relative volume, 10–20 nm average grain size embedded in a residual amorphous matrix, while the magnetic field with the possibility to be applied in two directions to the toroidal core axis, that is in transverse (which is equivalent to the transverse direction of the ribbon) or longitudinal (equivalent to the longitudinal direction of the ribbon), develops a macroscopic uniaxial magnetic anisotropy in the transverse (around 245 J/m3) or longitudinal (around 85 J/m3) direction of the ribbon, respectively. It is remarkable the quasi-unhysteretic character of the cores with these two kinds of field annealing as comparing with that of the as-quenched one. Magneto-optical study by Kerr-effect of the ribbons provides useful information on the domain structure of the surface in agreement with the direction and intensity of the induced magnetic anisotropy. This induced uniaxial magnetic anisotropy plays a very important role on the Hc(f) and EL(f) curves, (f: frequency), being drastic the presence and direction of the induced magnetic anisotropy. In addition, these frequency dependencies show a significant change at the frequency around 100 Hz.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetomotive force (MMF) compensation method is the powerful one for the measurement of open specimen soft magnetic materials parameters at AC magnetization. Although the effective control of the MMF compensation magnetizing process is relatively complicated, the other compensation method properties make this method excellent for precise absolute measurements. Compensation ferrometers (SSTs based on the compensation method) could be improved by more efficient magnetizing process control. This paper deals with the magnetizing process regulator based on the model of the compensation ferrometer magnetizing equipment. The regulator design, its properties, implementation and results of the measurements with described regulator are presented in this paper. The regulator improves the precision of the hysteresis loop measurement by more than ten times. It could be simplified for the IEC method magnetizing equipment.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We propose an experimental technique for extending feedback compensation of dissipative radiation used in nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) to encompass ferromagnetic resonance (FMR). This method uses a balanced microwave power detector whose output is phase shifted π/2, amplified, and fed back to drive precession. Using classical control theory, we predict an electronically controllable narrowing of field swept FMR line-widths. This technique is predicted to compensate other sources of spin dissipation in addition to radiative loss.© 2017In this present paper, the non-equilibrium Green function (NEGF) method along with the density functional theory (DFT) were used to investigate the effect of doping a single transition-metal atom on transport and electronic properties of armchair graphyne (γ-graphyne) nanoribbons. It can be deduced from the results that among the doped TM atoms, Mn and Fe cause stronger polarized currents comparing to Co and Ni. Mn-AGyNR represents the features of a half-semiconductor and behaves like a semiconductor in both up and down spin channels. On the other hand, Fe-AGyNR shows a great potential in spintronic applications due to its half-metal properties. Also our results show the promising application of armchair graphyne nanoribbons in nano-electrical devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The phenomenon of drift motion of single-domain ferromagnetic particles induced by the Magnus force in a viscous fluid is studied analytically. We use a minimal set of equations to describe the translational and rotational motions of these particles subjected to a harmonic force and a non-uniformly rotating magnetic field. Assuming that the azimuthal angle of the magnetic field is a periodic triangular function, we analytically solve the rotational equation of motion in the steady state and calculate the drift velocity of particles. We study in detail the dependence of this velocity on the model parameters, discuss the applicability of the drift phenomenon for separation of particles in suspensions, and verify numerically the analytical predictions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Crystallographically aligned nanocrystalline films of the ferromagnetic spinel CuCr2Se4 were successfully synthesized and their structure and alignment were confirmed by X-ray diffraction and high-resolution transmission electron microscopy. The average size of the crystallites is about 200–250 nm, and their (1 1 1) crystal planes are parallel to the film plane. A good match of the film's electronic structure to that of bulk CuCr2Se4 is confirmed by transverse Kerr effect measurements. Four easy 〈1 1 1〉 axes are present in the films. One of these axes is oriented perpendicular and three others are oriented at an angle of 19.5° relative to the film plane. The magnetic properties of the films are determined by a competition between the out-of-plane magnetocrystalline anisotropy and the in-plane shape anisotropy. Magnetic measurements show that the dominating type of anisotropy switches from shape to magnetocrystalline anisotropy near 160 K, which leads to a switch of the effective easy axis from inside the film plane at room temperature to perpendicular to the film plane as the temperature decreases. At last, a moderately large, negative value of the low-temperature magnetoresistance was observed for the first time in CuCr2Se4 films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.An increase in magnetic coercivity is important for the α″-Fe16N2-like compound with an enhanced magnetization from α-Fe as a new hard magnetic material. In the present study, BaFe12O19 particles were coated with fine Fe3O4 powder produced by hydrolysis of Fe(acac)3 in benzyl alcohol. Smooth magnetization curves were obtained for the composite particles, suggesting they were magnetic hybrids with strong magnetic coupling between the Fe3O4 coating and the BaFe12O19 core particles. The Fe3O4 coating layer was then nitrided by ammonolysis at 150 °C to produce a dual-phase mixture of an α″-Fe16N2-like compound, which we refer to as “α″-Fe16N2”, and residual α-Fe. Smooth magnetization hysteresis curves were obtained for (“α″-Fe16N2”)0.31(α-Fe)0.69/BaFe12O19 particles, and a magnetic coercivity of 199 mT, compared to the value of just 65 mT for (“α″-Fe16N2”)0.57(α-Fe)0.43 powder, indicating magnetic coupling between the core and shell structures. Thus, the hybrid particles exhibited both high magnetization and coercivity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.3He heat capacity of SmFeO3 single crystal was carried out from 0.4 K to 10 K. Magnetization was also checked from 2 K to 300 K. Magnetization fitting obtains a reasonable Θ = −2.16 K, while no signature of magnetic phase transition can be found down to 0.4 K from specific heat, showing |Θ/Tc| > 5.33. Considering the exchange interactions between Sm3+ and Fe3+, Sm3+ spins are frustrated. This gives a new form of spin frustration.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, microstructure, magnetic and microwave absorbing properties of NdxFe85−xCo4B11 nanocomposites (x = 3, 5, 7, 9) flaky-shaped particles prepared by melt spun were investigated. The analyses of XRD spectra suggest that all samples only have the single α-Fe phase. With the increase of the Nd content, the complex permittivity-frequency and permeability-frequency were increased at first, and then decreased with higher Nd content. The resin composites of 70 wt% of these nanocomposite powders showed excellent electromagnetic wave absorption properties in GHz range. A minimum reflection loss of −23.1 dB is obtained at 9.8 GHz for composite Nd9Fe76Co4B11.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the magnetorheological (MR) fluids containing MWCNT/CI (carbonyl iron) complex and graphene/CI complex were prepared and have the better dispersity in silicone oil than CI powders alone. 1, 4-Aminobenzoic acid (PABA) was used as a grafting agent to modify CI powders to have NH2-end-group so that such nanoparticles can adsorb to acid-treated MWCNT or graphene via attraction of NH2 and COOH groups. The MWCNT/CI complex and graphene/CI complex have a structure of carbonyl iron nanoparticles adsorbed to MWCNT and graphene by self assembly, respectively. Because the carbonyl iron particles possessing magnetic permeability in nanometer scale adsorb to MWCNT or graphene which usually has a nanometer-scaled diameter and a micrometer-scaled length in this work, the dispersity of MWCNT/CI or graphene/CI complex in silicone oil is superior than the previous report [15] that the micrometer-scaled carbonyl iron microspheres were coated with multiwalled carbon nanotubes. Among CI (unmodified), MWCNT/CI and graphene/CI, graphene/CI has the best dispersity while MWCNT/CI still has the better dispersity than unmodified CI. At the temperature T = 300 K, the saturation magnetizations of CI, MWCNT/CI, graphene/CI are 208, 211 emu/g, and 204 emu/g, respectively, indicating that MWCNT/CI complex and graphene/CI complex still maintain the saturation magnetization as high as CI without being interfered by the blended MWCNT or graphene. A wide dynamic range of the yield stress adjusted through varying the electric current can be achieved by the MR fluids containing 69 wt% MWCNT/CI and graphene/CI which is useful in a shock absorber or damper. The result of the yield stress indicates the suspended MWCNT/CI particles are oriented more easily toward the direction perpendicular to the flow direction to block the flow stream lines.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.An analytical expression for the energy of Neel skyrmions in ultra-thin nanodots considering exchange, uniaxial anisotropy, Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya, and dipolar contributions has been obtained. In particular, we have proposed for the Neel skyrmion, a general ansatz for the magnetization component perpendicular to the dot, given by mz(r)=[1-(r/Rs)n]/[1+(r/Rs)n], where Rs is the radius of the skyrmion and n is an even integer number. As proof of concept, we calculate the energy of a Neel skyrmion in an ultra-thin Co/Pt cylinder, and we find that the dipolar contribution cannot be neglected and that both Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction and anisotropy play an important role to stabilize the skyrmion. Additionally, we have obtained a good agreement between our analytical calculations and previously published micromagnetic simulations for n=10. For this reliable value of n, we have obtained that for a Dzyaloshinski Moriya constant D = 5.5 (mJ/m2), it is possible to stabilize a Neel skyrmion for Ku in the range 0.4 (MJ/m3) < Ku < 1.3 (MJ/m3), whereas for Ku=0.8(MJ/m3), the skyrmion stabilizes for 5.0 (mJ/m2) < D < 6.0 (mJ/m2). Thus, this analytical equation can be widely used to predict stability ranges for the Neel skyrmion in spintronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Remote plasma sputtering (RPS) offers a high degree of control over the sputtering parameters used to deposit thin metallic films and has demonstrated a capability to control the media grain size distribution. Narrow grain size distributions remain a key requirement for future magnetic media. Here we report a comprehensive magnetometry, X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopy study of how RPS affects the grain size distribution of continuous, non-segregated L10 FePt thin films. These provide a model medium for heat-assisted magnetic recording and more generally for spintronic devices such as magnetoresistive random access memory and spin torque oscillators, where very high perpendicular magnetocrystalline anisotropy is required. Varying the target DC bias voltage, which in RPS can be tuned independently of the plasma generation, produces no meaningful, statistical change in average grain size, 6.5 ± 0.1 nm, for as-deposited, disordered FePt. Annealing at 800 °C creates the well-ordered L10 phase but results in an increased average grain size of 8.3–13.6 nm, and a significantly wider grain size distribution of 6.4–8.5 nm. These results show that whilst RPS is capable of producing well-ordered L10 FePt thin films, it does not offer an advantage in controlling the grain size of FePt, as reported in other thin film systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The R2Co2Al compounds (R = Tb, Dy, Ho, Er, Tm) are known to contain RCoAl-type impurity. In order to suppress the impurity phase in Ho2Co2Al intermetallic compound, nonstoichiometric samples with excess rare-earth Ho were prepared and annealed. Structural analysis indicates that annealed nonstoichiometric Ho42Co40Al20 sample, with 2 at% excess Ho, comprises the Ho2Co2Al phase and minor traces of Ho2O3 oxide. Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the sample have been studied in detail. The alloy undergoes three phase transitions at 9 K, 21 K and 30 K. The multiple transitions and broadening effect of second-order phase transitions (SOT) on peak magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM), result in good refrigerant capacities (RCareas) of 136.9 and 437 J/kg under field changes (ΔH) of 2 and 5 T, respectively. These values of RCarea and their corresponding large −ΔSM peak magnitudes of 9.1 and 18.4 J/kg K under ΔH = 2 and 5 T, respectively, make Ho2Co2Al a promising and competitively good candidate magnetic refrigerant for low temperature cooling applications such as liquefaction of hydrogen gas.© 2017 Elsevier LtdTypical routes for fabricating MoS2-based electronic devices rely on the transfer of as-prepared flakes to target substrates, which is incompatible with conventional device fabrication methods. In this work we investigated the preparation of MoS2 films by magnetron sputtering. By subjecting room-temperature sputtered MoS2 films to post-annealing at mild conditions (450 °C in a nitrogen flow), crystalline MoS2 films were formed. To demonstrate the compatibility of the technique with typical device fabrication processes, MoS2 was prepared on epitaxial magnetic oxide films of La0.7Sr0.3MnO3, and the magnetic behavior of the films were unaffected by the post-annealing process. This work demonstrates the possibility of fabricating electronic and spintronic devices based on continuous MoS2 films prepared by sputtering deposition.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.High-velocity compaction (HVC) has been proposed as an effective approach for the fabrication of nanocrystalline Nd-Fe-B magnets. In this work, the effect of powder size on the density of HVCed magnets has been studied and the anisotropic nanocrystalline Nd-Fe-B magnets were prepared by HVC followed by hot deformation (HD). It is found that a proper particle size range is beneficial to high density. The investigations on the microstructure, magnetic domain structure, and hyperfine structure, indicate that the deformed grain structure and the magnetic domain structure with uniform paramagnetic grain boundary phase give good magnetic properties of HVC + HDed magnets. These magnets also have good mechanical and anti-corrosion properties. The results indicate that HVC is not only a near-net-shape, room temperature and binder-free process but is also able to maintain uniform nanostructure and to achieve good magnetic properties in both isotropic and anisotropic magnets. As a result, HVC can be employed as an ideal alternative process for bonding or hot pressing for the conventional MQI, MQII and MQIII magnets.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe investigated the tunability of the transport and magnetic properties in 7.5 nm La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 (LSMO) epitaxial films in a field effect geometry with the ferroelectric copolymer P(VDF-TrFE) as the gate insulator. Two different switching behaviors were observed upon application of gate voltages with either high or low magnitudes. The application of single voltage pulses of alternating polarity with an amplitude high enough to switch the remanent polarization of the ferroelectric copolymer led to a 15% change of the resistance of the LSMO channel at temperature 300 K (but less than 1% change at 20 K). A minimal shift of the peak in the resistance-temperature plot was observed, implying that the Curie temperature TC of the manganite layer is not changed. Alternatively, the application of a chain of low voltage pulses was found to shift TC by more than 16 K, and a change of the channel resistance by a 45% was obtained. We attribute this effect to the field-assisted injection and removal of oxygen vacancies in the LSMO layer, which can occur across the thickness of the oxide film. By controlling the oxygen migration, the low-field switching route offers a simple method for modulating the electric and magnetic properties of manganite films.© 2017 Elsevier LtdAn analytical model for describing the drain current characteristics of gate-all-around (GAA) tunneling field-effect transistor (TFET) is developed. Starting from potential distribution derived from Poisson's equation in different regions along the channel, drain current model is developed based on Kane's approach. The new model shows a better accuracy than the previously reported models. It is valid for larger ranges of bias conditions and channel length also. In particular, we have taken the effect of drain bias on the source junction tunneling into account. This effect is quite significant for the subthreshold conduction of short-channel devices. The validity of this model has been confirmed with TCAD simulation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Synthesis of Bixbyite phase nanocrystalline (Mn0.8Ni0.2)2O3 is achieved by a sol–gel method. X-ray diffraction pattern of the sample reveals the formation of cubic lattice type nanocrystalline with Ia-3 space group. The high-resolution transmission electron microscopy images show irregularly shaped cubic nanoparticles with average crystallite size of 25 nm. Symmetric anodic and cathodic cyclic Voltammetry curve suggests that the nanoparticles are favorable to fast redox reactions. The hysteresis behavior of the magnetization curve shows the ferromagnetic nature of the sample. Band structure and spin-polarized partial density of states confirm the half-metallic and ferromagnetic behavior of the sample.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.On-line ultrasonic measurements were taken on La0.7Sr0.3CuxMn1−xO3 polycrystalline perovskite materials (with x = 0.05, 0.10, and 0.15), which were prepared using the solid-state reaction technique. X-ray diffraction patterns of the samples confirmed the rhombohedral structure with R3c space group. The obtained X-ray spectra from the energy-dispersive analysis confirmed the elemental composition of the prepared samples. Scanning electron microscopy was used to determine the size of the particles in the samples. The substitution of copper in the Mn site was found to affect the Mn3+/Mn4+ ratio and the density of the charge carriers. The substitution caused an additional disorder that weakened the double-exchange (DE) interaction and reduced the ferromagnetic order. The temperature dependence of the elastic constants derived from the ultrasonic velocities revealed interesting features in the samples. The elastic constants indicated a short-range ferromagnetic to paramagnetic transition at temperatures (TC) of 358, 341 and 328 K for the samples with compositions (x) of 0.05, 0.10 and 0.15, respectively.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis work reports the observations of different geometry and temperature dependencies of electrical characteristics of silicon nanowire transistors with gate length of a couple microns. Several abnormal characteristics degradations were observed. As the gate lengths as well as the source/drain doping level of the devices under investigation were well beyond the punchthrough conditions, these observed characteristic degradations should not be due to conventional short-channel effects. We ascribed these observations to the charge transport along the corners/boundaries of the nanowires. Current enhancements were observed because of the higher mobility and larger density of states at the corners where the surface states have opposite effects on these parameters. Temperature dependence of the threshold voltage shows a linear decrease as the temperature increases. This trend is ascribed to the charge states at oxide/nanowire interfaces. Corners and surfaces of nanowire thus should play an important role for ultra-short nanowire transistors and that calls for shape of nanowire optimization for device design.© 2017 Elsevier LtdCharacterization on an InGaAs-based self-switching diode (SSD) using technology computer aided design (TCAD) aimed for optimizing the electrical rectification performance of the device is reported. The rectifying performance is mainly contributed by a parameter known as the curvature coefficient which is derived from the current-voltage (I-V) behavior of the device. As such, the curvature coefficient of SSD was analyzed in this work, not only by varying the device's geometrical structure, but also by implementing different dielectric relative permittivity of the device's trenches, ranging from 1.0 to 10. Furthermore, the simulations were performed under temperature range of 300–600 K. The results showed that increased temperature degraded the SSD's rectifying performance due to increased reverse current which can deteriorate the nonlinearity of the device's I-V characteristic. Moreover, an improved curvature coefficient can be achieved using silicon dioxide (∼3.9) as the SSD trenches. The cut-off frequency of SSD with zero-bias curvature coefficient of ∼30 V−1 attained in this work was approximately 80 GHz, operating at unbiased condition. The results obtained can assist the design of SSD to efficiently operate as rectifiers at microwave and terahertz frequencies.© 2017To explain three order of magnitude discrepancy between the experimental and calculated magnetic moments due to Zn vacancies in ZnS nanocrystals we study the effect of Zn vacancy distribution in a nanocrystal (NC). We consider small, intermediate, and large quantum dots. For the latter we employ the surface-bulk model. To study Zn vacancy distributions we choose aggregates and uniformly distributed gas in an NC core, on a surface, and both core + surface. From the investigation we find that the uniform distribution of vacancies on a surface is the most favorable configuration for quantum dots of all sizes. Then we investigate the detailed vacancy arrangement on an NC surface. We find that the most likely arrangement if the vacancies are placed along the diagonal of the unit cell square rather than along the square side. The former has the zero magnetic moment what explains the huge reduction in the total magnetization. The small nonvanishing magnetization is probably due to the presence of a small amount of Zn vacancies in the side configuration in a metastable state.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The purpose of this study is to theoretically examine nanoparticle shapes behavior on mass and heat flow of ferrofluid over a rotating disk with the presence of low oscillating magnetic field. Ferrofluid is prepared by water and iron nanoparticles of three different shapes like sphere, oblate ellipsoid and prolate ellipsoid. The problem has been formulated by employing the controllable force into the fundamental hydrodynamic equations and its effect along with particle shape factor on physical properties of fluid is discussed. These equations are converted into a system of ordinary differential equations by employing appropriate similarity approach and then solved by HAM based Bvph2 package. Effects of particle shape, particle volume fraction and magnetization parameter on axial, radial and tangential velocities along with temperature profile are demonstrated through graphically. The results for local Nusselt number are calculated and analyzed and the path for enhancement in heat transfer is also proposed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and magneto-caloric properties of (Gd1−xTbx) alloy thin films and [Gd/Tb] multilayers have been investigated. All the samples had a total thickness of 100 nm and were deposited by DC sputtering. By changing the composition of the system, the ordering temperature (Tc) and the magnetic entropy changes of the compounds could be tuned. The results show that the Tc of the alloy thin films is close to 270 K for x = 0.2. Moreover, creating [Gd/Tb] multilayers with the same thickness and concentration of the studied Gd80Tb20 alloy film enables to strongly increase the relative cooling power, and reach values twice as big as from the corresponding alloys. These results suggest that nanostructuring of [Gd/Tb] multilayers may be a promising route to tailor the magnetocaloric response of materials.© 2017First-principle calculations are used to investigate how an external electric field controls the spin polarization in graphene on chromia, a system of interest in the area of spin field-effect transistors. Both free-standing chromia thin films and graphene-bilayers are considered. The effect of the electric field depends on the thickness of the chromia and ranges from moderately strong and linear effects to very strong nonlinear magnetoelectricity. The graphene modifies and generally enhances the nonlinear magnetoelectric effect. We also find that the external electric field drastically changes the energy-dependent spin polarization in the graphene layers, which is predicted to reach values of up to about 80%.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Based on micromagnetic simulations, we shall demonstrate that influences of hole- or pit-shaped artificial defects on magnetic properties of rectangular submicron ferromagnetic particle are sensitive to the defect location, and dependent in a somewhat complicated way on size and shape of the defects. Generally, these defects may lead the main resonance peak of magnetic susceptibility spectrum to shift to a lower frequency. Our work may provide an effective way to tailor and design static and dynamic properties of submicron ferromagnetic particle by patterning artificial defects.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Effects of capping layer by 5d transition metals (TM = Hf, Ta, W, Re, Os, Ir, Pt, and Au) on Fe/MgO(0 0 1), a typical magnetic tunneling junction, are systematically investigated using first-principles calculation for magnetism and magnetocrystalline-anisotropy (MCA). The early TMs having less than half-filled d bands favor magnetization antiparallel to Fe, whereas the late TMs having more than half-filled d bands favor parallel, which is explained in the framework of kinetic exchange energy. The Os capping, isovalent to Fe, enhances MCA significantly to gigantic energy of +11.31 meV/cell, where positive contribution is mostly from the partially filled majority d bands of magnetic quantum number of |m| = 1 along with stronger spin-orbit coupling of Os than Fe. Different TM cappings give different MCA energies as the Fermi level shifts according to the valence of TM: Re and Ir, just one valence more or less than Os, have still large PMCA but smaller than the Os. In the W and Pt cappings, valence difference by two, PMCA are further reduced; MCAs are lowered compared to Fe/MgO(0 0 1) by the cappings of the very early TMs (Hf and Ta), while the very late TM (Au) switches sign to in-plane MCA.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This article considers a realistic approach to examine the magnetohydrodynamics (MHD) flow of Carreau fluid induced by the shrinking sheet subject to the stagnation-point. This study also explores the impacts of non-linear thermal radiation on the heat transfer process. The governing equations of physical model are expressed as a system of partial differential equations and are transformed into non-linear ordinary differential equations by introducing local similarity variables. The economized equations of the problem are numerically integrated using the Runge–Kutta Fehlberg integration scheme. In this study, we explore the condition of existence, non-existence, uniqueness and dual nature for obtaining numerical solutions. It is found that the solutions may possess multiple natures, upper and lower branch, for a specific range of shrinking parameter. Results indicate that due to an increment in the magnetic parameter, range of shrinking parameter where a dual solution exists, increases. Further, strong magnetic field enhances the thickness of the momentum boundary layer in case of the second solution while for first solution it reduces. We further note that the fluid suction diminishes the fluid velocity and therefore the thickness of the hydrodynamic boundary layer decreases as well. A critical analysis with existing works is performed which shows that outcome are benchmarks with these works.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of nitrogen incorporation on the L10 ordering transformation of CoPt thin films deposited by dc magnetron sputtering on MgO substrate with/without TiN seed layers has been investigated. Without TiN seed layer, CoPt film is subjected to a tensile stress, and the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) decreases with N2 gas flow ratio. This is due to the degradation of tensile stress, which is proven to be beneficial to the ordering transformation of L10 CoPt. On the contrary, when sputtered on TiN seed layer, CoPt film is subjected to a compressive stress and the PMA increases with N2 gas flow ratio. The increase of PMA is due to the increase in equilibrium vacancy concentration, which also promotes the diffusion of Co and Pt atoms during annealing. On quartz substrate, the maximum perpendicular coercivity of 11 kOe was obtained at the CoPt/TiN bilayer films with 50% partial N2 gas flow ratio after post annealing at 700 °C. By partially flowing nitrogen during the deposition, a 200 °C reduction of ordering temperature was also obtained.© 2017 Elsevier LtdElectro-optic modulation is a key function in optical data communication and possible future optical computing engines. The performance of modulators intricately depends on the interaction between the actively modulated material and the propagating waveguide mode. While high-performing modulators were demonstrated before, the approaches were taken as ad-hoc. Here we show the first systematic investigation to incorporate a holistic analysis for high-performance and ultra-compact electro-optic modulators on-chip. We show that intricate interplay between active modulation material and optical mode plays a key role in the device operation. Based on physical tradeoffs such as index modulation, loss, optical confinement factors and slow-light effects, we find that bias-material-mode regions exist where high phase modulation and high loss (absorption) modulation is found. This work paves the way for a holistic design rule of electro-optic modulators for on-chip integration.© 2017 Elsevier LtdOn-chip integrated solenoid inductors with multilayered nanogranular magnetic cores have been designed and fabricated on silicon wafers. Both decoupled and coupled inductors with multilayered magnetic cores were studied. For the decoupled inductor, an inductance of 14.2 nH or an equivalent inductance area density greater than 100 nH/mm2 was obtained, which is about 14 times of that of the air-core inductor, and the quality factor is 7.5 at 130 MHz. For the coupled inductor, an even higher peak quality factor of 17 was achieved at 300 MHz, however, the inductance area density decreased to 34 nH/mm2. The reason of the enhanced peak quality factor was attributed to less spike domains on the edge of the closure-loop shaped magnetic core, and therefore higher permeability and more uniform uniaxial anisotropy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The zero-temperature phase diagrams of the antiferromagnetic Union Jack and checkerboard lattices, with spin one and an easy-plane single anisotropy term, are studied using the SU(3) Schwinger boson formalism (also known as flavor wave theory). We find that the Union Jack lattice has a quantum phase transition (QPT) at J2/J1 = 0.707 between a Néel and a collinear phase, while the checkerboard lattice has a QPT at J2/J1 = 0.785, from the Néel to a magnetically disordered phase. The ground state phase diagrams of the two models are different, both from each other and from that of the square lattice antiferromagnet with all the next nearest neighbors. For the checkerboard lattice, we calculate the spin gap and the ground state energy in the disordered phase. This phase is a candidate for a spin liquid state.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.ZnFe2-xInxO4 (x = 0, 0.05, 0.1 and 0.15) nanoparticles have been prepared by solution combustion synthesis method. The effects of In3+ substitution on the cation distribution between tetrahedral and octahedral sites in the spinel structure, and on the magnetic properties were investigated by X-ray diffraction, Raman spectroscopy, Mössbauer spectroscopy and vibrating sample magnetometer methods. The results showed that the indium preferentially occupied the tetrahedral sites and pushed Fe3+ cations to the octahedral sites. The magnetic measurements revealed that the saturation magnetization decreased from 11.8 to 2.2 emu/g, because of the reduction in total moments with the In3+ substitution and redistribution of cations between the tetrahedral and octahedral sites.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we have investigated structural, transport, magnetic, magnetocaloric (MC) properties and critical exponents analysis of the (Ni2.1−xCox)Mn0.9 Ga (x = 0, 0.04, 0.12 and 0.2) Heusler alloys. For all compositions, cubic austenite (A) phase with metallic character is observed at room temperature (RT). With increasing of Co content, magnitude of resistivity decreases, whereas residual resistivity (ρ0) and electron scattering factor (A) increases linearly. Magnetic measurements exhibit that ferromagnetic (FM) Curie temperature (TCA) increases towards RT by increasing Co concentration. All samples show conventional MC and maximum magnetic entropy change (ΔSMpeak) of −2.8 Jkg−1 K−1 is observed for x = 0.12 at 147 K under 5 T. Further, hysteresis is observed between cooling and warming cycles around FM-PM (TCA) transition in x = 0, 0.04 samples, which suggests that first order nature of transition. However, there is no hysteresis across TCA for x = 0.12 and 0.2 samples suggesting second-order nature of the transition. The critical exponents are calculated for x = 0.12 sample around TCA using Arrott plot and Kouvel-Fisher method, the estimated critical exponents are found closer to the mean-field model reveals the long range ferromagnetic ordering in this composition.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe report the formation of new ferromagnetic (FM) states in antiferromagnetic (AFM) NiO at the interface with FM La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 (LCMO). The LCMO/NiO heterostructures exhibit an exchange bias field of 209 Oe that vanishes as the temperature rises above 90 K. A new magnetization temperature at 90 K is observed and can be ascribed to Ni3+-O-Mn3+ superexchange interactions. Mn 3 s and Ni 3p core-level spectra, measured by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, show a direct evidence of charge transfer effects of the type Mn4+-Ni2+ → Mn3+-Ni3+ at the interface region. The valence band offset (VBO) at the LCMO/NiO interface can be determined to be ΔEVBO ∼ 0.77 eV. The valence band of LCMO is shifted to higher binding energy compared with NiO. Thus, charge transfer occurred because of the shifting of the valence band edge at the heterostructure interfaces. We speculate that the superexchange interactions of the Ni3+ and Mn3+ at the interface give rise to the novel low-temperature FM order and the magnetic regions that pin the FM LCMO layer as the temperature decreases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.MHD natural convection of Cu-water nanofluid in a square porous enclosure is investigated using a parallel LBM code, considering temperature dependence of viscosity and viscous dissipation. Effects of nanofluid concentration (φ=0–0.12), Rayleigh (Ra =103–106), Hartmann (Ha = 0–20) and porous-fluid thermal conductivity ratio (K∗ = 1–70) on heat transfer and entropy generation are investigated. It is shown that K∗ is a very important parameter, and porous media with low K∗ numbers can confine convection effects, but by increasing K∗ both conduction and convection effects can substantially improve. Also, magnetic field always has negative impact on Nu, however this impact can be controlled by φ and K∗. A magnetic instability has also observed in Ra = 104, and Nu exhibits a sinusoidal variation with Ha. It is proved that, depending on K∗, Ra and Ha values, use of nanofluid with porous media to enhance heat transfer can be either beneficial or detrimental. Also, for given K∗, Ra and Ha numbers an optimal φ exists to improve heat transfer. Finally, entropy generation study performed and results state that in low and high Ra values the thermal and frictional entropy generation are respectively dominant, while for moderate Ra they have the same order of magnitude.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Doping spinel structure with large rare earth ions can alter the physical properties of the lattice, which can be used for tuning the magnetic and electrical properties of the ferrite material. We investigated the effect of rare earth doping on the crystal properties such as magnetoimpedance. The X-ray and HRTEM data revealed that the strain increases with increasing the ionic radius of the rare-earth. The Study implemented three types of rare earth, namely Dy, Gd, and Sm. The rare earth ions are in the Spinel crystal of Mn-Cr ferrite. The magnetoimpedance showed all negative slope, with the Gd-doped Mn-Cr ferrite sample, have the giant magnetoimpedance up to 60% drop in impedance at electric field frequency 10 kHz. The magnetisation and remanence of the samples were correlated to the microstrain, in which the magnetisation and remanence of the rare earth doped Mn-Cr ferrite samples decrease as the microstrain increases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the investigation of the low temperature magnetic state of the polycrystalline Y0.5Ca0.5MnO3 compound is presented through the magnetic and magnetocaloric effect. As predicted earlier, in the absence of the no long range magnetic ordering in this compound, however a pounced peak in magnetocaloric effect was found at T ∼ 50 K. Magnetic properties also reveals such behavior at the low temperature regime. The numerical values of the magnetization is far below to the theoretical estimated values (considering ferromagnetic ordering of Mn spins) up to 70 kOe external magnetic field at the low temperature region (T = 2 K). Astonishingly, the bifurcation between the zero field cooled and field cooled magnetization is present in magnetization as a function of temperature data measured at high values of the magnetic field (H = 70 kOe). The overall responses of the compound indicate glassy nature at the low temperature region (T < 100 K) which is predominant below T ∼ 50 K and manifested as a pronounced peak in magnetocaloric effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of arc-melted polycrystalline Ni43Mn46−xAlxIn11 (x = 0, 0.5 and 1.0) alloys have been investigated by X-ray powder diffraction, scanning electron microscope and magnetic measurements. It is found that all investigated alloys undergo a first-order structural phase transition from austenite (cubic) to martensite (tetragonal) structure on cooling. According to temperature dependent magnetization measurements, the martensitic and magnetic phase transition temperatures decrease by substituting small amounts of Al for Mn in Ni43Mn46In11 alloy. Inverse magnetic entropy changes and relative cooling power (RCP) values are found 5.10, 9.63, 11.42 J kg−1 K−1 and 57.4, 60.67, 65.04 J kg−1 for x = 0, 0.5 and 1.0 alloys for a magnetic field change of 2 T, respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Latent magnetization in the multiferroics can be achieved via the structural distortion with respect to particle size and destroying the spiral spin structure, which plays the vital role in high-performance applications. In this investigation, multifunctional single phase Bi1−xLaxFe1−yCoyO3 nanomaterials were synthesized by co-precipitation technique. The chemical composition, phase genesis, morphology and thermal characteristics of the Bi1−xLaxFe1−yCoyO3 were studied by FTIR, XRD, SEM/EDS, TEM and TGA. XRD studies confirmed single phase distorted rhombohedral structure in Bi1−xLaxFe1−yCoyO3. The novelty in magnetic behavior of the Bi0.85La0.15Fe0.75Co0.25O3 multiferroic at room temperature showed both ferro and anti-ferromagnetic nature with higher order remanent magnetization among other nanocomposites in this study. This magnetic anomaly in Bi0.85La0.15Fe0.75Co0.25O3 is due to doping and size effects on the crystal structure that leads to spin-orbit interactions. Besides, Bi0.85La0.15Fe0.75Co0.25O3 integrated graphene oxide (GO) nanocomposite has shown the change in the magnetic hysteresis that indicates the effect of the semiconducting behavior of GO on the ordered magnetic moments in the multiferroic. This kind of magnetic anomaly could form advanced multiferroic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.With the intention to reduce the Nd content in Nd2Fe14B-type alloys, 20 at.% Ce and 0.5 at.% Nb substituting Nd and Fe in the Nd13Fe82B5 alloys were previously employed to improve successfully the coercivity and the thermal stability without the energy product reduction. In this study, a light increase of the remnant polarization Jr was observed in (Nd0.8Ce0.2)13Fe82−xNbxB5 alloy at x = 0.5 and x = 1.0, resulting from the increasing amount of α-Fe phase. The optimum magnetic properties obtained with 0.5 at.% Nb doping are Hcj = 13.1 kOe, Jr = 0.79 T, (BH)max = 13.3 MGOe, respectively. Besides, the coercivity Hcj and maximum energy product (BH)max for the melt-spun ribbons with 0.5 at.% Nb addition are higher than those of the Nb-free ribbons in the temperature range of 300–450 K. Both the variations of Curie temperature Tc and a increase of lattice constants a and c of the hard magnetic phase with Nb addition imply that some of Nb atoms may directly enter into the hard magnetic phase, occupying the Fe sites. With the analysis on the demagnetization curve, Henkel curve and the observation of transmission electron microscope (TEM), the results indicate that a small amount of Nb can enhance the coercivity and exchange coupling though improving the microstructure of alloys.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Basal (hexagonal) magnetocrystalline anisotropy of iron borate FeBO3, including crystal field and dipole-dipole contributions, is discussed in detail. Previously, the latter contribution had been ruled out on the basis of symmetry; indeed, considering the magnetic dipole-dipole interaction in the approximation of point dipoles, only uniaxial magnetocrystalline anisotropy is accounted for. In the present work we consider the dipole-dipole interaction energy for extended dipoles and calculate the dipole-dipole contribution to basal magnetocrystalline anisotropy for two different models of an extended dipole: a pair of fictitious magnetic charges and a circular current loop. A comparison between theoretical expressions developed and experimental results obtained by antiferromagnetic resonance allows estimating the effective size of magnetic dipoles and calculating the dipole-dipole contribution to basal magnetocrystalline anisotropy constants of iron borate.© 2017 The AuthorsThe long-range magnetic field is the most time-consuming part in micromagnetic simulations. Computational improvements can relieve problems related to this bottleneck. This work presents an efficient implementation of the Fast Multipole Method [FMM] for the magnetic scalar potential as used in micromagnetics. The novelty lies in extending FMM to linearly magnetized tetrahedral sources making it interesting also for other areas of computational physics. We treat the near field directly and in use (exact) numerical integration on the multipole expansion in the far field. This approach tackles important issues like the vectorial and continuous nature of the magnetic field. By using FMM the calculations scale linearly in time and memory.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Complex permeability and permittivity spectra of Fe50Co50/Cu hybrid granular composite materials have been studied in the RF to microwave frequency range. At low Cu particle content, the Fe50Co50/Cu hybrid sample shows a metallic percolative property with the electrical conductivity value about 0.1 S/cm. However, the low frequency plasmonic (LFP) state with negative permittivity (ENG) spectrum was not observed. An abrupt increase of electrical conductivity takes place at 14 to 16 vol% Cu content where the conductivity becomes above 1.0 S/cm; the Fe50Co50/Cu composite possesses the LFP state with negative permittivity spectrum below a characteristic frequency. The complex permittivity spectra in the LFP state can be described by the Drude model. Magnetic permeability spectrum in the LFP state showed a broad frequency dispersion above 10 MHz; a small negative permeability (MNG) dispersion was observed from 2 to 10 GHz. Consequently, the double negative (DNG) electromagnetic property with MNG and ENG was realized in the microwave range for the Cu content of 26 and 30 vol%.© 2017Phenomenological Landau theory is used to study an interaction between structural and magnetic subsystems in a crystal in the vicinity of phase-transition lines. It is demonstrated that the twist-induced severe plastic deformation results in a forced onset of inhomogeneous distribution in the magnetic subsystem. A nonsinusoidal spatial modulation of magnetic and structural order parameter moduli is found to arise near the lines of magnetic or structural phase transition. The obtained results permit to construct various distributions of ferromagnetic vector in crystals under twist-induced severe plastic deformation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The nanohyperthermia investigation of superparamagnetic La0.77Sr0.23MnO3 nanoparticles synthesized by hydrothermal method has been carried out. The synthesized nanoparticles are found to be highly uniform in size and shape with average particle size 18 nm. Structural analysis confirms the pseudo-cubic perovskite crystal structure with space group of (R3c). The magnetization versus applied magnetic field (M-H) hysteresis loops measurements revealed the superparmagnetic nature of the synthesized nanoparticles. The induction heating of synthesized nanoparticles for their applications in nanohyperthermia has been studied. The in vitro cytotoxicity test of the synthesized superparamagnetic nanoparticles has been probed by evaluating the viability of HeLa (Human Negroid Cervix Epitheloid Carcinoma) cell lines. The mechanism responsible for nanohyperthermia heating of the synthesized nanoparticles has been discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Different matrix and graphite morphologies were generated by a special heat treatment in three chemically different series of flake graphite cast iron samples. As cast, furnace cooled and air cooled samples were investigated. The length of graphite particles and the pearlite volume of samples were determined by metallographic examination and these parameters were compared with the nondestructively measured magnetic parameters. Magnetic measurements were performed by the method of Magnetic Adaptive Testing, which is based on systematic measurement and evaluation of minor magnetic hysteresis loops. It was shown that linear correlation existed between the magnetic quantities and the graphite length, and also between the magnetic quantities and the relative pearlite content in the investigated cast iron. A numerical expression was also determined between magnetic descriptors and relative pearlite content, which does not depend on the detailed experimental conditions.© 2017Suspensions of magnetic nanoparticles in suitable carrier liquids, denoted as ferrofluids, are in the focus of current research in the biomedical area. Those fluids can be potentially used for the treatment of cancer by coupling chemotherapeutic agents and accumulating them in the diseased region with the help of external magnetic fields or by artificially local induced heating. Those applications rely on the help of external magnetic fields, which are well known to drastically influence the physical behaviour of ferrofluids. This study investigates the changing viscosity of a biocompatible ferrofluid in a flow situation close to the situation found in a biomedical application. For this purpose blood as diluting agent and thin capillaries have been utilised. The strong magnetoviscous effects found lead to the assumption of quite big changes of the microstructure due to the external magnetic fields, which was investigated and quantified using a microscopic setup. In the result an increases of the structure size as well as faster structure formation in the stronger magnetic fields were observed. Moreover, with increasing duration of the applied magnetic field the size of the structures increases too. The observed process of the structure formation is reversible.© 2017Fe56Mn20Ga24, Fe46Mn35Ga19 and Fe39Mn25Ga36 Heusler alloy (HA) films are investigated. It is shown that as-deposited Fe-Mn-Ga films are fine crystalline with a body-centered cubic (BCC) structure. Annealing of the films leads to the formation of a face-centered cubic (FCC) structure. The BCC to FCC transformation results in a drastic increase in the magnetization, the Curie temperature as well as in a change of the sign of temperature coefficient of resistivity from negative to positive. These effects are discussed in terms of band structures of L21 and L12 phases of stoichiometric Fe2MnGa HA.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A mixed spin-1/2 and spin-3/2 Ising model on a decorated square lattice with a nearest-neighbor interaction, next-nearest-neighbor bilinear interaction, three-site four-spin interaction and single-ion anisotropy is exactly investigated using a generalized decoration-iteration transformation, Callen-Suzuki identity and differential operator technique. The ground-state and finite-temperature phase boundaries are obtained by identifying all relevant phases corresponding to minimum internal or free energy of the system. The thermal dependencies of magnetization, correlation functions, entropy and specific heat are also calculated exactly and the most interesting cases are discussed in detail.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The electronic and thermoelectric properties of two nonmagnetic Hg2CuTi-type or called inverse Heusler semiconductors Sc2FeSi and Sc2FeGe are predicted by using first principles calculations and Boltzmann transport theory. The band gaps of Sc2FeSi and Sc2FeGe are 0.54 eV and 0.60 eV, respectively. Their zero total magneticmoments both satisfy the Mt = Zt-18 while not the Mt = Zt-24 rule. The good thermoelectric properties are achieved under the condition of electron doping. At the room temperature 300 K, the peak value of Seebeck coefficient is −592.02 μVK−1 for Sc2FeSi, and −609.38 μVK−1 for Sc2FeGe by electron doping. The maximum power factor is 48.77(1014 μW cm−1 K−2 s−1) for Sc2FeSi and 47.11(1014 μW cm−1 K−2 s−1) for Sc2FeGe with electron doping concentration −2.29 × 1026 m−3 and −2.42 × 1026 m−3, respectively, which are close to the power factor of well-known thermoelectric material Bi2Te3, indicating their potential applying values for thermoelectric devices.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this work we report on the development of Giant Magnetoresistive (GMR) sensors for off-line current measurements in standard integrated circuits. An ASIC has been specifically designed and fabricated in the well-known AMS-0.35 μm CMOS technology, including the electronic circuitry for sensor interfacing. It implements an oscillating circuit performing a voltage-to-frequency conversion. Subsequently, a fully CMOS-compatible low temperature post-process has been applied for depositing the GMR sensing devices in a full-bridge configuration onto the buried current straps. Sensitivity and resolution of these sensors have been investigated achieving experimental results that show a detection sensitivity of about 100 Hz/mA, with a resolution of about 5 μA.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We apply Monte Carlo simulation techniques to study the magnetic behavior of a mixed Ising system on a square lattice, where spins SA=±3/2,±1/2 alternate with spins σB=±5/2,±3/2,±1/2 in two interpenetrating sublattices A and B, respectively. The Hamiltonian of the system contains an exchange interaction between nearest neighbors and a longitudinal magnetic field. In order to understand the differences between a mixed Ising system with competing interactions with one with cooperating ones, we study both cases, the ferrimagnetic and the ferromagnetic exchange interactions. We calculate the dependence of the total magnetization, the sublattice magnetizations, the energy, and the magnetic susceptibility, with the magnetic field, and their temperature dependence for a fixed field. We found that under the influence of the magnetic field the ferrimagnetic system presents an interesting phenomena associated with a reversal of the sublattice magnetizations at low temperatures. We found that our system has no compensation temperatures. In both, the ferri and the antiferromagnetic cases, the magnetic field smooths the transition between the ordered and the paramagnetic phase. Finally we present a phase diagram with the critical temperatures in terms of the magnetic field for the ferri and ferromagnetic cases.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA review of metal rich and nitrogen rich (N-rich), low-temperature grown InxGa1−xN is provided, focusing on two low-temperature approaches that have resulted in non-phase separated InxGa1−xN. The metal modulated epitaxy (MME) and N-rich, low temperature approaches to the reduction of defects in InxGa1−xN are described and are capable of growing InxGa1−xN throughout the miscibility gap. MME films remain smooth at all thicknesses but show device quality material primarily for x < 0.2 and x > 0.6. Low temperature, N-rich grown films show a critical thickness extend well beyond the theoretical values and results in slower relaxation through the 0.2 < x < 0.6 range most interesting for light emitters and solar cells. This reduced defect density results in improved optical emission, but due to increased roughening with increased thickness, low temperature, N-rich films are limited to thin layers. Future thick InxGa1−xN substrates are necessary to increase design freedom, as well as improve optoelectronic device performance. Initial results with films up to 800 nm are shown to display evidence of defect annihilation which could be promising for future thick optoelectronic templates and thick devices.© 2017 Elsevier LtdAmorphous oxide semiconductors (AOSs) based on indium oxides are of great interest for next generation ultra-high definition displays that require much smaller pixel driving elements. We describe the scaling behavior in amorphous InZnO thin film transistors (TFTs) with a significant decrease in the extracted field-effect mobility μFE with channel length L (from 39.3 to 9.9 cm2/V·s as L is reduced from 50 to 5 μm). Transmission line model measurements reveal that channel scaling leads to a significant μFE underestimation due to contact resistance (RC) at the metallization/channel interface. Therefore, we suggest a method of extracting correct μFE when the TFT performance is significantly affected by RC. The corrected μFE values are higher (45.4 cm2/V·s) and nearly independent of L. The results show the critical effect of contact resistance on μFE measurements and suggest strategies to determine accurate μFE when a TFT channel is scaled.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The gyroscopic g factor, g′, of FeCo nanogranules embedded in a matrix of MgF2 (FeCo-MgF2) was determined by measuring the magnetic-field generation from a rotating sample due to the Barnett effect. The g′ value of the FeCo-MgF2 is estimated to be 1.76 ± 0.11. The orbital contribution to the magnetic moment in the FeCo nanogranules was found to be quite large compared with that in bulk FeCo, being consistent with a density-functional-theory calculation that shows that the orbital magnetic moment may increase at the FeCo/MgF2 interfaces. The result suggests that the orbital magnetic moment is enhanced by symmetry breaking at the surface of the FeCo nanogranules.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.First principles calculations are reported on perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) in nearly fully compensated ferrimagnetic Heusler compound Mn0.75Co1.25VIn. The structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Mn2−xCoxVIn Heusler compounds (x = 0.0, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75, 1.0, 1.25, and 1.75) have been investigated using Density Functional theory (DFT) as implemented in the Vienna ab initio simulation package (VASP). The Perdew Burke Ernzerhof parametrization of the generalized gradient approximation (GGA) was used to treat the exchange and correlation in the system. The crystal structure of the compounds with x = 0.75, 1.00 and 1.25 are found to be tetragonally distorted. While the former exhibits inplane magnetocrystalline anisotropy (IMA) energy of 0.035 meV, the latter two exhibit perpendicular magnetocrystalline anisotropy (PMA) energy of 11.700 meV and 96.800 meV respectively. Additionally, the magnetic moments for x = 0.75 and 1.25 are found to be ∼0.5 µB/f.u. while for x = 1.00, it is found to be ∼0 µB/f.u., in agreement with the Slater Pauling rule for half metallic systems. Through Co replacement of Mn in Mn2VIn which is not half metallic at the optimized volume, a composition whose crystal structure is tetragonally distorted is found, which is not only a highly spin polarized nearly fully compensated ferrimagnet but also exhibits PMA.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on the magnetocaloric effect in Gd100-xBx (x = 0, 10, 15) cold rolled ribbons. A moderate entropy change ΔS = 5 J/kg·K and adiabatic change of ΔT = 4.8 K were observed for the as-cast materials in an external magnetic field of 3 T which is less by 20% in comparison with the pure gadolinium metal. It was found that a significant (up to 70%) depression of magnetization and magnetocaloric properties developed in the course of plastic deformation can completely be restored by means of a high temperature heat treatment. It is concluded that cold rolling is one promising technique for producing foil shaped magnetocaloric materials suitable for designing heat exchangers of magnetic cooling devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present results of micromagnetic simulations of thin ferromagnetic nano hemispheroidal shells with sizes ranging from 5 to 50 nm (inside dimensions). Depending on the geometrical and magnetic parameters of the hemispheroidal shell, there exist three different magnetic phases: easy axis, onion and vortex. The profile for the vortex magnetization distribution is analyzed and the limitations and applicability of different vortex ansatzes are discussed. In addition, we investigate the total energy density for each of the magnetic distributions as a function of the hemispheroidal shell dimensions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fe1.2Co films with various thicknesses were prepared on glass substrates by pulsed laser deposition (PLD). The Fe1.2Co crystal structure exhibited a preferred orientation in the <1 1 0> direction. Also, we found that changing the film thickness affected its magnetic properties and the formation of its reversed nucleus. By measuring magnetism–temperature (M–T) curves under applied field cooling (FC) and zero-field cooling (ZFC), we found that the mechanism of the formation and growth of the reversed nucleus played a main role in blocking the motion of domain walls: the mechanism was competition between a ferromagnetic phase (FM) and an anti-ferromagnetic phase (AFM) at 10–300 K. Moreover, we found that the reversed nucleus blocked the motion of magnetic domains more at 10 K than at 300 K. We suggest that the reversed nucleus affects the magnetism more at low temperatures, which causes the coercivity to be higher at low temperature than at room temperature. These results will help us to understand the magnetic properties and temperature characteristics of FeCo thin films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The BaFe12-xGaxO19 (x = 0.1–1.2) solid solutions of the barium hexagonal ferrite of M-type were synthesized and attested by the powder X-ray diffraction method at 300 K. The unit cell parameters were refined. With increase of substitution level the parameters of unit cell monotonically decrease. These samples were investigated by the vibration magnetometry method. With increase of substitution level the magnetic parameters monotonically decrease. The concentration dependence of the TC Curie temperature as well as the MS spontaneous specific magnetization and the HC coercive force at 300 K is constructed. The microwave properties of the considered samples in the external magnetic bias field were also investigated at 300 K. It is shown that with increase of Ga3+ concentration from x = 0.1 to x = 0.6 the frequency value of the natural ferromagnetic resonance decreases in the beginning, and at further increase in concentration up to x = 1.2 it increases again. With increase in Ga3+ concentration the line width of the natural ferromagnetic resonance increases that indicates the increase of frequency range where there is an intensive absorption of electromagnetic radiation. At the same time the peak amplitude of the resonant curve changes slightly. The frequency shift of the natural ferromagnetic resonance in the external magnetic bias field takes place more intensively for the samples with small Ga3+ concentration. It is shown the prospects of use of the Ga-substituted barium hexagonal ferrite as the material effectively absorbing the high-frequency electromagnetic radiation.© 2017We have built a scanning dc-susceptometer for magnetic characterization of millimeter-scale samples. Using samples with few millimeter-thick slabs, the setup used is able to apply perpendicularly to the sample uniform dc magnetic fields up to 500 mT. It has a scanning range of 100 mm × 100 mm with micrometer resolution. In the present configuration, the dc-susceptometer is equipped with a pair of commercial Hall effect sensors forming an axial gradiometer. The measured output noise at 6.0 Hz is about 1.0 µTrms/√Hz in an unshielded environment and the magnetic moment sensitivity is 8.8 × 10−11 Am2. In particular, we used it to characterize heat-resistant steels, used as radiant tubes in steam reformer furnaces. We measured the cross-section of tube samples with progressing states of aging from as-cast to state VI. Measuring their susceptibilities, we detected a ferromagnetic layer at the external tube wall on aged samples. We were able to establish a relation between the magnetic response and the microstructural change of the steel.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we have examined the motion of magnetic-nanoparticles and the flow characteristics of biofluid in a micro-tube in the presence of externally applied magnetic field and electrokinetic effects. In the drug delivery system, the motion of the magnetic nanoparticles as carriers is important for therapeutic procedure in the treatment of tumor cells, infections and removing blood clots. The unidirectional electro-osmotic flow of biofluid is driven by the combined effects of pulsatile pressure gradient and electrokinetic force. The governing equation for unsteady electromagnetohydrodynamic flow subject to the no-slip boundary condition has been solved numerically by using Crank-Nicolson implicit finite difference scheme. We have analyzed the variation of axial velocity, velocity distribution of magnetic nanoparticles, volumetric flow rate and wall shear stress for various values of the non-dimensional parameters. The study reveals that blood flow velocity, carriers velocity and flow rate are strongly influenced by the electro-osmotic parameter as well as the Hartmann number. The particle mass parameter as well as the particle concentration parameter have efficient capturing effect on magnetic nanoparticles during blood flow through a micro-tube for drug delivery.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Grain boundary diffusing process was applied to Nd-Ce-Fe-B sintered magnets using Nd80-xDyxAl20 (x = 0, 20, 40, 60, 80 at.%) ribbons. After diffusion treatment at 900 °C for 13 h and annealing at 470 °C for 2 h, the coercivities of processed samples were 12.5, 17.2, 14.9, 15.2 and 14.3 kOe, respectively. The highest coercivity, with a 70% increasement compared to original sample, was achieved using Nd60Dy20Al20 with the least Dy content. Microstructural investigations show that the coercivity enhancement of these diffused samples is mainly attributed to the magnetic hardening extensive layers along (Nd,Ce)2Fe14B grains and weakening magnetic coupling between adjacent grains by continuous intergranular phases. Nd60Dy20Al20 is a promising diffusion source for producing high-coercivity Nd-Ce-Fe-B sintered magnets with effective Dy utilization.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Core-shell Co1-xNixFe2O4-BaTiO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) composite nanoparticles were synthetized by a combination of soft chemical routes such as co-precipitation and sol gel. X-ray diffraction patterns confirm the presence of both the materials, the ferrite solid solution, and BaTiO3. Unit cell parameters become smaller as Ni concentration is increased. SEM and HRTEM micrographs corroborate the formation of core-shell nanostructures. Magnetic behaviors of the core are very different from those of the composites. Anomalous magnetic behavior of the composite nanostructures have been discussed considering a coupling between the ferromagnetic and ferroelectric phases. Present work provides an experimental evidence of complex behaviors in magnetoelectric composites and strengthens the idea of remarkable changes of the magnetoelectric properties depending on the nanostructures, morphology or the method of synthesis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report an electric modulation of magnetization at the Fe3O4/BaTiO3 interface and a magnetoelectric coefficient of 0.72 Oe·cm/kV by ferroelectric polarization reversal at room temperature. We find that the change of magnetization is approximately proportional to the BaTiO3 layer c axial electrostriction. We believe that this effect is due to atomic displacements at the interface as a result of ferroelectric switching which affects the interface magnetization.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the anisotropy of magnetic field-induced entropy change in rare earth Er1-yTbyAl2 compounds (y = 0.00, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75 and 1.00). In the present work, we use a model Hamiltonian that includes the crystalline electrical field anisotropy in both Er and Tb magnetic sublattices, chemical disorder in exchange interactions among Er-Er, Tb-Tb and Er-Tb magnetic ions and the Zeeman effect. We investigated the isothermal magnetic entropy change ΔST for a magnetic field of 1 T rotating from a hard 〈0 0 1〉 to the easy 〈1 1 1〉 direction. We also performed a systematic analysis of the reorientation temperature as a function of the magnetic field intensity. The anisotropic magnetocaloric effect highlights the applicability of this effect on the rotating magnetic refrigeration.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Investigations of temperature dependent anomalous Hall effect and longitudinal resistivity in Co2FeAl (CFA) thin films grown on Si(1 0 0) at different substrate temperature Ts are reported. The scaling of the anomalous Hall conductivity (AHC) and the associated phenomenological mechanisms (intrinsic and extrinsic) are analyzed vis-à-vis influence of Ts. The intrinsic contribution to AHC is found to be dominating over the extrinsic one. The appearance of a resistivity minimum at low temperature necessitates the inclusion of quantum corrections on account of weak localization and electron-electron scattering effects whose strength reduces with increase in Ts. The study establishes that the optimization of Ts plays an important role in the improvement of atomic ordering which indicates the higher strength of spin-orbit coupling and leads to the dominant intrinsic contribution to AHC in these CFA full Heusler alloy thin films.© 2017The performance of gallium nitride (GaN) p-i-n diodes were investigated for use as a betavoltaic device. Dark IV measurements showed a turn on-voltage of approximately 3.2 V, specific-on-resistance of 15.1 mΩ cm2 and a reverse leakage current of −0.14 mA/cm2 at −10 V. A clear photo-response was observed when IV curves were measured under a light source at a wavelength of 310 nm (4.0 eV). In addition, GaN p-i-n diodes were tested under an electron-beam in order to simulate common beta radiation sources ranging from that of 3H (5.6 keV average) to 63Ni (17 keV average). From this data, we estimated output powers of 53 nW and 750 nW with overall efficiencies of 0.96% and 4.4% for our device at incident electron energies of 5.6 keV and 17 keV corresponding to 3H and 63Ni beta sources respectively.© 2017The magnetic convection heat transfer in an obstructed two-dimensional square cavity is investigated numerically. The walls of the cavity are heated with different constant temperatures at two sides, and isolated at two other sides. The cavity is filled with a high Prandtl number ferrofluid. The convective force is induced by a magnetic field gradient of a thermally insulated square permanent magnet located at the center of the cavity. The results are presented in the forms of streamlines, isotherms, and Nusselt number for various values of magnetic Rayleigh numbers and permanent magnet size. Two major circulations are generated in the cavity, clockwise flow in the upper half and counterclockwise in the lower half. In addition, strong circulations are observed around the edges of the permanent magnet surface. The strength of the circulations increase monotonically with the magnetic Rayleigh number. The circulations also increase with the permanent magnet size, but eventually, are suppressed for larger sizes. It is found that there is an optimum size for the permanent magnet due to the contrary effects of the increase in magnetic force and the increase in flow resistance by increasing the size. By increasing the magnetic Rayleigh number or isothermal walls temperature ratio, the heat transfer rate increases.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this work, new design strategies for 10 nm node NMOS bulk FinFET transistors are investigated to meet low power (LP) (20 pA/μm < IOFF < 50 pA/μm) and ultralow power (ULP) (IOFF < 20 pA/μm) requirements using three dimensional (3D) TCAD simulations. The punch-through stop implant, source and drain junction placement and gate workfunction are varied in order to study the impact on the OFF-state current (IOFF), transconductance (gm), gate capacitance (Cgg) and intrinsic frequency (fT). It is shown that the gate length of 20 nm for the 10 nm node FinFET can meet the requirements of LP transistors and ULP transistors by source-drain extension engineering, punch-through stop doping concentration, and choice of gate workfunction.© 2017Hard magnetic NdFeB submicro/nanoflakes were successfully prepared by surfactant-assisted ball milling at low temperature (SABMLT) by specially using 2-methyl pentane and trioctylamine (TOA) as solvent and surfactant, respectively. Influences of the amount of TOA and milling temperature on the crystal structure, morphology and magnetic performances of the as-prepared NdFeB powders were investigated systematically. There is significant difference on morphology between the NdFeB powders milled at room and low temperature. The NdFeB powders with flaky morphology could be obtained even with a small amount of TOA by SABMLT, which could not be achieved by surfactant-assisted ball milling at room temperature (SABMRT). The better crystallinity, better grain alignment, higher coercivity, larger saturation magnetization and remanence ratio were achieved in the samples prepared by SABMLT. Furthermore, the final NdFeB powders prepared by SABMLT possessed a lower amount of residual TOA than those prepared by SABMRT. It was demonstrated that SABMLT is a promising way to fabricate rare-earth-transition metal nanoflakes with high anisotropy for permanent magnetic materials. The effective method of preparing NdFeB flakes by lowering temperature will be also useful to fabricate flakes of other functional materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The electronic structure and the magnetic properties of the multiferroic YFeO3 perovskite are investigated using two different first principles methods based on the Density Functional Theory with the so-called Hubbard correction. The results obtained with both the Projector Augmented Wave method implemented into the Vienna Ab inito Simulation Package and the Full-potential Linearized Augmented Plane Wave method implemented into FLEUR are compared to investigate the impact of the use of large Hubbard parameter UFe values allowing to get a reasonable bandgap. It is shown that both approaches lead to very similar results as long as the majority spin Fe d states remain hybridized with the O p states; this being the case up to UFe values around 4 eV. For larger UFe values, when the majority spin Fe d states are strongly localized and weakly hybridized with the O states, different crystal field splittings behaviors are obtained leading us to the conclusion that such large UFe values should be use with care. In addition, including the Spin–Orbit coupling contribution, the weakly canted antiferromagnetic structure is investigated and it is shown that the canting decreases when UFe is increased. Finally, the comparison with a method, taking the self-energy of the electrons (the GW approximation) into account, shows that even using small UFe values results in large distortion of the occupied part of the band structure for this particular system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Monte Carlo Simulated Annealing (MCSA) method is used for performing micromagnetic simulations, in particular the determination of the domain wall structure originated from the energy's minimization of known micromagnetic hamiltonians. Beside the new theoretical approach, we also discuss the influence of different models for the exchange energy on the wall structure. It was found that the existence of long range exchange, like the RKKY interactions, can significantly affects the domain wall width when compared to the results obtained for the typical Heisenberg like exchange, whose range is restricted to the nearest neighbors. The calculations also indicate that especially for phases with high magnetocrystalline anisotropy the modeling should be performed at atomistic level or, in other words, the Bloch wall continuum model is not valid.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the effects of surface shape anisotropy in the magnetization behavior of a torus nanoring by means of Monte Carlo simulations. Stable states (vortex and reverse vortex states) and metastable states (onion and asymmetric onion states) were found in the torus nanoring. The probability of occurrence of the metastable states (stable states) tends to decrease (increase) as the amount of Monte Carlo steps per spin, temperature steps and negative values of the anisotropy constant increase. We evaluated under which conditions it is possible to switch the magnetic state of the torus nanoring from a vortex to a reverse vortex state by applying a circular magnetic field at certain temperature interval. The switching probability (from a vortex to a reverse vortex state) depends on the value of the current intensity, which generates the circular magnetic field, and the temperature interval where the magnetic field is applied. There is a linear relationship between the current intensity and the minimum temperature interval above which the vortex state can be switched.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The correlations of phase structure and thermal stability for Alnico 8 alloys is analyzed by three-step aging at 650 °C, 600 °C and 550 °C gradually in this paper. After three-step aging the a1 phase is a chess-like structure in transverse direction and a bamboo-like structure in longitudinal direction. Meanwhile the magnetic energy product ((BH)m) increases from 9.17 MGOe to 10.59 MGOe, and the remanence temperature coefficient a(RT-180 °C) reduces from −2.31 %%/°C to −1.25 %%/°C. The MPMS and VSM measurements indicate that three-step aging makes the a1 phase be single domain particles and dispersed distribution, which plays an important role in optimizing the thermal stability of Alnico alloys.© 2017 Elsevier LtdHyperbolic metamaterials were originally introduced to overcome the diffraction limit of optical imaging. Soon thereafter it was realized that hyperbolic metamaterials demonstrate a number of novel phenomena resulting from the broadband singular behavior of their density of photonic states. These novel phenomena and applications include super resolution imaging, new stealth technologies, enhanced quantum-electrodynamic effects, thermal hyperconductivity, superconductivity, and interesting gravitation theory analogues. Here we briefly review typical material systems, which exhibit hyperbolic behavior and outline important novel applications of hyperbolic metamaterials. In particular, we will describe recent imaging experiments with plasmonic metamaterials and novel VCSEL geometries, in which the Bragg mirrors may be engineered in such a way that they exhibit hyperbolic metamaterial properties in the long wavelength infrared range, so that they may be used to efficiently remove excess heat from the laser cavity. We will also discuss potential applications of three-dimensional self-assembled photonic hypercrystals, which are based on cobalt ferrofluids in external magnetic field. This system bypasses 3D nanofabrication issues, which typically limit metamaterial applications. Photonic hypercrystals combine the most interesting features of hyperbolic metamaterials and photonic crystals.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this work, dual-k spacer structures are investigated using a variety of materials along the high-k spacer length in detail. It is known that not only the higher permittivity materials of high-k spacer boost the on-current but also lower permittivity materials of low-k spacer effectively reduce the off-current. By compared the results of other various single spacers and dual-k spacers, it is HfO2/Vacuum dual-k spacer that shows relatively higher ION, ION/IOFF, better immunity of short channel effects and outstanding device performances.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe investigated the validity of the Natori formalism for realistic multi-layer quantum well FETs. We show that the assumption of a single layer (the channel) carrying all of the current density is far from reality in the sub-threshold region, where in fact most of the current density resides below the channel. Our analysis is based on comparing results of Natori calculations with experimental ones and on comparing with other first-principles calculations. If the Natori calculations are employed in the subthreshold region then a misleadingly small subthreshold slope would be obtained. We propose a way to remedy this inefficiency of this formulation so that it can be applicable to realistic many-layer devices. In particular we show that if the 1-dimensional quantum well of the Natori method enclosing the electron gas is expanded to include the supply layer-usually below the channel- and a proper ab initio potential is used to obtain its eigenvalues, then the Natori formula regains its validity.© 2017 Elsevier LtdGamma-aminopropyltriethoxysilane (γ-APTES) is an organosilane material commonly used for biomedical sensing. Sensors with a γ-APTES surface layer have been reported for use in pH, DNA, and cell detection. However, no application of γ-APTES on resistive switching random access memory (RRAM) devices has yet been reported. In this paper, we report, for the first time, the resistive switching characteristics of using γ-APTES as the insulator layer in an RRAM device. The resistive switching of the γ-APTES layer embedded with ZnO nanoparticles is also investigated in this work. A unipolar resistive switching characteristic is found when the γ-APTES is employed as an insulator layer in a device with a metal-insulator-metal (MIM) structure. The stability and reliability of the resistive switching characteristics of the device can be improved after adding zinc oxide (ZnO) nanoparticles at the expense of reducing the ratio of the resistance of a high-resistance state (RHRS) to the resistance of a low-resistance state (RLRS).© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Current investigation focuses on the electromagnetic properties of nonwoven fabric coated with BaFe12O19 (BHF) /MWCNTs/PANi nanocomposite in X and Ku bands. The BHF/MWCNTs and BHF/MWCNTs/PANi nanocomposites are prepared using the sol gel and in-situ polymerization methods respectively. The absorbent fabric was prepared based on applying a 40 wt% of BHF/MWCNTs/PANi nanocomposite in silicon resin on nonwoven fabric via roller coating technique The X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analysis (VNA) are used to peruse microstructural, magnetic and electromagnetic features of the composite and absorber fabric respectively. The microscopic images of the fabric coated with magnetic nanocomposite shows a homogenous layer of nanoparticles on the fabric surface. The maximum reflection loss of binary nano-composite BHF/MWCNTs was measured about −28.50 dB at 11.72 GHz with 1.7 GHz bandwidth (RL < −10 dB) in X band. Moreover in Ku band, the maximum reflection loss is −29.66 dB at 15.78 GHz with 3.2 GHz bandwidths. Also the ternary nanocomposite BHF/MWCNTs/PANi exhibits a broad band absorber over a wide range of X band with a maximum reflection loss of −36.2 dB at 10.2 GHz with 1.5 GHz bandwidth and in the Ku band has arrived a maximum reflection loss of −37.65 dB at 12.84 GHz with 2.43 GHz bandwidth. This result reflects the synergistic effect of the different components with different loss mechanisms. As it is observed due to the presence of PANi in the structure of nanocomposite, the amount of absorption has increased extraordinarily. The absorber fabric exhibits a maximum reflection loss of −24.2 dB at 11.6 GHz with 4 GHz bandwidth in X band. However, in Ku band, the absorber fabric has had the maximum absorption in 16.88 GHz that is about −24.34 dB with 6 GHz bandwidth. Therefore, results indicate that the fabric samples coated represents appreciable maximum absorption value of more than 99% in X and Ku bands which can be attributed to presence of carbon and polyaniline structure in composite material.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe have investigated the energy efficiency and scalability of ferroelectric HfO2 (FE:HfO2)-based negative-capacitance field-effect-transistor (NCFET) with gate-all-around (GAA) nanowire (NW) channel structure. Analytic simulation is conducted to characterize NW-NCFET by varying NW diameter and/or thickness of gate insulator as device structural parameters. Due to the negative-capacitance effect and GAA NW channel structure, NW-NCFET is found to have 5× higher Ion/Ioff ratio than classical NW-MOSFET and 2× higher than double-gate (DG) NCFET, which results in wider design window for high Ion/Ioff ratio. To analyze these obtained results from the viewpoint of the device scalability, we have considered constraints regarding very limited device structural spaces to fit by the gate insulator and NW channel for aggresively scaled gate length (Lg) and/or very tight NW pitch. NW-NCFET still has design point with very thinned gate insulator and/or narrowed NW. Therefore, FE:HfO2-based NW-NCFET is applicable to the aggressively scaled technology node of sub-10 nm Lg and to the very tight NW integration of sub-30 nm NW pitch for beyond 7 nm technology.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Two sets of Cobalt-doped (1–10% at) TiO2 thin films, for different molar concentrations of the Ti precursor (0.3 and 0.5 mol/L), have been deposited onto Si substrates by combining the Sol Gel process and the Spin Coating technique. The structure of the samples was studied by X-ray reflectivity (XRR) and X-ray diffraction (XRD) and their magnetic properties were analyzed by magnetization measurements as a function of the applied magnetic field. The XRR results provided the thickness and interfacial roughness of the films, while XRD patterns revealed the crystalline phases and lattice parameters. Room temperature ferromagnetic behaviour was observed for some of the atomic Co concentrations by the magnetization measurements. This behaviour has been correlated to the crystalline phases, which were found to be modified by both the molar ratio of Ti precursor and the concentration of the Co dopant. A suppression of ferromagnetism is observed for some atomic Co fractions and it was attributed to the presence of secondary crystalline phases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The report describes the effect of elemental addition (Mn and Co) on the phase evolution and magnetic properties of equiatomic TiFeNiCr based high entropy alloys (HEAs). HEAs were synthesized through mechanical alloying (MA) of constituent elements for different milling duration. XRD analysis confirms that simple solid solution of face cantered cubic structure is formed for all the three selected HEAs. Double FCC and a sigma phase are evolved for TiFeNiCr and TiFeNiCrMn HEAs. However, for TiFeNiCrCo HEA single FCC phase is formed. Synthesized HEAs show soft magnetic characteristics and the value of saturation magnetization increases as the content of magnetic element increases. Moreover, the investigation also describes the effect of annealing on phase evolution and magnetic properties of synthesized HEAs. The value of saturation magnetization altered for annealed TiFeNiCrM (M = Mn, Co) HEAs.© 2017Complete author list has shown above.© 2017 Elsevier LtdStudies of diamond material for thermal management are reported for a nominally 1-µm thick layer grown on silicon. Thickness of the diamond is measured using spectroscopic ellipsometry. Spectra are consistently modeled using a diamond layer taking into account surface roughness and requiring an interlayer of nominally silicon carbide. The presence of the interlayer is confirmed by transmission electron microscopy. Thermal conductivity is determined based on a heater which is microfabricated followed by back etching to produce a supported diamond membrane. Micro-Raman mapping of the diamond phonon is used to estimate temperature rise under known drive conditions of the resistive heater. Consistent values are obtained for thermal conductivity based on straightforward analytical calculation using phonon shift to estimate temperature and finite element simulations which take both temperature rise and thermal stress into account.© 2017Amorphous vanadium oxide (VO2) films deposited by atomic layer deposition (ALD) were crystallized with an ex situ anneal at 660–670 °C for 1–2 h under a low oxygen pressure (10−4 to 10−5 Torr). Under these conditions the crystalline VO2 phase was maintained, while formation of the V2O5 phase was suppressed. Electrical transition from the insulator to the metallic phase was observed in the 37–60 °C range, with an ROFF/RON ratio of up to about 750 and ΔTC ≅ 7–10 °C. Lateral electric field applied across two-terminal device structures induced a reversible phase change, with a room temperature transition field of about 25 kV/cm in the VO2 sample processed with the 2 h long O2 anneal. Both the width and slope of the field induced MIT I-V hysteresis were dependent upon the VO2 crystalline quality.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we demonstrate 12 × 12 µm2 high-performance, dual-band, long-wavelength infrared (LWIR) photodetectors based on InAs/GaSb/AlSb type-II superlattices. The structure consists of two back-to-back heterojunction photodiodes with 2 µm-thick p-doped absorption regions. High quality dry etching combined with SiO2 passivation results in a surface resistivity value of 7.9 × 105 Ω cm for the longer (red) channel and little degradation of the electrical performance. The device reaches dark current density values of 4.5 × 10−4 A/cm2 for the longer (red) and 1.3 × 10−4 A/cm2 for the shorter (blue) LWIR channels at quantum efficiency saturation. It has 50% cut-off wavelengths of 8.3 and 11.2 µm for the blue and red channel, respectively, at 77 K in back-side illumination configuration and exhibits quantum efficiencies of 37% and 29%, respectively. This results in specific detectivity values of 2.5 × 1011 cm·Hz1/2/W and 1.3 × 1011 cm·Hz1/2/W at 77 K.© 2017 Elsevier LtdMicro self-locked switches (MSS), where execution voltage corresponds to the output signal, are efficient and convenient platforms for sensor applications. The proper functioning of these sensing devices requires driving accurate displacement under execution voltage. In this work, we show how to control the actuating properties of MSSS. This switch comprises microstructures of various shapes with dimensions from 3.5 to 180 µm, which are optimized to encode a desired manufacture deviation by means of mathematical model of threshold voltage. Compared with pull-in voltage, threshold voltage is more easy to control the pull-in instability point by theoretical analysis. With the help of advanced manufacture technology, switch is processed in accordance with the proposed control method. Then, experimental results show that it is better, which have been validated by corresponding experiments. In addition, they can be known from experiments that the manufacturing technology is advanced and feasible, and its high resilience and stably self-locked function can achieve instantaneously sensing.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this article we have studied the structural, elastic, electronic and magnetic properties of Zn1-xTixSe and Cd1-xTixSe alloys at (x = 0.25, 0.50, 0.75) using first principles density functional theory calculations with local spin density approximation (LSDA) and generalized gradient approximation plus Hubbard parameter (GGA+U) as exchange-correlation potential. The physical properties of both alloys were investigated in the zinc-blend phase. The structural parameters at equilibrium are consistent with experimental and earlier theoretical predictions. The elastic constants are also computed and compared with the literature. The DOS curves of Zn1-xTixSe and Cd1-xTixSe alloys for all the concentrations show the existence of hybridization among Ti (3d) and Se (4p) states. The calculated exchange constants N0α(s-d) and N0β (p-d) are useful to determine the contribution in the valence band and conduction band and are also shows the magnetic character of these alloys. In addition, the p-d hybridization in the PDOS reduces local magnetic moment of Ti from its free space charge of 2 µB and results small magnetic moments on the nonmagnetic Zn, Cd and Se sites. The calculated negative values of formation energy (Ef) reveal that all the Zn1-xTixSe and Cd1-xTixSe alloys are thermodynamically stables. A larger/Smaller value of Curie temperature (TC) for all the Zn1-xTixSe and Cd1-xTixSe alloys shows the strong/low interaction among the magnetic atoms respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Preparation of a novel yttrium-iron garnet of the chemical formula Y3-xFe5+xO12, where 0.1≤x≤1.5, is reported. Epitaxial films of this garnet were grown by the liquid phase epitaxy technique from the PbO–B2O3 solution containing weakly dissociated both yttrium-iron garnet Y3Fe5O12 and yttrium orthoferrite YFeO3 as the charge materials. It has been shown that crystallization from such a solution-melt results in the clusters which contain some structural fragments of Y3Fe5O12 and YFeO3 inside the liquid phase of the growing films and crystals forming in such a way a structure of the novel ferrite. Structural and magnetic properties of the obtained garnet films are also discussed.© 2017Recycled NdFeB magnets are emerging as a viable alternative to virgin NdFeB, because of lower production costs and environmental impacts. Recycled NdFeB magnets produced via the recently reported magnet-to-magnet (m2 m™) recycling process display unanticipated enhancements of magnetic and physical properties that may arise because of their unique microstructure. In the present study, we compare electrical transport and magnetic properties of these recycled magnets (Grade: N42SH, Br = 1289 mT, Hcj = 1876 kA/m, BHmax = 323.4 kJ/m3, Dy content = 4.0 wt%) with an equivalent grade of commercial NdFeB magnet produced from virgin material by conventional techniques (Grade: N42SH, Br = 1215 mT, Hcj = 1943 kA/m, BHmax = 285.0 kJ/m3, with Dy content = 4.6 wt%). Atomic force microscopy (AFM) and magnetic force microscopy (MFM) analyses revealed very similar surface morphology and magnetic structure for the virgin and recycled samples. However, bulk electrical transport measurements demonstrated a 27% enhancement in the resistivity of the recycled magnets. This suggests that the electrical properties of NdFeB alloys are enhanced during Grain Boundary Engineering™ (GBE™). Moreover, point-contact measurements, used to probe the electrical transport properties on the microscopic scale, found similar results to those of the bulk measurements.© 2017 Elsevier LtdPorous silicon substrate is very promising for next generation wireless communication requiring the avoidance of high-frequency losses originating from the bulk silicon. In this work, new variants of porous silicon (PSi) substrates have been introduced. Through an experimental RF performance, the proposed PSi substrates have been compared with different silicon-based substrates, namely, standard silicon (Std), trap-rich (TR) and high resistivity (HR). All of the mentioned substrates have been fabricated where identical samples of CPW lines have been integrated on. The new PSi substrates have shown successful reduction in the substrate's effective relative permittivity to values as low as 3.7 and great increase in the substrate's effective resistivity to values higher than 7 kΩ cm. As a concept proof, a mm-wave bandpass filter (MBPF) centred at 27 GHz has been integrated on the investigated substrates. Compared with the conventional MBPF implemented on standard silicon-based substrates, the measured S-parameters of the PSi-based MBPF have shown high filtering performance, such as a reduction in insertion loss and an enhancement of the filter selectivity, with the joy of having the same filter performance by varying the temperature. Therefore, the efficiency of the proposed PSi substrates has been well highlighted.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe design approach and performance of a 5-bit digital phase shifter implemented with 0.25 μm GaN HEMT technology for X-band phased arrays are described. The switched filter and high-pass/low-pass networks are proposed in this article. For all 32 states of the 5-bit phase shifter, the RMS phase error less than 5.5°, RMS amplitude error less than 0.8 dB, insertion loss less than 12 dB and input/output return loss less than 8.5 dB are obtained overall 8–12 GHz. The continuous wave power capability is also measured, and a typical input RF P1dB data of 32 dBm is achieved at 8 GHz.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We calculate low-frequency gyrotropic excitation modes of the skyrmion state thin cylindrical magnetic dots. The skyrmion is assumed to be stabilized at room temperature and zero external magnetic field due to an interplay of the isotropic and Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya exchange interactions, perpendicular magnetic anisotropy and magnetostatic interaction. We consider Bloch and Neel-type magnetic skyrmions and assume that the dot magnetization does not depend on the thickness coordinate. The skyrmion gyrotropic frequencies are calculated in GHz range as a function of the skyrmion equilibrium radius, dot radius and the dot magnetic parameters. The magnetostatic interaction is explicitly accounted via appropriate ansatz of the skyrmion magnetization. Recent experiments and calculations of magnetic skyrmion dynamics in infinite thin films and nanodots are discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The observation of significantly large magnetoresistance at the liquid nitrogen temperature range in the polycrystalline La0.2Gd0.5Ba0.3MnO3 (LGBMO) compound has been addressed in the present manuscript. The motivation of considering LGBMO sample is the average ‘A’ site ionic radius 〈rA〉 and tolerance factor (t), almost same as that of La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 (LSMO), which is a well studied colossal magnetoresistive material. Magnetoresistance of the LGBMO compound has been compared with the LSMO as well as parent compound La0.7Ba0.3MnO3(LBMO) to show the enhancement of magnetoresistance in LGBMO compound. This observed nature has been elucidated considering the disorder induced short range magnetic interaction due to the enhance size disorder parameter (σ2). Our study revels that, size disorder parameter plays the crucial role for enhancing the colossal magnetoresistance.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effects of 3d transition metals V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co, and Ni doping on the structural, electronic, and magnetic properties of MgH2 were investigated based on density functional calculations. The results indicated that doping such an isolated foreign atom can produce considerable spin polarization and tailor MgH2 into n-type magnetic semiconductor. In particular, the long-range antiferromagnetic coupling was achieved in the Mn, Fe, Co, and Ni doped cases. The stability of the antiferromagnetic phase is mainly due to the hole number and the larger superexchange interaction between the occupied and unoccupied eg (t2g) states. This work pointed out the possibilities of achieving antiferromagnetic characteristic and semiconducting feature in MgH2 upon transition-metal doping for potential application in spintronics and hydride electronics.© 2017 Elsevier LtdBefore designing a detector circuit, the electrical parameters extraction of the Schottky diode is a critical step. This article is based on a Monte-Carlo (MC) solver of the Boltzmann Transport Equation (BTE) including different transport mechanisms at the metal-semiconductor contact such as image force effect or tunneling. The weight of tunneling and thermionic current is quantified according to different degrees of tunneling modelling. The I-V characteristic highlights the dependence of the ideality factor and the current saturation with bias. Harmonic Balance (HB) simulation on a rectifier circuit within Advanced Design System (ADS) software shows that considering non-linear ideality factor and saturation current for the electrical model of the Schottky diode does not seem essential. Indeed, bias independent values extracted in forward regime on I-V curve are sufficient. However, the non-linear series resistance extracted from a small signal analysis (SSA) strongly influences the conversion efficiency at low input powers.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, magnesium copper zinc ferrite (MCZ) nanoparticles were synthesized by the modified Pechini method. In this approach, the magnesium nitrate, copper nitrate, zinc nitrate, iron nitrate, citric acid and diethylene glycol (instead of ethylene glycol in conventional Pechini method) were used as a source of Mg2+, Cu2+, Zn2+, complex and stabilizer and solvent agent, respectively. The effect of annealing temperature and copper mole ratio on the morphology, structural and magnetic properties of Mg0.5xCuxZn0.5Fe2O4 (x = 0–0.5) nanoparticles were investigated. Various characterization methods, including X-ray diffraction (XRD), field emission scanning electron microscope (FeSEM), energy-dispersive spectroscopy (EDS), X-ray mapping, Fourier transforms infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), adsorption-desorption isotherm and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) were used to study the phase, microstructure, particle size, elemental distribution, functional group determination, porosity and magnetic properties of nanoparticles, respectively. The results showed that cubic spinel phase with various morphologies such as semi-spherical, sheet-like shapes was obtained by the modified Pechini method. Furthermore, the nanoparticles with the x value of 0.2, annealed at 700 °C have the highest saturation magnetization (Ms = 56.5 emu/g) among the other synthesized MCZ ferrite nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of sintering time on the evolution of structural and magnetic phases has been studied in Bi0.8Nd0.2FeO3 multiferroic. These multiferroics were prepared by normal solid state reaction technique. XRD, NPD and VSM characterizations were performed to explore the structural and magnetic properties and correlation between these. The refinement of the XRD patterns using FullProf program show, mixed phase having rhombohedral (R3c) + orthorhombic (Pnma) symmetry in sample sintered for 1 h. For sample sintered for two hours, crystal structure was found to be mixed phase with rhombohedral (R3c) + orthorhombic (Pbam) symmetry and the sample sintered for three hours, it crystallized in pure orthorhombic (Pbam) symmetry. The octahedral tilting is thus found to be changing systematically with the variation of sintering time. The refinement of the neutron diffractions patterns confirms the XRD results of structural evolution with sintering time. The magnetic moment undergoes change in the direction of their preferential alignment from c-axis to along a-axis in the 3 h sintered sample. The M-H loops shows significant enhancement in magnetization from 0.17455 emu/g to 0.35872 emu/g with increase in sintering time from 1 to 3 h. The enhancement in the magnetization is attributed to increase in the canting angle between magnetic spins. Also, the observation of exchange bias effect with discontinuous variation in exchange bias field indicates the presence of magnetic anisotropy. The magnetic moments obtained through the magnetic refinement of NPD patterns are found to decrease from 4.6 μB to 3.8 μB with increase in sintering time from 1 to 3 h.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we show that mixture model, with algebraic slip velocity relating to the magnetophoresis, provides a continuum-based, and cost-effective tool to simulate biomagnetic separations in microfluidics. The model is most effective to simulate magnetic separation protocols in which magnetic or magnetically labeled biological targets are within a naturally dilute or diluted samples. The transport of these samples is characterized as mixtures in which the dispersed magnetic microparticles establish their magnetophoretic mobility quickly in response to the acting forces. Our simulations demonstrate the coupled particle-fluid transport and the High Gradient Magnetic Capture (HGMC) of magnetic beads flowing through a microchannel. Also, we show that the mixture model and accordingly the modeling of the slip velocity model, unlike with the case with dense and/or macro-scale systems, can be further simplified by ignoring the gravitational and granular parameters. Furthermore, we show, by conducting comparative simulations, that the developed model provides an easier and viable alternative to the commonly used Lagrangian-Eulerian (particle-based) models.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The La(Fe,Co,Si)13- based composite sample was obtained by high energy ball milling of LaFe11.8-xCoxSi1.2 alloys (where x = 0.52, 0.66, 0.8, 0.94, 1.08) and subsequent compaction into a form of the single pellet. A motivation for the processing of such composite specimen was the wish to improve the operating temperature range of the magnetocaloric materials at around the room temperature. In order to achieve this task the influence of Co content on the phase constitution and magnetic properties of the LaFe11.8-xCoxSi1.2 alloys (where x = 0.52, 0.66, 0.8, 0.94, 1.08) was studied. The coexistence of two crystalline phases (the dominant La(Fe,Si)13- type and minor α-Fe(Co) in each sample was detected by XRD studies. These observations were confirmed by the Mössbauer spectroscopy. Furthermore, the Mössbauer spectra analysis revealed the evolution of magnetic ordering in the La(Fe,Si)13- type phase for samples of various Co content. These changes of magnetic ordering were related to the increase of the Curie point with the increase of Co content. The highest value of the magnetic entropy change of ∼16.25 J (kg K)−1 was measured for the x = 0.66 sample, though a significant decrease of the magnetic entropy change down to 3.77 J (kg K)−1 was detected for the composite sample. However, a significant broadening of the −ΔSM peak, reaching ∼100 K in comparison to predicted 85 K was observed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.High magnetic field was introduced to improve the saturation magnetostriction of cast Fe81Ga19 alloy during annealing process. The effects of high magnetic field on the microstructure, magnetic domain structure and magnetostrictive properties were investigated in this paper. Results indicated that high magnetic field could transfer Ga atom from precipitation to parent phase. High magnetic field also enhanced [1 0 0] direction orientation of FeGa alloy. The saturation magnetostriction for Fe81Ga19 alloy annealed at 10 T increased by about five times compared to one without high magnetic field. The improvement in saturation magnetostriction is attributed to the enhanced [1 0 0] orientation and Ga diffusion under high magnetic field during annealing process.© 2017An improved deep sub-micrometer (90 nm) large signal model for silicon-based MOSFET that incorporates DC/AC dispersion model is proposed. The derived DC model can accurately predict the device current-voltage behavior over the wide range of bias points and the corresponding extraction method for model parameters is investigated. The improvement also consists of new equations for the nonlinear capacitance phenomenon in the saturation region using few fitting parameters, and emphasizes for the particularly difficult problems associated with the DC/RF dispersion. Model verification is carried out by comparison of measured and simulated S-parameters for 90 nm gate-length MOSFET devices point up to 50 GHz. Good agreement is obtained between measured and modeled results and the scalability of model is also verified in this paper.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we have analyzed short channel effects (SCEs) and RC delay with Vertical nanoplate FET (VNFET) using 3-D Technology computer-aided design (TCAD) simulation. The device is based on International Technology Road-map for Semiconductor (ITRS) 2013 recommendations, and it has initially gate length (LG) of 12.2 nm, channel thickness (Tch) of 4 nm, and spacer length (LSD) of 6 nm. To obtain improved performance by reducing RC delay, each dimension is adjusted (LG = 12.2 nm, Tch = 6 nm, LSD = 11.9 nm). It has each characteristic in this dimension (Ion/Ioff = 1.64 × 105, Subthreshold swing (S.S.) = 73 mV/dec, Drain-induced barrier lowering (DIBL) = 60 mV/V, and RC delay = 0.214 ps). Furthermore, with long shallow trench isolation (STI) length and thick insulator thickness (Ti), we can reduce RC delay from 0.214 ps to 0.163 ps. It is about a 23.8% reduction. Without decreasing drain current, there is a reduction of RC delay as reducing outer fringing capacitance (Cof). Finally, when source/drain spacer length is set to be different, we have verified RC delay to be optimum.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Alnico-8 permanent magnets were produced through casting and subsequent thermal treatment process. Magnetic alloy of nominal composition 32.5 Fe-7.5 Al-1.0 Nb-35.0 Co-4.0 Cu-14.0 Ni-6.0 Ti were prepared by arc melting and casting technique. The Zr was added to 32.5 Fe-7.5 Al-1.0 Nb-35.0 Co-4.0 Cu-14.0 Ni-6.0 Ti alloy ranging from 0.3 to 0.9 wt%. The magnets were developed by employing two different heat treatment cycles known as conventional treatment and thermo-magnetic annealing treatment. The samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction method, Scanning electron microscope and magnetometer by plotting magnetic hysteresis demagnetization curves. The results indicate that magnetic properties are strongly depended upon alloy chemistry and process. The 0.6 wt% Zr added alloys yielded the best magnetic properties among the studied alloys. The magnetic properties obtained through conventional heat treatment are Hc = 1.35 kOe, Br = 5.2 kG and (BH)max = 2 MGOe. These magnetic properties were enhanced to Hc = 1.64 kOe, Br = 6.3 kG and (BH)max = 3.7 MGOe by thermo-magnetic annealing treatment.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic Cr-, Fe-, and Ni-doped TiO2 nanopowder samples (with 0.2% Cr, Fe, or Ni) were synthesized using the solid-state reaction method. The X-ray diffraction pattern showed that all the samples possessed typical anatase structure, and no other impurity phases were observed. Ultraviolet–visible spectroscopy (UV–vis) measurements revealed that the band gap decreased due to the incorporation of Cr, Fe, or Ni. The photoluminescence results showed the presence of oxygen defect related emission peaks in Cr-, Fe-, and Ni-doped TiO2. Room temperature ferromagnetism is observed in all the Cr-, Fe-, and Ni-doped TiO2 samples. Saturation magnetic moment is the highest for Fe-doped TiO2. The Fe:TiO2 samples were found to have a magnetic moment of 4.58 µB/Fe, and they seem to have greater ferromagnetism than the Cr/Ni-doped TiO2 samples. The structural and magnetic investigations demonstrate that ferromagnetism at room temperature is an intrinsic property of the samples. Thus, ferromagnetism does not originate from clusters or secondary phases; it is due to the Cr/Fe/Ni:TiO2 matrices. This study has shown that substituting a very light percentage of Cr, Fe, or Ni for Ti in TiO2 gives rise to appreciable room temperature ferromagnetic ordering useful for spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a comprehensive investigation of the frequency response of a monolithic OpAmp-RC integrator implemented in a 4H-SiC bipolar IC technology. The circuits and devices have been measured and characterized from 27 to 500 °C. The devices have been modelled to identify that the substrate capacitance is a dominant factor affecting the OpAmp's high-frequency response. Large Miller compensation capacitors of more than 540 pF are required to ensure stability of the internal OpAmp. The measured unit-gain-bandwidth product of the OpAmp is ∼1.1 MHz at 27 °C, and decreases to ∼0.5 MHz at 500 °C mainly due to the reduction of the transistor's current gain. On the other hand, it is not necessary to compensate the integrator in a relatively wide bandwidth ∼0.7 MHz over the investigated temperature range. At higher frequencies, the integrator's frequency response has been identified to be significantly affected by that of the OpAmp and load impedance. This work demonstrates the potential of this technology for high temperature applications requiring bandwidths of several megahertz.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the crystal orientation dependence of the elastic and piezomagnetic properties have been calculated for nickel ferrite (NiFe2O4) in three-dimensional space by means of coordinate transformations. The maximum elastic compliances s11′, s12′ and piezomagnetic constants q31′, q33′ along specific orientations have been determined based on experimental data of NiFe2O4 and original matrices for m3m point group. The piezomagnetic constants q31′ and q33′ show highly dependence on crystal orientation compared with elastic compliances s11′, s12′, meanwhile permittivity μ33′ is a constant. The max s11′ and s12′ can be obtained along directions [n k l] (n·k = 0, l ≠ 0) and [n k l] (n·k·l = 0), respectively. The max q31′ and max q33′ lie along [0 0 1] and [1 1 1] axes, respectively, NiFe2O4||[1 1 1] axis can produce large q31′ and q33′ at the same time. The result suggests that by adopting the optimal directions, the elastic and piezomagnetic properties of the devices made from NiFe2O4 can be precisely modulated.© 2017Many biological materials are naturally soft and stretchable, far more so than crystalline semiconductors. Creating systems that can be placed directly on a surface such as human skin has required new approaches in electronic device design and materials, a field known as stretchable electronics. One common method for fabricating a highly brittle semiconductor device able to survive tens of percent strain is to incorporate stress relief structures (‘waves’). Although the mechanical advantages of this approach are well known, the effects on the electrical behavior of a device such as a transistor compared to a more traditional geometry have not been studied. Here, AlGaN/GaN high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) grown on rigid sapphire substrates were fabricated in a common wavy geometry, a sinusoid, with dimensions similar to those used in stretchable electronics. The study analyzes control parameters available to the designer including gate location along the sinusoid, angle the source-drain contacts make with the gate, as well as variation of the gate length at the peak of the sinusoid. Common electrical parameters such as saturation current density, threshold voltage, and transconductance were compared between the sinusoidal and conventional straight geometries and results found to fall to within experimental uncertainty, suggesting shifting to a stretchable geometry is possible without appreciably degrading semiconductor device performance.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Functional dependence of magnetoresistance on external magnetic field is of great importance for not only discovering the origin of electrical transport but also tailoring materials for advanced properties in magnetic-field-controlled devices. By utilizing the magnetic domain-rotation model combined with antiphase boundary and charge carrier hopping theories, the formular description of magnetoresistance in magnetite (Fe3O4) film has been studied systematically. The calculation shows that the magnetoresistance depends linearly and quadratically on the external magnetic field when the fields are applied parallel and perpendicular to the Fe3O4 film plane, respectively. We give the experimental MR data to verify these theoretical results.© 2017The electronic structures and magnetic properties of 3d transition metal-based full Heusler compounds Co2VZ (Z = Ga, Ge, As, Se) are investigated using the projector augmented wave (PAW) pseudopotential method. By considering the strong localization of Co 3d-states and V 3d-states at the Fermi level, these Co2VZ (Z = Ga, Ge, As, Se) compounds were treated in the framework of the generalized gradient approximation (GGA)+U method, and the results from the conventional GGA method are presented for comparison. The results that were obtained from the density of states with the GGA+U and GGA methods show that the Co2VGa compound is a half-metallic ferromagnet. For the Co2VGe and Co2VAs compounds, the GGA+U method predicts that these two compounds are half-metallic ferromagnetic by shifting the Fermi level to a lower value with respect to the gap in the minority states, when compared to the conventional GGA method. The energy gaps are determined to be 0.283 eV and 0.425 eV, respectively. However, these results show that the density of states of the Co2VSe compound has a metallic character, although the 3d states were corrected when using the GGA+U method. We found that the characteristic of half-metallic ferromagnetism is attributed to the interaction between the V 3d-states other than Co 3d-states. The calculated total magnetic moments are 2.046 μB, 3.054 μB and 4.012 μB respectively for the Co2VZ (Z = Ga, Ge, As) compounds with the GGA+U method. The relationship between total spin magnetic moment per formula unit and total number of valence electrons of these Heusler compounds is in agreement with the Slater-Pauling rule.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this article, we demonstrated the fabrication and characterization of 395 nm GaN ultraviolet light-emitting diodes grown on patterned sapphire substrates. The current confining aperture is designed as 45, 55, 65, 75 and 85 μm. The indium tin oxide (ITO) was used as a current spreading layer. Use the metals of nickel and gold to form ohmic contact with P-AlGaN layer prior to dry etching. The 45-μm-diameter LED exhibits a 3-dB modulation bandwidth of 134 MHz at 50 mA and a light output power density of 1.2 mW (78 W/cm2) at 30 mA. In addition, the 3-dB frequency bandwidth is proportional to the square root of the injected current density.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA crystalline-like temperature dependence of the electrical characteristics of amorphous Indium-Gallium-Zinc-Oxide (a-IGZO) thin film transistors (TFTs) is reported, in which the drain current reduces as the temperature is increased. This behavior appears for values of drain and gate voltages above which a change in the predominant conduction mechanism occurs. After studying the possible conduction mechanisms, it was determined that, for gate and drain voltages below these values, hopping is the predominant mechanism with the current increasing with temperature, while for values above, the predominant conduction mechanism becomes percolation in the conduction band or band conduction and IDS reduces as the temperature increases. It was determined that this behavior appears, when the effect of trapping is reduced, either by varying the density of states, their characteristic energy or both. Simulations were used to further confirm the causes of the observed behavior.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The possibility of 3D printing a transformer core using fused deposition modeling methods is explored. With the use of additive manufacturing, ideal transformer core geometries can be achieved in order to produce a more efficient transformer. In this work, different 3D printed settings and toroidal geometries are tested using a custom integrated magnetic circuit capable of measuring the hysteresis loop of a transformer. These different properties are then characterized, and it was determined the most effective 3D printed transformer core requires a high fill factor along with a high concentration of magnetic particulate.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The active magnetic regenerator (AMR) is an attractive technology for efficient heat pumps and cooling systems. The costs associated with a permanent magnet for near room temperature applications are a central issue which must be solved for broad market implementation. To address this problem, we present a permanent magnet topology optimization to minimize the total cost of cooling using a thermoeconomic cost-rate balance coupled with an AMR model. A genetic algorithm identifies cost-minimizing magnet topologies. For a fixed temperature span of 15 K and 4.2 kg of gadolinium, the optimal magnet configuration provides 3.3 kW of cooling power with a second law efficiency (ηII) of 0.33 using 16.3 kg of permanent magnet material.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Si substitution on the ac electrical conductivity, dielectric and impedance properties of Li0.5+0.5xSixFe2.5−1.5xO4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.6) ferrite synthesized by high energy ball milling technique has been reported. The ac measurements were performed over a wide range of frequencies from 100 Hz up to 1 MHz and as a function of temperature from room temperature up to 960 K. Ac electrical conductivity as a function of frequency and temperature exhibited a semiconducting behavior. Small polaron hopping conduction mechanism has been observed in all compositions. For the samples with x = 0.0 and 0.1, the correlated barrier hopping mechanism was noticed at first, followed by the small polaron hopping conduction mechanism. The dielectric constant έ and dielectric loss ε″ decrease with increasing frequency and remain constant at higher frequencies, showing the usual dielectric dispersion. The dispersion of the dielectric properties was discussed through Koop's phenomenological theory. The low dielectric loss tangent at higher frequencies makes the opportunity of these ferrites for high frequency applications. The impedance spectroscopy technique was utilized to investigate the effect of grain and grain boundary on the electrical properties of the present series.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The tetragonal Cu2Sb-type Mn1.8Cu0.2Sb alloy was prepared by solidification under zero field and high magnetic field of 12 T. No thermal hysteresis was observed. High-magnetic-field (HMF) solidification led into c-axis texture in Mn1.8Cu0.2Sb alloy. Moreover, the severity of metamagnetic transformation in a Mn1.8Cu0.2Sb alloy was steepened and the resultant magnetic entropy change was enhanced. The exchange bias at low temperature was observed. Our work demonstrated the pronounced influences of HMF solidification on the crystallographic orientation, metamagnetic phase transformation and the magnetic exchange couplings.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, we have examined the influence of surface shell exchange coupling on the magnetic properties of a diluted ferromagnetic spin- 1 Ising nanocubic particle, by employing the effective-field theory with correlations based on the probability distribution technique. Some interesting results have been found such as, a tricritical point, a triple point, an isolated critical point, reentrant and even double reentrant phenomena, S-, R- and Q-type behaviors, as well as, both first- and second-order phase transitions as it is confirmed by the free energy. In addition, when the interactions are low between the surface shell sites, quadruple hysteresis loops can be seen in the system.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThin film transistors (TFTs) based on transparent oxide semiconductors, such as indium zinc oxide (IZO), are of interest due to their improved characteristics compared to traditional a-Si TFTs. Previously, we reported on top-gated IZO TFTs with an in-situ formed HfO2 gate insulator and IZO active channel, showing high performance: on/off ratio of ∼107, threshold voltage VT near zero, extracted low-field mobility µ0 = 95 cm2/V·s, and near-perfect subthreshold slope at 62 mV/decade. Since device stability is essential for technological applications, in this paper we report on the temporal and voltage stress stability of IZO TFTs. Our devices exhibit a small negative VT shift as they age, consistent with an increasing carrier density resulting from an increasing oxygen vacancy concentration in the channel. Under gate bias stress, freshly annealed TFTs show a negative VT shift during negative VG gate bias stress, while aged (>1 week) TFTs show a positive VT shift during negative VG stress. This indicates two competing mechanisms, which we identify as the field-enhanced generation of oxygen vacancies and the field-assisted migration of oxygen vacancies, respectively. A simplified kinetic model of the vacancy concentration evolution in the IZO channel under electrical stress is provided.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In order to improve the magnetic properties and corrosion resistance of sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets, the (PrNd)29.9Dy0.1B1Co1Cu0.15Febal (wt%) powders were mixed with Mg nanopowders, as grain boundary modifiers. For Nd-Fe-B magnets with 0.1–0.4 wt% Mg addition, the result showed that addition amount of 0.1 wt% Mg, Hcj reaches the maximum value of 999.1 kA/m, Br reaches 1.436T, (BH)max reaches 396.9 kJ/m3 and magnet density is 7.42 g/cm3, which are related to the microstructural modification of grain boundaries and the magnet density. Effects of Mg addition on corrosion behavior in sulphuric acid and sodium chloride solution were researched by electrochemical workstation. With increase of Mg addition level, the magnet turns to have a higher corrosion potential and lower corrosion current density, the corrosion poverty is improved. However, temperature coefficient remained nearly unchanged with Mg addition.© 2017 Elsevier LtdBias temperature instability (BTI) is one of the critical device degradation mechanisms in poly-Si/SiON and metal gate/high-k complementary metal-oxide-semiconductor (CMOS) technologies. Using the pre- and post-BTI flicker noise measurements, we investigated the bulk trap density, Nt in both of these technologies. The low-frequency noise spectra were predominantly of 1/fγ type with γ < 1 for NMOS and ∼1 for PMOS. For SiON based technologies, the lower VTH degradation due to PBTI was noticed while considerable VTH degradation was observed for NBTI in both SiON and MGHK technologies. Both MGHK and SiON pFETs show a clear increase in the effective volume trap density, Nt, after NBTI. The increase in Nt in MGHK n-MOSFETs during PBTI is markedly higher than that in MGHK p-MOSFETs during NBTI.© 2017 Elsevier LtdMultichannel, flexible neural probes have been fabricated using standard CMOS techniques. The neural probe consists of four shanks with 16 recording sites each of approximately 290 μm2. The recording sites are created using gold rectangular pyramidal electrodes sandwiched between two polyimide dielectric layers. Windows in the first polyimide layer expose the electrode sites and bonding pads. The bonding pads and interconnect wires at the topmost section of the probe are soldered to tungsten wire followed by encapsulation with epoxy to protect the interconnections from contact with phosphate buffered saline solution. The electrode test impedance values at 1 kHz are on average 135 kΩ. Multi-walled carbon nanotubes (MWCNTs) were deposited on electrode sites resulting in a reduction of impedance at 1 kHz to 6.89 kΩ on average. Moreover, the cell viability and proliferation of the PC12 cells on the surface of the probe was investigated by trypan blue exclusion assay to evaluate biocompatibility of the probe material. The PC12 cells attached and grew on the surfaces of the probe with no significant effect on the cells’ morphology and viability. The polyimide probe displayed a good cell viability and proliferation, making the polyimide attractive for potential candidate as probe materials in the fabrication of neural probes.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The local structures and EPR parameters of flatten CuIIX4 (X = N, O, S, Se, Cl and Br) compositions in proteins, liquid precursors and nanocrystals are analyzed and computed based on the cluster approach and perturbation method. The g and A components of copper(II) under D2d symmetry are well explained in terms of a global parameter β characterizing the local angular distortion away from the ideal Td tetrahedron where β0 ≈ 109.4712°. The calculated isotropy and anisotropy of g factors (gav and Δg) are found suffering an increase with the enlargement of the obtained βcal, which is consistent with the increasing trends of both experimental Δg and gav. The variation trend of gav can also be interpreted by the decreasing covalence of the studied system (or the increasing covalency factor ρ). On the other hand, the hyperfine structure constant A‖ decreases with increasing βcal. The obtained cubic crystal field parameter Dq and the core polarization constant κ experience the dropping and growing tendencies, respectively, with the enlarging copper-ligand bond length R. The above correlations are appropriate for all the studied CuIIX4 complexes and thus this work would be helpful to establish the complete physical scheme for uniform analysis on spectroscopic and magnetic behaviours of MX4 (M = transition metal and X = halides and pseudohalides) compounds.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic viscosity, S, of Mn-Ga and Mn-Al alloys with the L10 type crystal structure has been measured at temperatures in the range 2–300 K. The values of the fluctuation field, Sv, and the coercive field, Hc, of the two types of materials are comparable to each other. The observed dependence of Sv on the applied field, H, is not in accordance with the theory of magnetic viscosity of particulate recording media. The relationship between Hc and Sv, the latter measured at H = −Hc, fits the Barbier relationship, Sv ∼ Hc α, rather well.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We elucidate here the impact of niobium in ultra-low carbon grain oriented electrical steel (GOES) in terms of microstructure, texture, precipitation and magnetic properties that was processed by twin roll strip casting. Coarse and complex MnS + NbN precipitates, and fine NbN were nucleated at the grain boundaries and in the interior of the grain in the as-cast strip, which contributed to a small degree of grain refinement together with relatively random texture, and AlN precipitation was suppressed during the strip casting process. NbN continuously precipitated during the entire process and exhibited high stability during the reheating cycle, which provided stronger inhibiting force in comparison to AlN precipitates. As a consequence, fine and homogeneous inhibitors were obtained in the primary annealed sheet in the presence of Nb under cold rolling and annealing parameters used in the present study. On considering the effect of NbN particles or Nb in solution on the deformation and recrystallization behavior, the primary annealed Nb-containing sheet exhibited significantly more homogeneous microstructure in relation to Nb-free GOES, with grain size in the range of ∼8–12 μm, and was characterized by relatively more pronounced γ-fiber and weak Goss texture, beneficial for the abnormal growth of Goss grains. Furthermore, Nb-containing GOES experienced complete abnormal growth during secondary recrystallization annealing, such that the enhanced magnetic induction (B8 as high as 1.88 T) was obtained. In summary, the present study underscores that NbN can be used as an effective inhibitor in ultra-low carbon grain oriented electrical steel using strip casting technology.© 2017Ni-Mn-In-Co Heusler alloys demonstrate promising magnetocaloric performance for use as refrigerants in magnetic cooling systems with the goal of replacing the lower efficiency, eco-adverse fluid-compression technology. The largest change in entropy occurs when the applied magnetic field causes a merged structural and magnetic transformation and the associated entropy changes of the two transformations works constructively. In this study, magnetic and crystalline phase transformations were each treated separately and the effects of the application of magnetic field on thermal hystereses associated with both structural and magnetic transformations of the Ni52Mn25In16Co7 were studied. From the analysis of synchrotron diffraction data and thermomagnetic measurements, it was revealed that the alloy undergoes both structural (from cubic austenite to a mixture of 7M & 5M modulated martensite) and magnetic (ferromagnetic to a low-magnetization phase) phase transformations. Thermal hysteresis is associated with both transformations, and the variation of the thermal hystereses of the magnetic and structural transformations with applied magnetic field is significantly different. Because of the differences between the hystereses loops of the two transformations, they merge only upon heating under a certain magnetic field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.GdCo(35 nm)/Co(1 ÷ 7 nm)/Cu(4 nm)/Co(7 nm) spin valves were prepared by magnetron sputtering. The Gd23Co77 alloy with rare earth rich composition used in this study has a magnetization compensation temperature above room temperature. The effective composition of GdCo/Co exchange coupled bilayers changes from rare earth rich to transition metal rich compositions with the increase of Co layer thickness, leading to the change of giant magnetoresistance sign. The coercivity of GdCo/Co composite layer also changes. Consequently, the coercivity and the switching field of ferrimagnetic layer can be tailored by the insertion of thin Co layers of different thickness between the GdCo and Cu layers. In the present case, the switching field of GdCo/Co composite layer varied from 40 to 400 Oe.© 2017 Elsevier LtdChalcogenide alloys are paid much attention in the study of nonvolatile phase-change memory (PCM). A comprehensive research is investigated on Sb2Te (ST), a base material, from properties to performances in this paper. For the characteristics of ST films, the sheet resistance is extremely stable during cooling process in resistance-temperature measurement and the thickness change of ST film is 5.7%. However, low 10-year data retention temperature (∼55 °C) and large crystal grain are the demerits for ST. In addition, the structure characteristics show stable hexagonal phase and large grain of several hundred nanometers at crystalline state after annealing. As for electrical properties, although the ST-based PCM devices are characterized by fast operation speed of ∼20 ns, only about 8 × 103 times of stable operation cycles can be obtained. After that, the endurance performance deteriorates gradually due to the growth of grains. About resistance drift, the drift coefficients are very small both in crystalline state and in amorphous state.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic ground states, local crystallographic environment of Fe, and hyperfine interaction parameters in tetragonal FeX (X = S, Se, Te) are investigated by means of density functional theory (DFT) calculations using augmented plane waves plus local orbitals (APW + lo) method. We use several different magnetic configurations to evaluate the magnetic and electronic properties of this system, as well as the hyperfine interaction parameters at Fe lattice site. The results obtained for the ground state collinear anti-ferromagnetic arrangement relatively well reproduce the quadrupole splitting and isomer shifts from the available Mössbauer measurements. The Bader's atoms in molecule charge density analysis indicates bonding of closed-shell type and a sizable charge transfer from Fe to X. The system properties are sensitive to the structural optimization of the position of the chalcogen atom with respect to the iron plane.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.La0.7(Ca,Sr)0.3Mn1−xGdxO3 (with x = 0; x = 2% and x = 6%) manganites samples have been studied by several techniques including X-ray diffraction (XRD), Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM), 55Mn and 139La nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) spectroscopy and magnetometric measurements. The X-ray powder diffraction shows that all the prepared samples are single phase. La0.7Ca0.15Sr0.15MnO3 manganite is crystallized in the rhombohedral structure, whereas a structural transition towards orthorhombic system is observed for x ≥ 2%. Magnetization as a function of temperature shows that all samples exhibit a ferromagnetic (FM)-paramagnetic (PM) phase transition. Gadolinium doping in Manganese site was found to induce a strong initial decrease of the Curie temperature TC. The single double-exchange-narowed 55Mn NMR line, though broadened by Gd, demonstrates a metallic state in all samples. The current manganites exhibit a second-order magnetic phase transition at TC, which is also confirmed by the criterion of Banerjee. In addition, the normalized entropy change curves of all the compounds collapse onto a universal master curve, a further signature of a second-order transition. The Gd-doped compounds undergo a large magnetocaloric effect, with an enhanced width TFWHM of the entropy change peak as compared to the Gd-free materials, and have consequently potential applications in magnetic refrigeration.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This study develops a rate-dependent constitutive model which includes pinning site loss and eddy current loss for magnetostrictive materials. The static pinning site loss is described by an energy-weighted averaging framework; the stress- and field-induced eddy current loss is defined by Maxwell's equations. Due to the eddy currents, the magnetic field in magnetostrictive materials is inhomogeneous especially when the excitation frequency is beyond the cut-off frequency. The model developed in this study is able to capture the stress- and field-induced magnetic diffusion. Analytical solutions are derived for magnetostrictive rods and minor loop responses. However, numerical solutions can be found for other geometries and large input amplitudes using the same modeling algorithm. The model is used to interpret flux density versus stress measurements of a highly-textured, 〈100〉-oriented, polycrystalline Fe81.6Ga18.4 rod under constant current biasing. The model accurately and efficiently reproduces the nonlinear magnetostrictive behavior up to 800 Hz, which is much higher than the cut-off frequency.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, based on the transfer-matrix method, we investigate the transport properties of Dirac fermions through a superlattice of ferromagnetic/normal/ferromagnetic (FNF) buckled silicene junction where an electrostatic gate potential U is attached to the normal region. It is found that owing to buckled structure of silicene, the transmission probabilities and consequently valley-resolved conductance of the junction can be turned on or off by adjusting electric field strength, the number of barriers, and electrostatic gate voltage. Remarkably, the fully valley polarized current can be achieved by increasing the number of barriers in the proposed device. The effect of the number of barriers on the total charge conductance Gc of such a junction versus barrier length has also been investigated and it is shown that by increasing the number of barriers the amplitudes of Gc oscillations decrease. It is also found that Fano factor strongly modulated by applying electric field, number of barriers, and gate voltage. In particular, in presence of an electrostatic gate potential, Fano factor reaches the full Poissonian value F=1, which signifies that transport is forbidden (T→0) and pure tunneling occurs in this junction.© 2017 The AuthorsThe spin polarising properties of the iron oxide magnetite (Fe3O4) make it attractive for use in spintronic devices, but its sensitivity to compositional and structural variations make it challenging to prepare reliably. Infrared microspectroscopy and modelling are used to determine the spatial variation in the chemical composition of three thin films of iron oxide; one prepared by pulsed laser deposition (PLD), one by molecular beam epitaxy (MBE) deposition of iron whilst simultaneously flowing oxygen into the chamber and one by flowing oxygen only once deposition is complete. The technique is easily able to distinguish between films which contain metallic iron and different iron oxide phases as well as spatial variations in composition across the films. The film grown by post-oxidising iron is spatially uniform but not fully oxidised, the film grown by simultaneously oxidising iron showed spatial variation in oxide composition while the film grown by PLD was spatially uniform magnetite.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.I consider a single-level quantum dot coupled to two reservoirs of spin waves (magnons). Such systems have been studied recently from the point of view of possible coupling between electronic and magnonic spin currents. However, usually weakly coupled systems were investigated. When coupling between the dot and reservoirs is not weak, then higher order processes play a role and have to be included. Here I consider cotunneling of magnons through a spin-occupied quantum dot, which can be understood as a magnon (spin) leakage current in analogy to leakage currents in charge-based electronics. Particular emphasis has been put on investigating the effect of magnetic field and temperature difference between the magnonic reservoirs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic ordering of Mo2NiB2-type {Gd, Tb, Dy}2Co2Al (Immm, No. 71, oI10) compounds has been established using bulk magnetic measurements and neutron diffraction study. Polycrystalline Gd2Co2Al, Tb2Co2Al and Dy2Co2Al undergo ferrimagnetic transitions (TC) at 78 K, 98 K and 58 K, respectively, and low-temperature field induced transition (Tm) around 15 K, 20 K and 15 K, respectively. Between Tm and TC Gd2Co2Al, Tb2Co2Al and Dy2Co2Al are soft ferrimagnets. Below Tm Gd2Co2Al is soft ferrimagnet, whereas Tb2Co2Al and Dy2Co2Al exhibit permanent magnet properties with residual magnetization per rare earth of 4.95 B and 4.8 B, respectively, and large coercive field of 72 kOe and 22 kOe, respectively, at 2 K. The magnetocaloric effects of Gd2Co2Al, Tb2Co2Al and Dy2Co2Al were calculated in terms of isothermal magnetic entropy change and they reach maximum values of −10.4 J/kg K, −7.6 J/kg K and −6.6 J/kg K for a field change of 50 kOe near 75 K, 98 K and 58 K, respectively. Low-temperature transition of Gd2Co2Al is followed by the magnetic entropy change of −2.9 J/kg K in a field change of 50 kOe at 15 K. Low temperature magnetic ordering with enhanced anisotropic effects in Tb2Co2Al and Dy2Co2Al is accompanied by a positive magnetocaloric effect with isothermal magnetic entropy changes of +19.9 J/kg K at 20 K (field change 0–50 kOe) and +2.7 J/kg K at 15 K (field change 0–10 kOe), respectively. Neutron diffraction study shows that, in zero applied field, Tb2Co2Al exhibits c-axis ferrimagnetic ordering with magnetic space group Immm′ and propagation vector K0 = [0, 0, 0] below TCND ∼ 111 K with MTb = 8.86(15) B and MCo = 0.26(2) B at 2 K.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this work, gate-driven, substrate-triggered and gate-substrate-triggered techniques for both 5 V NMOS-based and 18 V NLDMOS-based power clamps under electrostatic discharge (ESD) stress were investigated in details. Schematics of the three trigger designs were depicted and their physical mechanisms were studied at first. To verify and make comparisons of their performance, they were fabricated in a standard 0.5-μm 5 V/18 V CDMOS process and characterized by transmission line pulse (TLP) test system, respectively. Experimental results show that 5 V NMOS-based power clamp with substrate-triggered technique has the lowest trigger voltage (∼8.37 V) and the highest failure current (∼3.58 A), and 18 V gate-substrate-triggered design based on NLDMOS has low trigger voltage (∼34.02 V) and greatest robustness (It2 = 3.32 A). Therefore, as for low-voltage NMOS-based ESD power clamps, substrate-triggered design obtains the most superior ESD protection performance; but for high-voltage power clamps, gate-substrate-triggered technique can make NLDMOS actualize uniform current conduction and better ESD robustness.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Oleic acid capped CoFe2O4 nanoparticles which exhibit a high coercivity of ∼9.47 kOe at room temperature were coated with a robust coating of SiO2. We have used chemical synthesis method to obtain SiO2 coated CoFe2O4 nanoparticles with different weight percentages of CoFe2O4 in SiO2 (1.5, 3.1 and 4.8 wt.%). The morphological investigation of the coated nanoparticles by transmission electron microscopy shows that the particles are spherical with average size ∼160 nm. Infrared spectroscopy reveals that oleic acid capping on the surface of CoFe2O4 nanoparticles is retained after silica coating process. The complete coating of SiO2 on CoFe2O4 nanoparticles is confirmed by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy as there is no signature of cobalt or iron ions on the surface. Magnetic measurements show that coercivity of SiO2 coated CoFe2O4 particles remains more or less unaffected as in CoFe2O4 nanoparticles at room temperature. In addition, the temperature dependent magnetic measurements show that at 5 K the CoFe2O4 and SiO2 coated 1.5 wt.% CoFe2O4 samples exhibit a very high value of coercivity (∼20 kOe) which is more than twice as compared to room temperature coercivity value (∼9.47 kOe). We conclude that silica coating in our study does not significantly affect the coercivity of CoFe2O4 nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work points out the origin of the convergence problem when the Jiles-Atherton hysteresis model is associated with the finite elements method (FEM) to analyze electromagnetic devices. To overcome this problem, a restriction is proposed and applied in the classical approach for the determination of the Jiles-Atherton hysteresis model parameters process. The presented methodology considers the inverse model, where the magnetic induction is the input variable and the magnetic field is the output variable.© 2017NiO nanoflakes and nanosheets are successfully synthesized with different anions via homogeneous precipitation method. The prepared samples are characterized by XRD, SEM, TEM-SAED, DRS, PL and VSM analysis. XRD pattern confirms the presence of cubic bunsenite phase with preferred orientation along (2 0 0) direction. SEM images exhibits the presence of nanoflakes, semi-spherical, flower-like and nanosheet shaped particles with an average size 34 nm. The estimated band gap energy and refractive index are found to be in the range 3.79–4.18 eV and 1.48–1.93 respectively. Blue emissions in PL spectrum with a strong band centered at 425 nm and green emission band at 537 nm confirmed presence of crystal defects in NiO lattice. VSM analysis reveals the presence of superparamagnetic and weak ferromagnetic behavior in the NiO nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In our present work, we have synthesized a series of Cd-Zn doped nickel ferrite ((Cd0.5−xZnx)Ni0.5Fe2O4; x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4 and 0.5) through standard chemical co-precipitation method to study the influence of diamagnetic ions (Cd, Zn) on the magnetic properties of ferrites. XRD and Raman spectroscopy were employed for the structural characterizations. The refinement of the X-ray diffractogram data augmented by the Williamson-Hall plots showed the presence of Cd2+ vacancies and a strained crystal structure. The vibrational spectroscopy indicated the presence of lower space-group symmetry and a distorted crystal structure. Magnetic measurements showed the samples possessed low magnetic anisotropy along with a canted spin structure. The Mössbauer measurements confirmed the cation distribution and gave evidence of super transferred hyperfine interactions arising due to canted spin structure of the system.© 2017 Elsevier LtdComparison of short-circuit (SC) characteristics of 500 V rated trench gate U-shaped channel (TGU) SOI-LIGBT and planar gate U-shaped channel (PGU) SOI-LIGBT is made for the first time in this paper. The on-state carrier profile of the TGU structure is reshaped by the dual trenches (a gate trench G1 and a hole barrier trench G2), which leads to a different conduction behavior from that of the PGU structure. The TGU structure exhibits a higher latchup immunity but a severer self-heating effect. At current density (JC) < 640 A/cm2, the SC destruction is suspected to be latchup-dependent and short-circuit withstand time (tSC) of the TGU structure is much longer than that of the PGU structure. Due to the high lattice temperature rise caused by the high current density at the emitter side in the TGU structure, the PGU exhibits a better JC-tSC trade-off at JC > 640 A/cm2. Comparison of layouts and fabrication processes are also made between the two types of devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work we present a method to produce NiH (β-NiH phase) nanoparticles from Ni-Cu solid solution. The reduction of Ni2+ and Cu2+ occurred at high temperatures and in presence of glutaraldehyde, citric acid and chitosan biopolymer. The samples are mainly composed of Ni and NiH phases with particles sizes ranging from 9 to 27 nm. DC magnetization studies reveal the presence of hydrogen-poor nickel hydride phase (α-NiH phase) which enhances the saturation magnetization at temperatures below 50 K. Stability of samples stored in air after 8 months was verified, and thermal treatment at 350 oC in presence of air transformed the samples to Ni and Cu oxides. Furthermore, we present a discussion regarding the mechanism of Ni2+ and Cu2+ chemical reduction.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Optically pumped atomic magnetometers have found widespread application in biomagnetic studies. Most of the studies utilize MX gradiometers as sensitive and simple arrangements. One the sensitivity improvement methods in the MX configurations is detection of magnetic resonance at higher harmonics due to nonlinear precession of spin polarization. To enhance the harmonic components, we have proposed square wave RF magnetic fields with various duty cycles as substitute for sinusoidal fields. Our results revealed that detection of the 5th harmonic of a 10% duty cycle square wave magnetic field, improved the magnetometer sensitivity by a factor of 4.5 respect to the first harmonic which could be a reliable option to generate high sensitivity MX magnetometers in the MCG applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Data of a magnetic susceptibility of ferro-and the ferrimagnetic particles of many technogenic, natural, special media are especially demanded for the solution of various tasks connected with purposeful magnetic impact on these particles. One of productive approaches to definition of a magnetic susceptibility χ of these particles consists in receiving experimental data of a susceptibility of disperse samples 〈χ〉 with a disperse phase of these particles. The paper expounds and analyses the results of experiments on defining (by Faraday method in a magnetic field with intensity H = 90–730 kA/m) the magnetic susceptibility 〈χ〉 of disperse samples (conglomerates) with a given volume ratio γ of magnetite particles (γ = 0.0065–0.25). The corresponding families of concentration and field dependences are provided alongside with discussing the applicability of linear and exponential functions to describe these dependences. We consider the possibility of defining single particles susceptibility χ (with simultaneous obtaining field dependence of this susceptibility) by the commonly used relation χ = 〈χ〉/γ both at relatively small (preferable for accuracy reasons) values γ – to γ = 0.02…0.025, as well as at increased values γ – up to γ = 0.25. The data χ are provided depending on H and correlating with known data at H < 90 kA/m; they are obtained at small values γ when with almost double distance between the neighbouring particles (in comparison with their proper dimensions) the mutual adverse (to determine valid data χ)magnetic impact of particles is practically excluded. The article also gives the data χ received at increased values γ with almost halved distance between the surfaces of the neighbouring particles. It is specified that in the studied (post-extreme) area of H both variants of obtained field dependencesχare functionally identical within the accuracy of a constant, and close to an exponential dependence χ ∼ 1/H0.75. With the account for the defined here value of constant-multiplier (0.8), it provides the grounds for obtaining valid data χ, employing the results of measuring 〈χ〉 for conglomerates with not obligatory small values of γ. It is demonstrated that being obtained by data χ, the calculated field dependence of the particle matter magnetic susceptibility χm (for the case when the particles are traditionally likened to balls with the characteristic for them demagnetising factor equalling 1/3) complies with the anticipated inverse function χm ∼ 1/H in the studied area H (where magnetization M expressed as M = χH reaches saturation M = Const).© 2017 The AuthorsCopper-permalloy [Cu1−x(Ni80Fe20)x] alloy films were deposited by co-sputtering and their chemical, structural, magnetic, and electrical properties were characterized. These films are found to have favorable weak ferromagnetic properties for low temperature magnetoelectronic applications. Our results show that by varying the composition, the saturation magnetization (Ms) can be tuned from 700 emu/cm3 to 0 and the Curie temperature (Tc), can be adjusted from 900 K to 0 K. The Ms and Tc are found to scale linearly between x = 25% and 100%. Electronic structure calculations are used to provide a strong fundamental understanding of the mechanisms responsible for establishing the observed electrical and magnetic properties. The theoretical results also show that the introduction of Cu into the permalloy lattice results in very strong spin scattering in the minority spin channel, with only moderate interactions in the majority channel.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn a Hall plate with finite size and contacts the Hall output voltage is given by the product of sheet resistance, input current, Hall mobility, magnetic flux density, and Hall geometry factor GH. GH∈[0,1] accounts for the loss in signal due to the contacts. At weak magnetic field GH→GH0 is a function of geometrical parameters only, which makes it the crucial point for layout optimization. We show how to express GH0 alternatively as a function of electrical parameters only, namely of input and output resistances over sheet resistance. This allows for an analytical optimization of signal-to-noise-ratio (SNR) without getting lost in the multitude of geometrical representations of equivalent Hall plates. In the course of this investigation we notice a hidden symmetry property of GH, which we prove rigorously in the limit of small magnetic fields. The physical meaning of this symmetry in the case of Hall plates with equal input and output resistances is also explained.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Highly-coercive nanocrystalline Pr5Co19 powders have been synthesized by mechanical milling for the first time. The structural properties are studied by X-ray diffraction and refined with Rietveld method. This analysis revealed that whatever annealing temperature, samples crystallize in the rhombohedral (3R) of Ce5Co19-type structure (space group R3¯m). The magnetization curve as a function of temperature shows a magnetic transition state at the Curie temperature TC = 690 K. The optimum hard magnetic properties have been obtained for Pr5Co19 milled for 5 h and annealed at 1048 K for 30 min. These alloys exhibit a coercivity of 15 kOe at room temperature. This high coercivity is attributed to the high uniaxial magnetocrystalline anisotropy, nanoscale grain size, and to the homogeneous nanostructure developed by mechanical milling process and subsequent annealing.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we present a detailed investigation of the impact of different Lightly Doped Drain (LDD) implants and different well doping on the low frequency noise performance of n- and p-MOS devices from a CMOS technology node. We investigate the impact of three different devices. Two with the same LDD implant but different well doping and one with different LDD implant cocktail. The results demonstrate that the different bulk doping does not affect the low frequency noise performance of the devices. On the other hand there is a serious impact on the noise level of the device with the different LDD implant. In order to further support our results we investigated devices with different lengths in the linear and saturation region of operation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We perform micromagnetic simulations of the magnetization distribution in inverse opal-like structures (IOLS) made from ferromagnetic materials (nickel and cobalt). It is shown that the unit cell of these complex structures, whose characteristic length is approximately 700 nm, can be divided into a set of structural elements some of which behave like Ising-like objects. A spin-ice behavior of IOLS is observed in a broad range of external magnetic fields. Numerical results describe successfully the experimental hysteresis curves of the magnetization in Ni- and Co-based IOLS. We conclude that ferromagnetic IOLS can be considered as the first realization of three-dimensional artificial spin ice. The problem is discussed of optimal geometrical properties and material characteristics of IOLS for the spin-ice rule fulfillment.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this report, the evolution of structure and magnetic properties in stoichiometry and oxygen rich LaMnO3 samples synthesized by a simple, cost effective, conventional co-precipitation technique are systematically studied. While X-ray powder diffraction reveals a monoclinic, I2/a structure in both samples, Reitveld refinement demonstrates higher John-Teller (J-T) distortion in the former one. Higher J-T distortion is accompanied with a large deviation in Mn[sbnd]O bond length. FESEM (Field Emission Scanning Electron Microscopy) analysis combined with crystallite size calculated from XRD peak profile suggest that the particles are of 50–60 nm and are polycrystalline in nature. The antiferromagnetism observed in bulk LaMnO3 with TN = 140 K evolves towards a ferromagnetic order in both stoichiometry and oxygen rich samples. However, Curie temperature, TC, is found to be higher in oxygen rich sample due to higher Mn[sbnd]O[sbnd]Mn bond angle. The large effective magnetic moment calculated from Curie-Weiss plot is found to be higher in stoichiometry sample. Higher moment is ascribed to high oxygen vacancies evidenced from XPS analysis. Dispersion behavior observed in frequency dependent ac susceptibility (χ) indicates the spin-glass, cluster-glass and interacting superparamagnetic behavior. Fitting the susceptibility data with phenomenological models such as Neel-Arrhenius, Vogel-Fulcher and Power law, while canonical spin-glass, cluster-glass and interacting superparamagnetism is ruled out, the spin-glass behavior with a higher relaxation time in oxygen rich sample is confirmed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Based on the thermodynamic theory, by introducing the Weiss molecular field and considering current eddy loss, a 1D nonlinear elasto-thermo-magnetic multi-field coupling hysteresis constitutive model is proposed for giant magnetostrictive materials. This new model can fully describe the effects of the stress, frequency and ambient temperature not only on the curves of magnetostriction and magnetization under the static frequency, but also on the hysteresis characteristics of magnetostriction and magnetization at the dynamic frequency. This model, which has more concise mathematical form compared with other related models, shows a good agreement with experimental results on the magnetostrictive strain and magnetization hysteresis loops. Furthermore, the predicted results have indicated the necessary of considering the Weiss molecular field. This model is of convenient for both theoretical researches and engineering applications of magnetostrictive materials due to being without piecewise function and implicit functions in magnetostrictive constitutive relations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ferrogels are composite materials widely introduced in the area of biomedical engineering as magnetic field sensitive transformers. These biomimetic materials can be prepared by incorporating monodomain magnetic nanoparticles into chemically crosslinked hydrogels. The properties of a biomimetic ferrogels taken for the study unlike that of the biological prototype might be set up by the synthesis and can be thoroughly controlled in a physical experiment. In this work we developed a giant magnetoimpedance sensor with a multilayered FeNi/Ti-based sensitive element adapted for ferrogel studies. Ferrogels were synthesized by radical polymerization of acrylamide in a stable aqueous suspension of γ-Fe2O3 MNPs fabricated by laser target evaporation. The magnetoimpedance measurements in initial state and in the presence of ferrogels with concentrations of nanoparticles from 0 to 2.4 wt% in a frequency range of 1–300 MHz allowed a precise characterization of the stray fields of the nanoparticles present in the ferrogel.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the nonlinear spin dynamics of a spin polarized current driven anisotropic ferromagnetic nanowire with Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) under the influence of electromagnetic wave (EMW) propagating along the axis of the nanowire. The magnetization dynamics and electromagnetic wave propagation in the ferromagnetic nanowire with weak anti-symmetric interaction is governed by a coupled vector Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert and Maxwell's equations. These coupled nonlinear vector equations are recasted into the extended derivative nonlinear Schrödinger (EDNLS) equation in the framework of reductive perturbation method. As it is well known, the modulational instability is a precursor for the emergence of localized envelope structures of various kinds, we compute the instability criteria for the weak ferromagnetic nanowire through linear stability analysis. Further, we invoke the homogeneous balance method to construct kink and anti-solitonic like electromagnetic (EM) soliton profiles for the EDNLS equation. We also explore the appreciable effect of the anti-symmetric weak interaction on the magnetization components of the propagating EM soliton. We find that the combination of spin-polarized current and the anti-symmetric DMI have a profound effect on the propagating EMW in a weak ferromagnetic nanowire. Thus, the anti-symmetric DMI in a spin polarized current driven ferromagnetic nanowire supports the lossless propagation of EM solitons, which may have potential applications in magnetic data storage devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this research, the variations of the residual magnetic field (RMF) and its gradients on the surface of 30CrNiMo8 steel specimens with two types of defect's shape were investigated by tensile tests. It was found that both the RMF and its gradient curves of the two defective specimens demonstrate similar evolution patterns in terms of shape and position during the loading process. The RMF gradients exhibit more pronounced characteristics than the RMF signals in the defect area, which makes it possible to capture the defect's information. Then some magnetic characteristic parameters are defined to characterize the quantitative relationship between the abnormal magnetic changes and the applied loads, as well as the defect characteristics. The characteristic parameters that reflected the degree of the abnormal changes are found to be quadratic polynomial correlated with the applied load. The characteristic parameters that reflected the acting range of the abnormal magnetic changes are capable of capturing the defect's location and shape. This research provides a potential possibility for quantitative defect identification for ferromagnetic steels by the RMF measurements.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe present a surface potential based analytical model for double gate tunnel field effect transistor (DGTFET) for the current, terminal charges, and terminal capacitances. The model accounts for the effect of the mobile charge in the channel and captures the device physics in depletion as well as in the strong inversion regime. The narrowing of the tunnel barrier in the presence of mobile charges in the channel is incorporated via modeling of the inverse decay length, which is constant under channel depletion condition and bias dependent under inversion condition. To capture the ambipolar current behavior in the model, tunneling at the drain junction is also included. The proposed model is validated against TCAD simulation data and it shows close match with the simulation data.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The dynamics of domain wall driven by the spin-orbit torques is theoretically studied in the heavy metal/ferromagnet bilayer with Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) and in-plane magnetic anisotropy. Based on the Walker profile, we infer that DMI has a selectivity for the chirality of head-to-head (tail-to-tail) static wall. By analyzing the dynamic equations obtained from the collective coordinates methods, we find that there exists a switching or a hysteresis of the polarity of wall in the low-current regime. In the presence of DMI, the wall can keep sustained propagation which velocity saturates for high current and is proportional to the strength of DMI. Furthermore, the DMI makes the adjacent walls possess the same chirality and move in the same direction.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The NiZn nanowires arrays were prepared into anodized aluminum oxide (AAO) templates by alternating current (AC) using electrochemical deposition (ECD). We have tuned the magnetic and structural properties of NiZn nanowires by changing the AC potential from 12 to 17 V. The samples were characterized by different elemental, compositional, structural and magnetic properties analysis. The X-ray diffraction shows that the nanowires are polycrystalline with dominant FCC phase and grain size calculated by Debye Scherrer formula is found to be 27 nm. Atomic force microscopy (AFM) was used for surface analysis which showed surface roughness ∼5 µm. The SQUID (superconducting quantum interference device) is used for magnetic properties analysis and it showed ferromagnetic nature of the samples which were expected because of the presence of Ni. The potential dependent coercivity and saturation magnetization was calculated which were variable and their maximum values are 68 Oe and 49.22 µemu respectively explained on the basis defects induced blocking of magnetic domain wall motion.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Experimental study was carried out to investigate the influence of particle size distribution function on the temperature dependent magneto-controllable first-order phase transition of the “gas–liquid” type in magnetic fluids. The study resolves one crisis situation in ferrohydrodynamic experiment made by several research groups in the 1980–1990s. It is shown that due to polydispersity magnetic fluids exhibit phase diagrams which are divided into three regions by vaporus and liquidus curves. Granulometric data states the primary role of the width of the particle size distribution function in the process of spinodal decomposition. New modified Langevin parameter is introduced for unification of liquidus curves of different ferrofluids despite the significant difference between the curves (one order of magnitude) in (H,T) coordinates.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The transport properties of GaAs nanowire (NW)-based devices are investigated using non-equilibrium Green's function technique combined with density functional theory (DFT). Two types of NW-based devices are studied, which include the electrodes that are made of half-metallic GaMnAs NWs grown along the [0 0 0 1] direction, and the scattering region that consists of a tunneling structure (GaMnAs/GaAs/GaMnAs) or a conducting structure (GaMnAs/GaAs:Be/GaMnAs), respectively. The proposed nanostructures both exhibit robust transport properties including spin-filtering, negative differential resistance (NDR) and giant magnetoresistance (GMR) effects, which are further analyzed with carrier channels and transmission spectra. These structures imply potential applications for low dimensional semiconductor spintronic devices such as spin valve.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ni81Fe19Oy thin films with different thicknesses were obtained by atomic layer deposition. After a thermal reduction process, Ni81Fe19Oy films were converted to their strong Ni81Fe19 ferromagnetic phase, usually known as Permalloy. The different thicknesses were obtained by considering 500, 1000, 1500 and 2000 supercycles, which are defined as a cycle of NiCp2/O3 followed by another cycle of FeCp2/O3. The samples were characterized before and after the thermal reduction process with respect to their crystallinity, morphology and magnetism. In particular, the thermally reduced samples exhibit holes whose sizes increase significantly as the thickness of the samples also increases, affecting their magnetic behaviour. As Permalloy is widely used in many applications, its synthesis through atomic layer deposition is expected to introduce comparative advantages over other synthesis processes, opening up new possibilities for nanoelectronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we report the synthesis of nano-sized CoCrFeO4 and NiCrFeO4 using the solution self combustion method and the variation in the magnetic and structural properties with different fuel to nitrate ratios-fuel lean, fuel rich and stoichiometric. Citric acid is used as the fuel. XRD analysis of the samples confirms the formation of pure spinel phased nanoparticles in fuel rich and stoichiometric cases. But CoCrFeO4 and NiCrFeO4 samples prepared under the fuel lean condition show the presence of a small amount of impurity phases: α-Ni in fuel lean NiCrFeO4 and α-Co in fuel lean CoCrFeO4. Fuel lean samples possess high magnetic saturation. The stoichiometric ratio results in finest nano-particles and structural and magnetic properties are very critically dependent on fuel to nitrate ratio.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this article, we report the measurements of the magnetothermoelectric power (MTEP) in metallic ferromagnetic thin films of Ni80Fe20 (Permalloy; Py), Co and CrO2 at temperatures in the range of 100 K to 400 K. In 25 nm thick Py films and 50 nm thick Co films both the anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) and MTEP show a relative change in resistance and thermoelectric power (TEP) of the order of 0.2% when the magnetic field is reversed, and in both cases there is no significant change in AMR or MTEP after the saturation field has been reached. Surprisingly, both Py and Co films have opposite MTEP behaviour although both have the same sign for AMR and TEP. The data on half metallic ferromagnet CrO2 films show a different picture. Films of thickness of 100 nm were grown on TiO2 and on sapphire. The MTEP behavior at low fields shows peaks similar to the AMR in these films, with variations up to 1%. With increasing field both the MR and the MTEP variations keep growing, with MTEP showing relative changes of 1.5% with the thermal gradient along the b-axis and even 20% with the gradient along the c-axis, with an intermediate value of 3% for the film on sapphire. It appears that the low-field effects are due to the magnetic domain state, and the high-field effects are intrinsic to the electronic structure of CrO2 and intergarian tunnelling magnetoresistance that contributes to MTEP as tunnelling-MTEP. Our results will stimulate the research work in the field of spin dependent thermal transport in ferromagnetic materials to further develop spin-Caloritronics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ni0.5Sn0.5CoxMnxFe2−2xO4 ferrites with x = 0.0–0.8 have been prepared by the micro-emulsion method, using CTAB as a surfactant material. X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transformed infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) and vibrational sample magnetometer (VSM) were used to investigate the effects of Co and Mn substitutions on cationic distribution, crystallite size, lattice constant, spectral, magnetic and dielectric properties. Lattice constant and crystallite size were found to increase from 7.4 to 9.25 Å and from 11.8 to 19.7 nm respectively with increasing substitution of Co and Mn ions. Saturation magnetization (MS) gradually increased from 20.5 to 47.6 emu/g with increase in the value of x. However, Coercivity increased from 152.7 to 462.4 Oe up to x = 0.4 and then it decreased thereafter. The dielectric constant, complex dielectric constant and tan loss (tanδ) were observed to decrease with increase in frequency, depicting the semiconductor behavior of the ferrites. Dc resistivity was observed to decrease considerably upon addition of Co and Mn content. The outcome for the tunable magnetic properties and achieved modification of the synthesized nanocrystallites may be chosen for tremendous applications; such as miniaturized memory devices that are based on the energy storage principles and capacitive components.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present a study of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy in [Co/Ni(t)/Co/Pt]×8 multilayers for use as free layers in magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJ) and spin valves. The thickness t of the Ni sub-layer was varied and the resulting magnetic properties were investigated. As determined from magnetic force microscopy and magnetometry measurements, all multilayers exhibited a perpendicular magnetic anisotropy with an increase of saturation magnetization with thickness t. From the temperature dependence of the magnetization, well described by a Bloch law, we find that the spin-wave stiffness constant of the [Co/Ni(t)/Co/Pt]×8 multilayers is larger compared to (Co/Ni) multilayers. These multilayers could be the basis for spintronic devices where the reduction of total Pt content could help to reduce the damping constant while keeping the magnetic anisotropy energy relatively high. These are conflicting requirements needed for high performance magnetic memory devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fe/Pt and C/Fe/Pt multilayer thick-films with different configurations were prepared by pulsed laser deposition technique and their microstructures and magnetic properties of FePt thick-films have been investigated. Compared to [Fe(0.972 µm)/Pt(1.192 µm)] and [Fe(0.486 µm)/Pt(0.596 µm)]2 multilayer thick-films, higher performance of magnetic properties with the coercivity about 875 kA/m was obtained in the [Fe(0.243 µm)/Pt(0.298 µm)]4 film because of the enhancement in interdiffusion among the thinner Fe and Pt layer. Additional C layers refine grains of the films, leading to an enhancement of the coercivity up to 1200 kA/m and a stronger exchange-coupling between the hard and soft magnetic phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nonlinear magnetoelectric (ME) effects in a flexible composite planar structure, containing mechanically coupled layers of amorphous FeBSiC ferromagnet and PVDF piezoelectric polymer have been experimentally investigated. Under the action of a weak harmonic magnetic field h with frequency f = 50–1000 Hz and tangential bias magnetic field H = 1–80 Oe, the structure generated a voltage of the same frequency. The efficiency of linear ME conversion reached 3.4 V/(cm·Oe) for the optimum bias field Hm ≈ 15 Oe. On increasing the excitation field up to h ∼7 Oe, the structure generated second and third harmonics with efficiencies of ∼25 mV/(cm·Oe2) and ∼2.5 mV/(cm·Oe3), respectively. The amplitudes of the harmonics were not monotonous functions on the bias field H and grew with the increase in the alternating field h. Under the action of two alternating fields with different frequencies f1 and f2, the structure generated ac voltages with frequencies equal to the sum and difference frequencies f1 ± f2. The efficiency of magnetic fields mixing reached a maximum of ∼30 mV/(cm·Oe2) in the absence of the bias field. The effects of harmonics generation and magnetic fields mixing arise due to the nonlinear dependence of the ferromagnet's magnetostriction λ on the bias field H. The efficiency of the nonlinear processes is proportional to the derivatives of the magnetostriction over magnetic field. The nonlinear ME effects in the ferromagnet-piezopolymer flexible structures can be used to design high-sensitivity dual ac/dc magnetic field sensors and energy harvesting devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Being inspired by a recent study (Dimitriadis et al., 2015), we study the finite temperature magnetic properties of the spherical nanoparticles with antiferromagnetic interface coupling including quenched (i) surface and (ii) interface nonmagnetic impurities (static holes) as well as (iii) roughened interface effects. The particle core is composed of ferromagnetic spins, and it is surrounded by a ferromagnetic shell. By means of Monte Carlo simulation based on an improved Metropolis algorithm, we implement the nanoparticles using classical Heisenberg Hamiltonians. Particular attention has also been devoted to elucidate the effects of the particle size on the thermal and magnetic phase transition features of these systems. For nanoparticles with imperfect surface layers, it is found that bigger particles exhibit lower compensation point which decreases gradually with increasing amount of vacancies, and vanishes at a critical value. In view of nanoparticles with diluted interface, our Monte Carlo simulation results suggest that there exists a region in the disorder spectrum where compensation temperature linearly decreases with decreasing dilution parameter. For nanoparticles with roughened interface, it is observed that the degree of roughness does not play any significant role on the variation of both the compensation point and critical temperature. However, the low temperature saturation magnetizations of the core and shell interface regions sensitively depend on the roughness parameter.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles have a wide range of potential applications. The fast magnetization inversion is the goal of magnetic recording and other data storage, logic and communication applications operating at GHz frequencies. Here, we present theoretical studies on mechanisms of fast coherent magnetization inversion in the system of ferromagnetic nanoparticles composed of molecules or clusters with high magnetic moments. The possibilities to accelerate magnetic relaxation are considered: the feedback field from a resonator, radiation friction and Landau-Lifshitz relaxation. Equations of motion for the interparticle dipole-dipole interactions are solved numerically and the role of these relaxation mechanisms has been examined. Radiation friction is shown to be an important factor at certain conditions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Lattice dynamics in a σ-Fe60V40 compound, which shows a re-entrant magnetism and orders ferromagnetic at TC ≈ 170 K, was investigated with the Mössbauer spectroscopy in the temperature interval of 5–300 K. Two relevant spectral parameters viz. the average center shift, 〈CS〉, and the relative recoil-free fraction, f/fo, were explored. The former yielded the Debye temperature, TD1, and the mean-square velocity of vibration, 〈v2〉, while the latter TD2 and the mean-square amplitude of vibrations, 〈x2〉. Significant differences in the lattice-dynamical behaviors in the magnetic and paramagnetic phases were revealed. In particular, the values of TD were notably lower and those of f/fo greatly higher in the former. This anomalous result has likely its origin in a remarkably high anharmonic contribution to the vibrations found for the ground magnetic state (spin-glass). Especially anomalous behavior vs. temperature exhibits 〈x2〉 where four well defined ranges could have been identified and ascribed to the paramagnetic, ferromagnetic and two spin-glass phases. Linear correlations between 〈v2〉-〈x2〉 were found within each of the four ranges. They enabled determination of force constants, hence a change of the potential energy, Ep, in each of the ranges. The total change of Ep ≈ 30 meV while the corresponding one of the kinetic energy, determined from the knowledge of 〈v2〉, was Ek ≈ 21 meV. The lack of balance between Ep and Ek follows from the anharmonic lattice-dynamical behavior observed in the spin-glass state. The results give a strong evidence that magnetism can significantly affect the lattice dynamics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically investigate a new mechanism of interfacial current in a two-layer system consisting of a magnetic insulator and an adjacent non-magnetic metal. The mechanism is based on Rashba spin-orbit interaction in the metal layer near the interface where the magnetic insulator induces non-zero magnetization. The rotation of the magnetization of the magnetic insulator induces the alternating interfacial current in the non-magnetic metal. Coordinate and time dependencies of the current and induced magnetization in the non-magnetic layer are calculated using quasi-energy approach assuming ballistic conductivity in non-magnetic metal. It is found that the current displays sizable magnitude within the metal layer over a distance which significantly exceeds a region with non-zero spin-orbit interaction. Both the current and the spin density induced in the metal layer demonstrate oscillatory dependence as a function of the distance from the interface due to the interference of the incoming and reflected waves.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Rod-shaped BaCoxTixFe12−2xO19 was prepared by precipitation-topactic reaction method with using needle-like α-FeOOH as a template, and its formation process, morphology, phase components and magnetic performances were investigated by XRD, FT-IR, SEM, EDS and VSM. The experimental results show that the prepared rod-shaped BaCoxTixFe12−2xO19 contains a small amount of middle phase α-Fe2O3, and with the content of (Co2+, Ti4+)-doping ions raising the contained middle phase increases. The dependence of the length-diameter ratio on the content of (Co2+, Ti4+)-doping ions is associated with the contained middle phase. With the content of (Co2+, Ti4+)-doping ions increasing, the prepared rod-shaped BaCoxTixFe12−2xO19 presents a slow reduction of coercivity, and the development of its saturation magnetization displays a drop followed by a slight increase. The shape anisotropy and occupancy of doping ions may play important role in the magnetic performance of prepared rod-shaped BaCoxTixFe12−2xO19.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Bilayer films of La0.7Sr0.3MnO3/LaFeO3 (LSMO/LFO) were grown on (0 0 1) orientated LaAlO3 substrate for different thickness of LSMO layer by using RF magnetron sputtering. The analysis of X-ray diffraction patterns show the growth of both films along (0 0 1) direction and the out-of-plane lattice constant of LSMO film decreases with increase in film thickness. Both films are found to undergo out-of-plane tensile strain and the lattice strain is found to decrease with increase in film thickness. The temperature variation of magnetisation measurements show that all films exhibit ferromagnetic transition with transition temperature in the range of 290 K for 30 nm thick film to 332 K for 200 nm film. M–H loops recorded at 50 K show a systematic increase in saturation magnetisation with increase in film thickness. The electron magnetic resonance spectra recorded at room temperature and at 77 K show the presence of ferromagnetic resonance peak. The resonance peak becomes sharper and shifts towards lower field as the film thickness is increased. The resonance spectra recorded with magnetic field applied perpendicular to the plane of the film show an additional peak due to lattice strain and surface pinning of spins.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The discovery of different two-dimensional (2D) materials both theoretically and experimentally, can change the scenario of the current electronic industry because of their intriguing properties. Among the 2D materials, the first one which was discovered experimentally was graphene. In this work we have studied the electronic and magnetic properties of a new allotrope of disordered graphene, which is not hexagonal, rather possesses tetragonal symmetry known as T-graphene (TG). Density functional theory (DFT) has been thoroughly employed to study the relevant electronic properties. In previous works, it has been reported that pristine TG is non-magnetic. It is also known that, introducing transition metal (TM) atoms is a feasible way to control the electronic and magnetic properties. Here we have reported the relevant properties of four TM atoms i.e. Sc, V, Cr and Mn doped TG. From the defect formation energy study, it has been noticed that all the structures are endothermic in nature. For each case, we have found appreciable amount of magnetic moment. With increasing atomic weight of the dopant atom, the magnitude of the magnetic moment also increases. We have tried to explain this magnetic ordering with the help of spin-polarized partial density of states (PDOS). Controlling spin degrees of freedom is important for building spintronic devices. From that point of view, we hope this study will be useful to build TG based spintronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, Cobalt-Ferrite (CFO) films were grown on silicon substrates with 300 nm amorphous silicon dioxide by Pulsed Laser Deposition (PLD) with different annealing conditions. The results of structural analysis prove that the CFO films have high crystalline quality with (1 1 1) preferred orientation. The Raman spectra and X-ray absorption spectra (XAS) indicate that the Co ions can transfer from tetrahedral sites to octahedral sites with increasing the annealing pressure. The site exchange of Co and Fe ions leads to the change of saturation magnetization in the CFO films. Our experiments provide not only a way to control the magnetism of CFO films, but also a suitable magnetic layer to develop silicon and semiconductor based spintronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.BiFeO3 is the most famous multiferroic material, but it has no strong spontaneous magnetization due to its antiferromagnetism. Here we show that giant ferroelectric polarization and strong spontaneous magnetization can be both realized in double perovskite Bi2FeMoO6 with R3 (#146) space group based on BiFeO3. Our first-principles phonon spectra establishes that this multiferroic R3 phase is stable. Our systematic calculations show that it is a spin-polarized semiconductor with gap reaching to 0.54–0.85 eV and has a strong ferroelectric polarization of 85 μC/cm2. This ferroelctricity is comparable with that of BiFeO3, but here obtained is a strong ferrimagnetism. Both ferroelectric polarization and magnetic easy axis are shown to be in pseudocubic [1 1 1] orientation. Our further analysis shows that the macroscopic spontaneous magnetization can be deterministically reversed through a three-step path by external electric field. Therefore, we believe that this Bi2FeMoO6 material can be used to design new multifunctional materials and achieve high-performance devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline Fe-10 wt% Si powders has been obtained by mechanical alloying. The synthesis conditions as well as their influence on the structural and magnetic properties of this soft magnetic alloy have been investigated in the light of several experimental techniques (X-ray diffraction, neutron diffraction, DSC, magnetic measurement, SEM). By X-ray diffraction (XRD) investigations have been highlighted that Fe-Si alloy is formed after 4 h of mechanical milling and the mean crystallite size is down to 14 nm (8 h milled sample). The heat treatment leads to the formation of the Fe3Si compound with DO3-type superstructure for low milling times. The saturation magnetisation of the as-milled powders decreases in the first 4 h of milling due to the formation of the Fe-Si alloy. The behaviour of the saturation magnetisation versus milling time and annealing was explained by the different magnetic moment of iron atoms in Fe3Si structure. The Curie temperature decreases from 770 °C (the Curie temperature for pure iron) to about 650 °C after 8 h of milling.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the static and dynamic aspects of the magnetic properties for single phase nanocrystalline BiFeO3 with average crystallite size of 35 nm. The frequency dependence of the peak is observed in the real part of ac susceptibility χ′ac vs T measurement and described well by the Vogel-Fulcher law as well as the power law. These analyses indicated the existence of cluster glass state with significant interaction among the spin clusters and results in cluster-glass like cooperative freezing at low temperature. The influence of temperature and magnetic field cooling on the exchange bias effect is investigated. A training effect is also observed. We have reported a significantly high ZFC & FC exchange bias of 200 Oe & 450 Oe at 300 K and 900 Oe & 2100 Oe at 5 K. The obtained results are interpreted in the framework of core-shell model, where the core of the BFO nanoparticles shows antiferromagnetic behavior and surrounded by CG-like ferromagnetic (FM) shell associated to uncompensated surface spins.© 20176.5 wt% Si electrical steel is a superior soft magnetic material with excellent magnetic properties which highly depends on texture. In this study, based on the heredity of 〈0 0 1〉 orientation in columnar grains, columnar grains are used as the initial material to prepare non-oriented 6.5 wt% Si electrical steel with excellent magnetic properties. EBSD and XRD techniques are adopted to explore the structure and texture evolution during hot rolling, warm rolling, cold rolling and annealing. The results show that, due to the heredity of “structure and texture” from the initial strong {1 0 0} columnar grains, annealed sheet with {1 0 0}〈0 0 1〉 texture had better magnetic properties, which can be used as non-oriented high-silicon electrical steel. Both preferred cube grain nucleation in deformed {1 1 3}〈3 6 1〉 grains in subsurface and coarse {1 0 0}〈0 0 1〉 deformed grains in center layer show the effect of initial columnar grains with {1 0 0} texture.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The paper presented the effect of post-diffusion annealing on the magnetic properties and microstructure of Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets by grain boundary diffusion with Pr68Cu32, Dy70Cu30 and Pr35Dy35Cu30 alloys. The coercivities of the samples changed slightly by diffusing Pr68Cu32 alloy then increased sharply by subsequent post-diffusion annealing. Differently, the coercivities of the samples showed large rise by diffusing Dy70Cu30 and Pr35Dy35Cu30 alloys then slight rise by subsequent annealing. Investigation on microstructure revealed that it was mainly due to different mechanism of grain boundary modification by Pr-Cu and Dy-Cu alloys. The coercivity enhancement of the diffused magnets by Dy70Cu30 and Pr35Dy35Cu30 alloys was mainly attributed to continuous Dy-rich shells in extensive layers of Nd2Fe14B grains. Nevertheless, the coercivity enhancement of the diffused magnets by Pr68Cu32 alloy was mainly resulted from relatively continuous and thin intergranular layers isolating Nd2Fe14B grains, which were achieved only by post-diffusion annealing.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a design and optimization method for submillimeter-wave Schottky diode is proposed. Parasitic capacitance is significantly reduced to under 20% of the total capacitance of the diode. The parasitic capacitance value is measured to be 0.6 fF for 1 μm anode radius which increased the cut-off frequency to 1.5 THz. A corresponding microfabrication process that provides higher degrees of freedom for the anode diameter, air-bridge dimensions and distance to the substrate is introduced and implemented. The DC and RF measurements are provided and compared with the simulations. In order to provide a better understanding of the diode behavior, the limiting factors of the cut-off frequency for different applications are studied and compared. For the mixer/multiplier mode, an improved and expanded formulation for calculation of the cut-off frequency is introduced. It is shown that the usable voltage bias range (with acceptable cut-off frequency) is limited by the exponential reduction of junction resistance, Rj, in mixer/multiplier mode.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of Re substituting for the divalent Zn ions and impurity pairs in wurtzite and zinc blende ZnO are analyzed by employing the Generalized Gradient Approximation with the +U corrections. The +U term applied to d(Zn), p(O), and d(Re) orbitals stabilizes spin polarization of Re. Re impurity introduces a defect level located in the band gap, and Re2+ generates the local spin 5/2 in both wurtzite and zinc blende structures. Magnetic coupling of Re-Re pairs as a function of distance between the defects, their relative orientation, and the charge state was calculated. All magnetic coupling between impurities is antiferromagnetic and due to an intermediate O atom via strong d(Re)-p(O) hybridization between Re and O states. The defect states and magnetic moments come from d(Re) with a contribution of p(O) orbitals of the O nearest neighbors of Re. The results show that the Re-doped wurtzite ZnO may be a new type of magneto-optical materials with a great promise.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Mn1-xZnxFe2O4 nanoparticles (x = 0.1, 0.3, 0.5, 0.7 and 0.9) were synthesized using chemical co-precipitation method. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis confirmed the cubic spinel structure of synthesized nanoparticles. The crystallite size and lattice parameter were found to decrease with increase in zinc substitution. Surface morphology by scanning electron microscope (SEM) and energy dispersive analysis of X-ray (EDAX) confirmed the presence of substituted metal ions in all the samples. Magnetic parameters at room temperature using vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) are found to decrease with increasing zinc substitution. Faraday rotation of Mn1-xZnxFe2O4 nanoferrofluids is found to vary with zinc substitution under applied magnetic field. Verdet constant obtained from Faraday rotation are found to vary from 5.35 to 2.71 deg./T cm with zinc substitution.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Application of high magnetic field (HMF) during the film growth and dopant of SiO are used to affect nanostructure of the evaporated Co films with a thickness of about 30 nm. Then, the relationship of magnetoresistance (MR) and magnetic properties with the nanostructure is explored. The results indicate that columnar growth of the Co film become growth of nanoparticles by doping SiO. HMF and SiO could be used to tune the surface particle size and surface morphology. The SiO suppresses the abnormal aggregation of the Co particle on the surface. The HMF accelerates the Co aggregation on the surface of the Co-SiO films. However, both HMF and SiO have no effect on the hcp phase formation of the films. The variations of these nanostructures significantly affect the MR and magnetic properties. The SiO and the HMF make magnetic isotropy of the Co films become anisotropy. Meanwhile, the coercivity increases 95%. However, the SiO dopant decreases the saturation magnetization. The nanoparticle growth makes the Co-SiO films exhibit a special MR phenomenon that the single MR peak becomes several peaks. These results indicate that the combination of the HMF and SiO dopant provides a new method to affect magnetic properties.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ferrite nanoparticles with bi-magnetic layered structure were synthesized by a seed-mediated co-precipitation technique. The strategy of growing a second magnetic layer enhanced the magnetic saturation (Ms) of the nanostructures, with a very small increase in their blocking temperature (TB). In contrary to the common magnetic nanostructures of 10–15 nm size range, which manifest blocking temperatures around room temperature (≈300 K), the measured TB values of the bi-magnetic nanostructures are much lower. The experimental TB values of the bi-magnetic nanostructures are much lower than their theoretically predicted ones. Moreover, the TB of the nanoparticles varies unusually, decreasing with particle size beyond a certain value. The low blocking temperature and high Ms of the fabricated bi-magnetic nanoparticles indicate the seed-mediated coprecipitation is an effective method for designing magnetic nanostructures suitable for biomedical applications such as in magnetic hyperthermia treatment, where nanostructures of low TB and high Ms are required.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe endurance degradation mechanisms of p-channel floating gate flash memory device with two-transistor (2T) structure are investigated in detail in this work. With the help of charge pumping (CP) measurements and Sentaurus TCAD simulations, the damages in the drain overlap region along the tunnel oxide interface caused by band-to-band (BTB) tunneling programming and the damages in the channel region resulted from Fowler-Nordheim (FN) tunneling erasure are verified respectively. Furthermore, the lifetime model of endurance characteristic is extracted, which can extrapolate the endurance degradation tendency and predict the lifetime of the device.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Materials presenting high spin-orbit coupling are able to convert spin currents in charge currents. The phenomenon, known as inverse spin Hall effect, promises to revolutionize spintronic technology enabling the electrical detection of spin currents. It has been observed in a variety of systems, usually non-magnetic metals. We study the voltage emerging in exchange biased Ta/NiFe/FeMn/Ta thin films near the ferromagnetic resonance. Measured signals are related to both inverse spin Hall and spin rectification effects, and two distinct protocols were employed to separate their contributions.The curve shift due to the exchange bias effect may enable high frequency applications without an external applied magnetic field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of strong singularity in the calculation of range function for the RKKY interaction in 1D electron gas is discussed. The method of handling this singularity is presented. A possible way of avoiding the singularity in the Ruderman–Kittel perturbation theory in 1D is described.© 2017We study the anisotropic one-dimensional XY model s=12 with uniform long-range interaction between the transverse components of the spins. The solution of the model was obtained by using the Jordan-Wigner transformation, and by treating the four fermion term within the mean field approximation. The proposed approximation reproduces the known exact results for two limiting cases of the model, namely, the isotropic model with long-range interaction and the anisotropic model without long-range interaction. Explicit expressions are obtained for the Helmholtz free energy, the induced magnetization and the isothermal susceptibility at arbitrary temperatures. Special attention is given to the study of quantum critical behaviour at T=0, by determining the phase diagram for the quantum phase transitions, and it is shown that the system presents a critical behaviour analogous to the one presented by isotropic model with long-range interaction. The spontaneous magnetization is also determined, at T=0, and we show that our results obtained by mean field approximation are in good agreement with those obtained by exact diagonalization of a finite chain; a comparison is also made with already known results.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.To understand the structure, phase precipitation and magnetic properties of the ternary Ce-Fe-B alloy, the effects of wheel speed and heat treatment on the melt-spun Ce2Fe14B alloy have been investigated. For the wheel speeds varied from 10 to 50 m/s, hard magnetic Ce2Fe14B phase precipitates in as-spun ribbons prepared at 10 and 20 m/s. Increasing wheel speed leads to the appearance and increase of amorphous phase and reduced saturation magnetization. For the amorphous ribbons prepared at 50 m/s, when the annealing temperature increased from 500 °C to 600 °C and 700 °C, α-Fe phase precipitates first followed by the appearance of Ce2Fe14B phase and grain growth. Transmission electron microscope analysis revealed that large Ce2Fe14B grains and the uniformly distributed small α-Fe grains precipitates from amorphous matrix after heat treatment. The good magnetic properties with saturation magnetization of 11.7 kG, remanence of 5.7 kG, coercivity of Hc = 2.8 kOe, and maximum energy product of 2.9 MGOe have been obtained in the optimized sample.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work an extensive characterization of Co doped Cu2O thin films grown by electrochemical deposition is presented. The doped films showed ferromagnetic behavior, with impressive Curie temperature up to 700 K. Undoped samples also presented magnetic moments at room temperature, but much reduced when compared to doped ones. The observed magnetism in undoped and doped samples was taken as an indicative of a defect-mediated ferromagnetism. Moreover, the sample magnetization was reduced as a consequence of a decreasing in defect density due to thermal annealing. Polarization-dependent X-ray absorption measurements demonstrated that oxygen derived states are the source of the observed magnetic moment and its magnetic dichroism depends on the amount of point defects. Structural, optical and electrical characterization provides information that confirms the incorporation of Co atoms in the Cu2O lattice, without the formation of secondary segregated Co phases. In addition, Electron Paramagnetic Resonance and Glow Discharge Optical Emission Spectroscopy measurements reject the existence of contaminants in the films, dismissing them as the source for the observed magnetism. Computational calculations have shown that Co doping shall locally increases the amount of defects, such as interstitial O, leading to highly oxidized regions from where the unpaired spin arises. This situation generates a picture similar to the magnetic polaron theory, but with the dopant ion pinning the defects.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Several new MgZn2-type Laves phases with the P63/mmc symmetry and RE(Co0.667Ga0.333)2 stoichiometries (RE = Gd, Tb, Dy, Ho, and Er) were obtained by arc-melting and subsequent annealing. Single crystals with the MgZn2-type structure were extracted from the annealed RE(Co0.667Ga0.333)2 (RE = Gd, Tb, Dy, and Ho) alloys and Ga flux-grown Er(Co0.667Ga0.333)2 sample. Powder and single-crystal X-ray diffraction methods were used for the phase analysis and structural characterization. A decrease in the cell volume due to the lanthanide contraction is observed from Gd(Co0.667Ga0.333)2 to Er(Co0.667Ga0.333)2. RE atoms occupy the 4f site, while Co and Ga are in the 2a and 6h sites. Magnetic behavior of the hexagonal MgZn2-type RE(Co0.667Ga0.333)2 phases strongly depends on the RE. Apparent ferromagnetic transition is observed for RE = Gd, Tb, and Dy, while the other two phases (RE = Ho, and Er) seem to be ferrimagnetic. Magnetocaloric properties of the Gd(Co0.667Ga0.333)2 phase were measured; the small isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔSiso) value of −4.94 J/kgK at 152 K and for a ΔH = 0–50 kOe field change suggests a conventional magnetocaloric effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.BaFe12−xAlxO19 (0 ≤ x 0 ≤ 2.5) powders and thick films were prepared by solid state synthesis method and screen printing technique respectively. X-ray diffraction confirmed the single phase without any impurity phase. Bond length calculation from FTIR spectra suggested the occupation of Al3+ ions at octahedral and tetrahedral sites. Magnetic measurements showed that coercivity (Hc), saturation magnetization (Ms) and anisotropic field (Ha) strongly depends on the substitution amount. As compared to the powder, substituted thick films possess higher Hc despite its larger grain size. M-T measurement showed a decrease in Curie temperature from ∼497 °C (x = 0.0) to ∼437 °C (x = 2.0). High dielectric constant (εr) and low losses (tan δ) were observed in Al3+ substituted samples. However, εr decrease and tan δ increase with temperature. Scanning electron micrographs showed that Al3+ substitution promotes hexagonal shaped grains in sintered thick films. Complex permeability behavior in X-band frequency is also investigated and found to be less in Al-substituted samples. Reflection losses are increased with Al3+ substitution and found maximum (−47 dB at 9.3 GHz) for x = 1.5.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the electronic and magnetic properties of layered ternary transition metal nitrides, FeWN2. We found that the density functional theory (DFT) based approaches within the generalized gradient approximation frameworks fail to predict the correct ground state configuration. While the DFT plus on-site repulsion U method (DFT+U) predict the AF ordering which it's in good agreement with experiment. We found that the metal-insulator transition is accompanied by a magnetic phase transition which occurred at the same time, a ferromagnetic-metallic to antiferromagnetic-insulating transition where Ueff=3eV. It is shown also that magnetism and correlation effects are important in band-gap formation in this compound. Our calculated results by DFT-mBJ show the same trend of the band gap. The fully spin polarized DOS at the Fermi level in FM phase makes from FeWN2 a promising candidate material for spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have probed the magnetic properties of hexagonal Sr0.6Ba0.4MnO3 (SBMO) and its correlations with the vibrational spectra. Magnetization measurements reveal two antiferromagnetic transitions at 325 K and at 227 K. Temperature dependent Raman spectra of SBMO suggest that though structural symmetry is maintained across the transition temperatures, imprints of these magnetic transitions are noticed in anomalous behavior of Mn displacement E1g mode position in the same temperature range. A1g mode related to non-magnetic oxygen ion does not show such anomaly and follows an anharmonic behavior. Deviation from the anharmonic behavior of the E1g mode and its absence in A1g highlight the spin-phonon coupling in SBMO. The spin-phonon coupling parameter is evaluated to be 2.2 cm−1.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles cobalt ferrite, vacancies defective through vanadium substitution for iron, were synthesized by a sol-gel method. Two systems CoFe2-xVxO4 (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 0.25) and CoFe2-1.67xVxO4 (x = 0.1, 0.2) were prepared. The crystal structure, microstructure and magnetic properties were investigated using XRD, SEM and VSM magnetometer. The occupancy of tetrahedral and octahedral sites by different cations was determined by Rietveld analysis and correlated with magnetic measurements. Vanadium resides at octahedral sites up to x = 0.10, while for higher values it resides mainly at octahedral sites with a lesser amount at the tetrahedrons. Upon increasing the vanadium content, the cell parameter decreases and the bond lengths of the tetrahedral and octahedral sites change opposite to each other. The change in the coercivity and saturation magnetization is correlated with cation distribution. For the same amount of doping x, the iron deficient samples CoFe2-1.67xVxO4 have saturation magnetization obviously reduced than the corresponding samples in CoFe2-xVxO4. The spin canting between cations in A- and B- sites was discussed in details based on Yafet–Kittel triangular arrangement model.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on domain pattern transfer from a ferroelectric BaTiO3 substrate to a CoFeB wedge film with a thickness of up to 150 nm. Strain coupling to domains in BaTiO3 induces a regular modulation of uniaxial magnetic anisotropy in CoFeB via an inverse magnetostriction effect. As a result, the domain structures of the CoFeB wedge film and BaTiO3 substrate correlate fully and straight ferroelectric domain boundaries in BaTiO3 pin magnetic domain walls in CoFeB. We use X-ray photoemission electron microscopy and magneto-optical Kerr effect microscopy to characterize the spin structure of the pinned domain walls. In a rotating magnetic field, abrupt and reversible transitions between two domain wall types occur, namely, narrow walls where the magnetization vectors align head-to-tail and much broader walls with alternating head-to-head and tail-to-tail magnetization configurations. We characterize variations of the domain wall spin structure as a function of magnetic field strength and CoFeB film thickness and compare the experimental results with micromagnetic simulations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and electromagnetic properties of nanocrystalline spinel ferrites with chemical formula MgxCd1−xFe2O4 (x = 0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8 and 1.0) prepared by oxalate co-precipitation method under microwave sintering technique were studied. The magnetic and dielectric parameters of ferrites were determined by using vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analyzer (VNA) respectively. Magnetic parameters such as saturation magnetizations (Ms), coercive force (Hc), remnant magnetization (Mr), Yafet-Kittel (Y-K) angle of ferrites were determined from hysteresis loops. The variation of real permittivity (ε′), dielectric loss tangent (tanδe), real permeability (µ′) and magnetic loss tangent (tanδm) with frequency and Mg2+content were studied in X-band frequency range. The values of ε′, tanδe, µ′ and tanδm of ferrites were observed to be in range of 4.2 – 6.12, 2.9 × 10−1 – 6 × 10−2, 0.6 – 1.12 and 4.5 × 10−1 – 2 × 10−3 respectively for the prepared compositions. The study of variation of reflection loss with frequency of all ferrites shows that ferrite with magnesium content x = 0.4 can be potential candidate for microwave applications in X-band.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this brief, multilevel data storage for phase-change memory (PCM) has attracted more attention in the memory market to implement high capacity memory system and reduce cost-per-bit. In this work, we present a universal programing method of SET stair-case current pulse in PCM cells, which can exploit the optimum programing scheme to achieve 2-bit/ 4state resistance-level with equal logarithm interval. SET stair-case waveform can be optimized by TCAD real time simulation to realize multilevel data storage efficiently in an arbitrary phase change material. Experimental results from 1 k-bit PCM test-chip have validated the proposed multilevel programing scheme. This multilevel programming scheme has improved the information storage density, robustness of resistance-level, energy efficient and avoiding process complexity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The electronic and magnetic properties of novel Heusler alloys Co2HfZ (Z = Al, Ga, Ge, Sn) with Hg2CuTi- and Cu2MnAl-type structures are investigated by first-principles calculations. It is found that the Cu2MnAl-type structure is more stable than the Hg2CuTi-type structure for all the Co2HfZ alloys. The Hg2CuTi-type structures of Co2HfZ show a metallic ferrimagnetic character with a high spin polarization. The Cu2MnAl-type structures have half-metallic ferrimagnetic behavior with minority-spin gaps of 0.38, 0.06, 0.55 and 0.46 eV for Co2HfAl, Co2HfGa, Co2HfGe and Co2HfSn, respectively. The total magnetic moments of the Cu2MnAl-type alloys are 1µB, 1µB, 2µB and 2µB, which obey the Slater–Pauling rule (Mtot = Ztot − 24). Analysis of the projected density of states indicates clear gaps resulting from the hybridization of Co (A) and Co (B) atoms. The half-metallicity makes Co2HfZ with Cu2MnAl-type structure promising candidates for spintronic applications.© 2017Polycrystalline (1 − x) BiFeO3-xBa0.8Sr0.2TiO3 (0.1 ≤ x ≤ 0.9) ceramics have been synthesized by using the solid-state-reaction method. The structural, dielectric, ferroelectric, magnetic and electrical properties of the resulting solid solutions have been investigated. XRD analysis reveals that the composition-driven rhombohedral to cubic phase transition occurs at x ≈ 0.4. Experimental results reveal that BST substitution leads to the suppression of the spiral spin structure, resulting in the appearance of net magnetization. The electrical conductivity has been found to increase with increase in frequency of applied electric field. The dielectric constant (ε′) and the dielectric loss (ε″) have been found to decrease with increase in frequency of applied electric field and shows non-Debye relaxation behavior. The samples have been found to exhibit magnetoelectric coupling (up to x = 0.2). An enhancement in ferroelectric properties with increasing BST content (up to x = 0.3) has been observed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The lattice parameters, electronic structure, magnetism and multiferroicity of compound BiMn3Fe4O12 were investigated by using the first-principle calculations. The total energy calculations indicated that BiMn3Fe4O12 was a G-type antiferromagnetic insulator. The ferroelectricity was induced by magnetism and originated from the hybridization between Fe and Mn ions. The electric polarization was predicted to be around 39 μC/m2 along 〈1 1 1〉 orientation. It was sensitive to the lattice distortion such as Fe ion shift of FeO6 octahedron and a great improvement in electric polarization could be possibly achieved by strain engineering or inducing chemical pressure. Furthermore, the effects of on-site Coulomb repulsion on electronic structure, magnetism, and ferroelectricity were also discussed. It was showed that with increasing U the spin splitting increased, resulting in an increased ban-gap and hybridization between Fe and Mn ions, and then electric polarization.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic fluid hyperthermia (MFH) is a promising cancer treatment modality where alternating magnetic field is used for heating cancerous cells loaded with magnetic nanofluids. Of late, it is realized that magnetic nano-carriers in the size range ∼100–200 nm (e.g. magnetic nanocomposites, magnetic liposomes and magnetic nanoemulsions) are ideal candidates for multimodal MFH coupled with drug delivery or photodynamic therapy due to enhanced permeation and retention (EPR) in the leaky vasculature of cancerous tissues. Here, we study the radiofrequency alternating magnetic field induced heating in magnetically polarizable oil-in-water nanoemulsions of hydrodynamic diameter ∼200 nm, containing single domain superparamagnetic nanoparticles of average diameter ∼10 nm in the oil phase. We probe the effects of size polydispersity of the droplets and medium viscosity on the field induced heating efficiency. The contribution of Neel and Brown relaxation of the magnetic nanoparticles on specific absorption rate (SAR) of the magnetic nanoemulsions, was found to increase linearly with the square of the applied field, with a maximum value of 164.4 ± 4.3 W/gFe. In magnetic nanoemulsions, the heating is induced by the Neel-Brown relaxation of the MNP over a length scale of 10 nm, and the whole scale Brownian relaxation of the emulsion droplets has over a length scale of 200 nm. The magnetic nanoemulsion sample with lower polydispersity (σ = 0.2) exhibited a significantly higher SAR value (3.3 times higher) as compared to the sample with larger polydispersity (σ = 0.4). The SAR values of the samples with 4.6 and 1.7 wt.% of MNP loading with σ values 0.4 a 0.3, respectively were comparable, suggesting a higher heating efficiency in nanofluid containing particles of lower size polydispersity even at lower particle loading. The emulsion droplets, immobilized in an agar matrix (4 wt.%), gave a maximum SAR value of 41.7 ± 2.4 W/gFe as compared to 111.8 ± 3.4 W/gFe in the case of droplets dispersed in water, which indicate a ∼40–50% drop in SAR due to abrogation of whole scale Brownian relaxation of the emulsion droplets. This suggests the need for improving the heating efficiency during actual therapy in tissues. The residual SAR of the immobilized sample correlates well with the SAR of the magnetic nanofluid, albeit under a lower external field amplitude due to demagnetization effect of the clusters of MNP loaded inside the droplets. The observed heating efficiency of larger sized magnetic nanoemulsion offer new possibilities for multimodal therapy due to availability of large volume for loading anti-cancer drug or photodynamic agents.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Among Heusler compounds, the ones being magnetic semiconductors (also known as spin-filter materials) are widely studied as they offer novel functionalities in spintronic and magnetoelectronic devices. The spin-gapless semiconductors are a special case. They possess a zero or almost-zero energy gap in one of the two spin channels. We employ the GW approximation to simulate the electronic band structure of these materials. Our results suggest that in most cases the use of GW self energy instead of the usual density functionals is important to accurately determine the electronic properties of magnetic semiconductors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Mixed Fe3O4/CuO nanofluid was selected and the role of external magnetic field with strength up to 0.2 T was studied on the thermal conductivity of the considered nanofluid with different basic parameters such as nanoparticle concentration and temperature of the base fluid. Thermal conductivity was measured using hot wire technique. Also the magnetic field applied uniformly to the nanofluid system regarding to the different situations of the field strength and weight percent of the both containing Fe3O4 and CuO nanoparticles. We found that the thermal conductivity of the pure and mixed Fe3O4 with CuO nanoparticle has significant enhancement at presence of the external magnetic field. However the rate of the thermal conductivity growth is strongly correlated with the magnetic field strength which is applied uniformly to the system. More results including measurement technique and conclusions are described in details at the context.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.There have been extended studies on the appearance of ferromagnetism in transition-metal–metalloid (MD) glasses. In particular, the paramagnetic (PM) to ferromagnetic (FM) transition has been investigated on numerous (Ni100-xFex)-MD alloys upon the introduction of Fe where MD can represent a combination of various metalloid elements, while keeping the metal/metalloid ratio constant. It has been reported that adding a sufficient amount of Fe to a Pauli PM Ni-MD alloy matrix first induces a spin-glass (SG) state at low temperatures which goes over to a PM state at higher temperatures. Beyond a certain Fe content, xc, the SG state transforms to a FM state upon increasing the temperature. By plotting the characteristic transition temperatures as a function of the Fe content, a magnetic phase diagram can be constructed for each Ni-Fe-MD system which has a multicritical point (MCP) at xc. By using the reported magnetic phase diagrams of various Ni-Fe-MD alloy systems, it is shown that the critical Fe content, xc scales inversely with the density of states at the Fermi level, N(EF), of the parent Ni-MD matrix. This means that the higher the N(EF), the lower the critical Fe content to induce ferromagnetism in the Ni-MD matrix. This is then discussed in terms of the Stoner enhancement factor, S, which characterizes the tendency of the matrix to become ferromagnetic.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Coupling at the interfaces between antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic constituents is known to be responsible for the exchange-bias effect, where external stimulus like temperature, electric or magnetic fields are supposed to influence the associated phenomenology. In this paper, we prepare the polycrystalline Co2TiO4 and investigate its temperature- and field-dependent magnetization, from which an unusual exchange-bias effect associated with magnetic reversals is extracted. At low temperature, a continuous crossover from negative to positive exchange-bias fields can be obtained with increment of the cooling magnetic field, showing a magnetically tunable effect. The bipolar switching of exchange-bias field in this compound depends on the relative orientation between Co2+ and [Co3+Ti3+] magnetic moments.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.For the first time, we report on the low temperature Mössbauer spectroscopic study of Zn2+0.5Mn2+0.5Sm3+xFe3+2−xO4 (where x = 0.01–0.05) prepared by the modified solution combustion method using a mixture of urea and glucose as a fuel. The Mössbauer spectroscopy at room and low temperatures was applied to understand the magnetic properties of the samples. The room temperature Mössbauer spectroscopy results suggest that the occupation of the octahedral sites by Sm3+ ions leads to the distortion enhancement of 57Fe nuclei environments, which leads to an increase in quadrupole splitting Δ values of D2 and D3 doublets. The low temperature Mössbauer spectroscopy results indicate that the presence of Sm3+ ions in the octahedron sites causes the decrease in the number of Fe–O–Fe chains. The transformation of Mössbauer spectra doublets into Zeeman sextets is accompanied by a significant decrease in the magnitude IM of Mössbauer spectra intensity within the 0–1.2 mm/s velocity range normalized to its value at 300 K. This drop in the temperature dependence of IM allows one to obtain the magnetic phase transition temperature TM from the Mössbauer experiment.© 2017 Elsevier LtdTo better comprehend electrical silicon-package interaction in high voltage applications requires full characterization of the electrical properties of dielectric materials employed in wafer and package level design. Not only the packaging but wafer level dielectrics, i.e. passivation layers, would experience high electric fields generated by the voltage applied pads. In addition the interface between the passivation layer and a mold compound might develop space charge because of the mismatch in electrical properties of the materials. In this contribution electrical properties of a thin silicon nitride (Si3N4) dielectric is reported as a function of temperature and electric field. The measured values later analyzed using different temperature dependent exponential expressions and found that the Mott variable range hopping conduction model was successful to express the data. A full temperature/electric field dependency of conductivity is generated. It was found that the conduction in Si3N4 could be expressed like a field ionization or Fowler-Nordheim mechanism.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper the reciprocal relations for the matrix coefficients of the resistance of nonlinear multipole located in an inhomogeneous magnetic field was considered. It is shown that the nonlinear resistance matrix can be represented as the sum of two matrices. The coefficients of the first matrix depend on both the current flowing through the multipole and the external inhomogeneous magnetic field. First matrix is responsible for nonlinear effects. The second matrix coefficients depend only on the induction of the external inhomogeneous magnetic field and are responsible for the Hall effect and the offset resistance. We obtain reciprocal relations for these matrices and experimentally show that the classical reciprocal relations are valid for the second matrix within the limits of experimental accuracy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Interesting behaviors in the magnetocaloric effect and magnetoresistivity are predicted for cubic CsCl-type TmZn compound in which, recently, the giant magnetocaloric effect was reported. Our model includes the crystalline electrical field, exchange, Zeeman and elastic-quadrupolar interactions. The calculated giant magnetocaloric effect is in agreement with the experimental data upon magnetic field variation along the easy magnetic direction 〈0 0 1〉. For applied magnetic field direction 〈1 1 0〉an inverse magnetocaloric effect was predicted in the temperature range from 0.7 to 8.2 K. For applied magnetic field along 〈1 1 1〉direction, a discontinuity in magnetic entropy change was predicted at 14.1 K leading to a latent heat of 80 J/mol and magnetic entropy change of 36 J mol−1 K−1 in the field change from zero to 5 T. Besides, strong correlation between the anisotropic magnetoresistivity and magnetocaloric effects was reported.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the correlation between roughness, remanence and coercivity in Co/Ni films grown on Cu seed layers of varying thickness. Increasing the Cu seed layer thickness of Ta/Cu/8×[Co/Ni] thin films increases the roughness of the films. In-plane magnetization loops show that both the remanence and coercivity increase with increasing seed layer roughness. Polar Kerr microscopy and magnetic force microscopy reveal that the domain density also increases with roughness. Finite element micromagnetic simulations performed on structures with periodically modulated surfaces provide further insight. They confirm the connection between domain density and roughness, and identify the microsocpic structure of the domain walls as the source of the increased remanence in rough films. The simulations predict that the character of the domain walls changes from Bloch-like in smooth films to Néel-like for rougher films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Studying the magnetic property of La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 (LCMO) bulks, it has been found that they exhibit a first-order phase transition (FOPT) around the ferromagnetic-paramagnetic (FM-PM) transition. However, most previous studies just concerned on their magnetic property for applied fields below 60 kOe. To learn more about this material system, we have considered the influence of high applied fields up to 140 kOe on the magnetic property of a polycrystalline LCMO bulk sample. The detailed analyses based on the Banerjee criterion, Arrott and Kouvel-Fisher methods, and scaling hypothesis prove LCMO exhibiting the first-order phase transition at low applied fields (H) and the tricritical behavior at high applied fields H > 65 kOe with critical exponents β ≈ 0.25 and γ ≈ 1 close to those expected for the tricritical mean-field theory. We have also found a strong dependence of the FM-PM transition temperature (TC) on H varying as a power function TC(H) ∝ Hn (with n = 0.64 and H > 3.5 kOe), and an existence of the Griffiths phase that is completely suppressed as H ≥ 35 kOe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Barium Z-type hexaferrites (Ba3Co2Cr2 xFe24−2 xO41 with x = 0, 0.3, 0.6 and 0.9) were synthesised using solid state reaction technique. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis confirmed the formation of single phase Z-type hexaferrite structure. From transmission electron microscopy (TEM) analysis platelet morphologies were observed in all the studied samples and the average grain size were calculated, which were around 100 nm. Magnetisation measurements (M-H) and (M-T) were carried out using vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). Saturation magnetisation (Ms) was found to decrease with increasing Cr content in the samples whereas, magnetic coercive field (Hc) and remanent magnetisation (Mr) were increased. Electromagnetic absorption properties of all the ferrite samples were tested in 2–18 GHz frequency range using Agilent Vector Network Analyser. The sample Ba3Co2Cr1.2Fe22.8O41 (x = 0.6) had exhibited maximum microwave absorption of 99.8% at 5.34 GHz. All the samples showed broad absorption bandwidth of 3–3.2 GHz as well significantly high enough reflection loss of −10 dB. Therefore, the developed Z-type hexaferrites can be used for good electromagnetic shielding/absorber applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effects of annealing and magnetic field annealing on the Gilbert damping constant of polycrystalline CoFe thin films were investigated. Angle dependent ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) demonstrates that an in-plane (IP) anisotropy is developed by field annealing which dramatically reduces the effective Gilbert damping constant. An inverse relation between effective IP anisotropic field and effective damping is shown by FMR measurement in cryogenic environment. This relation is further confirmed in bilayer films of IrMn/CoFe where a strong in-plane unidirectional anisotropy is developed. A large effective IP anisotropic field is possibly associated with a smaller distribution of local fields which reduces the FMR linewidths and subsequently effective damping.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Developments in electronic industries for telecommunications and demands for decreasing electromagnetic radiation pollution result in developing researches on microwave absorption materials. The target of the present study is to design materials with high absorption properties for electromagnetic waves in the 12–18 GHz range. Thus, Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles were syntheses through chemical co-precipitation reinforced by ultrasonic. Then, BaTiO3 nanocrystalline powder was synthesized by the hydrothermal sol-gel method under atmospheric oxygen. Next, nano-particles of barium titanate were deposited on the multi-walled carbon nanotubes (BaTiO3@CNT). It was concluded that a magnetic-dielectric nanocomposite has superior microwave absorption properties in comparison to individual magnetic or dielectric absorbers. Also, in order to obtain an optimum absorption in a wide frequency band, dielectric-CNT nanocomposites represents higher properties than magnetic-CNT composites. It is concluded that composites with more magnetic percentage showed better absorption in low frequency band (12 GHz), whereas composites with more dielectric percentage exhibited superior absorption for high frequency band (18 GHz). 80–93% absorption was obtained in the frequency range of 16.7–18 GHz by composite 40M.20F.40C (40% paraffin, 20% magnetite, 40% multi-walled carbon nanotubes). Also, composite 40M.20B.40B@C (40% paraffin, 20% barium titanate, 40% barium titanate deposited on multi-walled carbon nanotubes) showed the absorption of 80–90%.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Devlin two-time Green function framework is used to investigate the role played by the easy-axis single-ion anisotropy on the phase diagram of (d>2)-dimensional spin-1 planar ferromagnets which exhibit a magnetic-field-induced quantum phase transition (QPT). In this scheme, the exchange anisotropy terms in the equations of motion are treated at the Tyablikov decoupling level while the crystal field anisotropy contribution is handled exactly. The emerging key result is a reentrant structure of the phase diagram close to the quantum critical point for a well defined window of values of the single-ion anisotropy parameter. This experimentally interesting feature was recently recovered by employing the Anderson-Callen decoupling (ACD) which is considered to provide meaningful results only for small values of the single-ion anisotropy parameter. In this context, our findings suggest that the simplest ACD treatment offers the possibility to have, at least qualitatively, a correct physical scenario of quantum criticality close to a field-induced QPT avoiding the limiting mathematical difficulties involved in the Devlin scheme.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present paper we have studied the effect of Sm doping on the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of La0.7-xSmxBa0.3MnO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.2) compounds. These sample have been synthesized by conventional solid state reaction method. The analysis of synthesized samples by X-ray diffraction showed that the formation of single phase compositions and doping of La3+ by Sm3+ ion converted the chemical structure form rhombohedral (R-3C) to orthorhombic (Imma). The magnetic study measurement specified that the ferromagnetic double exchange interaction is weakened with increasing Sm content as a consequence of the curie temperature (Tc) shift in lower temperature from 340 K for x = 0, 290 K for x = 0.1 and 225 K for x = 0.2 compounds. Using the Banerjee's criterion plots, it is found that the phase transition for all samples in the second-order. All reported compounds exhibit a maximum and large magneto-caloric effect near the Curie temperature (Tc). The magnitude of the maximum magnetic entropy change is found to be decrease with increasing of Sm doping content i.e. 4.39 J/kg K for x = 0, 4.22 J/kg K for x = 0.1 and 2.48 J/kg K for x = 0.2 in applied field change of 5T. The trend of large entropy change and the convenient adjustment of the Curie temperature make these oxides useful for magnetic refrigeration in an extended high and low temperature even at near room temperature.© 2017This study investigates the effects of a monolithic gate current booster integrated with an AlGaN/GaN-on-Si power-switching device. The integrated gate current booster was implemented by a single-stage inverter topology consisting of a recessed normally-off AlGaN/GaN MOS-HFET and a mesa resistor. The monolithically integrated gate current booster in a switching FET eliminated the parasitic elements caused by external interconnection and enabled fast switching operation. The gate charging and discharging currents were boosted by the integrated inverter, which significantly reduced both rise and fall times: the rise time was reduced from 626 to 41.26 ns, while the fall time was reduced from 554 to 42.19 ns by the single-stage inverter. When the packaged monolithic power chip was tested under 1 MHz hard-switching operation with VDD = 200 V, the switching loss was found to have been drastically reduced, from 5.27 to 0.55 W.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work we report the synthesis and investigation of magnetic properties of La1.5Sr0.5CoIrO6. Study of temperature dependent magnetization on this double-perovskite compound revealed two anomalies at T≃88 K and T≃68 K, probably related to antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic couplings of Co and Ir ions, respectively. At T≃27 K there is another anomaly, which was confirmed by means of ac magnetic susceptibility measurements to be related to the emergence of a spin glass(SG)-like phase. Magnetization as a function of applied magnetic field measurements revealed exchange bias effect of the same order of magnitude of that found for La1.5Ca0.5CoIrO6 analogue compound. We compare our results for La1.5Sr0.5CoIrO6 with those reported for La1.5Ca0.5CoIrO6, and discuss the magnetic properties of both materials in terms of their structural and electronic properties.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the effect of vacancies on magnetic properties and spin-dependent behaviors of monolayer and bilayer armchair and zigzag graphene nanoribbons is investigated using first principles calculations based on density functional theory (DFT). The armchair and zigzag graphene nanoribbons are composed of 6 rows and 4 rows of carbon atoms with the edges closed by the hydrogen atoms, respectively. Our results show that vacancies affect the magnetic properties and spin polarization of the graphene nanoribbons. It is seen that the monolayer armchair graphene nanoribbon with one vacancy in its supercell (24 carbon sites + 8 hydrogen sites) gives the magnetic moment of 0.79 μB, while magnetic moment in the monolayer zigzag graphene nanoribbon with one vacancy in its supercell (24 carbon sites + 6 hydrogen sites) is 1.72 μB (for site α) and 1.84 μB (for site β). The highest and lowest values of magnetic moment in different configurations of the bilayer armchair (zigzag) graphene nanoribbons with one vacancy in each layer of the supercell give 1.54 μB and 1.29 μB (3.51 μB and 2.72 μB), respectively. Numerical values of the magnetic moment in different configurations depended on the distance of vacancies from each other and from nanoribbon's edge as well as their orientations.© 2017In this paper, we systematically investigated the leakage mechanism of the ion-implantation isolated AlGaN/GaN metal-insulator-semiconductor high electron mobility transistors (MIS-HEMTs) on Si substrate. By means of combined DC tests at different temperatures and electric field dependence, we demonstrated the following original results: (1) It is proved that gate leakage is the main contribution to OFF-state leakage of ion-implantation isolated AlGaN/GaN MIS-HEMTs, and the gate leakage path is a series connection of the gate dielectric Si3N4 and Si3N4-GaN interface. (2) The dominant mechanisms of the leakage current through LPCVD-Si3N4 gate dielectric and Si3N4-GaN interface are identified to be Frenkel–Poole emission and two-dimensional variable range hopping (2D-VRH), respectively. (3) A certain temperature annealing could reduce the density of the interface state that produced by ion implantation, and consequently suppress the interface leakage transport, which results in a decrease in OFF-state leakage current of ion-implantation isolated AlGaN/GaN MIS-HEMTs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The critical behavior associated with the magnetic phase transition has been investigated by in La0.8Na0.2−x□xMnO3 (0.00 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) (□ is the sodium deficiency). The critical exponents are estimated by various techniques such as the modified Arrott plot, Kouvel–Fisher plot and critical isotherm technique. Compared to standard models, the critical exponent values determined in our work are close to those expected by the tricritical model (β = 0.25, γ = 1, and δ = 5) for x = 0.00 and 0.05 samples and by mean field theory (β = 0.5, γ = 1, and δ = 3) for x = 0.10 and 0.15 samples. We conclude that the Na deficiency rate affect the critical exponents.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Here the magnetotransport properties of vertical spin valve structures incorporating graphene (Gr), Gr/Au and Gr/Al2O3 intervening layers are elucidated. An in-plane magnetic field is obliquely applied to the device with the purpose to vary the relative magnetizations of ferromagnetic electrodes (Co and Ni). The relative magnetoresistance (MR) of Co/Gr/Ni is enhanced from ∼0.16% to 0.57% by simply passivating the bottom Ni electrode with thin Au film. On the other hand, depositing Al2O3 on the bottom ferromagnetic layer in such a spin valve junction not only increases the magnitude of MR (∼−0.52%) but also reverses its polarity. Furthermore, the linear current-voltage characteristics for graphene and graphene/Au spin valve devices specifies ohmic contact, while non-linear curves indicate tunneling behavior for graphene/Al2O3 device.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this present study we report the large magnetoresistance and spin glass behavior of nanocrystalline La0.48Ca0.52MnO3 compound having average particle size 25 nm. Our experimental study reveals that in contrast to the bulk counterpart, the charge ordered antiferromagnetic ground state of the compound is totally suppressed and ferromagnetism part predominant. In addition to that, a spin glass like transition appears at the low temperature (∼42 K). Such glassy nature of the frozen spins influence the magnetoresistive properties of this compound also. Low field magnetoresistance at the low temperature of this compound is analyzed considering the correlation between the ferromagnetic clusters formed inside the grains.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Using micromagnetic simulation, we show that in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy (IPUA) can be used to obtain FAN-OUT, AND and OR gates in an array of coupled disks with magnetic vortex configuration. First, we studied the influence of the direction of application of the IPUA on the energy transfer time (τ) between two identical coupled nanodisks. We found that when the direction of the IPUA is along the x axis the magnetic interaction increases, allowing shorter values of τ, while the IPUA along the y direction has the opposite effect. The magnetic interactions between the nanodisks along x and y directions (the coupling integrals) as a function of the uniaxial anisotropy constant (Kσ) were obtained using a simple dipolar model. Next, we demonstrated that choosing a suitable direction of application of the IPUA, it is possible to create several different logic gates with a single array of coupled nanodisks.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The phase diagram and magnetocaloric effect in itinerant magnets is explored within the Stoner theory, which yields a reasonable description of the metamagnetic transition observed in various compounds. We obtain the phase diagram as a function of temperature and magnetic field, identifying the region of metastability around the first-order ferromagnetic transition. The impact on the magnetocaloric properties has been verified through the calculation of the isothermal entropy change ΔS, which is computed from two alternative methods based on specific heat or magnetization data. From the direct comparison between the two methods, we observe that the second one is strongly dependent on the process, and we explain under what conditions they become equivalent by using the Clausius-Clapeyron equation. We also discuss the effect of metastable states on the curves of ΔS. The evolution of the transition from first to second order is in good agreement with the phenomenological approach based on the Landau expansion. The results can be applied to different magnetic compounds such as RCo2, MnAs1−xSbx, and La(FexSi1−x)13.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Among the ferromagnetic II–VI semiconductors, the (Zn,TM)O diluted magnetic semiconductors (DMSs) is the most promising for application in spintronic, since the high Curie temperature. In this work, the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of pristine armchair (5,5) and zigzag (5,0) ZnO nanotubes (ZnONTs) and doped with a single and a pair 3d transition metals (TMs) were studied based on density functional theory (DFT) method. Moreover a single TM encapsulated inside twice unit cell of (5,5) ZnONT are systematically investigated. The both doped and encapsulated systems are found exceptionally stable and their formation is exothermic. It is revealed that the TM magnetic moment increases first and then decreases, and reaches the maximum value when Mn is doped into ZnONTs. The values of magnetic moment and their variation trend versus the atomic number are similar for 3d TM-doped (5,0) and (5,5) ZnONTs, indicating they are independent of the chirality of tubes. Additionally, the Fe-doped (5,5) and Cu@(5,5) ZnONT with half-metal and thus 100% spin polarization characters seem to be good candidates for spintronic applications. Our research can provide guidance for the experiment upon DMSs and systemic investigation in 3d TMs. We suggest that ZnONTs especially armchair type, doped by TMs would have application potential as a spin polarized electron source for spintronic devices in the future.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of single crystalline HoCoC2 and the evolution of magnetic and structural features in a series of polycrystalline solid solutions HoCo1−xNixC2 (0⩽x⩽1) are investigated by means of X-ray diffraction, magnetization, magnetic susceptibility and specific heat measurements. The crystal structures of all investigated samples refers to the CeNiC2-type structure (space group Amm2 and Pearson symbol oS8). Non-isoelectronic substitution of Co by Ni causes a non-linear increase of the unit cell volume and especially a non-monotonous variation of the a and c lattice parameters as well as a pronounced reduction of the C–C bond length of carbon dimers. Temperature dependent magnetization and specific heat measurements reveal a crossover from a ferromagnetic for HoCoC2 with TC=10.6(1) K to an antiferromagnetic ground state for HoNiC2 with TN=2.78(6) K and a non-monotonous variation of the magnetic ordering temperature with a minimum at intermediate compositions. Crystalline electric field effects of HoCoC2 and HoNiC2 are analysed using combined thermodynamic and magnetic susceptibility data. The electrical resistivity of HoNiC2 displays a distinct anomaly near room temperature which indicates the formation of a charge density wave (CDW) state as earlier reported for several other rare earth nickel dicarbides.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we investigate the antiferromagnetic Heisenberg model on the checkerboard lattice by the O(3) Non-linear Sigma Model (NLSM). The checkerboard lattice is distinguished from the antiferromagnetic square lattice (with coupling constant J) by the presence of diagonal crossing (with coupling constant J′) in half of the sites. This lattice model is the direct analogous of the three-dimensional pyrochlore lattice in a two-dimensional surface. Many effects of the three-dimensional model version, as the Quantum Order-by-Disorder, have been recently described also in the checkerboard lattice. Here we have developed the continuous version of the Heisenberg model on the checkerboard lattice and applied Renormalization Group together other techniques to analyze the both cases J < J′ and J > J′. We have therefore determined the effects of the crossing interaction J′ on the phase transitions. In addition, skyrmion solutions and their possible influences on these transitions were also considered.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticle size is one of the key factors determining its magnetic and biological properties. Herein, we report a synthesis of magnetite uniform-sized cubic nanoparticles with 10, 15 and 20 nm edge lengths for magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). The structure and physicochemical properties of obtained magnetite nanocubes (MNCbs) were studied by multiple methods. MNCbs conjugated with Pluronic F-127 exhibited high colloidal stability in aqueous medium. Synthesized MNCbs demonstrated improved T2-relaxation comparing to commercially available contrast agents proving that these nanocubes can be used for MRI.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Epitaxial-grown DyFe2/YFe2 multilayer thin films form an ideal model system for the study of magnetic exchange springs. Here the DyFe2 (YFe2) layers are magnetically hard (soft). In the presence of a magnetic field, exchange springs form in the YFe2 layers. Recently, it has been demonstrated that placing small amounts of Er into the centre of the YFe2 springs generates substantial changes in magnetic behavior. In particular, (i) the number of exchange-spring states is increased dramatically, (ii) the resulting domain-wall states cannot simply be described as either Néel or Bloch walls, (iii) the Er and Dy magnetic loops are strikingly different, and (iv) it is possible to engineer Er-induced magnetic exchange-spring collapse. Here, results are presented for Er-doped (1 1 0)-oriented DyFe2 (60 Å/YFe2(240 Å)15 multilayer films, at 100 K in fields of up to 12 T. In particular, we contrast magnetic loops for fields applied along seemingly equivalent hard-magnetic [1 1 0]-type axes. MBE-grown cubic Laves thin films offer the unique feature of allowing to apply the magnetic field along (i) a hard out-of-plane [1 1 0]-axis (the growth axis) and (ii) a similar hard in-plane [1¯10]-axis. Differences are found and attributed to the competition between the crystal-field interaction at the Er site and the long-range dipole-dipole interaction. In particular, the out-of-plane [1 1 0] Er results show the existence of a new magnetic exchange spring state, which would be very difficult to identify without the aid of element-specific technique of X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD).© 2017Size dependent training of exchange bias effect in CuFe2O4/CuO nanocomposites has been investigated in this report. The analysis of coercive field versus cycle numbers predict two mechanisms (athermal effect and conventional thermal activation) exist in the training process. The athermal effect is concerned to result the abrupt decrease at first cycle, while the conventional thermal activation is responsible for the gradual reduction of the subsequent cycles. Size depends on relative change of exchange bias field (HEB) and enhancement of coercivity (ΔHC) show a nonmonotonic change. The decay rate of normalized HEB and ΔHC with field cycles are different, supporting dual behaviors of uncompensated spins at the interface. The frozen uncompensated antiferromagnetic spins are responsible for the HEB reduction, while the ΔHC change has correlation to the rotatable uncompensated antiferromagnetic spins at the FM/AFM interface.© 2017In this work we demonstrate the use of Fully Depleted Silicon On Insulator (FDSOI) transistors as pH sensors with a 23 nm silicon nitride sensing layer built in the Back-End-Of-Line (BEOL). The back end process to deposit the sensing layer and fabricate the electrical structures needed for testing is detailed. A series of tests employing different pH buffer solutions has been performed on transistors of different geometries, controlled via the back gate. The main findings show a shift of the drain current (ID) as a function of the back gate voltage (VB) when different pH buffer solutions are probed in the range of pH 6 to pH 8. This shift is observed at VB voltages swept from 0 V to 3 V, demonstrating the sensor operation at low voltage. A high sensitivity of up to 250 mV/pH unit (more than 4-fold larger than Nernstian response) is observed on FDSOI MOS transistors of 0.06 µm gate length and 0.08 µm gate width.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe have succeeded in forming a Ga-Sn-O (GTO) film for a thin-film transistor (TFT) using radio-frequency (RF) magnetron sputtering at room temperature without annealing process. It is achieved that the field-effect mobility is 0.83 cm2 V−1 s−1 and the on/off ratio is roughly 106. A critical process parameter is the deposition pressure during the RF magnetron sputtering, which determines a balance between competing mechanisms of sputtering damages and chemical reactions, because the film quality has to be enhanced solely during the sputtering deposition. This result suggests a possibility of rare-metal free amorphous metal-oxide semiconductors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The study of stable half-metallic ferromagnetic materials is important from various fundamental and application points of view in condensed matter Physics. Structural phase stability, electronic structure, mechanical and magnetic properties of Fe-based quaternary Heusler alloys XX′YZ (X = Co, Ni; X′ = Fe; Y = Ti; Z = Si, Ge, As) for three different phases namely α, β and γ phases of LiMgPdSn crystal structure have been studied by density functional theory with generalized gradient approximation formulated by Perdew, Burke and Ernzerhof (GGA-PBE) and the Hubbard formalism (GGA-PBE + U). This work aims to identify the ferromagnetic and half-metallic properties of XX′YZ (X = Co, Ni, X′ = Fe; Y = Ti; Z = Si, Ge, As) quaternary Heusler alloys. The predicted phase stability shows that α-phase is found to be the lowest energy phase at ambient pressure. A pressure-induced structural phase transition is observed in CoFeTiSi, CoFeTiGe, CoFeTiAs, NiFeTiSi, NiFeTiGe and NiFeTiAs at the pressures of 151.6 GPa, 33.7 GPa, 76.4 GPa, 85.3 GPa, 87.7 GPa and 96.5 GPa respectively. The electronic structure reveals that these materials are half metals at normal pressure whereas metals at high pressure. The investigation of electronic structure and magnetic properties are performed to reveal the underlying mechanism of half metallicity. The spin polarized calculations concede that these quaternary Heusler compounds may exhibit the potential candidate in spintronics application. The magnetic moments for these quaternary Heusler alloys in all the three different phases (α, β and γ) are estimated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The influence of the structure on the energy product for the exchange-coupled Nd2Fe14B/α″-(FeCo)16N2 films has been investigated, and the magnetic properties of the trilayer system have been analyzed based on the micromagnetic simulation software object-oriented micromagnetic framework. The numerical results show that the energy product and the magnetic properties change with the bilayers to trilayers, where the maximum energy products of the bilayer and trilayer systems are 589 and 833.52 kJ/m3, respectively. The dependence of the magnetic properties on the structure of the trilayer system was also considered. The symmetrical sandwich structure was observed to achieve a large energy product. In addition, hysteresis loops, energy product, and magnetic reversal process for the exchange-spring trilayer system were investigated. The optimal thickness of the soft phase is 7 nm with the largest maximum energy product. (BH)max was observed to decrease with the increase of β, where β is the angle between the applied field and the easy axis. The trilayer system achieves the largest maximum energy product when β = 0°.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, amorphous FeSiB and FeGaSiB thin films have been fabricated on silicon substrates using a co-sputtering-evaporation deposition technique. The effect of adding gallium into FeSiB (Metglas) thin films on the structure, magnetic properties and magnetostriction have been studied. From X-ray diffraction (XRD), all the films were amorphous and the observed peaks were for the Si substrate. X-ray Photoelectron Spectroscopy (XPS) measurements were carried out to determine the film's composition, which was found to be Fe83Ga11Si5.2 B0.8. Atomic force microscopy (AFM) images were taken to measure the film thickness along with studying the surface topography. It was found that the film surface had an average roughness of 0.461 nm. For both FeSiB and FeGaSiB thin films, the effect of the thickness of the films on the magnetic properties and magnetostriction were investigated. The results showed that adding Ga into the FeSiB films changed the magnetic properties by reducing the saturation induction along with changing the magnetic anisotropy from uniaxial to isotropic. For the FeGaSiB films, the coercive field decreased and the saturation field (Hs) increased with film thickness. The magnetostriction constants of the FeGaSiB films were all larger than the FeSiB films for thicknesses greater than 40 nm.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The low energy behavior of the one dimensional Kondo necklace model with structural aperiodicity is studied using a representation for the localized and conduction electron spins, in terms of local Kondo singlet and triplet operators at zero temperature. A decoupling scheme on the double time Green's functions is used to find the dispersion relation for the excitations of the system. We determine the dependence between the structural aperiodicity modulation and the spin gap in a Fibonacci approximant chain at zero temperature and in the paramagnetic side of the phase diagram.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A novel and facile strategy is introduced for the preparation of ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid (EDTA) capped magnetite nanoparticles (MNPs). In this strategy, Fe3O4 nanoparticles were electrodeposited from a deposition bath containing 0.005 M Fe2+/Fe3+ nitrate and chlorides alts and 1 g/L EDTA. A simple deposition mode i.e. constant current and two-electrode set-up was used in the electro-synthesis procedure. The magnetite phase of the deposited nanoparticles was confirmed through XRD and FT-IR analyses. Morphological observations through FE-SEM and TEM confirmed the formation of spherical MNP particles with an average size of 10 nm. The EDTA layer on the surface of the electro-synthesized magnetite nanoparticles was proved based on FT-IR, DLS and TG data. Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) measurements confirmed the EDTA capped iron oxide nanoparticles to have a super-paramagnetic nature, since they exhibit a high saturation magnetization (Ms = 51.9 emu g−1), as well as, negligible remnant magnetization (Mr = 0.59 emu g−1) and coercivity (Hc = 0.85 Oe). Based on the obtained results, the proposed platform can be considered as a fast, simple and efficient method for the preparation of the EDTA capped magnetite nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A Hydrogen Decrepitation Press-Less Process (HD-PLP) recycling method for recycling of anisotropic NdFeB magnets is demonstrated. The method combines hydrogen decrepitation (HD) disintegration of the initial magnet, powder sieving and the Press-Less Process (PLP), where hydride powder is sintered in a graphite mold. Coercivities up to 534 kA/m were obtained in porous samples based on powder size d < 100 µm. Adding a ball milling step resulted in full density isotropic magnets for d > 100 µm. The coercivity reached Hci = 957 kA/m being 86% of the original N48M material without addition of rare earth elements.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new concept of using permanent magnet systems for guiding superparamagnetic nano-particles on arbitrary trajectories over a large volume is proposed. The basic idea is to use one magnet system which provides a strong, homogeneous, dipolar magnetic field to magnetize and orient the particles, and a second constantly graded, quadrupolar field, superimposed on the first, to generate a force on the oriented particles. In this configuration the motion of the particles is driven predominantly by the component of the gradient field which is parallel to the direction of the homogeneous field. As a result, particles are guided with constant force and in a single direction over the entire volume. The direction is simply adjusted by varying the angle between quadrupole and dipole. Since a single gradient is impossible due to Gauß’ law, the other gradient component of the quadrupole determines the angular deviation of the force. However, the latter can be neglected if the homogeneous field is stronger than the local contribution of the quadrupole field. A possible realization of this idea is a coaxial arrangement of two Halbach cylinders. A dipole to evenly magnetize and orient the particles, and a quadrupole to generate the force. The local force was calculated analytically for this particular geometry and the directional limits were analyzed and discussed. A simple prototype was constructed to demonstrate the principle in two dimensions on several nano-particles of different size, which were moved along a rough square by manual adjustment of the force angle. The observed velocities of superparamagnetic particles in this prototype were always several orders of magnitude higher than the theoretically expected value. This discrepancy is attributed to the observed formation of long particle chains as a result of their polarization by the homogeneous field. The magnetic moment of such a chain is then the combination of that of its constituents, while its hydrodynamic radius stays low. A complete system will consist of another quadrupole (third cylinder) to additionally enable scaling of the gradient/force strength by another rotation. In this configuration the device could then also be used as a simple MRI machine to image the particles between movement intervals. Finally, a concept is proposed by which superparamagnetic particles can be guided in three-dimensional space.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fe84.75-xCoxSi2B9P3C0.5Cu0.75 (x = 0, 2.5 and 10) nanocrystalline alloys with excellent magnetic properties were successfully developed. The fully amorphous alloy ribbons exhibit wide temperature interval of 145–156 °C between the two crystallization events. It is found that the excessive substitution of Co for Fe greatly deteriorates the magnetic properties due to the non-uniform microstructure with coarse grains. The alloys with x = 0 and 2.5 exhibit high saturation magnetization (above 1.83 T), low core loss and relatively low coercivity (below 5.4 A/m) after annealing. In addition, the Fe84.75Si2B9P3C0.5Cu0.75 nanocrystalline alloy also exhibits good frequency properties and temperature stability. The excellent magnetic properties were explained by the uniform microstructure with small grain size and the wide magnetic domains of the alloy. Low raw material cost, good manufacturability and excellent magnetic properties will make these nanocrystalline alloys prospective candidates for transformer and motor cores.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The thermoelectric properties of the spin-polarized β′-Tb2(MoO4)3 phase are calculated using first-principles and second-principles methods to solve the semi-classical Bloch-Boltzmann transport equations. It is interesting to highlight that the calculated electronic band structure reveals that the β′-Tb2(MoO4)3 has parabolic bands in the vicinity of the Fermi level (EF); therefore, the carriers exhibit low effective mass and hence high mobility. The existence of strong covalent bonds between Mo and O in the MoO4 tetrahedrons is more favorable for the transport of the carriers than the ionic bond. It has been found that the carrier concentration of spin-up (↑) and spin-down (↓) increases linearly with increasing the temperature and exhibits a maximum carrier concentration at EF. The calculations reveal that the β′-Tb2(MoO4)3 exhibits maximum electrical conductivity, minimum electronic thermal conductivity, a large Seebeck coefficient and a high power factor at EF for (↑) and (↓). Therefore, the vicinity of EF is the area where the β′-Tb2(MoO4)3 is expected to show maximum efficiency.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, a new and efficient nanosorbent for the fast removal of heavy metal ions was prepared. The proposed nanosorbent was fabricated using Fe3O4 magnetic core shelled by mesoporous silica, and cetyltrimethylammonium bromide (CTAB) as surfactant template through a sol-gel process. The magnetic nanomaterial was further modified with bis(3-triethoxysilylpropyl)tetrasulfide (MSCMNPs-S4). The final nanosphers were characterized by FT-IR, XRD, TGA, BET, SEM, TEM, DLS, VSM, EDX, and UV–Vis. The potential of the resultant mesoporous magnetite nanomaterials was investigated as a convenient and effective adsorbent for the removal of toxic heavy metal ions from aqueous solutions in a batch system. The effect of essential parameters on the removal efficiency including initial pH of sample solution, adsorbent amount, metal ion concentration, contact time and type and quantity of the eluent on the adsorption characteristics of the MSCMNPs-S4 were studied. Under the optimized conditions, the proposed nanosorbent exhibited high adsorption capacity of 303.03, 256.41 and 270.27 mg g−1 and maximum removal percentages of 98.8%, 96.4%, 95.7% for Hg(II), Pd(II) and Pb(II) ions, respectively. The mechanism of the adsorbtion was found to be in good agreement with the Langmuir isotherm model. Furthermore, the reusability investigation indicated that the MSCMNPs-S4 could be used frequently at least for five cycles without any significant loss in its performance.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Layered structures especially perovskites have titanic potential for novel device applications and thanks to the multifunctional properties displayed in these materials. We forecast and justify the robust spin-polarized ferromagnetism in half-metallic Sr2SnFeO6 and semiconducting Sr2SnMnO6 perovskite oxides. Different approximation methods have been argued to put forward their physical properties. The intriguingly intricate electronic band structures favor the application of these materials in spintronics. The transport parameters like Seebeck coefficient, electrical and thermal conductivity, have been put together to establish their thermoelectric response. Finally, the layered oxides are found to switch their application as thermoelectric materials and hence, these concepts design the principles of the technologically desired thermoelectric and spin based devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present research, a magnetic ZnO-ZnFe2O4 binary nanocomposite was synthesized by a one-step microemulsion method. The characteristics of the synthesized powders were characterized using various analytical instruments including X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscope, transmission electron microscope, thermogravimetric and differential thermal analysis, vibrating sample magnetometer, and ultraviolet–visible spectroscopy. The results of transmission electron microscope proved that the synthesized nanoparticles have irregular morphologies and the average particle size is about 20 nm. The photocatalytic investigation of ZnO-ZnFe2O4 nanoparticles was carried out using methylene blue solution under UV light. The synthesized nanoparticles showed enhanced photocatalytic performance in comparison with the ZnO nanoparticles more than 40%. The magnetization saturation value of ZnO-ZnFe2O4 nanoparticles was about 5.8 emu/g, which was high enough to be magnetically removed by applying a magnetic field. The results showed that the magnetization and coercivity of the samples reduced by increasing calcination temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The single-phase crystal ZnO-C nanopowders with the hexagonal wurtzite structure and a low carbon dopant content (under 0.25 wt%) were produced. The production of the ferromagnetic nanopowders was done by electron beam evaporation of mechanical mixtures of non-magnetic micron ZnO powders and carbon in a vacuum at RT. The subsequent annealing of evaporation products in air was produced at the temperature of 773 K. The ferromagnetic response of the doped ZnO-C NP has exceeded that of the pristine ZnO NP by 5 times. The anhysteretic form of ZnO-C NP magnetization curves reveals the tendency of samples to superparamagnetism. The abnormal behavior of the ZnO-C (% xC = 0.25 wt%) sample magnetization curve in the magnetic field of 2.4 T can be attributed to the metamagnetic transformation associated with the bimodal distribution of the ZnO ferromagnetic phase in accordance with the SEM analysis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nd2Fe14C-based magnet is prepared by a mechanochemical method, namely high-energy ball-milling Nd2Fe11Bx (x = 0–0.15) alloy in heptane (C7H16), followed by annealing to 850 °C in vacuum. Under the action of high-energy ball-milling, Nd2Fe11Bx react with heptane to form NdH2+δ, Fe-(CB), C, etc. H2 is released and Nd2Fe17, Nd2Fe17Cx (x = 0–3), Nd2Fe14C, Nd carbides and α-Fe are formed in the subsequent annealing. C amount depends on ball-milling time t. Long time ball milling or high C content suppresses the formation of 2:17 phase and favors the formation of 2:14:1 phase in the final products. Excessive ball-milling results in the quick increase of α-Fe. The maximum of magnetically hard Nd2Fe14C is obtained at t = 4 h. For Nd2Fe11 samples, there exists considerable quantity of Nd carbides and α-Fe phase appears earlier and increases rapidly with extending the ball-milling time t. The addition of B element shortens the ball-milling time of the formation of maximum Nd2Fe14C and prominently suppresses the formation of Nd carbide and α-Fe. The optimum magnetic properties, coercivity iHc of 1193.7 kA/m, remanence Mr of 580.9 kA/m, maximum magnetic energy product (BH)max of 91.7 kJ/m3 is approaching to its theoretic value of 99.2 kJ/m3 for isotropic Nd2Fe14C magnet, are obtained in Nd2Fe11B0.06 alloy ball milled for 3.5 h.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report temperature (T) dependence of dc magnetization, electrical resistivity (ρ) and heat-capacity of rare-earth (R) compounds, Gd3RuSn6 and Tb3RuSn6, which are found to crystallize in the Yb3CoSn6-type orthorhombic structure (space group: Cmcm). The results establish that there is an onset of antiferromagnetic ordering near (TN = ) 19 and 25 K respectively. In addition, we find that there is another magnetic transition for both the cases around 14 and 17 K respectively. In the case of the Gd compound, the spin-scattering contribution to ρ is found to increase below about 75 K as the material is cooled towards TN, thereby resulting in a minimum in the plot of ρ(T) unexpected for Gd based systems. Isothermal magnetization at 1.8 K reveals an upward curvature around 50 kOe. Isothermal magnetoresistance plots also show interesting anomalies in the magnetically ordered state. There are sign reversals in the plot of isothermal entropy change versus T in the magnetically ordered state, indicating subtle changes in the spin-orientations with T. The results reveal that these compounds exhibit interesting transport properties.© 2017The behavior of local magnetic moments and exchange coupling parameters of FexCo1-x nanostructures (nanowires and compact clusters) on the fcc Pt(1 1 1) surface is here investigated using the first-principles real-space RS-LMTO-ASA method, in the framework of the DFT. Different configurations of FexCo1-x trimers and heptamers on Pt(1 1 1) are considered, varying the positions and the concentration of Fe or Co atoms. We discuss the influence of dimensionality and stoichiometry changes on the magnetic properties, specially on the orbital moments, which are very important in establishing a nanoscopic understanding of delocalized electron systems. We demonstrate the existence of a strictly decreasing nonlinear trend of the average orbital moments with the Fe concentration for the compact clusters, different from what was found for FexCo1-x nanowires on Pt(1 1 1) and also for corresponding higher-dimensional systems (FexCo1-x monolayer on Pt(1 1 1) and FexCo1-x bulk). The average spin moments, however, are invariably described by a linear function with respect to stoichiometry. In all studied cases, the nearest neighbors exchange couplings have shown to be strongly ferromagnetic.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Numerical calculations of magnetic properties of Pr3+ ions in crystal field of the mixed (hexagonal + orthorhombic) symmetry in PrNi5−xCux pseudobinary alloys are presented. The molecular field theory and the crystal field theory in the point charge model are used in calculations. It is shown that the admixing of crystal field of orthorhombic symmetry to the original hexagonal crystal field of PrNi5 and PrCu5 compounds leads to an abrupt increase in their magnetic susceptibility followed by the onset of ferromagnetism, which was earlier observed experimentally in pseudobinary PrNi5−xCux alloys. The calculated dependences of magnetic moments of Pr3+ ions in crystal fields of the mixed symmetry on the magnetic field strength and temperature satisfactorily agree with the experimental results for PrNi5−xCux alloys.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and thermodynamical properties of a system of spins in a honeycomb lattice, such as magnetization, magnetic susceptibility and specific heat, in a low-temperature regime are investigated by considering the effects of a Kekulé scalar exchange and QED vacuum polarization corrections to the interparticle potential. The spin lattice calculations are carried out by means of Monte Carlo simulations. We present a number of comparative plots of all the physical quantities we have considered and a detailed analysis is presented to illustrate the main features and the variation profiles of the properties with the applied external magnetic field and temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The present work was undertaken to investigate the effect of microstructure on the magnetic entropy change of Ni50Mn37Sn13 ribbon alloys. Unchanged sample composition and cell parameter of austenite allowed us to study strictly the correlation between the average grain size and the total magnetic field induced entropy change (ΔST). We found that a size-dependent martensitic transformation tuning results in a wide temperature range tailoring (>40 K) of the magnetic entropy change with a reasonably small variation on the peak value of the total field induced entropy change. The peak values varied from 6.0 J kg−1 K−1 to 7.7 J kg−1 K−1 for applied fields up to 2 T. Different tuning efficiencies obtained by diverse MCE tailoring approaches are compared to highlight the advantages of the herein proposed mechanism.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Inverse spin Hall effect (ISHE) in ferromagnetic metals (FM) can also be used to detect the spin current generated by longitudinal spin Seebeck effect in a ferromagnetic insulator YIG. However, anomalous Nernst effect (ANE) in FM itself always mixes in the thermal voltage. In this work, the exchange bias structure (NiFe/IrMn) is employed to separate these two effects. The exchange bias structure provides a shift field to NiFe, which can separate the magnetization of NiFe from that of YIG in M-H loops. As a result, the ISHE related to magnetization of YIG and the ANE related to the magnetization of NiFe can be separated as well. By comparison with Pt, a relative spin Hall angle of NiFe (0.87) is obtained, which results from the partially filled 3d orbits and the ferromagnetic order. This work puts forward a practical method to use the ISHE in ferromagnetic metals towards future spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetostriction of Co-Ga alloys: Co-14Ga, Co-24Ga and Co-33Ga (atomic), is studied at room temperature for the first time. All three alloys are ferromagnetic. Co-14Ga microstructure is biphasic, a mixture of ε (hcp) and α (fcc) phases. Co-24Ga presents three phases ε, α and β (ordered bcc) and Co-33Ga is single β phase alloy. It was found that all three alloys present negative saturation magnetostriction λs. The most interesting material for applications would be the alloy Co-33Ga since the magnetostriction saturates for a small field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Theoretical understanding of interactions between localized and mobile electrons and the crystal environment in light lanthanides is important because of their key role in much needed magnetic anisotropy in permanent magnet materials that have a great impact in automobile and wind turbine applications. We report electronic, magnetic, and magnetocrystalline properties of these basic light lanthanide elements studied from advanced density functional theory (DFT) calculations. We find that the inclusion of onsite 4f electron correlation and spin orbit coupling within the full-potential band structure is needed to understand the unique magnetocrystalline properties of these light lanthanides. The onsite electron correlation, spin orbit coupling, and full potential for the asphericity of charge densities must be taken into account for the proper treatment of 4f states. We find the variation of total energy as a function of lattice constants that indicate multiple structural phases in Ce contrasting to a single stable structure obtained in other light lanthanides. The 4f orbital magnetic moments are partially quenched as a result of crystalline electric field splitting that leads to magnetocrystalline anisotropy. The charge density plots have similar asphericity and environment in Pr and Nd indicating similar magnetic anisotropy. However, Ce and Sm show completely different asphericity and environment as both orbital moments are significantly quenched. In addition, the Fermi surface structures exemplified in Nd indicate structural stability and unravel a cause of anisotropy. The calculated magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MAE) reveals competing c-axis and in-plane anisotropies, and also predicts possibilities of unusual structural deformations in light lanthanides. The uniaxial magnetic anisotropy is obtained in the double hexagonal closed pack structures of the most of the light lanthanides, however, the anisotropy is reduced or turned to planar in the low symmetry structures. Through crystal field calculations we also illustrate the crystal field ground state 4f multiplets of light lanthanides.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The fabrication of a thin layer of microwave absorber that operates over a wide band of frequencies is still a challenging task. With recent advances in nanostructure synthesis techniques, considerable progress has been achieved in realizations of thin nanocomposite layer designed for full absorption of incident electromagnetic (EM) radiation covering S to K band frequencies. The primary objective of this investigation is to achieve best possible EM absorption with a wide bandwidth and attenuation >10 dB for a thin absorbing layer (few hundred of microns). Magnetic yttrium iron garnet (Y3Fe5O12; in short YIG) nanoparticles (NPs) were prepared by sol–gel (SG) as well as solid-state (SS) reaction methods to elucidate the effects of nanoscale finite size on the magnetic behavior of the particles and hence their microwave absorption capabilities. It is found that YIG prepared by these two methods are different in many ways. Magnetic properties investigated using vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM) exhibit that the coercivity (Hc) of solid-state NPs is much larger (72 Oe) than the sol-gel NPs (31 Oe). Microwave absorption properties were studied by ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) technique in field sweep mode at different fixed frequencies. A thin layer (∼300 μm) of YIG film was deposited using electrophoretic deposition (EPD) technique over a coplanar waveguide (CPW) transmission line made on copper coated RT/duroid® 5880 substrates. Temperature dependent magnetic properties were also investigated using VSM and FMR techniques. Microwave absorption properties were investigated at high temperatures (up to 300 °C) both for sol-gel and solid-state synthesized NPs and are related to skin depth of YIG films. It is observed that microwave absorption almost vanishes when the temperature reached the Néel temperature of YIG.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Full-potential linearized augmented plane wave (FP-LAPW) method is applied to calculate the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of A2BB′O6 (A = Ba, Sr) and (BB′ = FeRe, MnMo, and MnRe). The structural properties in cubic phase are studied at optimized volume. Electronic band structures are calculated by using the most efficient modified generalized gradient approximation for both spin-channels. This revealed that these materials have metallic behavior while some revealed half metallic behavior in generalized gradient approximation plus Hubbard parameter (GGA+U). Spin orbit (SO) coupling effects added to GGA+U reveal that all the compounds have semiconducting nature in both spin channels. Density of states shows that valence band has the majority O-2p state character while conduction band is dominated by the Fe/Re, Mn/Mo, and Mn/re-d state. The evaluated magnetic moment shows the utility of these compounds for the spintronics applications of these compounds.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.As-synthesized Fe2+CrxFe(2−x)O4 nanoferrites, 0.0 ≤ x ≤ 1, were prepared by the wet-chemical co-precipitation route and characterized by the X-ray diffraction, Brunauer-Emmett-Teller and transmission electron microscopy, IR spectra, thermographometry and vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM) techniques. This study proved that these samples have single phase of cubic spinel structure in nano-metric scale and are ferrimagnetic materials. VSM measurements revealed that these nanoferrites are soft ferrimagnetic materials. The crystallite size R, porosity P, strain ε, Debye temperature, nanoparticle specific surface area, B-site force constant, elastic parameters and sheer and longitudinal velocities were increased with increasing the Cr3+ ion content x, whereas the lattice constant, density, grain specific surface area and A-site force constant were decreased. The strain ε proved dependence on P and R. Six absorption bands were observed in IR spectra and assigned to their corresponding sites and bonds. Thermal analysis of the samples displayed three steps of combustion process where the net loss of weight ranged 19%–33%. The saturation magnetization MS of the samples was decreased against x, whereas the coercivity HC was increased. Two peaks at 710 and 723 eV appeared in XPS spectra and attributed to Fe 2p3/2 and Fe 2p1/2. They reveal that the ratio of Fe2+ to Fe3+ ions increases with Cr ion increment.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The investigation is focussed on phase generation and magnetocaloric properties of a series of Ni77-XMnXGa23 (x = 22, 23, 24, 25, 27) alloys prepared through arc melting furnace. With increase in Mn content, the alloys showed systematic transition from a non-modulated martensite (NM) to a fully austenitic parent phase through an appearance and coexistence of modulated (M) structure. Intermediate Mn containing alloy (#Mn24) not only displayed high magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) of −7.7 J/kg−1K−1 but also large Refrigerant Capacity (RC) of 169 J.Kg−1 at magnetic field change of 3 T compared to other alloys. The coexisting martensite (NM, M) and parent austenite as well as overlapping thermomagnetic and structural transformation was deliverable through tuning of alloy chemistry wherein Ni was systematically substituted by Mn. Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) supported the proposition with existence of martensite plates of different morphology in Mn24 alloy exhibiting superior magnetocaloric properties.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effects of Mn doping on the ferromagnetic properties of the dilute magnetic semiconductor Zn1−xMnxO nanorods (NR's) having the nominal composit-ions x = 0, 0.01, 0.03, 0.04 and 0.05 grown by a low temperature hydrothermal method are studied. Energy dispersive X-ray (EDX) is used to determine the actual amounts of the elements in each NR's. X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, photoluminescence and vibrating sample magnetometer measurements are used to observe the effects of the Mn substitution on the properties of the doped ZnO and to relate the changes in the properties to changes in the defect content. It is observed that the saturation magnetization of the Mn ions in the wurtzite structure varies from 0.0210 µB/Mn2+ to 0.0234 µB/Mn2+ reaching a high of 0.0251 µB/Mn2+ as the Mn concentrations is varied from 0.9 to 7.36 atomic%. It is argued that the changes in the saturation magnetization are due to the competition between the direct Mn-Mn exchange interaction and the indirect Mn-O-Mn exchange interaction in the doped Mn ZnO NP's.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of Er(Co1−xFex)2 (x = 0.0, 0.125 and 1) compounds are investigated. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis has revealed that the compounds crystallize in the C15 type Laves phase structure, with Fd-3m space group. All the samples are ferrimagnetically ordered, exhibiting a compensation point in the M(T) traces for x = 1. The substitution of Fe to Co is accompanied by an increase of the Curie temperature from 42 to 591 K, for x varying from 0 to 1. Magnetocaloric effect (MCE) is anticipated according to the Maxwell relation based on isothermal magnetization measurements. A maximum |ΔSM| value is found decreasing from 21 J.kg−1.K−1for x = 0 to 1.5 J.kg−1.K−1 for x = 1 under an applied magnetic field change of 0–5 T. This decrease is accompanied by a change in the nature of the magnetic transition which becomes 2nd order when substituting Fe to Co.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological elastomers are a type of smart hybrid material which combines elastic properties of a soft elastomer matrix with magnetic properties of magnetic micro particles. This composition creates a complex interplay of magnetic and elastic phenomena. The best known is the magnetorheological effect which describes the alteration of the Young's modulus with external magnetic fields. The particle properties and their arrangement in the material play a major role in determining the resulting effects. In this paper X-ray microtomography has been utilized to analyze the particle microstructure. Besides a characterization of the particle microstructure in presence of magnetic fields, here the in-situ observation was combined with an application of mechanical strain. Thus, the situation of the sample during mechanical testing was recreated during tomography to observe the particle microstructure under the exact circumstances of occurring magnetorheological effects. A significant impact of the magnetic field and the strain on the rotation of the particles and their radial distribution was verified.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of site disorder (originating from the presence of substitutional atoms) on intrinsic magnetic properties of intermetallic phases derived from the ThMn12-type crystal structure has been studied using the tight-binding linear-muffin-tin-orbital atomic-sphere approximation (TB-LMTO-ASA) method of density functional theory (DFT). The focus was put on the analysis of magnetisation and magnetocrystalline anisotropy in 42 inequivalent configurations that differed in their arrangements of the substitutional atoms. The first-order anisotropy constant K1 turns out to be far more sensitive to the site occupancy than the magnetisation M. Addition of light interstitial atoms B, C or N gives rise to much higher K1 values but the same range of scattering is retained. As the anisotropy constant K1 is strongly increased by interstitial atoms, the influence of the atomic disorder is less pronounced for these systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Rubber specimens were prepared by mixing micron-sized iron particles dispersed in room-temperature-vulcanized (RTV) silicone rubber by solution mixing. The possible correlations of the particle volume, size, and distribution with the mechanical properties of the specimens were examined. An isotropic mechanical test shows that at 60 phr, the elastic modulus was 3.29 MPa (electrolyte), 2.92 MPa (carbonyl), and 2.61 MPa (hybrid). The anisotropic effect was examined by curing the specimen under magnetic fields of 0.5–2.0 T at 90° relative to the applied strain. The measurements show anisotropic effects of 11% (carbonyl), 9% (electrolyte), and 6% (hybrid) at 40 phr and 1 T. At 80 phr, the polymer-filler compatibility factor (c-factor) was estimated using the Pythagorean theorem as 0.53 (regular) and 0.73 (anisotropic studies). The improved features could be useful in applications such as controlled damping, vibrational absorption, or automotive bushings.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanosized MnZn ferrite particles, with narrow size distribution, regular morphology and high saturation magnetization have been synthesized via a modified hydrothermal method. This modified hydrothermal method involves a chemical co-precipitation of hydroxides under a vacuum condition using potassium hydroxide as precipitating agent, followed by a separate hydrothermal process. The microstructure and magnetic properties of the synthesized nanoparticles were investigated by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Raman spectroscopy, field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM), high resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The effects of different synthesis conditions (excess ratio of precipitating agent and hydrothermal reaction time) on the microstructure and magnetic properties of the as-synthesized nanoparticles were discussed. The magnetic measurements indicated that the obtained samples were superparamagnetic in nature at room temperature. Moreover, the MnZn ferrite nanoparticles with excellent magnetic performance could be synthesized at 180 °C for a short reaction time (3 h).© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, PEG6000 was used as a surfactant to prevent the MnZn ferrite nanoparticles from aggregation. Introduction of PEG6000 didn't affect structure of the products, but modified their dispersion state and decreased their particle size. Furthermore, saturated magnetization of the MnZn ferrite nanoparticles increased with an increase in the PEG6000 content, and presented the maximum of 110.3 emu/g at the PEG6000 content of 0.006 mol/l. This value is about 40% higher than that without any PEG6000, and almost the highest one reported to date for the MnZn ferrite nanoparticles. Hence the obtained results proved that the PEG6000 was a powerful surfactant to improve magnetic properties of the MnZn ferrite nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Iron nanoparticles are highly-effective magnetic nanoparticles for T2 magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). However, the stability of their magnetic properties is dependent on good protection of the iron core from oxidation in aqueous media. Here we report the synthesis of custom-synthesized phosphonate-grafted polyelectrolytes (PolyM3) of various chain lengths, for efficient coating of iron nanoparticles with a native iron oxide shell. The size of the nanoparticle-polyelectrolyte assemblies was investigated by transmission electron microscopy and dynamic light scattering, while surface attachment was confirmed by Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy. Low cytotoxicity was observed for each of the nanoparticle-polyelectrolyte (“Fe-PolyM3”) assemblies, with good cell viability (>80%) remaining up to 100 μg mL−1 Fe in HeLa cells. When applied in T2-weighted MRI, corresponding T2 relaxivities (r2) of the Fe-PolyM3 assemblies were found to be dependent on the chain length of the polyelectrolyte. A significant increase in contrast was observed when polyelectrolyte chain length was increased from 6 to 65 repeating units, implying a critical chain length required for stabilization of the α-Fe nanoparticle core.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe effect of pre–metal deposition cleaning on 4H-SiC Schottky barrier diodes (SBDs) by using Ar ion bombardment in an inductively coupled plasma (ICP) chamber was investigated. The ICP treatment produced a thin and Si-depleted amorphous layer on the SiC surface. Partial graphitization was observed in the amorphous layer after post-metal deposition (PMD) annealing. This interfacial layer strongly pinned the Schottky barrier height (SBH). PMD annealing at 500 °C resulted in a constant SBH (approximately 1.1 eV) and narrow SBH distribution (standard deviation < 3 meV). However, the amorphous layer was consumed after 600 °C PMD annealing due to interfacial reactions. These results suggest that the Ar ion bombardment technique with a suitable thermal budget can be used to form relatively uniform SBDs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Single phase ε-Mn4N thin and ultrathin films are grown on MgO(001) using molecular beam epitaxy. Reflection high-energy electron diffraction and out-of-plane X-ray diffraction measurements are taken for each sample in order to determine the in- and out-of-plane strain for each sample. Vibrating sample magnetometry and superconducting quantum interference device measurements, which are performed on the thin and ultrathin films respectively, are used to plot the magnetization of each sample versus both in- and out-of-plane H→-fields and to determine the magnitude of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy in these films. Three significant components of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy are observed in these films and are attributed to sample strain (1 component) and shape (2 components). Among these components, the most significant component 0.8–4.9 [Formula presented] is identified as a second term of shape anisotropy, which possesses a negative linear relationship with sample thickness over the range from 9 nm to 310 nm. Atomic (magnetic) force microscopy measurements show the presence of a surface localized magnetic polarization (22–82%), which increases with decreasing thickness, when the net magnetizations of the films are zero. The second term of shape anisotropy as well as the surface localized polarization, which each depend on sample thickness, are each regarded as a consequence of Ising domains overlapping out-of-plane in these films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Two different magnetic hysteresis behaviors with and without exchange coupling between magnetic hard M-type Sr-hexaferrite (SrM) and soft perovskite La-Sr manganite (LSMO) could be achieved by controlling the synthesis process routes of the solid-state reaction. Double hysteresis curves without exchange coupling were observed in the composite prepared by calcinations of the mixture of LSMO and SrM powders, while exchange-coupled single hysteresis behavior was obtained in the composite synthesized directly from the initial precursor powders. The possible origins of the difference in the magnetic coupling behavior between the two composites were discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effects of Al content (0.53 ≤ Al ≤ 9.65 wt%) on microstructure, texture, magnetic flux density, permeability, core loss and magnetic domain structure of Fe-Al based electrical steel were measured or observed. Average grain size decreased as Al content increased, but Al contents had no severe effects on texture. Magnetic flux density and permeability tends to decrease as Al content increased. Total core loss Ptot was separated into hysteresis loss Ph, eddy-current loss Pe and anomalous loss Pa. As Al increased, Ph increased, but Pe and Pa decreased, so the optimal grain size increased. To reduce core loss of electrical steel with high resistivity, annealing should be conducted at high temperature and for a long time to increase grain size.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetohydrodynamic (MHD) fluid flow in different geometries relevant to human body parts is an interesting and important scientific area due to its applications in medical sciences. This article performs a comprehensive review on the applications of MHD and their numerical modelling in biological systems. Applications of MHD in medical sciences are classified into four categories in this paper. Applications of MHD in simple flow, peristaltic flow, pulsatile flow, and drag delivery are these categories. The numerical researches performed for these categories are reviewed and summarized separately. Finally, some conclusions and suggestions for future works based on the literature review are presented. The results indicated that during a surgery when it is necessary to drop blood flow or reduce tissue temperature, it may be achieved by using a magnetic field. Moreover, the review showed that the trapping is an important phenomenon in peristaltic flows that causes the formation of thrombus in blood and the movement of food bolus in gastrointestinal tract. This phenomenon may be disappeared by using a proper magnetic field. Finally, the concentration of particles that are delivered to the target region increases with an increase in the magnetic field intensity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work we studied light diffraction in magneto-photonic crystals (MPC) having large magneto-optical activity and modulation large depth. The case of arbitrary angles between the direction of the external static magnetic field and the normal to the border of the MPC layer is considered. The problem is solved by Ambartsumian's modified layer addition method. It is found that there is a new type of non-reciprocity, namely, the relation R(α)≠R(-α) takes place, where R is the reflection coefficient, and α is the incidence angle. It is shown the formation of new photonic band gap (PBG) at oblique incidence of light, which is not selective for the polarization of the incident light, in the case when the external magnetic field is directed along the medium axis. Such a system can be used as: a tunable polarization filter, polarization mirror, circular (elliptical) polarizer, tunable optical diode, etc.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work we present a faster modified protocol for first order reversal curve (FORC) measurements. The main idea of this procedure is to use the information of the ascending and descending branches constructed through successive sweeps of magnetic field. The new method reduces the number of field sweeps to almost one half as compared to the traditional method. The length of each branch is reduced faster than in the usual FORC protocol. The new method implies not only a new measurement protocol but also a new recipe for the previous treatment of the data. After of these pre-processing, the FORC diagram can be obtained by the conventional methods. In the present work we show that the new FORC procedure leads to results identical to the conventional method if the system under study follows the Stoner-Wohlfarth model with interactions that do not depend of the magnetic state (up or down) of the entities, as in the Preisach model. More specifically, if the coercive and interactions fields are not correlated, and the hysteresis loops have a square shape. Some numerical examples show the comparison between the usual FORC procedure and the propose one. We also discuss that it is possible to find some differences in the case of real systems, due to the magnetic interactions. There is no reason to prefer one FORC method over the other from the point of view of the information to be obtained. On the contrary, the use of both methods could open doors for a more accurate and deep analysis.© 2017A diplexer offering the advantages of compact size, high performance, and high reliability is proposed on the basis of advanced integrated passive device (IPD) fabrication techniques. The proposed diplexer is developed by combining a third-order low-pass filter (LPF) and a third-order high-pass filter (HPF), which are designed on the basis of the elliptic function prototype low-pass filter. Primary components, such as inductors and capacitors, are designed and fabricated with high Q-factor and appropriate values, and they are subsequently used to construct a compact diplexer having a chip area of 900 μm × 1100 μm (0.009 λ0 × 0.011 λ0, where λ0 is the guided wavelength). In addition, a small-outline transistor (SOT-6) packaging method is adopted, and reliability tests (including temperature, humidity, vibration, and pressure) are conducted to guarantee long-term stability and commercial success. The packaged measurement results indicate excellent RF performance with insertion losses of 1.39 dB and 0.75 dB at operation bands of 0.9 GHz and 1.8 GHz, respectively. The return loss is lower than 10 dB from 0.5 GHz to 4.0 GHz, while the isolation is higher than 15 dB from 0.5 GHz to 3.0 GHz. Thus, it can be concluded that the proposed SOT-6 packaged diplexer is a promising candidate for GSM/CDMA applications. Synthetic solution of diplexer design, RF performance optimization, fabrication process, packaging, RF response measurement, and reliability test is particularly explained and analyzed in this work.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA comprehensive model for field-effect pnpn devices (Z2-FET) is presented. It is based on three current continuity equations coupled to two MOS equations. The model reproduces the characteristic S-shaped I-V curve when the device is driven by a current source. The negative resistance region at intermediate currents occurs as the center junction undergoes a steep transition from reverse to forward bias. Also playing a vital role are the mix and match of the minority carrier diffusion current and the generation recombination current. Physical insights to the key mechanisms at work are gained by regional approximations of the model, from which analytical expressions for the maximum and minimum voltages at the switching points are derived.© 2017We have attempted to fabricate a nanocomposite Nd-Fe-Ti-B magnet. Flash-lamp rapid annealing treatments were performed for melt-spun ribbons to obtain the α-Fe/Nd2Fe14B composite microstructure, and the evolution of magnetic properties by the annealing was studied by vibration sample magnetometer (VSM). It was found that the magnetic properties were improved by relatively short-time annealing at the temperatures near the crystallization temperature. Further higher-temperature and longer annealing treatments resulted in deterioration of the magnetic properties. For the selected samples, recoil curves were measured to analyze the spring-back behaviors. Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) was performed to investigate the microstructural factors for the deterioration of the magnetic properties. The relation between the variation of the magnetic properties (coercivity, saturation magnetization and recoil permeability) and the microstructural factors were discussed.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we demonstrate high performance GaN-based Schottky-barrier ultraviolet (UV) photodetectors with graded doping prepared on patterned sapphire substrates. The fabricated devices exhibit an extremely low dark current density of ∼1.3 × 10−8 A/cm2 under −5 V bias, a large UV-to-visible light rejection ratio of ∼4.2 × 103, and a peak external quantum efficiency of ∼50.7% at zero bias. Even in the deeper 250–360 nm range, the average external quantum efficiency still remains ∼40%. From the transient response characteristics, the average rising and falling time constants are estimated ∼115 μs and 120 μs, respectively, showing a good electrical and thermal reliability. The specific detectivities D∗, limited by the thermal equilibrium noise and the low-frequency 1/f noise, are derived ∼5.5 × 1013 cm Hz1/2/W (at 0 V) and ∼2.68 × 1010 cm Hz1/2 W−1 (at −5 V), respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work addresses the effect of substituting Mn3+ by Fe3+ at the octahedral site of TbMnO3 on the magnetic phase sequence, ferroelectric and magnetoelectric properties, keeping the Fe3+ concentration below 5%. The temperature dependence of the specific heat, dielectric permittivity and electric polarization was studied as a function of Fe3+ concentration and applied magnetic field. From the experimental results a strong decrease of the electric polarization with increasing Fe3+ substitution is observed, vanishing above a concentration of 4%. However, within this range, a significant increase of the magnetic sensitivity of the electric polarization is obtained by increasing Fe3+ concentration. For Fe3+ concentration above 4%, a non-polar phase emerges, whose spin structure prevents ferroelectricity according to the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya model. The experimental results here reported reveal the crucial effect of B-site substitution on the magnetic phase sequence, as well as, on the polar and magnetoelectric properties, evidencing the important role played by the eg electrons on the stabilization of the magnetic structures that are suitable for the emergence of electric polarization.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The evolution of magnetic phases in multi-phase iron oxide nanoparticles, synthesized via the transferred arc plasma induced gas phase condensation method, was investigated by X-ray diffraction, vibrating sample magnetometry and 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy. The particles are proposed to be consisting of three different iron oxide phases: α-Fe2O3, γ-Fe2O3 and Fe3O4. These nanoparticles were exposed to high temperature (∼935 K) under vacuum (10−3 mbar He pressure), and the thermally induced phase transformations were investigated. The Rietveld refinement of the X-ray diffraction data corroborates the least-squares fitting of the transmission Mössbauer spectra in confirming the presence of Fe3O4, γ-Fe2O3 and α-Fe2O3 phases before the thermal treatment, while only Fe3O4 and α-Fe2O3 phases exist after thermal treatment. On thermal annealing in vacuum, conversion from γ-Fe2O3 to Fe3O4 and α-Fe2O3 was observed. Interestingly, we have observed a phase transformation occurring in the temperature range ∼498 K–538 K, which is strikingly lower than the phase transformation temperature of γ-Fe2O3 to α-Fe2O3 (573–623 K) in air. Combining the results of Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction patterns and Mössbauer spectroscopy, we have attributed this phase transformation to the phase conversion of a metastable “defected and strained” d-Fe3O4 phase, present in the as-prepared sample, to the α-Fe2O3 phase. Stabilization of the phases by controlling the phase transformations during the use of different iron-oxide nanoparticles is the key factor to select them for a particular application. Our investigation provides insight into the effect of temperature and chemical nature of the environment, which are the primary factors governing the phase stability, suitability and longevity of the iron oxide nanomaterials prepared by the gas-phase condensation method for various applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We studied how the strain, induced exchange field and extrinsic Rashba spin-orbit coupling (RSOC) enhance the electronic band structure (EBS) and electronic heat capacity (EHC) of ferromagnetic silicene in presence of external electric field (EF) by using the Kane-Mele Hamiltonian, Dirac cone approximation and the Green's function approach. Particular attention is paid to investigate the EHC of spin-up and spin-down bands at Dirac K and K′ points. We have varied the EF, strain, exchange field and RSOC to tune the energy of inter-band transitions and consequently EHC, leading to very promising features for future applications. Evaluation of EF exhibits three phases: Topological insulator (TI), valley-spin polarized metal (VSPM) and band insulator (BI) at given aforementioned parameters. As a new finding, we have found a quantum anomalous Hall phase in BI regime at strong RSOCs. Interestingly, the effective mass of carriers changes with strain, resulting in EHC behaviors. Here, exchange field has the same behavior with EF. Finally, we have confirmed the reported and expected symmetry results for both Dirac points and spins with the study of valley-dependent EHC.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate deterministic multi-step rotation of a magnetic single-domain (SD) state in Nickel nanodisks using the multiferroic magnetoelastic effect. Ferromagnetic Nickel nanodisks are fabricated on a piezoelectric Lead Zirconate Titanate (PZT) substrate, surrounded by patterned electrodes. With the application of a voltage between opposing electrode pairs, we generate anisotropic in-plane strains that reshape the magnetic energy landscape of the Nickel disks, reorienting magnetization toward a new easy axis. By applying a series of voltages sequentially to adjacent electrode pairs, circulating in-plane anisotropic strains are applied to the Nickel disks, deterministically rotating a SD state in the Nickel disks by increments of 45°. The rotation of the SD state is numerically predicted by a fully-coupled micromagnetic/elastodynamic finite element analysis (FEA) model, and the predictions are experimentally verified with magnetic force microscopy (MFM). This experimental result will provide a new pathway to develop energy efficient magnetic manipulation techniques at the nanoscale.© 2017Detailed experimental investigation of thermal and magnetic properties are presented for Cu(NH3)4SO4·H2O, an ideal uniform Heisenberg spin ½ chain compound. A comparison of these properties with relevant spin models is also presented. Temperature dependent magnetic susceptibility and specific heat data have been compared with the exact solution for uniform Heisenberg chain model derived by means of Bethe ansatz technique. Magnetization isotherms measured as a function of field are analyzed using the numerical results simulated by Quantum Monte Carlo technique. Specific heat as a function of magnetic field (up to 7T) and temperature (down to 2 K) is reported. Subsequently, the data are compared with the corresponding theoretical curves for infinite Heisenberg spin ½ chain model with J = 6 K. Moreover, internal energy and entropy are calculated by analyzing the experimental specific heat data. Magnetic field and temperature dependent behavior of entropy and internal energy are in good agreement with the theoretical predictions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on structural, spin glass behaviour and competing magnetic interactions in xNiFe2O4 - (1-x)BaTiO3 (x = 0.2 and 0.3) nanocomposites prepared by sol-gel method. The structure and surface morphology of the NiFe2O4-BaTiO3 composites were examined by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and scanning electron microscope (SEM). XRD measurements of composite materials show the presence of both NiFe2O4 and BaTiO3 phases. FESEM and energy dispersive X-ray (EDX) measurements indicate uniformly distributed nano size particles and presence of Ni, Fe, O, Ba and Ti elements respectively. Temperature variation Raman spectra indicates large structural disordering (Peak broadening and shift) around 395 K due to the structural transformation of BaTiO3. Magnetization, zero field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) measurements were carried out from 2 K to 320 K for both composites. ZFC and FC measurements reveal the spin glass and Superparamagnetism like behaviour along with competing magnetic interaction in both composites. Saturation magnetization value is seen to increase from 6.7 to 10 emu/g with increasing Ni ferrite composition from x = 0.2 to x = 0.3. Distribution function associated with magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy barrier exhibits broad peaks due to the random distribution of spins associated with different particle size in the x = 0.3 composition.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA detailed noise study of mid-infrared 2–3 μm wavelenght GaSb-based type-I ridge-waveguide laser diodes (LDs) has been carried out using the low frequency noise spectroscopy. Different samples having slightly different heterostructures, differently packaged, with and without facet passivation have been investigated. The activation energies of trap levels, associated with additional generation-recombination (g–r) noise components in noise spectra at small current region before the threshold, have been determined. It was shown that at particular forward currents the mode-hopping effect dominates during LD lasing operation. It was demonstrated that small differences in LD heterostructure and waveguide layers have got the largest influence to LD noise characteristics while influence of the absence of facet passivation, linking to noise generation centers at the cleaved semiconductor interface, and package type is much weaker.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Two kinds of 0.23 mm-thick high-silicon steel sheets with strong η-fiber texture and Goss texture were produced by rolling methods. Their final microstructures, textures and magnetic properties were analyzed by scanning electron microscope (SEM), transmission electron microscope (TEM), energy-dispersive spectroscopy (EDS), X-ray diffractometer (XRD), electron backscattered diffraction (EBSD) and classical loss separation. The results showed that the core loss of strong η-fiber-oriented high-silicon steel was lower than that of grain-oriented high-silicon steel at frequencies ranging from 40 Hz to 20 kHz, and their differences in core loss were more obvious at 400 Hz and higher frequencies. The hysteresis losses and anomalous losses of the strong η-fiber-oriented high-silicon steel were lower than that of grain-oriented high-silicon steel at frequencies ranging from 40 Hz to 1000 Hz, and the losses were closely related to final cleanness and grain sizes. A few stable remained nitride precipitates increased the hysteresis loss of the grain-oriented high-silicon steel. The effect of decreasing grain sizes on decreasing core losses at high frequencies was significant, and the strong η-fiber-oriented high-silicon steel was more suitable for high frequency applications because of smaller grain sizes compared to the grain-oriented high-silicon steel.© 2017A general study of [Tb2] molecular magnet is presented using the general spin Hamiltonian formalism. A spin-spin correlators determined for a spin wave functions in [Tb2] are analyzed numerically and compared in details with the results obtained by means of conventional quantum mechanics. It is shown that the various expectation values of the spin operators and a study of their corresponding probability distributions allow to have a novel understanding in spin dynamics of entangled qubits in quantum [Tb2] system. The obtained results reveal that the properties of spin-spin correlators are responsible for the entanglement of the spin qubit under a pulse magnetic field. It allows us to present some quantum circuits determined for quantum computing within SSNQ based on [Tb2] molecule, including the CNOT and SWAP gates.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The static and dynamic linear response functions for the spin-1 mean-field Blume-Capel model with a random diluted single-ion anisotropy are derived using the thermodynamics of linear irreversible processes. Thermal dependence of the static susceptibility is studied in detail. In addition, by utilizing the stationary solution of the kinetic equation in existence of sinusoidal external magnetic field, the low frequency thermal behavior of the magnetic absorption and dispersion factors are investigated. Particularly, we have analyzed the behaviors of these quantities near both first- and second-order transition temperatures and multicritical points such as tricritical point, critical endpoint and double critical endpoint. The static and dynamical mean field critical exponents in hydrodynamic limit are also calculated in order to formulate the critical and multicritical behaviors of the magnetic susceptibility. Finally, a comparison of the findings of this study with previous theoretical and experimental studies is presented and it is shown that a good agreement is found with our results.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, nanocrystalline (Fe70Al30)100−xSix (x = 0, 5, 10, 15 and 20 at.%) powders were prepared by mechanical alloying for a fixed milling time of 72 h. The powder samples were characterized in terms of structural evolution, morphological changes and magnetic behavior. The X-ray diffraction measurements reveal that all the samples are of (bcc) single phase with an average crystallite size less than 22 nm. Besides, the lattice parameter decreases with Si content (x) up to the solubility limit of Si atoms into the α-Fe lattice where it remains independent of the composition. The magnetic data obtained by Vibrating Sample Magnetometer showed that the saturation magnetization decreases monotonously with Si content increasing x, whereas coercivity which not only depends on composition but also on structure of the sample decreases to a minimum of 20.3 Oe at x = 10 at.% and increases abruptly at the higher x value (x = 20 at.%). Mössbauer spectroscopy analyses indicated that the sample with x = 5 at.% exhibits a fully ferromagnetic behavior and that beyond this concentration, the content of the ferromagnetic phase gradually decreases due to the non magnetic nature of Si.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work reports enhancing the hard magnetic properties of a binary ferromagnetic Heusler alloy based on Mn-Al system through mechanical milling. We report the processing induced evolution of magnetic properties for two sets of alloys, both having the same stoichiometric composition of Al-55at.%Mn with one of them containing high temperature ε phase while the other consisting of only metastable ferromagnetic τ phase. No effect of milling on the magnetic properties of ε phase could be detected due to its nonmagnetic nature. However, subsequent annealing at 350 °C for 30 min after milling results in structural change and exhibits magnetic response. The phase transitions were found to depend on prior milling history. The highest saturation magnetization and coercivity were obtained for 4 h milled sample that is annealed at 350 °C for 30 min with values of 23 emu/g and 5.2 KOe, respectively. In the case of samples with initial microstructure consisting of grains of only metastable τ phase, no decomposition could be observed when milled for a period up to 9 h. Additionally, it was observed that after 3 h of milling, the saturation magnetization value reduces to 24 emu/g and coercivity increases to 5.2 KOe from an initial values of 116 emu/g and 0.98KOe respectively. Further milling causes a decrease in both the values. Annealing of the 3 h milled powder at 350 °C for 30 min, resulted in a slight decrease in coercivity (Hc = 4.9 KOe) while a significant increase in saturation magnetization (34 emu/g) value could be observed. Experimental results suggest that magnetization reversal is domain nucleation controlled and that the nonmagnetic phases (β + γ2) present can act as the pinning sites.© 2017Electronic polarization or bond relaxation can effectively alter the electronic and magnetic behavior of materials by doping impurity atom. For this aim, the thermodynamic, electronic and magnetic performances of cubic BiFeO3 have been modulated by the 3d transition metal (TM) dopants (Sc, Ti, V, Cr, Mn, Co, Ni, Cu and Zn) based on the density functional theory. Results show that the doped specimen with low impurity concentration is more stable than that with high impurity concentration. The Mulliken charge values and spin magnetic moments of TM element are making major changes, while those of all host atoms are making any major changes. Especially, it is the linear relation between the spin magnetic moments of TM dopants and the total magnetic moment of doped specimens; thus, the variations of total magnetic moment of doped specimens are decided by the spin magnetic moments of TM dopants, thought the total magnetic moments of doped specimens mainly come from Fe atom and TM dopants. Besides, as double TM atoms substitution the Fe atoms, the Sc-, Ti-, Mn-, Co- and Zn-doped specimens show AFM state, while the V-, Cr-, Ni- and Cu-doped specimens show FM state.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A simplified multiscale approach and a Helmholtz free energy based approach for modeling the magneto-mechanical behavior of electrical steel sheets are compared. The models are identified from uniaxial magneto-mechanical measurements of two different electrical steel sheets which show different magneto-elastic behavior. Comparison with the available measurement data of the materials shows that both models successfully model the magneto-mechanical behavior of one of the studied materials, whereas for the second material only the Helmholtz free energy based approach is successful.© 2017A study of ageing effects on the magnetic properties of Single-Molecule-Magnets (SMMs) of the Mn12 based Acetate, ([Mn12O12(CH3COO)16(H2O)4]·2CH3COOH·4H2O (1) and Stearate, [Mn12O12(CH3(CH2)16COO)11(CH3COO)5(H2O)4] (2) complexes has been carried out. Detailed magnetization (M) measurements as a function of temperature (T ∼ 1.8–10 K), magnetic field (H ∼ 0 to ±40 kOe) and time (t) have been performed on relatively fresh samples (1A and 2A) and samples aged for ∼4 weeks (1B and 2B) of both Mn12-Acetate and Mn12-Stearate. The blocking temperatures (TB) extracted from the measured M(T) lie between ∼3.0 and 3.4 K for all the four samples. In all cases, below TB, the M-H loops exhibit hysteresis with periodic steps. Interestingly, the ageing process leads to significant changes in the magnetic response of both the complexes. With ageing the Mn12-Acetate exhibits a large increase in the magnetization drop near zero-field, but the estimated anisotropy energy barrier (U) remains unchanged ∼71 K. Whereas, in the case of Mn12-Stearate ageing results in a change of U from ∼52 K (2A) to ∼35 K (2B). The results are discussed in terms of possible ageing induced changes in the structural and chemical environment of the SMMs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Mixed spinel ferrite nanoparticles are being applied in biomedical applications due to their biocompatibility, antibacterial activity, particular magnetic and electronic properties with chemical and thermal stabilities. The Cu0.3Zn0.5Mg0.2Fe2O4 nanoparticles are synthesized through the thermal treatment method. Polyvinyl alcohol (PVA) is used as the capping agent to stabilize the particles and prevent their agglomeration. The synthesized nanoparticles are characterized through X-ray diffractometer (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), N2 adsorption-desorption, field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM), and transmission electron microscope (TEM). The magnetic characterization is made on a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), which displayed super-paramagnetic behavior of the synthesized sample. Potential application of the Cu0.3Zn0.5Mg0.2Fe2O4 nanoparticles as a drug delivery agent is assessed in vitro by estimating their release properties. The obtained results indicate that the amount of ibuprofen (IBU) adsorbed into the nanocarrier of Cu0.3Zn0.5Mg0.2Fe2O4 is 104 mg/g and the drug release is sustained up to 72 h.© 2017The resistance of the Pt bar deposited on the YIG slab was monitored while the magnetic field was ramped through the ferromagnetic resonance with the YIG slab facing a coplanar waveguide resonator excited at 4.3 GHz excitation. The resistance change provides detection of the ferromagnetic resonance with a high signal-to-noise ratio. It is ascribed to a change in the temperature of the Pt bars. The thermal origin of the signal is confirmed by the observation that the signal vanishes when field modulation is applied at frequencies above 6 Hz. The spin pumping effect was vanishingly small, and the anisotropic magnetoresistance of the Pt bar, though quite easily observed, would imply a rectification voltage that is much smaller than the bolometric effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study force dynamics of macropsin of molecular magnets coupled to a torsional resonator. In the presence of an ac field and a static field with a gradient, the force is shown to display various types of quantum oscillations which depend upon the coupling strength and the frequency of torsional oscillations. Optimal conditions for observing them will be discussed within the framework of experimentally controllable parameters.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) and magnetic properties of NiFe films can be remarkably enhanced via CoFeB layer. In the case of an ultrathin NiFe film having a Ta/CoFeB/MgO/NiFe/MgO/CoFeB/Ta structure, the CoFeB/MgO layers suppressed the formation of magnetic dead layers and the interdiffusions and interface reactions between the NiFe and Ta layers. The AMR reached a maximum value of 3.56% at 450 °C. More importantly, a single NiFe (1 1 1) peak can be formed resulting in higher AMR values for films having CoFeB layer. This enhanced AMR also originated from the significant specular reflection of electrons owing to the crystalline MgO layer, together with the sharp interfaces with the NiFe layer. These factors together resulted in higher AMR and improved magnetic properties.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Topology optimization is used to obtain a magnetic source distribution providing levitation of a diamagnetic body or type I superconductor with maximized thrust force. We show that this technique identifies non-trivial source distributions and may be useful to design devices based on non-contact magnetic suspension and other magnetic devices, such as micro-magneto-mechanical devices, high field magnets etc. Diamagnetic and superconducting suspensions are often used in physical experiments and thus we believe this approach will be interesting to physics community as it may generate non-trivial and often unexpected topologies and may be useful to create new experiments and devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of LaMn0.5Co0.5O3 (LMCO) adding on structural, magnetic, dielectric, and ferroelectric properties of BiFeO3 is presented. X ray diffraction and Raman investigation allowed the identification of a structural transition and permitted to shed more light on the influence of LCMO addition. By varying LMCO concentration, highest remnant polarization (Pr) and coercive field (Ec) with a likely square hysteresis loop are obtained for 10 mol% addition. With increasing concentration to 20 mol%, a change of P-E shape, a decrease of both Pr and Ec, and a frequency dependence of Ec are observed. The results are approached with both Ishibashi-Orihara and Du-Chen models.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nano drug targeting, through the use of an external magnetic field, is a new technique for the treatment of several diseases, which can potentially avoid the dispersion of drugs in undesired locations of the body. Nevertheless, due to the limitations on the intensity of the magnetic field applied, the hydrodynamic forces can reduce the effectiveness of the procedure. This technique is studied in this paper with the Computational Fluid Dynamics (CFD), focusing on the influence of the magnetic probe position, and the direction of the circulating electric current. A single rectangular coil is used to generate the external magnetic field. A patient-specific geometry of the coeliac trunk is reconstructed from DICOM images, with the use of VMTK. A new solver, coupling the Lagrangian dynamics of the nanoparticles with the Eulerian dynamics of the blood, is implemented in OpenFOAM to perform the simulations. The resistive pressure, the Womersley's profile for the inlet velocity and the magnetic field of a rectangular coil are implemented in the software as boundary conditions. The results show the influence of the position of the probe, as well as the limitations associated with the rectangular coil configuration.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Thermodynamic properties of spin-1/2 Heisenberg antiferromagnetic (AFM) two-leg ladder with alternating strong rung interactions are investigated by numerical and analytical approaches. Two gapless Luttinger Liquid (LL) and two gapped symmetry protected topological (SPT) phases are observed in this type of spin structure. As a low temperature characteristic of the first LL gapless regime, a maximum and a minimum are observed in the magnetization curve. The magnetization of the system in the second LL phase is completely different and shows only a maximum in the temperature behavior. In the SPT Haldane phase, the value of magnetization increases with single broad peak, while apparently anomalous behavior is observed in the SPT 1/2-plateau phase. In fact, we have argued that the magnetization shows a complex logical temperature behavior in the 1/2-plateau phase. In the second LL phase, there is a novel three peaks structure in the temperature behavior of the specific heat whereas in the first LL phase, specific heat shows a double peaks structure. The temperature dependence of thermodynamic quantities like the magnetization, the susceptibility and the specific heat are also studied to specify various SPT and LL phases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.First-principles calculations based on density functional theory (DFT) using the self-consistent full-potential linearized augmented plane wave (FPLAPW) method were applied to study the electronic structures and magnetic properties of new Heusler alloys CoYO2 (Y = Sc, Ti, V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Ni, Cu, and Zn). The calculated formation energies of these compounds were negative, therefore, they can be synthesized experimentally. All compounds were stable in ferromagnetic AlCu2Mn-type structure. In AlCu2Mn-type structure, CoScO2, CoFeO2, and CoNiO2 compounds were HM ferromagnets, CoCuO2 was a nearly half-metal, CoZnO2 was a spin gapless semiconductor, and other compounds were conventional ferromagnets. In CuHg2Ti-type structure, CoTiO2 compound had a nearly HM characteristic, CoVO2 was a spin gapless semiconductor, and other compounds were conventional ferromagnets. The origin of the half-metallic band gap for CoScO2 alloy Heusler alloy was well understood. The total magnetic moments of the three HM compounds obeyed Slater-Pauling rules (Mtot = 22-Ztot and Mtot = 32-Ztot). CoScO2 had the widest region of half-metallicity between the three half-metals indicating its high robustness of half-metallicity with respect to the variation of lattice constants.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Using full micromagnetic simulations we calculate the spectra of ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) for an iron (core-shell) nanocube and show that the FMR characteristics are strongly size dependent. For instance, for a 40 nm it is found that, in contrast to a macrospin picture, the spectrum of the iron nanocube possesses two bands centered around 0.4 T and ≈0.1 T. The peaks originate from the surface anisotropy induced by the strong demagnetizing fields (DMFs) of iron. Further simulations reveal that for ≈20 nm nanocubes the macrospin model becomes viable. Above 40 nm we find a broad band for FMR absorption. Our results point to possible interpretations of existing FMR experimental observations for the system studied here.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.To investigate the electronic and magnetic properties of Co2MnGe thin film, we simulate four (1 1 1) surfaces of Co2MnGe and its eight (1 1 1) interfaces with GaAs by means of the first principles calculations. According to the calculated density of states, there are two surfaces exhibiting the half-metallic character among considered four surfaces. More importantly, this kind of half-metallicity also exists in some interfaces of Co2MnGe/GaAs. The results on the (1 1 1) surfaces of Co2MnGe and its (1 1 1) interfaces with GaAs would be helpful for the practical applications of spintronic devices with superior performance.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and structural properties of highly ordered (S ∼ 0.82) epitaxial Fe50−xMnxPt50 thin films were investigated. L10 Fe50−xMnxPt50 (x = 0, 6, 9, 12 and 15) thin films with a constant thickness of 45 nm were prepared by co-sputtering Fe50Pt50 and Mn50Pt50 on to MgO (100) single crystal substrate. We find a significant increase in the coercivity for FeMnPt thin films. We have shown that this increase coincides with a tetragonal distortion, while a recent first principles study of Mn doped FePt showed the sub lattice ordering of ferromagnetically aligned Mn atoms would lead to increase in magnetic anisotropy in the FeMnPt ternary alloy system with fixed Pt concentration. At x = 12 the coercivity has increased by 46.4% relative to that of Fe50Pt50 (x = 0). We attribute the increase in coercivity to the tetragonal distortion as the experimentally determined c/a ratio is larger than the expected c/a ratio for ferromagnetically ordered Mn atoms in the sublattice at the concentration x = 12. High temperature deposition and high temperature annealing was applied to achieve large coercivity in Mn doped FePt as these process lead to the observed tetragonal distortion.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Changes in the magnetic susceptibility spectrum of ferrofluids, χ(ω), due to the nanoparticle agglomeration are common when a static magnetic field is superimposed on the measuring field, but here we report on changes which occur in the absence of a static magnetic field, solely in the presence of the measuring field, over the frequency range of 50 Hz–13 MHz and irrespective of the colloidal stability of samples. The result is explained in terms of local rearrangement of particles within ferrofluids subjected to low frequency alternating magnetic field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization of Gd1-xNdxZn2 (0x⩽1) was measured to study the effect of Nd substitution in GdZn2 with a Curie temperature of 85 K and a spin-reorientation transition temperature of 58 K on the magnetocaloric effect. The Nd counterpart NdZn2 shows antiferromagnetic order at 23 K. Samples of Gd1-xNdxZn2 (0x⩽1) were prepared by the melt-growth method. In Nd-substituted systems, the anomaly due to spin-reorientation disappeared. For x⩾0.6, field-induced metamagnetic transitions were observed, indicating an antiferromagnetic ground state. This complex magnetism may originate from competition between ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic interactions. Magnetic entropy change ΔSm was calculated based on the magnetization measurements. ΔSm was suppressed by Nd substitution for x values up to 0.6. For x=1 (NdZn2), the maximum value of ΔSm was −9 J/K kg, which is almost the same as those of other Nd-based magnetocaloric materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanomagnetic memory and logic are currently seen as promising candidates to replace current digital computing architectures due to its superior energy-efficiency, non-volatility and propensity for highly dense and low-power applications. In this work, we investigate the use of shape engineering (concave and diamond shape) to introduce biaxial anisotropy in single domain nanomagnets, giving rise to multiple easy and hard axes. Such nanomagnets, with dimensions of ∼100 nm × 100 nm, double the logic density of conventional two-state nanomagnetic devices by encoding more information (four binary bits: “00”, “11”, “10”, “01”) per nanomagnet and can be used in memory and logic devices as well as in higher order information processing applications. We study reliability, magnetization switching coherence, and show, for the first time, the use of voltage-induced strain for the clocking of magnetization in these four-state nanomagnets. Critical parameters such as size, thickness, concavity, and geometry of two types of four-state nanomagnets are also investigated. This analytical study provides important insights into achieving reliable and coherent single domain nanomagnets and low-energy magnetization clocking in four-state nanomagnets, paving the way for potential applications in advanced technologies.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, strontium hexaferrite powders, SrFe12O19, synthesized by the Pechini and combustion methods have been structurally and magnetically characterized. Based on structural characterization from X-ray diffraction (XRD) data analysis, it was confirmed that pure material was obtained by both methods when the reaction conditions (calcination temperature, precursors, pHe) were kept constant. However, the morphological characterization based on scanning electron microscopy (SEM) showed differences in the samples obtained by each method. Similarly, magnetic characterization showed discrepancies not only in the magnetic coercivity (Hc), but also in the remanent magnetization (Mr) and saturation magnetization (Ms).© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We synthesized Co0.25Cu0.25Mn0.5Fe2O4@CMC (CCMFe2O4@CMC) nanorods as a new dual-modal simultaneous for magnetic resonance imaging contrast agent and nanocarrier for drug delivery system. Impact of CCMFe2O4@CMC nanorods were investigated on the longitudinal (T1), transverse (T2) and transverse (T2∗) relaxation times for in vitro MRI contrast agent in water and also for drug delivery system, L-dopa was coated on CCMFe2O4@CMC nanorods and then in vitro drug release test was carried out at three PHs values and different temperatures. In vitro MR imaging demonstrated that r2 value of CCMFe2O4@CMC nanorods is 138.33 mM−1 s−1, CCMFe2O4@CMC is useful as T2 contrast agent relative to other T2 contrast agants. In vitro drug release test shows the amount of released L-dopa from CCMFe2O4@CMC nanorods at medium with pH = 1.2 is more than pH = 5.3 and 7.4.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, electromagnetic design and permanent magnet shape optimization for permanent magnet synchronous generator with hybrid excitation are investigated. Based on generator structure and principle, design outline is presented for obtaining high efficiency and low voltage fluctuation. In order to realize rapid design, equivalent magnetic circuits for permanent magnet and iron poles are developed. At the same time, finite element analysis is employed. Furthermore, by means of design of experiment (DOE) method, permanent magnet is optimized to reduce voltage waveform distortion. Finally, the validity of proposed design methods is validated by the analytical and experimental results.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of the binary Nickel/Bismuth alloy (Ni/Bi) are investigated within the effective field theory. The Ni/Bi alloy has been modeled that the rhombohedral Bi lattice is surrounded by the hexagonal Ni lattice. According to lattice locations, Bi atoms have two different magnetic properties. Bi1 atoms are in the center of the hexagonal Ni atoms (Ni/Bi1 single layer) and Bi2 atoms are between two Ni/Bi1 bilayers. The Ni, Bi1, Bi2 and Ni/Bi undergo a second-order phase transition from the ferromagnetic phase to paramagnetic phase at Tc = 1.14. The magnetizations of the Ni/Bi alloy are observed as Bi1 > Bi2 > Ni/Bi > Ni at T < Tc; hence the magnetization of the Bi1 is dominant and Ni is at least dominant. However, the total magnetization of the Ni/Bi alloy is close to magnetization of the Ni at T < Tc. The corcivities of the Ni, Bi1, Bi2 and Ni/Bi alloy are the same with each others, but the remanence magnetizations are different. Our theoretical results of M(T) and M(H) of the Ni/Bi alloy are in quantitatively good agreement with the some experimental results of binary Nickel/Bismuth systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the electronic structures and magnetic properties of SnS2 monolayers substitutionally doped with 4-d transition-metal through systematic first principles calculations. The doped complexes exhibit interesting electronic and magnetic behaviors, depending on the interplay between crystal field splitting, Hund's rule, and 4d levels. The system doped with Y is nonmagnetic metal. Both the Zr- and Pd-doped systems remain nonmagnetic semiconductors. Doping results in half-metallic states for Nb-, Ru-, Rh-, Ag, and Cd doped cases, and magnetic semiconductors for systems with Mo and Tc dopants. In particular, the Nb- and Mo-doped systems display long-ranged ferromagnetic ordering with Curie temperature above room temperature, which are primarily attributable to the double-exchange mechanism, and the p-d/p-p hybridizations, respectively. Moreover, The Mo-doped system has excellent energetic stability and flexible mechanical stability, and also possesses remarkable dynamic and thermal (500 K) stability. Our studies demonstrate that Nb- and Mo-doped SnS2 monolayers are promising candidates for preparing 2D diluted magnetic semiconductors, and hence will be a helpful clue for experimentalists.© 2017In this paper, binder jetting additive manufacturing technique is employed to fabricate NdFeB isotropic bonded magnets, followed by an infiltration process with low-melting point eutectic alloys [i.e., Nd3Cu0.25Co0.75 (NdCuCo) and Pr3Cu0.25Co0.75 (PrCuCo)]. Densification and mechanical strength improvement are achieved for the as-printed porous part. Meanwhile, the intrinsic coercivity Hci is enhanced from 732 to 1345 kA/m and 1233 kA/m after diffusion of NdCuCo and PrCuCo, respectively. This study presents a novel method for fabricating complex-shaped bonded magnets with promising mechanical and magnetic properties.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper focuses on improving the permeability of Fe-Si-B based amorphous magnetic powder cores by addition of micron-sized ferromagnetic crystalline metal particles (Permalloy). The effects of Permalloy content, size and the amount of insulation on magnetic properties and density were investigated. The results showed that the Fe based amorphous powder cores prepared with 15 wt.% Permalloy (<15 μm particle size) have higher permeability and relatively low core loss. Furthermore, compared with Fe-Si-B based amorphous powder, the saturation magnetization of mix powder increases by 60.7%, while the magnetic powder cores coated with 3 wt.% coating agent (DC805) have low core loss of 57 W/kg at 100 kHz for Bm = 500Oe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and phase composition of magnets based on misch-metal (MM) with nominal composition of MM13+xFe84−xB6.5 with x = 0.5, 1, 1.5, 2 and 2.5 using melt-spinning method were investigated. For x = 1.5, it could exhibit best magnetic properties (Hcj = 753.02 kA m−1, (BH)max = 70.77 kJ m−3). X-ray diffraction and energy dispersive spectroscopy show that the multi hard magnetic phase of RE2Fe14B (RE = La, Ce, Pr, Nd) existed in the magnets. The domain wall pinning effect and the exchange coupling interaction between grains are dependent on the abnormal RE-rich phase composition. Optimizing the phase constitution is necessary to improve magnetic properties in MM-Fe-B magnets for utilizing the rare earth resource in a balanced manner.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization reversal mechanisms in soft/hard multisegmented nanowires have been investigated using numerical simulations. In most of the studied systems the magnetization reversal process starts at the ends. However in short soft/hard/soft nanowires, the magnetization reversal process starts at the center of the wire, generating an unusual behavior of the coercivity as a function of the length.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe carrier microscopic transport process of uniaxial strained Si n-channel metal-oxide semiconductor field-effect transistor (NMOSFET) has been analyzed under γ-ray radiation. The variation of electrical characteristics of the uniaxial strained Si nanometer NMOSFET has also been investigated under the total dose radiation. The Capacitor-Voltage (C-V) and Current-Voltage (I-V) characteristics are measured at room temperature before and after irradiation for each sample. The results indicate that the drift of threshold voltage, the degradation of carrier mobility and the increase in leakage current because of the total dose radiation effect. Moreover, a two-dimensional analytical model of threshold voltage (Vth) and carrier mobility model have been developed due to the total dose irradiation taken into consideration. Based on the model, numerical simulation has been carried out by MATLAB. The influence of the total dose, geometry and physics parameters on threshold voltage was simulated. Moreover, to evaluate the validity of the model, the simulation results were compared with experimental data, and good agreements were confirmed. Thus, the experiment results and proposed model provide good reference for research on irradiation reliability and application of strained integrated circuit of uniaxial strained Si nanometer n-channel metal-oxide semiconductor field-effect transistor.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic drug targeting has been used to steer magnetic therapeutic agents and has received much attention for capillaries and human brain arteries. In this paper, we focus on noninvasive targeting of nanoparticles in muscular arteries, in where the vessel diameter and blood flow are much challengingly higher than brain capillaries. We aim to design a low intensity magnetic field which avoids potential side effects on blood cells while steers particles with high targeting rate. The setup design procedure is considerably flexible to be used in a wide variety of large vessels. Using particle tracing, a new method is proposed to connect the geometry of the vessel under the action of targeting to the required magnetic force. Specifications of the coil which is placed outside the body are derived based on this required force. Mutual effects of coil dimensions on the produced magnetic force are elaborated and summarized in a design flowchart to be used for arbitrary muscular vessel sizes. The performance of the optimized coil is validated by in vitro experiments and it is shown that particles are steered with the average efficiency of 80.2% for various conditions.© 2017 Elsevier LtdResistive thin film devices with four contacts of arbitrary size are discussed analytically by conformal mapping and equivalent resistor circuit. The device symmetry is assumed to be mirror symmetric to two lines, which are perpendicular. These lines go either through the contacts or midway between the contacts. This limits the degrees of freedom (DoF) to three. It is shown how to derive the sheet resistance and the other two DoF by Van-der-Pauw measurement without knowledge of the specific device geometry. It is also elucidated why conventional Van-der-Pauw method fails for devices with large contacts – an alternative procedure is proposed. The results are applicable to Van-der-Pauw devices, Hall plates, Vertical Hall effect devices, and mechanical stress sensors.© 2017This article has been retracted: please see Elsevier Policy on Article Withdrawal (http://www.elsevier.com/locate/withdrawalpolicy). This article has been retracted at the request of the Editor-in-Chief. The authors have plagiarized part of a paper that had already appeared in Ceram. Int., 39 (2013) 2317–2322, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ceramint.2012.08.079. One of the conditions of submission of a paper for publication is that authors declare explicitly that their work is original and has not appeared in a publication elsewhere. Re-use of any data should be appropriately cited. As such this article represents a severe abuse of the scientific publishing system. The scientific community takes a very strong view on this matter and apologies are offered to readers of the journal that this was not detected during the submission process.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of the anisotropic NdFeB magnets prepared by hot pressing followed by die-upsetting NdFeB MQU-F powders doped with low-melting RCu alloy powders were explored, where RCu stands for Nd70Cu30, Dy70Cu30 and (Nd0.5Dy0.5)70Cu30, respectively. In addition, the post-annealing at 600 °C was employed to modify the microstructures and the magnetic properties of the hot deformed magnets. It is found that doping RCu alloy powders is effective in enhancing the coercivity of the hot deformed NdFeB magnets from 15.1 kOe to 16.3–19.5 kOe. For Nd70Cu30-doped magnets, the increment of coercivity is only 1.2 kOe. Meanwhile, Dy70Cu30-doped and (Nd0.5Dy0.5)70Cu30-doped magnets show an almost identical enhancement of coercivity of about 4.4 kOe. Importantly, the latter magnet shows a beneficial effect of reducing the usage of Dy from 1.6 wt% to 0.8 wt%. TEM analysis shows that nonmagnetic Nd, Dy and Cu appear at grain boundary and isolate the magnetic grains, leading to an enhancement of coercivity. Doping lower melting point Dy-lean (Nd0.5Dy0.5)70Cu30 powders into commercial MQU-F powders for making high coercivity hot deformed NdFeB magnets might be a potential and economic way for mass production.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this research work, structural and magnetic evolution of Co57Fe13Nb8Ta4B18 alloy, during mechanical alloying process, have been investigated by using, X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, transmission electron microscopy, electron dispersive X-ray spectroscopy, differential thermal analysis and also vibrating sample magnetometer. It is observed that at 120 milling time, the crystallite size reaches to about 7.8 nm. Structural analyses show that, the solid solution of the initial powder mixture occurs at160 h milling time. The coercivity behavior demonstrates a rise, up to 70 h followed by decreasing tendency up to final stage of milling process. Thermal analysis of 160 h milling time sample reveals two endothermic peaks. The characterization of annealed milled sample for 160 h milling time at 427 °C shows crystallite size growth accompanied by increasing in saturation magnetization.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the magnetic properties in a system engineered to present Co grains laterally surrounded by a CoO matrix. By considering ferromagnetic SiO2/Co/CoO granular multilayers produced by sequential sputtering deposition, we verify that the Co grains present strong interfacial exchange coupling with the CoO matrix, assigned by the exchange bias effect as well as the raise of the Co blocking temperature. Morever, through magnetization and Hall resistivity experiments, we observe that the antiferromagnetic ordering temperature and exchange bias are dependent on the thickness of the antiferromagnetic material, attributed to finite size effects, as well as we find that the Co blocking temperature is raised as the CoO layer becomes thicker. We discuss the experimental results in terms of the growth mode of the layers, morphological properties of the multilayers, and temperature dependence of the magnetic behavior. The results place the sequential sputtering deposition as a promising alternative technique to produce Co/CoO granular multilayers.© 2017CoFeB/MgO-based perpendicular magnetic tunnel junctions (p-MTJ's) with high anisotropy and low damping are critical for spin-torque transfer random access memory (STT-RAM). Most schemes of making the pinned CoFeB fully perpendicular require ferrimagnets with high damping constants, a high temperature-grown L10 alloy, or an overly complex multilayered synthetic antiferromagnet (SyAF). We report a compositional study of perpendicular CoxPd alloy-pinned Co20Fe60B20/MgO based MTJ stacks, grown at moderate temperatures in a planetary deposition system. The perpendicular anisotropy of the CoxPd alloy films can be tuned based on the layer thickness and composition. The films were characterized by alternating gradient magnetometry (AGM), energy-dispersive X-rays (EDX), and X-ray diffraction (XRD). Current-in-plane tunneling (CIPT) measurements have also been performed on the compositionally varied CoxPd MTJ stacks. The CoxPd alloy becomes fully perpendicular at approximately x = 30% (atomic fraction) Co. Full-film MTJ stacks of Si/SiO2/MgO (13)/CoXPd100−x (50)/Ta (0.3)/CoFeB (1)/MgO (1.6)/CoFeB (1)/Ta (5)/Ru (10), with the numbers enclosed in parentheses being the layer thicknesses in nm, were sputtered onto thermally oxidized silicon substrates and in-situ lamp annealed at 400 °C for 5 min. CIPT measurements indicate that the highest TMR is observed for the CoPd composition with the highest perpendicular magnetic anisotropy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, Fe82Cu1Si4B11.5Nb1.5 nanocrystalline alloy ribbons with completely amorphous structure and surface crystallization were prepared using melt-spinning technique with wheel speeds of 45 m/s, 35 m/s and 25 m/s. The effect of surface crystallization layers on the soft-magnetic properties, core loss and dynamic magnetization process were systematically investigated. Moreover, the permeability-frequency spectra were measured as a function of the AC magnetic field, ranging from 1 to 75 A/m. It was found that decreasing the melt-spinning wheel speed can widen the annealing temperature range and the coercivity increases with the increase of surface crystallization. Excessive crystallization layers will increase the pinning field (Hp), which will lead to an increase of magnetic anisotropy constant K and eventually decrease the effective permeability. The crystallization mechanism of the Fe82Cu1Si4B11.5Nb1.5 nanocrystalline alloy ribbons with surface crystallization layers was discussed from the aspects of diffusion and competitive processes, which is helpful for further understanding the nanocrystallization process.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present study we have presented the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of ferromagnetic (La0.67Sr0.33MnO3)-charge ordered (Pr0.67Ca0.33MnO3) core-shell nanostructures. We have also compared the magnetocaloric properties of Pr0.67Ca0.33MnO3 (PCMO) nanoparticles. Our study indicates that in case of the core-shell nanostructures, the magnetocaloric properties markedly modifies compared to its parent compound PCMO, additionally the low field magnetocaloric effect enhanced. More specifically, the large value of magnetocaloric entropy change (−ΔS(T)) was observed in wider temperature range in core-shell nanostructure which may be important from application point of view.© 2017In this paper, we report a new phenomenon in C-V measurement of different gate length MIS-HEMTs, which can be associated with traps character of the AlGaN/GaN interface. The analysis of DC measurement, frequency dependent capacitance-voltage measurements and simulation show that the stress from passivation layer may induce a decrease of drain output current Ids, an increase of on-resistance, serious nonlinearity of transconductance gm, and a new peak of C-V curve. The value of the peak is reduced to zero while the gate length and measure frequency are increasing to 21 μm and 1 MHz, respectively. By using conductance method, the SiNx/GaN interface traps with energy level of EC−0.42 eV to EC−0.45 eV and density of 3.2 × 1012 ∼ 5.0 × 1012 eV−1 cm−2 is obtained after passivation. According to the experimental and simulation results, formation of the acceptor-like traps with concentration of 3 × 1011 cm−2 and energy level of EC−0.37 eV under the gate on AlGaN barrier side of AlGaN/GaN interface is the main reason for the degradation after the passivation.© 2017 Elsevier LtdOptimized Ge-rich GexSbyTez materials with improved crystallization temperature have been proven to guarantee code integrity after soldering thermal profile and data retention in extended temperature range for automotive application. Together with higher crystallization temperature, these materials show also peculiar characteristics of the crystalline state with respect to conventional GST (Ge2Sb2Te5). In particular integrated memory cell shows a very high virgin resistance and needs an electrical activation as last operation of the fabrication process. In this paper we investigate for the first time the role of this electrical activation we named forming operation. In particular we show that the level of the maximum current flowing into the cell at the first electrical activation (forming level) has an impact on cell programmability. An explanation of this behavior based on physical analysis is provided suggesting that it is related to the modulation of cell thermal efficiency. Finally it is shown how forming level can be used in order to optimize cell reliability with respect to requested specifications for high temperature data retention (HTDR) and endurance.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe high-voltage interconnection (HVI) issue becomes severe in the high-voltage monolithic ICs when single-layer metal is used for lowering the cost. This paper proposes a dual deep-oxide trenches (DDOT) structure for 500 V Silicon-on-Insulator Lateral Insulated Gate Bipolar Transistor (SOI-LIGBT) to shield the influence of HVI on the breakdown voltage. Compared with the conventional DDOT structure, HVI region of the proposed DDOT structure is shrunk by employing a shallow trench (T1) and a deep trench (T2). Besides the breakdown mechanism in the off-state, the current density and impact ionization rate distributions in the on-state of the proposed structure are also investigated. The experiments demonstrate that the proposed DDOT structure can fully shield the influence of HVI with significant reduction in the area of silicon region beneath the HVI. With almost the same off-state breakdown voltage (BVoff) of 550 V as the conventional DDOT structure, the length of the silicon region under the HVI in the proposed structure is shortened from 45 μm to 15 μm. Meanwhile, no on-state breakdown voltage (BVon) degradation is observed according to the measured results. The new method proposed in this work can also be used for other types of high-voltage devices such as LDMOS and free-wheeling diode in SOI Monolithic ICs.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn general most modeling approaches for organic field-effect transistors (OFETs) are based on the typical MOSFET equations. The threshold voltage is usually a fitting parameter without relation to physical parameters hence the impact of their variability on the threshold voltage is not clear. The presented modeling approach is charge based with a continuous equation for the channel current in organic field-effect transistors from below to above threshold. The model provides a physics based parameter set related to trap states, and a compatible parameter set from a circuit designer's perspective. An expression for the threshold voltage is derived depending on the density of trap states. The model considers a power-law mobility model, parasitic contact resistances and channel length modulation effects and is verified with measurements on OFETs fabricated with small molecules.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic, and magnetocaloric properties of DyNi0.67Si1.34 were investigated using X-ray powder diffraction, magnetic susceptibility, and magnetization measurements. X-ray powder diffraction pattern shows that DyNi0.67Si1.34 crystallizes in the AlB2-type hexagonal structure (space group: P6/mmm, No. 191, a = b = 3.9873(9) Å, and c = 3.9733(1) Å). The compound is a spin-glass with the freezing temperature TG = 6.2 K. The ac magnetic susceptibility measurements confirm magnetic frustration in DyNi0.67Si1.34. The maximum value of the magnetic entropy change determined from M(H) data is −16.1 J/kg K at 10.5 K for a field change of 70 kOe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.La2CoMnO6 are synthesized at different annealing temperature ranging from 600 °C to 1300 °C, marked as S600, S800, S1000 and S1300. S600 has the R-3c and the rest have the Pnma structure. The DTA curve exhibits two exothermic peaks, at 553 °C for the phase formation and 905 °C for the oxygen redistribution into the lattice. Deduced from xps, S1000 has the highest lattice oxygen. S1300 has one extra xps peak due to the oxygen deficient regions. Even though the xrd refinements are not reliable at telling whether Co/Mn ions are ordered or not, IR-FT, magnetic measurements and energy band gaps indicate that S1000 has the best Co/Mn ordering, and S600 has the worst. A stretching vibration at about 580–595 cm−1 in the IR-FT spectra is attributed to the ordered Co–O–Mn bond. A homogenous atomic distribution in S600, S800 and S1000 leads to one magnetic phase configuration, and the agglomeration of the FM ordered Co/Mn and the AFM disordered regions in S1300 induces the multi magnetic phases. From the aspects of band gap and energy level, S600 is a good candidate for light harvesting.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we present an investigation of the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of Mn0.98Cr(0.02-x)FexAs compounds with x = 0.002, 0.005 and 0.010. Our findings show that as Fe content increases the unit cell volume decreases, which indicates that Fe doping emulates the pressure effect on the crystalline structure. The transition temperature TC decreases as x increases and it can be set at approximate value of room temperature by changing the doping level. In addition, the magnetic entropy change ΔSM was determined using a discontinuous measurement protocol, and realistic values from the magnetocaloric effect presented by MnAs-type compounds under pressure (emulated pressure) could be obtained. The values of ΔSMMAX are very large, around −11 Jkg−1K−1 with ΔH = 15 kOe, which is higher than that observed for most compounds with TC around room temperature. However, ΔSM is confined to a narrow temperature range of 11 K. To overcome this drawback, the composition of a theoretical composite formed by our samples was calculated in order to obtain a table-shaped ΔSM curve. The simulated composite showed a high value of full width at half maximum δTFWHM of 33 K, which is much higher than that of single sample.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The present study reports the retention dynamics of a ferrofluid aggregate localized at the target site inside a glass capillary (500 × 500 µm2 square cross section) against a bulk flow of DI water (Re = 0.16 and 0.016) during the process of magnetic drug targeting (MDT). The dispersion dynamics of iron oxide nanoparticles (IONPs) into bulk flow for different initial size of aggregate at the target site is reported using the brightfield visualization technique. The flow field around the aggregate during the retention is evaluated using the µPIV technique. IONPs at the outer boundary experience a higher shear force as compared to the magnetic force, resulting in dispersion of IONPs into the bulk flow downstream to the aggregate. The blockage effect and the roughness of the outer boundary of the aggregate resulting from chain like clustering of IONPs contribute to the flow recirculation at the downstream region of the aggregate. The entrapment of seeding particles inside the chain like clusters of IONPs at the outer boundary of the aggregate reduces the degree of roughness resulting in a streamlined aggregate at the target site at later time. The effect of blockage, structure of the aggregate, and disturbed flow such as recirculation around the aggregate are the primary factors, which must be investigated for the effectiveness of the MDT process for in vivo applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we set out to fabricate an amorphous indium gallium zinc oxide (a-IGZO) thin-film transistor (TFT) with SiNx/HfO2/SiNx (SHS) sandwiched dielectrics. The J-V and C-V of this SHS film were extracted by the Au/p-Si/SHS/Ti structure. At room temperature the a-IGZO with SHS dielectrics showed the following electrical properties: a threshold voltage of 2.9 V, a subthreshold slope of 0.35 V/decade, an on/off current ratio of 3.5 × 107, and a mobility of 12.8 cm2 V−1 s−1. Finally, we tested the influence of gate bias stress on the TFT, and the result showed that the threshold voltage shifted to a positive voltage when applying a positive gate voltage to the TFT.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Power-tunable metamaterials based on barium permanent magnetic ferrite have been proposed and fabricated in this research. Scattering parameter measurements confirm a shift in resonant frequency in correlation to changes in incident electromagnetic power within microwave frequency band. The tunable phenomenon represented by a blue-shift in transmission spectra in the metamaterials array can be attributed to a decrease in saturation magnetization resulting from FMR-induced temperature elevation upon resonant conditions. This power-dependent behavior offers a simple and practical route towards dynamically fine-tunable ferrite metamaterials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the spin-wave resonance (SWR) frequency in a bicomponent bilayer and triple-layer films with antiferromagnetic or ferromagnetic interfacial couplings, as function of interfacial coupling, surface anisotropy, interface anisotropy, thickness and external magnetic field, using the linear spin-wave approximation and Green's function technique. The microwave properties for multi-layer magnetic film with antiferromagnetic interfacial coupling is different from those for multi-layer magnetic film with ferromagnetic interfacial coupling. For the bilayer film with antiferromagnetic interfacial couplings, as the lower (upper) surface anisotropy increases, only the SWR frequencies of the odd (even) number modes increase. The lower (upper) surface anisotropy does not affect the SWR frequencies of the even (odd) number modes. For the multi-layer film with antiferromagnetic interfacial coupling, the SWR frequency of modes m = 1, 3 and 4 decreases while that of mode m = 2 increases with increasing thickness of the film within a proper parameter region. The present results could be useful in enhancing our fundamental understanding and show the method to enhance and adjust the SWR frequency of bicomponent multi-layer magnetic films with antiferromagnetic or ferromagnetic interfacial coupling.© 2017 Elsevier LtdAn N-rich silicon nitride film, with a lower refractive index (RI) than the stoichiometric silicon nitride (RI = 2.01), was deposited by alternating the exposure of dichlorosilane (DCS, SiH2Cl2) and that of ammonia (NH3) in a plasma-enhanced atomic layer deposition (PEALD) process. In this process, the plasma ammonia was easily decomposed to reactive radicals by RF power activating so that the N-rich silicon nitride was easily formed by excited ammonia radicals. The growth kinetics of N-rich silicon nitride were examined at various deposition temperatures ranging from 400 °C to 630 °C; the activation energy (Ea) decreased as the deposition temperature decreased below 550 °C. N-rich silicon nitride film with a wide range of values of refractive index (RI) (RI = 1.86–2.00) was obtained by regulating the deposition temperature. At the optimal deposition temperature, the effects of RF power, NH3 flow rate and NH3 flow time were on the characteristics of the N-rich silicon nitride film were evaluated. The results thus reveal that the properties of the N-rich silicon nitride film that was formed by under plasma-enhanced atomic layer deposition (PEALD) are dominated by deposition temperature. In charge trap flash (CTF) study, an N-rich silicon nitride film was applied to MAONOS device as a charge-trapping layer. The films exhibit excellent electron trapping ability and favor a fresh cell data retention performance as the deposition temperature decreased.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We derive a theory of carrier induced local moment magnetization of p-type Sn1−xMnxTe based on the Hubbard model, k→·π→ electronic structure method (k→ is the electronic wave vector and π→ is the relativistic momentum operator) and the statistical paramagnetic approach for the localized moments. The Hubbard model is used to derive an internal exchange magnetic field. The difference in exchange self-energy is expressed in terms of an internal exchange field that is proportional to the parameter U, the onsite Coulomb repulsion, and the spin-density of carriers. In the present theory, the k→·π→+U model is integrated with the statistical paramagnetic theory for localized spins, which is then solved in a self-consistent manner by adding the exchange field to the applied field. The technique is applied to study the magnetic properties of p-type Sn1−xMnxTe, an important material for spintronics devices. The local moment magnetization calculated using the total magnetic field self-consistently agrees with the experimental observations. Magnetization and the exchange field studied as functions of the applied field, temperature and carrier concentration yield results on expected lines. Ours is a mechanism that is different from the RKKY interaction, normally invoked for carrier induced ferromagnetism and is thus a novelty.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ferrofluids have been popular among the academic and scientific communities owing to their intelligent physical characteristics under external stimuli and are in fact among the first nanotechnology products to be employed in real world applications. However, studies on the magnetoviscoelastic behavior of concentrated ferrofluids, especially of superparamagnetic oxides of iron and nickel are rare. The present article comprises the formulation of magneto-colloids utilizing the three various metal oxides nanoparticles viz. Iron (II, III) oxide (Fe3O4), Iron (III) oxide (Fe2O3) and Nickel oxide (NiO) in oil. Iron (II, III) oxide based colloids demonstrate high magnetoviscous characteristics over the other oxides based colloids under external magnetic fields. The maximum magnitude of yield stress and viscosity is found to be 3.0 kPa and 2.9 kPa.s, respectively for iron (II, III) oxide based colloids at 2.6 vol% particle concentration and 1.2 T magnetic field. Experimental investigations reveal that the formulated magneto-nanocolloids are stable, even in high magnetic fields and almost reversible when exposed to rising and drop of magnetic fields of the same magnitude. Observations also reveal that the elastic behavior dominates over the viscous behavior with enhanced relaxation and creep characteristics under the magnetic field. The effect of temperature on viscosity and yield stress of magneto-nanocolloids under magnetic fields has also been discussed. Thus, the present findings have potential applications in various fields such as electromagnetic clutch and brakes of automotive, damping, sealing, optics, nanofinishing etc.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Fe100- xCrx nanocluster-assembled granular films with Cr atomic fraction (x) ranging from 0 to 100 were fabricated by using a plasma-gas-condensation cluster deposition system. The TEM characterization revealed that the uniform Fe clusters were coated with a Cr layer to form a Fe-Cr core-shell structure. Then, the as-prepared Fe100- xCrx nanoclusters were randomly assembled into a granular film in vacuum environments with increasing the deposition time. Because of the competition between interfacial resistance and shunting effect of Cr layer, the room temperature resistivity of the Fe100- xCrx nanocluster-assembled granular films first increased and then decreased with increasing the Cr atomic fraction (x), and revealed a maximum of 2 × 104 μΩ cm at x = 26 at.%. The temperature-dependent longitudinal resistivity (ρxx), magnetoresistance (MR) effect and anomalous Hall effect (AHE) of these Fe100- xCrx nanocluster-assembled granular films were also studied systematically. As the x increased from 0 to 100, the ρxx of all samples firstly decreased and then increased with increasing the measuring temperature. The dependence of ρxx on temperature could be well addressed by a mechanism incorporated for the fluctuation-induced-tunneling (FIT) conduction process and temperature-dependent scattering effect. It was found that the anomalous Hall effect (AHE) had no legible scaling relation in Fe100- xCrx nanocluster-assembled granular films. However, after deducting the contribution of tunneling effect, the scaling relation was unambiguous. Additionally, the Fe100- xCrx nanocluster-assembled granular films revealed a small negative magnetoresistance (MR), which decreased with the increase of x. The detailed physical mechanism of the electrical transport properties in these Fe100- xCrx nanocluster-assembled granular films was also studied.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A complete theoretical analysis of inconsistencies of the magnetostatic model when applied to describe the propagation of spin waves through a bi-component system is presented. The standard magnetostatic theory, widely used to study propagation in a single homogenous magnetic media, has been used incorrectly in some recent papers to describe the spin wave propagation in bi-component systems. Our results demonstrate, in fact, that the application of the standard magnetostatic theory applied to this kind of system leads exclusively to a trivial solution. We discuss the boundary conditions to be fulfilled when two ferromagnetic media with different magnetic properties are coupled, as occurs at each interface of a bi-component magnonic crystal.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electronic, magnetic, half-metallic and mechanical properties of half-Heusler alloy CoCrBi under pressure have been studied by first-principle calculations. CoCrBi is found to be half-metallic under the uniform pressure from 7.45 to 295 GPa, and the total magnetic moment is 2.00 μB per formula unit. The transitions from metal to half-metal and from half-metal to metal occur at 7.45 and 295 GPa, respectively. The calculations show that the uniform pressure has an important influence on the minority-spin states, leading to a slight reconstruction of the minority-spin states with a shift of Fermi level. The calculated elastic constants revel that the mechanical instability will occur if the pressure is greater than 47.6 GPa. Two kinds of tetragonal distortions under non-uniform pressure are also studied. It is found that the change of c/a ratio has no obvious influence on the electronic structures and magnetic properties, whereas, compressing the lattice constant in one direction can also realize the transition from metallic to half-metallic properties for CoCrBi.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic system possessing successive phase transitions is expected to achieve a broad refrigeration temperature region. In present paper, the magnetocaloric effect is investigated in a MnNiFeGe alloy, in which the martensitic transformation and the ferromagnetic phase transition of austenite are in adjacent temperature regions. Under a low magnetic field of 0.9 T, this alloy shows a conventional and an inverse magnetocaloric effect simultaneously while only a conventional effect is observed under a magnetic field of 2.0 T, which is due to the magnetic-field-induced metamagnetic transition in the martensite. Metamagnetic phase transitions and potential application in magnetic refrigeration for the MnNiFeGe alloy are discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a conserving approximation for a single magnetic impurity embedded in a BCS superconductor according to the Anderson model. The calculation generalizes the second-order selfenergy theory of a normal metal host into a superconducting medium. Within the second-order theory, both spin and pairing fluctuations contribute to the selfenergy. The second-order theory removes the unphysical spontaneous symmetry breaking of the Hartree-Fock approximation but results in a doubling of the bound-state spectrum within the energy gap. The HF bound states may be recovered in the small-U limit as the average of the two separate bound states. For increasing U, the novel pronounced low-energy bound states tend towards the center of the gap while the other bound states approach the gap edge and their spectral weights vanish.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis study investigates the effect of implementing a field plate on a GaN high-electron-mobility transistor (HEMT) to improve power device reliability. The results indicate that the field plate structure reduces the peak electrical field and interface traps in the device, resulting in higher breakdown voltage, lower leakage current, smaller current collapse, and better threshold voltage control. Furthermore, after high voltage stress, steady dynamic on-resistance and gate capacitance degradation improvement were observed for the device with the field plate. This demonstrates that GaN device reliability can be improved by using the field plate approach.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.HDDR processed Nd-Fe-B powders blended with Nd-Cu powders were hot-pressed and then hot-deformed to obtain fully dense, anisotropic magnets. The microstructure evolution in hot-pressed and hot-deformed HDDR magnets was studied to illustrate the impact of Nd-Cu diffusion on coercivity and deformation ability. It was found that the coercivity and the deformation ability were improved significantly by Nd-Cu addition. The coercivity of hot-deformed magnets was increased from 3.81 kOe to 13.01 kOe after 2 wt% Nd-Cu additions and the annealing at 900 °C for 2 h. Scanning electron microscopy and transmission electron microscopy observations revealed that the variation in coercivity was attributed to the diffusion of Nd-Cu along the grain boundaries during hot pressing and hot deformation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnesium ferrite, MgFe2O4, nanoparticles with a mean diameter varying from ∼6 to ∼17 nm were successfully synthesized using a simple thermal decomposition method at different annealing temperatures ranging in between 400 and 600 °C. Pure spinel ferrite nanoparticles were obtained at temperatures lower than 500 °C, while the presence of hematite (α-Fe2O3) impurities was observed at higher temperatures. Single-phase samples show a superparamagnetic behavior at 300 K, the saturation magnetization (Ms) becoming larger with the increase of particles size. The temperature dependence of Ms was explained in terms of surface spin-canting as well as spin wave excitations in the core. Using a modified Bloch law, [Ms(T)=Ms(0)(1−βTα)], we observed a size dependent behavior of the Bloch constant β and the exponent α, whose values increase and decrease, respectively, as the particle size reduces.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, ZSM-5 nano zeolite was used as a support material for iron oxide nanoparticles and the potential ability of the nanocomposite for magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) contrast agent was investigated. The nanocomposite was synthesized by hydrothermal method and characterized using X-ray diffraction and scanning electron microscopy. MRI was carried out by use of a 1.5 Tesla clinical scanner. The T2 weighted images were prepared and the r2 relaxivity was calculated. The sizes of Fe3O4 nanoparticles and related nanocomposite were 13–24 nm and 80–150 nm, respectively. Results of MTT assay confirmed that the prepared nanocomposite is cytocompatible. The r2 relaxivity of the Fe3O4@ZSM-5 nanocomposite was 457.1 mM−1 s−1. This study suggests that the Fe3O4@ZSM-5 nanocomposite has potential to use as an MRI T2 contrast agent.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanowires (NWs) of single crystalline hcp Co with length from 200 to 530 nm and diameter from 8 to 20 nm (corresponding to the aspect ratio from 10 to 66) are synthesized via a solvothermal method by controlling the Co-precursor to amine mole concentration. The increased aspect ratio leads to enhanced coercivity of randomly oriented Co NWs up to an optimum value of 6.7 kOe, for the NWs of average length 200 nm and average diameter 15 nm (aspect ratio ∼13). Alignment of the NWs in a magnetic field leads to further enhanced coercivity up to a doubled value of 12.5 kOe at 300 K. The high magnetic coercivity achieved in the random and aligned assemblies is due to both the magnetocrystalline anisotropy and the shape anisotropy. For a better understanding of the coercivity mechanism of the NWs, angular dependence of the coercivity has been experimentally investigated for the aligned NW assemblies and the corresponding magnetization reversal mode is determined to be a coherent reversal mode according to an analytical simulation based on the Stoner-Wohlfarth model.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.La0.6Ca0.4−xCexMnO3 (x = 0, 0.03, 0.06, and 0.09) compounds are fabricated by a solid-state reaction, and their structural, magnetic, and magnetocaloric properties are investigated. The Curie temperature at which a ferromagnetic–paramagnetic transition occurs decreases from 260 to 221 K as x increases from 0 to 0.09. The saturation magnetization also decreases with the increase of x. The experimental results for the magnetization with respect to the temperature and magnetic field are analyzed using the Banerjee criterion, revealing that all the samples undergo the second-order magnetic phase transition. The maximum magnetic entropy change measured at a magnetic-field span of 50 kOe, which occurs near the Curie temperature, slightly increases from 6.31 to 7.62 J/kg K as x increases from 0 to 0.09.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.According to the formula Sr0.95Y0.05Fe12−xCoxO19 (x = 0.00, 0.08, 0.16, 0.24, 0.32, 0.40), the replacement of Y-Co in M-type strontium hexagonal ferrites have been successfully prepared by ceramic process for the first time. The phase compositions of magnetic powders were examined by X-ray diffraction. The results of XRD showed that the single phase was obtained in magnetic powders with the increase of Co content (x), and α-Fe2O3 occurred when x > 0.24. The morphology of the magnets was investigated by scanning electron microscopy (SEM). The micro-morphology of the particles exhibited the uniform plane hexagonal structures of M-type ferrites with different Co content. Magnetic properties of the ferrite magnets were measured by a physical property measurement system-vibrating sample magnetometer (PPMS-VSM). The Ms increases constantly with the increase of Co content. The Hc first increases and then decreases with the increase of Co content, and the value of coercivity (Hc) is up to 3774 Oe when x = 0.24.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, we address a suspension composed ferromagnetic rod-like particles to elucidate a regime change in the aggregate structures and the magneto-rheological characteristics. Monte Carlo simulations have been employed for investigating the aggregate structures in thermodynamic equilibrium, and Brownian dynamics simulations for magneto-rheological features in a simple shear flow. The main results obtained here are summarized as follows. For the case of thermodynamic equilibrium, the rod-like particles aggregate to form thick chain-like clusters and the neighboring clusters incline in opposite directions. If the external magnetic field is increased, the thick chain-like clusters in the magnetic field direction grow thicker by adsorbing the neighboring clusters that incline in the opposite direction. Hence, a significant phase change in the particle aggregates is not induced by an increase in the magnetic field strength. For the case of a simple shear flow, even a weak shear flow induces a significant regime change from the thick chain-like clusters of thermodynamic equilibrium into wall-like aggregates composed of short raft-like clusters. A strong external magnetic field drastically changes these aggregates into wall-like aggregates composed of thick chain-like clusters rather than the short raft-like clusters. The internal structure of these aggregates is not strongly influenced by a shear flow, and the formation of the short raft-like clusters is maintained inside the aggregates. The main contribution to the net viscosity is the viscosity component due to magnetic particle-particle interaction forces in relation to the present volumetric fraction. Hence, a larger magnetic interaction strength and also a stronger external magnetic field give rise to a larger magneto-rheological effect. However, the dependence of the viscosity on these factors is governed in a complex manner by whether or not the wall-like aggregates are composed mainly of short raft-like clusters. An increase in the shear rate functions to simply decrease the effect of the magnetic particle-particle and the particle-field interactions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The phase composition, magnetic and microstructural properties of Nd2Fe14B/(α-Fe, Fe3B) nanocomposite magnets produced by injection casting technique have been studied. Magnetic hysteresis loop of the Nd7Y6Fe61B22Mo4 permanent magnet demonstrates the coercivity as high as 1289 kA/m. Electron microscopy elucidates a microstructure composed of magnetically soft α-Fe, Fe3B and hard Nd2Fe14B/Y2Fe14B nanograins (20–50 nm) separated by ultra-thin grain boundary layer. The Henkel plot curve of the Nd7Y6Fe61B22Mo4 magnet yields the existence of exchange coupling interactions between soft and hard phases. Macroscopically large size sheet magnet is obtained due to high glass forming ability of the Nd7Y6Fe61B22Mo4 alloy derived from large atomic radius mismatch and negative enthalpy of alloy constituent elements. The high coercivity of the magnet is attributed to the magnetically hard phase increment, nucleation of reverse domains and the presence of thin grain boundary phase. Good magnetic properties such as remanence of 0.51 T, coercivity of 1289 kA/m and maximum energy product of 46.2 kJ/m3 are obtained in directly casted Nd7Y6Fe61B22Mo4 sheet magnets.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the preparation of single phase samples of Mn(Cr1−xFex)2O4 for x = 0–0.50 and study of their structural and magnetic properties. These samples are found to crystallize in cubic structure with Fd3¯m space group with typical lattice constant varying from a = 8.4396 Å for x = 0 to 8.4588 Å for x = 0.50. The ferrimagnetic transition temperature as per magnetic measurements is found to increase from 46 K for x = 0 to 402 K for x = 0.50 due to the strengthening of the superexchange interaction. The Saturation magnetization value is found to decrease monotonously with increase in Fe concentration beyond x = 0.10 and approaches magnetic compensation at x = 0.40. In addition to composition induced magnetic compensation, we have observed magnetic compensation due to change in temperature for x = 0.40 with a compensation temperature of 267 K. This is explained by considering the substitution of Fe3+ ions in one of the Cr3+ sites and the different temperature dependence of two sublattice moments.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic Bi1− xSmxFeO3 (x = 0, 0.05, 0.1, 0.2, and 0.3) nanopowders with particle sizes of 69–22.6 nm were prepared by a simple co-precipitation method. The structure and morphology of the samples were examined using X-ray diffraction (XRD) and scanning electron microscopy (SEM). The XRD patterns confirmed the phase transition from rhombohedral to orthorhombic phases. The results of X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS) data indicate that the oxidation state of Fe in the sample was Fe3+. The results of magnetic properties revealed the enhancement of weak ferromagnetic property with increasing Sm doping in BFO nanopowders. SEM images revealed that the average grain size decreased with an increase in Sm concentration. Undoped BFO ceramics exhibited a high dielectric constant ε′ ∼1.1 × 104 and a low loss tangent of tan δ ∼0.5 at room temperature for 1 kHz. The room temperature dielectric constant decreased with increasing concentration of Sm doping and the dielectric relaxation peaks were observed at x ≤ 0.1. The dielectric relaxation peaks which were observed at all frequency ranges were x ≤ 0.1 samples which were attributed to Maxwell-Wagner relaxation. As the temperature increased, great increases in dielectric permittivity were observed in all the Bi1− xSmxFeO3 samples. The effects of grain boundaries on the dielectric properties of Sm-doped BFO ceramics were investigated by measuring the dielectric responds in the frequencies of 100 Hz–1 MHz at room temperature under applied dc bias of 0–20 V. It was found that, with an increase in applied dc bias voltage from 0 to 20 V, the dielectric constant decreases at frequencies below 104 Hz. However, the dielectric properties in the high-frequency region remained unchanged.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, (Nd0.8Ce0.2)2−xFe12Co2B (x = 0–0.6) permanent alloys are prepared by melt-spinning method. The hard magnetic properties of (Nd0.8Ce0.2)2−xFe12Co2B (x = 0–0.6) alloys annealed at optimum temperatures have been investigated systematically. Depending on the Nd, Ce concentration, the maximum energy product ((BH)max) and remanence (Br) increase gradually with x in the range of 0 ≤ x ≤ 0.4, whereas decrease gradually in the alloys with 0.4 < x ≤ 0.6. It is found that the optimum magnetic properties are obtained at x = 0.4: Hci = 4.9 kOe, Br = 10.1 kG, (BH)max = 13.7 MGOe. Specifically, magnetic field heat treatment below the Curie temperature is applied for (Nd0.8Ce0.2)1.6Fe12Co2B (x = 0.4) annealed ribbons. The magnetic properties Br, (BH)max and squareness are all enhanced after the magnetic field heat treatment. The (BH)max shows a substantial increase from 13.7 MGOe to 16.0 MGOe after the heat treatment at 623 K with a magnetic field of 1 T, which gets 17% improvement compared with that of the sample without a magnetic field heat treatment. We demonstrate that the magnetic field heat treatment plays a certain role in the magnetization reversal behavior and can improve the microstructure of (Nd0.8Ce0.2)1.6Fe12Co2B alloy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The theoretical understanding of time-dependence in magnetic quantum systems is of great importance in particular for cases where a unitary time evolution is accompanied by relaxation processes. A key example is given by the dynamics of single-molecule magnets where quantum tunneling of the magnetization competes with thermal relaxation over the anisotropy barrier. In this article we investigate how good a Lindblad approach describes the relaxation in giant spin models and how the result depends on the employed operator that transmits the action of the thermal bath.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Localized spin-wave modes, which were thermally excited at a specific position in a triangular magnetic element, were investigated using micro-focused Brillouin light scattering in two saturated states, the buckle and Y-states, with an applied magnetic field of 0.24 T parallel and perpendicular to the basal edge, respectively. The measured frequency spectrum at a specific beam spot position, rather than an integrated spectrum, was analyzed by comparing it with the simulation data at a precisely selected position within the beam spot area. The analyzed results were used to plot a two-dimensional intensity map and simulation spatial profile to verify the validity of the analysis. From the analysis process, two localized spin-wave modes in a triangular magnetic element were successfully identified near the apex region in the buckle state and near the basal edge region in the Y-state.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Theoretical and experimental investigations of the ferromagnetism induced by intrinsic defects inside wurtzite zinc oxide structures are performed using magnetic field-dependent circular dichroism (MCD-H), direct magnetization measurement (M-H) by superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID) as well as by generalized gradient density functional theory (GGA-DFT). To investigate localized magnetic moments of bulk material intrinsic defects - vacancies, interstitial atoms and Frenkel defects, various-size periodic supercells are calculated. It is shown that oxygen interstitial atoms (Oi) or zinc vacancies (Znv) generate magnetic moments of 1,98 и 1,26 µB respectively, however, the magnitudes are significantly reduced when the distance between defects increases. At the same time, the magnetic moments of oxygen Frenkel defects are large (~1.5–1.8 µB) and do not depend on the distance between the defects. It is shown that the origin of the induced ferromagnetism in bulk ZnO is the extra spin density on the oxygen atoms nearest to the defect. Also dependence of the magnetization of ZnO (101̅0)and(0001) thin films on the positions of Oi and Znv in subsurface layers were investigated and it is shown that the magnetic moments of both defects are significantly different from the values inside bulk material. In order to check theoretical results regarding the defect induced ferromagnetism in ZnO, two thin films doped by carbon (C) and having Zn interstitials and oxygen vacancies were prepared and annealed in vacuum and air, respectively. According to the MCD-H and M-H measurements, the film, which was annealed in air, exhibits a ferromagnetic behavior, while the other does not. One can assume annealing of ZnO in vacuum should create oxygen vacancies or Zn interstitial atoms. At that annealing of the second C:ZnO film in air leads to essential magnetization, probably by annihilation of oxygen vacancies, formation of interstitial oxygen atoms or zinc vacancies. Thus, our experimental results confirm our theoretical conclusions that ZnO magnetization origin are Oi or Znv defects.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Zr62Cu22Al10Fe5Dy1 bulk metallic glass is studied in the as-cast state and in the state after processing by high-pressure torsion at temperatures of 20 °C and 150 °C. According to the data from X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopy, the structural state of the samples depends weakly on the conducted processing. At the same time, magnetic measurements reveal well recordable changes in paramagnetic susceptibility induced by the processing of the samples. It is assumed that, because of high-pressure torsion deformation, there occurs a noticeable change in the material electronic structure, which leads to a change in the full susceptibility of the samples. The performed studies demonstrate that paramagnetic susceptibility may be an indicator of a change in the structural state of paramagnetic amorphous metallic substances.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have studied crystal and magnetic properties of chalcogenides FeGa2S4 and FeIn2S4 with X-ray diffractometer (XRD), magnetic property measurement system (MPMS), magnetometer, physical property measurement system (PPMS), and Mössbauer spectrometer. The crystal structure has 2-dimension triangular lattice structure with P-3m1 of FeGa2S4, while FeIn2S4 has inverse spinel with space group Fd3m. The AC magnetic susceptibility measurements show that FeGa2S4 is an insulating spin glass material, exhibiting geometrical frustration, unlike in the antiferromagnetic [AFM] metallic spin glass FeIn2S4. From hysteresis (M-H) curves at 4.2 K, FeGa2S4 has spin-flop behavior with an angle of 120° of triangle, as against linear slope of FeIn2S4 due to anti-parallel spin. The gap energy by splitting of 5T2g, Δ1 and electric quadrupole splitting ΔEQ of FeIn2S4 are much higher than that of FeGa2S4 at 4.2 K because FeGa2S4 is geometrically frustrated magnet having degenerate ground state at low temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We obtained a new highly ordered colloidal composite using specially manufactured magnetite-polymer nanoparticles and lyotropic liquid crystal. A good compatibility between the components was ensured by the functionalization of the particles during their synthesis. We studied the laser light transmission for the mixtures filled in sandwich-glass cells with homeotropic and planar treatment of the surfaces under external magnetic field. The Fréedericksz transition critical field was estimated, and its’ behavior was compared to our new theoretical model based on the Brochard-de Gennes one.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Topology optimization of permanent magnet systems consisting of permanent magnets, high permeability iron and air is presented. An implementation of topology optimization for magnetostatics is discussed and three examples are considered. The Halbach cylinder is topology optimized with iron and an increase of 15% in magnetic efficiency is shown. A topology optimized structure to concentrate a homogeneous field is shown to increase the magnitude of the field by 111%. Finally, a permanent magnet with alternating high and low field regions is topology optimized and a Λcool figure of merit of 0.472 is reached, which is an increase of 100% compared to a previous optimized design.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate magnetic anisotropy and magnetization reversal mechanism in chromium telluride thin films grown by molecular beam epitaxy. We report existence of strong perpendicular magnetic anisotropy in these thin films, along with a relatively strong second order anisotropy contribution. The angular variation of the switching field observed from the magnetoresistance measurement is explained quantitatively using a one-dimensional defect model. The model reveals the relative roles of nucleation and pinning in the magnetization reversal, depending on the applied field orientation. Micromagnetic simulations are performed to visualize the domain structure and switching process.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ce9Fe91films were fabricated at different temperature by Rf magnetron sputtering. The static and dynamic magnetic properties of these films have been investigated in details. The results reveal that the two films prepared at 293 K and 623 K with the critical film thickness exhibit weak stripe domains and a small perpendicular anisotropy, and their correlated dynamic permeability spectra show one resonance peak, implying the coherent precession of magnetization at such critical thickness. However, the film prepared at 523 K possesses an in-plane uniaxial anisotropy and lower coercive field. And the permeability spectrum displays two peaks, which can be ascribed to the coexistence of the rotatable anisotropy and in-plane uniaxial anisotropy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and structural properties of Misch Metal (MM)-Fe-B alloys, were examined in the melt-spun ribbons. Melt-spun MM-Fe-B samples were prepared at the surface velocities of 18–30 m/s. Crystalline structure and their room-temperature magnetization characteristics were analyzed, and the optimum surface velocity of 20 m/s and nominal composition of MM13Fe81B6 were obtained. Microstructural analyses indicate that the grain size is approximately 30–50 nm in the alloys with the optimum characteristics. In the MM16Fe78B6 alloys, Pr-rich and La-rich phases concentrated on grain boundaries, which resulted in the coercivity augment with the increase of MMFe2 content. Dependence of coercivity on applied magnetic field suggested that the mechanism of coercivity in moderate MM-content samples was inhomogeneous domain wall pinning type. The melt-spun ribbons in the optimum condition exhibit a coercive force of 6.9 kOe and an energy product of 8.5 MGOe, which can be used as the potential isotropy magnetic powders in the bonded magnets.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The present work focuses on the influence of replacement of d-block element Cu2+ ion by Co2+ in Cu-spinel ferrites [Cu1−xCoxFe2O4 (x = 0.0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, and 1.0)] on the structural, vibrational and dielectric properties as synthesized by Solid-state reaction route. A structural transition from tetragonal (space group I41/amd)) to cubic (space group Fd3m) phase is observed due to introduction of cobalt. Cubic spinel- type structure at room temperature of Cu1−xCoxFe2O4 (0.4 ≤ x ≤ 1.0) is confirmed by Rietveld – refined X-ray powder diffraction patterns. Raman spectroscopic studies reveal 2 (5) optical active modes in CuFe2O4 (CoFe2O4) at room temperature. Transmission Mössbauer spectroscopy of Cu1−xCoxFe2O4 (x = 0.0, 0.2 and 0.6) shows two sets of six-line hyperfine patterns for all the three samples, indicating the presence of Fe in both A and B sites. Identification of sites is accomplished by evidence from hyperfine distribution and isomer-shift data. Dielectric constant and dielectric loss tangent measured in the frequency range from 1 KHz to 1 MHz at room temperature are found to be decreasing with the increase in frequency.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Single-phase polycrystalline La1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6 double perovskite nanoparticles (∼25 nm) have been synthesized by chemical sol-gel method. We report here the structural, magnetic and transport properties using X-ray diffraction, dc magnetization, ac susceptibility, exchange bias and dc resistivity measurements. The Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction pattern reveals that the La1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6 (LCCMO) system crystallizes in orthorhombic structure with pbnm space group. Mn and Co ions are not completely ordered on the B sites due to the presence of about 30% antisite-disorder in the system. The ordering of Co2+ and Mn4+ gives rise to the ferromagnetism below 145 K. A spin glass like ground state has also been observed near 37.6(4) K, arising mainly due to the presence of competing magnetic interactions and antisite-disorder in the LCCMO nanoparticles. The frequency dependence peak shift of the Ac-susceptibility peak in the glassy state follows the critical slowing down model. The observed memory effect in ac susceptibility data reveals the existence of interacting clusters in a competing magnetic interactions state. The presence of noticeable exchange bias effect can be best explained on the basis of uncompensated interface (ferromagnetic/spin-glass) spins of antisite-disordered LCCMO system. This anti-site disordered nanocompound exhibits semiconducting behavior with variable range hopping kind of electronic conduction mechanism in the temperature range of 200–300 K. We have also observed large negative magnetoresistance (−30% at 100 K and 60 kOe) mainly due to the spin-polarized transport across the grain boundaries.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of magnetic-field annealing on the strain sensitivity (q) and saturation magnetostriction (λs) of NiFe2O4 nanoparticles synthesized by citrate-gel method was investigated. The use of field-annealing resulted in improved magnetoelastic properties at the expense of coercivity. A maximum λs of −40 ppm at 2 kOe, associated with q value of −3.3 ppm/Oe at 5 Oe was achieved in the field-annealed NiFe2O4.© 2017In this work, a study of the electronic and magnetic properties of SnFe2O4 spinel ferrite for different case of octahedral and tetrahedral distribution was carried out by using the Full Potential Linearized Plane Wave (FP-LAPW) method in density functional theory (DFT) implemented in the WIEN2K package, with the generalized gradient (GGA) and Tran-Blaha modified Becke-Johnson approximations for the exchange and correlation functional. Our spin-polarized calculations based on mBJ correction show a half metallic behavior for SnFe2O4 which confirm the usefulness of SnFe2O4 in spintronic application. From the magnetic properties calculations, it is found that the magnetic moment per formula unit is 8.0327 µβ, 0.000015 µβ and 3.99µβ in SnFe2O4 100% normal, 100% inverse and 50% inverse, respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A series of amorphous Fe-Si-B ribbons with various Y addition were prepared by melt-spinning. The effect of Y addition on crystallization behavior, thermal and magnetic properties was systematically investigated. With the increase of Y content, the initial crystallization temperature shifted to a higher temperature, indicating that the thermal stability of amorphous state in Fe-Si-B-Y ribbon is enhanced compared to that of Fe-Si-B alloy. Meanwhile, compared to the two exothermic peaks in the samples with lower Y content, a new exothermic peak was found in the ribbons with Y content higher than 1 at%, which corresponded to the decomposition of metastable Fe3B phase. Among all the alloys, Fe76.5Si9B13Y1.5 alloy exhibits optimized magnetic properties, with high saturation magnetization Ms of 187 emu/g and low coercivity HcJ of 7.6 A/m.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we present a study of the electron spin resonance (ESR) of nanoparticles (NPs) of Cu1−xFexCr2Se4 chalcogenides with x = 0, 0.2, and 0.4. NPs were synthesized via the thermal decomposition of metal chloride salts and selenium powder in a high-temperature organic solvent. According to the XRD and HRTEM data, the NPs were single crystalline nearly hexagonal plates with the structure close to CuCr2Se4 (Fd-3m, a = 10.337 Å). For x = 0 and 0.2, the NPs tend to form long stacks consisting of the plates “face to face” attached to each other due to the magnetostatic interparticle interaction. Only separate NPs were observed in the case of x = 0.4. Peculiarities were revealed in the ESR temperature behavior for the NPs with x = 0 and 0.2 consistent with the features in the temperature dependences of the NPs magnetization. The non-monotonous dependence of the resonance field Hres on the temperature with a kink near 130 K and the energy gap in the resonance spectrum depending on the type of nanoparticle compacting are the distinct peculiarities. One of the main factors is discussed in order to explain the peculiarities: the coexistence of two types of anisotropy in the Cu1−xFexCr2Se4 NPs, in-plain shape anisotropy and magnetocrystalline anisotropy with four easy axes, which increases strongly with the temperature decrease.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper investigates the mechanical reliability of low temperature polycrystalline silicon (LTPS) thin film transistors (TFTs) for foldable display. Both compressive and tensile directions of mechanical stresses were applied for different types of mechanical stresses, such as dynamic and static mechanical stresses. The electrical characteristics of tested n-channel TFTs under mechanical stress conditions were analyzed based on several key parameters, including the threshold voltage (Vth), field effect mobility (μFE), maximum drain current (ID.MAX) and subthreshold swing (Ssub). For both cases of dynamic and static mechanical stresses, increase of Vth and decrease of μFE and ID.MAX were observed in the compressive direction. This trend was inversed when tensile stress was applied. The degradation of electrical characteristics originates from the change of lattice constant after mechanical stress. However, Ssub increases under dynamic tensile stress while it remains unchanged within 5% under static tensile stress. Transient analysis while bent condition was conducted to investigate the change of parameters in time.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A theoretical study was presented on generation of spin polarization in silicene nanoribbons using the single-band tight-binding approximation and the non-equilibrium Green's function formalism. We focused on the effect of electric and exchange magnetic fields on the spin-filter capabilities of zigzag-edge silicene nanoribbons in the presence of the intrinsic spin-orbit interaction. The results show that a robust bipolar magnetic semiconductor with controllable spin-flip and spin-conserved gaps can be obtained when exchange magnetic and electric field strengths are both larger than the intrinsic spin-orbit interaction. Therefore, zigzag silicene nanoribbons could act as bipolar and perfect spin filter devices with a large spin-polarized current and a reversible spin polarization in the vicinity of the Fermi energy. We also investigated the effect of edge roughness and found that the bipolar magnetic semiconductor features are robust against edge disorder in silicene nanoribbon junctions. These results may be useful in multifunctional spin devices based on silicene nanoribbons.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have determined the magnetic properties of epitaxially grown Dy islands on graphene/SiC(0001) that are passivated by a gold film (deposited in the ultra-high vacuum growth chamber) for ex-situ X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD). Our sum-rule analysis of the Dy M4,5 XMCD spectra at low temperatures (T=15 K) as a function of magnetic field assuming Dy3+ (spin configuration 6H15/2) indicate that the projection of the magnetic moment along an applied magnetic field of 5 T is 3.5(3) μB. Temperature dependence of the magnetic moment (extracted from the M5 XMCD spectra) shows an onset of a change in magnetic moment at about 175 K in proximity of the transition from paramagnetic to helical magnetic structure at TH=179 K in bulk Dy. No feature at the vicinity of the ferromagnetic transition of hcp bulk Dy at Tc = 88 K is observed. However, below ∼130 K, the inverse magnetic moment (extracted from the XMCD) is linear in temperature as commonly expected from a paramagnetic system suggesting different behavior of Dy nano-island than bulk Dy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, effects of Pt spacer and Co reference layers thickness in [Co/Pt]6/Pt/Co multilayer have been revealed to tailor magnetization directions in non-collinear configuration. Magneto-optic Kerr effect and ferromagnetic resonance techniques were employed to investigate magnetic properties. Bilinear coupling between [Co/Pt]6 and Co layers and anisotropy constants were determined by a micromagnetic simulation based on metropolis algorithm. 3 nm spacer causes ferromagnetic coupling while the samples have 4 and 5 nm spacer are coupled anti-ferromagneticaly. Also, tuning magnetic anisotropy of [Co/Pt]6 layer was accomplished by Co reference layer. It is revealed that controlling of non-collinear states in such systems is possible by variation of thickness of spacer and reference layers and [Co/Pt]6/tPt/tCo trilayer system can be used in multilayered magnetic systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Iron-nickel (Fe-Ni) alloys comprising nine different compositions were rapidly synthesized from the redox reaction using aluminum foils as the reducing metal. Compared with conventional chemical syntheses, this simple approach is relatively safe and allows control over the alloy morphology and magnetic behavior as a function of the alloy composition with minimal oxidation. For alloys having low (10%–30%) Fe content the single face-centered cubic (FCC) FeNi3 phase was formed with nanorods aligned in the (1 1 1) crystalline direction on the cluster surface. This highly anisotropic morphology gradually disappeared as the Fe content was raised to 40%–70% with the alloy structure possessing a mixture of FCC FeNi3 and body-centered cubic (BCC) Fe7Ni3. The FCC phase was entirely replaced by the BCC structure upon further increase the Fe content to 80%–90%. The substitution of Ni by Fe in the crystals and the dominance of the BCC phase over the FCC structure gave rise to enhanced magnetization. By contrast, the coercive field decreased as a function of increasing Fe because of the reduction in shape anisotropy and the rise of saturation magnetization.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of cooling rate on phase structure and magnetic properties of the Fe26.7Co28.5Ni28.5Si4.6B8.7P3 high entropy alloy (HEA) was investigated. The HEA forms into amorphous phase by melt spinning method at high cooling rate and FCC solid solution phase at low cooling rate. The soft magnetic properties of the amorphous phase (saturation magnetization Bs of 1.07T and coercivity Hc of 4 A/m) are better than that of the solid solution phase (Bs of 1.0 T and Hc of 168 A/m). In order to study the phase evolution of the present HEA, anneal experiments were conducted. It is found that crystallization products of amorphous phase are solid solution phase which constitute much of FCC and a small amount of BCC. BCC phase transforms into FCC phase, and then into BCC phase with the increase of annealing temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetostrictive Fe82Ga4.5Al13.5 sheets with 0.1 at% NbC were prepared from directional solidified alloys with <0 0 1> preferred orientation. The slabs were hot rolled at 650 °C and warm rolled at 500 °C. Then some warm-rolled sheets were annealed intermediately at 850 °C for 5 min but the others not. After that, all the sheets were cold rolled to a final thickness of ∼0.3 mm. The microstructures, the textures and the distributions of second phase particles in the primary recrystallized samples were investigated. With intermediate annealing, the inhomogeneous microstructure was improved remarkably and strong Goss ({1 1 0}<0 0 1>) and γ-fiber (<1 1 1>//normal direction [ND]) textures were produced in the primary recrystallized samples. But, an evident disadvantage in size and quantity was observed for Goss grains in the primary recrystallized sample without intermediate annealing. After a final annealing, the final textures and magnetostrictions of samples with and without intermediate annealing were characterized. For samples without intermediate annealing, abnormal growth of {1 1 3} grains occurred and deteriorated the magnetostriction. In contrast, abnormal Goss grain growth occurred completely in samples with intermediate annealing and led to saturation magnetostriction as high as 156 ppm.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In present study, sodium silicate, a kind of heat-resistant binder, was used to prepare bonded Nd-Fe-B magnets with improved thermal stability and mechanical strength. Effect of curing temperature and curing time of the new binder to the magnetic properties, microstructure, and mechanical strength of the magnets was systematically investigated. Fracture surface morphology observation show that sodium silicate in bonded magnets could completely be cured at 175 °C for 40 min, and the magnets prepared under this condition exhibit optimal properties. They exhibit usable magnetic properties of Br of 4.66 kGs, Hcj of 4.84 kOe, and (BH)max of 4.06 MGOe at 200 °C. Moreover, the magnets possess high compressive strength of 63 MPa.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A comprehensive investigation of magnetic properties of single layered perovskite Gd0.8Sr1.2CoO4 has been carried out by means of dc susceptibility, ac susceptibility and magnetic relaxation. The cusp in χZFC(T) as well as a considerable frequency dependence of a shoulder in χ′(T) and a peak in χ″(T) indicates the appearance of a glassy behavior. The dynamic scaling analysis of ac susceptibility data reveals a spin glass phase below 9 K. The aging effect and long-time relaxation phenomenon are also observed in this compound. Relative to those RE2−xSrxCoO4 compounds, the large structural distortion and the stability of the lower spin state in the cobalt ions can be considered as possible reasons for the existence of only one spin glass state in Gd0.8Sr1.2CoO4.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The nickel particles with the mean size about 10–20 nm coated with carbon were extracted by the treatment of the carbon condensate with nitric and hydrochloric acids. The initial carbon condensate containing nickel nanoparticles with a graphite conversion was synthesized in the high-frequency carbon-helium arc plasma at ambient pressure with the nickel nanoparticles as a catalyst. The nickel content in the nanoparticles was 84.6 wt%. Magnetic properties of the nanoparticles are characterized by the high hysteresis and thermal stability. The sample of compacted nanoparticles is characterized by electrical resistance much higher than it in of compacted initial condensate.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electronic, magnetic and transport properties of a new quaternary Heusler alloy CoMnVAs have been investigated by employing generalized gradient approximation (GGA), modified Becke-Johnson (mBJ) and GGA with Hubbard U correction (GGA + U). The alloy is energetically more stable in ferromagnetic Y1 type structure. Elastic parameters reveal high anisotropy and ductile nature of the material. CoMnVAs shows half-metallic ferromagnet character with 100% spin polarization at Fermi level with band gap of 0.55 eV in the minority spin state. The alloy also possesses high electrical conductivity and Seebeck coefficients with 15 μVK−1 at room temperature, achieving a figure of merit of 0.65 at high temperatures. The high degree of ductility, 100% spin polarization and large Seebeck coefficient, makes it an attractive candidate to be used in spin voltage generators and thermoelectric materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This article is about outreach to students and the general public. The evolution of a thirty year old program at the UM is described. The goal of this paper is to stimulate others in the research community in their quest to educate, motivate, and entertain in the name of science.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Independent control of the vortex chirality and polarity is realized by changing the in-plane magnetic field direction in nanodot pair through Object Oriented Micromagnetic Framework (OOMMF) simulation. The two magnetic circles are close to each other and have magnetic interaction. The two circles always have the same polarity and opposite chirality at every remanent state. There are totally four predictable magnetic states in the nanodot pair which can be obtained in the remanent state relaxed from the saturation state along all possible directions. An explanation on the formation of vortex states is given by vortex dynamics. The vortex states are stable in large out-of-plane magnetic field which is in a direction opposite to the vortex polarity. The geometry of the nanodot pair gives a way to easily realize a vortex state with specific polarity and chirality.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Pt(15 nm)/[Co(0.6 nm)/Pt(1.5 nm)]4 multilayers with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy were patterned into several-micrometer wide wires by electron-beam lithography. Bombarding the wires with He+ ions with a fluence gradient along the wire results in a spatial gradient of switching fields that allows a controllable positioning of domain walls. The influence of the reduced anisotropy near the wire edges causes a remanent state in which the reversal close to the long edges precedes that in the middle of the wires. Experiments using Kerr microscopy prove this effect and micromagnetic simulations corroborate that a decrease of the anisotropy at the edges is responsible for the effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic Bi0.8Gd0.2FeO3 (BGFO) ceramics were prepared by a rapid-liquid phase sintering process. BGFO ceramics can be sintered at a sintering temperature range of 875 °C–940 °C and shown a pure orthorhombic (space group, Pnma) structure. The crystal symmetry and lattice parameters were determined from the Rietveld analysis for the experimental data. BGFO ceramics sintered at 900 °C exhibited high theoretical relative density (∼98%), strong ferroelectricity and good magnetism. BGFO ceramics exhibited the similar dielectric relaxation properties to the typical relaxor ferroelectrics. The role of oxygen vacancies at high temperature in dielectric and ac conductivity behavior was also discussed. The diffusing of structure defects between the grain and grain boundary was established using Impedance Spectroscopy (IS).© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe influence of extension doping on parasitic resistance and its variability has been investigated for FinFETs. Electrical characterization of FinFETs and crystallinity evaluation of the doped fin structure are carried out for different fin thicknesses and different donor species for ion implantation, i.e., As and P. Reducing the fin thickness and the use of donor species with a larger mass cause serious degradation in the variability and median value of the parasitic resistance. Crystallinity evaluation by transmission electron microscope reveals that significant crystal defects remain after dopant activation annealing for the cases of smaller fin thickness and the implanted dopant with a larger mass. The unrecovered defects cause serious degradation in the parasitic resistance and its variability.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The dynamics of magnetic skyrmions is investigated in a composite free layer spin valve nano pillar for different coupling mechanisms in the absence of Dzyaloshinski-Moriya Interaction (DMI). Nano meter sized skyrmions and anti skyrmions are trapped with different helices in the free layer. The spin polarised current under specific choice of system parameters changes the droplet solitons into skyrmions and anti skyrmions. The current driven dynamics is studied and the condition at which an isolated skyrmion exists, is reported. We have optimised the current density (J) and spin wave vector (k) for which Skyrmion Hall Effect (SHE) completely vanishes and as a result the velocity, size and shape of skyrmions are preserved. When the coupling between the composite free layers is changed, skyrmion-anti skyrmion pair and radial skyrmion-chiral skyrmion pair emerge. For the specific values of ‘J’ and ‘k’ these pairs show coupled motion along the layer and hence these pairs could also be used as a bit in the data processing and storage devices. Our investigation ascertains that a single material can host all the localised magnetic structures if the current density, spin wave vector and coupling constant are suitably chosen and tuned. This study would really be of fundamental importance owing to the possible applications in information processing and data storage in skyrmion based logic circuits and magnetic sensors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Due to the complicated rotor structure and nonlinear saturation of rotor bridges, it is difficult to build a fast and accurate analytical field calculation model for multilayer interior permanent magnet (IPM) machines. In this paper, a hybrid analytical model suitable for the open-circuit field calculation of multilayer IPM machines is proposed by coupling the magnetic equivalent circuit (MEC) method and the subdomain technique. In the proposed analytical model, the rotor magnetic field is calculated by the MEC method based on the Kirchhoff's law, while the field in the stator slot, slot opening and air-gap is calculated by subdomain technique based on the Maxwell's equation. To solve the whole field distribution of the multilayer IPM machines, the coupled boundary conditions on the rotor surface are deduced for the coupling of the rotor MEC and the analytical field distribution of the stator slot, slot opening and air-gap. The hybrid analytical model can be used to calculate the open-circuit air-gap field distribution, back electromotive force (EMF) and cogging torque of multilayer IPM machines. Compared with finite element analysis (FEA), it has the advantages of faster modeling, less computation source occupying and shorter time consuming, and meanwhile achieves the approximate accuracy. The analytical model is helpful and applicable for the open-circuit field calculation of multilayer IPM machines with any size and pole/slot number combination.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we investigated the gradual resistance switching phenomenon of our fabricated silicon nitride-based bipolar RRAM. By positive (set) and negative (reset) pulses applied between top electrode (TE) and bottom electrode (BE), the resistance state of the RRAM cell was delicately controlled. We checked the effect of pulse width, rise and fall time and pulse amplitude on the change of the resistance state. In conclusion, it is demonstrated that change of resistance state is determined by applied pulse area above a certain threshold voltage. The memory cell and gradual resistance change characteristics would be used to implement accurate and reliable synaptic devices in low power neuromorphic system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization of Ta/CoFeB/Ta trilayer films with thick layer of CoFeB deposited under different substrate temperatures (Ts) via ultra-high vacuum DC sputtering technique has been measured with the applied magnetic field parallel and perpendicular to the plane of the film respectively to study the perpendicular coercive forces of the film. The samples were further analyzed for its structural, topological, morphological, and electrical transport properties. The core chemical states for the elements present in the CoFeB thin film were analyzed by XPS studies. Magnetization studies reveal the existence of perpendicular coercive forces in CoFeB films deposited only at certain temperatures such as RT, 450 °C, 475 °C and 500 °C. CoFeB film deposited at 475 °C exhibited a maximum coercivity of 315 Oe and a very low saturation magnetization (Ms) of 169 emu/cc in perpendicular direction. This pronounced effect in perpendicular coercive forces observed for CoFeB475 could be attributed to the effect of temperature in enhancing the crystallization of the film at the Ta/CoFeB interfaces. However at temperatures higher than 475 °C the destruction of the Ta/CoFeB interface due to intermixing of Ta and CoFeB results in the disappearance of magnetic anisotropy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Half-metallic properties of TlCrS2, TlCrSe2 and hypothetical TlCrSSe have been investigated by first-principles all-electron full-potential linearized augmented plane wave plus local orbital (FP-LAPW + lo) method based on density functional theory (DFT). The results of calculations show that TlCrS2 and TlCrSSe are half-metals with energy gap (Eg) ∼ 0.12 eV for spin-down channel. Strong hybridization of p-state of chalchogen and d-state of Cr leads to bonding and antibonding states and subsequently to the appearance of a gap in spin-down channel of TlCrS2 and TlCrSSe. In the case of TlCrSe2, there is a partial hybridization and p-state is partially present in the DOS at Fermi level making this compound nearly half- metallic. The present calculations revealed that total magnetic moment keeps its integer value on a relatively wide range of changes in volume (−10% ÷ 10%) for TlCrS2 and TlCrSSe, while total magnetic moment of TlCrSe2 decreases with increasing volume approaching to integer value 3 μB.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The spin one Heisenberg model with an easy-plane single-ion anisotropy and spatially anisotropic nearest-neighbor coupling, frustrated by a next-nearest neighbor interaction, is studied at zero temperature using a SU(3) Schwinger boson formalism (sometimes also referred to as flavor wave theory) in a mean field approximation. The local constraint is enforced by introducing a Lagrange multiplier. The enlarged Hilbert space of S = 1 spins lead to a nematic phase that is ubiquitous to S = 1 spins with single ion anisotropy. The phase diagram shows two magnetically ordered phase, separated by a quantum paramagnetic (nematic) phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic nanoparticles of LaFeO3 (LFO) are prepared by a combination of sono-chemical and sol-gel auto combustion method. The as prepared sample is calcined at 500 °C for 5 h to get the desired crystallographic phase. To enhance the microwave absorption, nanoparticles of LFO are incorporated in the matrix of multi-walled carbon nanotubes (MWCNTs). Crystallographic phases of LFO and LFO-MWCNTs are confirmed by analyzing the X-ray diffractograms (XRD) using Rietveld method. The average size of nanoparticles, crystallographic phase, morphology, and incorporation of LFO nanoparticles in MWCNTs are also obtained by high-resolution transmission electron microscope (HRTEM). Micrographs, nanocrystalline fringe pattern and selected area electron diffraction pattern recorded during HRTEM observations confirmed the formation of the desired nanocomposite phase of LFO-MWCNTs. FTIR and Raman spectroscopy of LFO and LFO-MWCNTs are also recorded at room temperature (RT) which confirm the presence of the individual component in the nanocomposite sample. Hysteresis loops at different temperatures from 300 K down to 5 K, zero field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) magnetizations (M) as a function of temperature (T) of LFO-MWCNTs are recorded in SQUID magnetometer. Analysis of the observed magnetic data of LFO-MWCNTs suggests the presence of superparamagnetism above ∼298 K and a spin-glass like behavior is found below ∼50 K. The electromagnetic wave absorbing properties in X and Ku bands of microwave regions (8–12 GHz and 12–18 GHz) measured by a vector network analyzer (VNA) confirm the significant enhancement of microwave absorption (RL ∼ −34.88 dB at 10.53 GHz for 1 mm thickness) of LFO in LFO-MWCNTs, which is quite interesting for such multiferroic system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and electronic properties of partially inverted Cobalt Ferrite with composition Co1.5Fe1.5O4 is discussed in the present work. Single phase (SG: Fd3m) sample is synthesized by co-precipitation technique and subsequent air annealing. The values of saturation magnetization obtained from careful analysis of approach to saturation in initial M(H) curves are used to determine spin states of Co ions in tetrahedral (TH) and octahedral (OH) sites. Spin states of Co3+ ions in TH sites, which has not been reported in literature, were found to be in high spin state. Temperature variation of magnetic parameters has been studied. The sample shows magneto-crystalline anisotropy with two clearly distinct pinning centers. Oxygen K-edge and Fe as well as Co L2,3-edge X-ray absorption (XAS) spectra have been used as complementary measurements to study crystal field splitting and core hole effects on transition metal (TM) 3d orbitals. The ratio of intensities of t2g and eg absorption bands in O-K edge XAS spectrum is used to estimate the spin states of Co ions at OH and TH sites. The results are in agreement with those obtained from magnetization data, and favors Co3+ ions in TH sites in high spin states. Normalized areas of the satellite peaks in TM L2,3-edge XAS spectra have been used to estimate 3dn+1L contribution in ground state wave function and the contributions were found to be significant.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Zr-substituted NiZnCo ferrite nanopowders, Ni0.4−xZn0.5ZrxCo0.1Fe2.0O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.20), were synthesized by the sol-gel auto-combustion method. The effects of Zr substitution on the structural, magnetic and electrical properties have been investigated. The DTA and TG results indicate that there are three steps of combustion process. The X-ray diffraction patterns show that the lattice parameter and the average crystallite size increase with the increase of Zr substitution. The saturation magnetization increases with the increase of Zr substitution when x ≤ 0.05, and then decreases when x > 0.05. Meanwhile, the coercivity initially decreases with the increase of Zr substitution when x ≤ 0.05, and then increases when x > 0.05. The polarization behavior for all the samples in the test frequency range from100 Hz to10 MHz obeys the charge polarization mechanism, which happens since the frequency of the hopping of electron exchange between Fe2+ and Fe3+ ions are far from the frequency of alternating-current field. And the dielectric constant increases with the increase of Zr substitution. The relaxation peak of the frequency dependence of dielectric loss is observed for x ≥ 0.10, which is due to the frequency of charge hopping between the Fe2+ and Fe3+ exactly matches with the frequency of the external applied field. Electrical transport behavior of the ferrite nanopowders is found to follow the impurity semiconductor, and the effect of Zr substitution on the temperature dependence of dc resistivity is observed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Advances in crystal growth have allowed for synthesis of large single crystals of Nd1+∊Fe4B4, a well-known phase with a modulated structure. As a result we are able to report heat capacity and resistivity measurements on a single crystal Nd1+∊Fe4B4 sample with a distribution of ∊ that skews towards the solubility limit of Nd near ∊≈[formula-presented]. Heat capacity measurements show evidence of crystal field splitting at temperatures higher than the long-range ferromagnetic Curie temperature. Heat capacity, resistivity, and magnetization measurements all confirm a Curie temperature of 7 K which is lower than previously reported values in the Nd1+∊Fe4B4 system. We also perform measurements of the angular dependence of the magnetization and discover behavior associated with the magnetic anisotropy that is inconsistent with the simple description previously proposed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have used full-potential linearized augmented plane wave method in the stable Fm-3m phase to investigate the structural, elastic, magnetic and electronic properties of Co2VZ (Z = As, In). The optimized equilibrium lattice parameter in stable phase is 5.80 Å for Co2VAs and 6.01 Å for Co2VIn. Ferromagnetic behavior of both the alloys is explained by the spin resolved density of states. The exchange splitting due to Co and V atoms are responsible for the ferromagnetic behaviour. No energy gap is found in spin up state while an energy gap can be seen in spin down state, hence, showing half-metallic nature. Elastic stability is discussed through elastic constants. Thermodynamic properties of the alloys have been obtained by using the quasi-harmonic approximations. Boltzmann theory is employed to investigate the electronic transport properties of these alloys.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.(Ce,Nd)-Fe-B sintered magnets were prepared by the addition of NdHx powders in Ce9Nd4.5Fe80B6.5 powders. The coercivity is rather low in Ce9Nd4.5Fe80B6.5 magnets, and Ce element prefers to distribute at the outer-layer of main phase (Ce,Nd)2Fe14B. The investigation of scanning electron microscope shows that the addition of NdHx powders leads to the increase of Nd content at grain outer-layer of main phase owing to the element diffusion. Magnetization reversal undergoes the nucleation of reversed domain wall at grain outer-later, and the addition of NdHx powders leads to the increase in the nucleation field of reversed domain, giving rise to the significant improvement of coercivity. The larger amount addition of NdHx powders leads to the increase in the amount of intergranular phase, resulting in the decreases of the remanence, the squareness of demagnetization curve and the maximum energy product.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on impedance experiments carried out in the reentrant alloys Au-Fe 18 at.% and Au-Fe 21 at.%. A spin-glass system Au-Fe 13.5 at.% was also studied for comparison. Measurements cover an extended temperature interval including the paramagnetic state, the intermediate ferromagnetic-like phase and the low temperature reentrant regime. Several frequencies in the range 0.1–1.8 MHz were applied. Magneto-impedance measurements were also performed in low magnetic fields applied parallel to the current orientation. From the impedance versus temperature data, the real and imaginary components of the circumferential permeability were extracted. A Hopkinson maximum is observed in both permeability components of the reentrant magnets. Also observed in these systems is a downwards inflexion in the permeability versus temperature curves at the canting temperature TK where the reentrant regime sets in. The anisotropy field HK was obtained from the magneto-impedance measurements in several temperatures spanning the ferromagnetic and reentrant states. A marked increase of the HK magnitude occurs in temperatures below TK, indicating the stabilization of the reentrant phase by the anisotropic Dzyaloshisnskii–Moriya coupling. These results are in agreement with predictions of the mean-field theory that explains canting and the reentrant state with basis on the freezing of the spin components which are transverse to the field orientation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.La3TMWS3O6 (TM = Fe, Co) and novel Ba3CrVS4O3 can be obtained as pure polycrystalline samples by mineralizer aided solid-state reactions and a solid-state reaction with further purification by water, respectively. In contrast, La3CrWS3O6 needs a standard solid-state reaction to form but the final product contains observable impurities. All four compounds contain similar quasi-1-D magnetic lattices although La-based ones are centrosymmetric (P63/m) and the Ba-containing one is polar and non-centrosymmetric (P63). Strong antiferromagnetic couplings are observed along the magnetic chains in the Fe and Cr containing compounds. As a result, short-range magnetic order is suggested at low temperatures for the Fe-chain, which can be related to magneto-electric couplings. The Co3+-homologue shows typical diamagnetic behavior, as supported by its insulating nature, which is due to a low-spin state. The polar Cr3+-compound exhibits very different magnetic behavior compared to its corresponding non-polar relative. This proves a strong influence on the physical properties from the crystallographic symmetry.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Heusler alloy Co2RuSi has been synthesized by melt-spinning technology successfully. Co2RuSi bulk sample after annealing is composed of an HCP Co-rich phase and a BCC Ru-Si phase, but melt-spinning can suppress the precipitation of the HCP phase and produce a single Co2RuSi Heusler phase. In the XRD pattern, it is found that Ru has a strong preference for the (A, C) sites, though it has fewer valence electrons compared with Co. This site preference is different from the case in Heusler alloys containing only 3d elements and is supported further by first-principles calculations. Melt-spun Co2RuSi has a Ms of 2.67 μB/f.u. at 5 K and a Tc of 491 K. An exothermic peak is observed at 871 K in the DTA curve, corresponding to the decomposition of the Heusler phase. Finally, the site preference and magnetic properties of Co2RuSi were discussed based on electronic structure calculation and charge density difference.© 2017In this paper, the scalability of dual trench epitaxial diode as the selector for phase change memory (PCM) has been analyzed. The 4 F2 diode with active area of 0.002916 µm2 has been fabricated using the standard 40 nm complementary metal oxide semiconductor process. The ratio of disturbance current between neighboring bit-lines (BLs) to drive current remains at average 2.0%. By introducing boron implantation into the device substrate, the punch-through voltage between neighboring word-lines (WLs) is larger than 6 V. Moreover, owing to the optimized P region in PN junction, the 4 F2 diode showed an excellent drive current of 431 µA. Finally, the resistances of 4/6.5/10/30 F2 diode array have been investigated, the series resistances of the buried N+ layer exhibited decreasing influence on drive current with the diode size scaling down.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the systematic design, construction and testing of a Tunable Absorption System (TAS) incorporating magnetorheological elastomer (MRE) has been investigated. The TAS has been designed for energy absorption and mitigation of vibratory motions from an impact excitation. The main advantage of the designed TAS is that it has the ability to change and adapt to working conditions. Tunability can be realised through a change in the magnetic field caused by the change of an internal arrangement of permanent magnets within a double dipolar circular Halbach array. To show the capabilities of the tested system, experiments based on an impulse excitation have been performed. Significant changes of the TASs natural frequency and damping characteristics have been obtained. By incorporating magnetic tunability within the TAS a significant qualitative and quantitative change in the devices mechanical properties and performance were obtained.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in multiferroic cubic spinel MnCr2O4 (space group Fd3¯m, no. 227, cF56), has been investigated using dc magnetization studies. The values of maximum magnetic entropy change (ΔSMmax) and the adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad) are ∼5.3 J kg−1 K−1 and ∼2 K, respectively, at ∼42.8 K for the magnetic field change of 50 kOe. The dc magnetization data near the transition temperature were analyzed by the modified Arrott plots, the Kouvel-Fisher method, log M vs log H, and the scaling analysis. Critical exponents β = 0.3932 ± 0.0287, γ = 1.0256 ± 0.0239, and δ = 3.55 ± 0.26 are obtained around the critical temperature ∼42.88 K. The critical exponents are in excellent agreement with the single scaling equation of state M(H,∊)=∊0.3932±0.0287 f±(H/∊((0.3932±0.0287)+(1.0256±0.0239))); with f+ for T < 42.88 K, f- for T > 42.88 K, and ∊ = (T − 42.88)/42.88. At T = 42.88 K, the exponent δ relates the magnetization with applied filed by M=H1/(3.55±0.26). Scaling analysis shows that calculated critical exponents as well as critical temperature are intrinsic to the system. Theoretically, the value of β is close to 3D Heisenberg model, while values of γ and δ are close to those of the mean field model. So the values of critical exponents indicate that the critical behavior of MnCr2O4 cannot be described within the framework of existing universality classes and probably belong to a separate class.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Monolayer Fe2C, a member of MXene group, has been investigated by the first-principles calculations. Fe2C MXene is predicted to be metallic and ferromagnetic. To estimate the strength of magnetic coupling, the Heisenberg model is employed to obtain the magnetic exchange interaction parameters. To understand the mechanism yielding the magnetic ordering, the Stoner's criterion is invoked, and ID(EF)>1 is fulfilled to induce the itinerant ferromagnetic ordering in Fe2C MXene. In addition, the magnetic anisotropy energy for the Fe2C MXene is −22.8 μeV per unit cell, and it has an easy plane for the magnetization, indicating that the magnetic system belongs to the XY model magnets. The Curie temperature from the mean-field approximation is 861 K, which is well above the room temperature. Thus, monolayer Fe2C is an intrinsic ferromagnetic MXene with a high Curie temperature, which is a promising candidate for spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.New metastable phases in the Fe homometallic ludwigite compound are obtained and studied using an evolutionary algorithm and Density Functional Theory. Our lowest energy monoclinic structure is identified as P21/m with space group number of 11. This structure evolves towards the monoclinic structure as the result of the spin orbit coupling and a particular zigzag magnetic structure. A zigzag distortion in a class of three-leg ladders follows similar to the experimental one observed below the transition temperature of Tc = 283 K. In this distortion long and short bonds inside rungs alternating in a zigzag way along the ladder legs. Furthermore, a new type of zigzag structural ordering is observed in other two low-energy phases analyzed. In this case, the magnetic ordering behaves qualitatively similar to the experimental structure at 82 K, with antiferromagnetically coupled ferromagnetic rungs. Our calculations show that magnetic symmetry is not favorable for zigzag structural ordering. Finally, structural and magnetic properties will be discussed in comparison with the experimentally known phases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Flake carbonyl iron/Fe3O4 (FCI/Fe3O4) composites with enhanced microwave absorption properties were prepared by a direct and flexible surface oxidation technique. The phase structures, morphology, magnetic properties, frequency-dependent electromagnetic and microwave absorption properties of the composites were investigated. The measurement results showed that lower permittivity as well as modest permeability was obtained by the FCI/Fe3O4 composites. The calculated microwave absorption properties indicated that enhanced absorption efficiency and broader absorption band were obtained by the FCI/Fe3O4 composite comparing with the FCI composite. The absorption frequency range with reflection loss (RL) below −5 dB of FCI/Fe3O4 composites at reaction time of 90 min at thickness of 1.5 mm is 13.3 GHz from 4.7 to 18 GHz, while the bandwidth of the FCI composite is only 5.9 GHz from 2.6 to 8.5 GHz at the same thickness. Thus, such absorbers could act as effective and wide broadband microwave absorbers in the GHz range.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magneto-optical and magnetic properties of Co(5 nm)/Bi/Co(5 nm) samples and the peculiarities of exchange coupling between Co layers through the Bi spacer layer are studied. The magneto-optical investigations indicate that the shapes of Transverse Kerr effect (TKE) spectra are similar for all studied samples but the TKE values decrease at tBi >4 nm as compared with TKE values of the single-layer Co thin film. The decrease in the volume ratio of the magnetic to nonmagnetic phases causes the reduction of the contribution of the magnetic phase to magnetooptical signals. Magnetic investigations show that the coercivity force, HC, and saturation field, HS, of the Co/Bi/Co samples increase with increasing tBi. The oscillatory behavior of HC and HS with various periods (short and long) is observed in a wide range of tBi values (from 0.2 to 50 nm). These data are explained by the dependence of Fermi energy on tBi and the changes in the Bi band structure with decreasing tBi.© 2017Comprehensive X-ray diffraction (XRD) studies have been performed at different temperature (T) (4.2–300 K) and magnetic field (H) (0–8 T) to understand the evolution of crystal structure of Nd0.49Sr0.51MnO3+δ (NSMO) under non ambient conditions. The T dependent XRD results show the abrupt change in the lattice parameters without any change in lattice symmetry at ∼200 K, which is associated with the first order structural phase transition from ferromagnetic to antiferromagnetic phase. This phase transition is strongly H dependent and shifted to lower temperature (∼150 K) on the application of 8 T field with phase coexistence (high temperature phase ∼18%), even down to 4.2 K. Isothermal XRD results at 150 K under different H clearly illustrate the H induced first order structural phase transition. The critical H at which this phase transformation starts is ∼1 T, with rapid growth above 4 T with hysteretic nature during increasing and decreasing H. These results are supported with the resistivity and magnetoresistance results and affirm the strong spin-lattice coupling in NSMO. Our detail studies reveal the structural correlations to the observed colossal magnetoresistance and magnetocaloric effect in this material.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Amorphous TbFeCo material with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy is currently attracting more attention for potential applications in spintronic devices and logic memories. We systematically investigate magnetic, structural, thermal, optical and electrical properties of TbFeCo alloy films. It shows out-of-plane easy axis of the films turns into in-plane orientation after annealing. Significant increase in saturation magnetization in the temperature range between 400 and 450 °C is revealed by thermomagnetic measurements. The occurrence of crystallization and oxidation at high temperatures is confirmed by X-ray diffraction measurements. Pronounced changes in optical reflectance and sheet resistance are observed with temperature, in line with structural relaxation and change. The activation barriers for crystallization and oxidation are determined to be 1.01 eV and 0.83 eV, respectively, for FeCo-rich and Tb-rich samples. Better thermal stability against crystallization and oxidation is demonstrated in the FeCo-rich sample than the Tb-rich type. Our results provide some useful information for the alloy used in device fabrication.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report here magnetic hyperthermia using nanoparticles of CexFe3−xO4 (x = 0.01, 0.05, 0.1, 0.3 and 0.5) during which temperature was found to be stabilizing near 42 °C. This happens despite of their high saturation magnetization (MS) and Curie temperature (TC) values. It was observed that by selecting an appropriate magnetic field the temperature can be rose exactly near the therapeutic temperature and thus it will help to selectively kill the cancerous cells leaving normal cells unaffected. These nanoparticles (size around 8–15 nm) were produced by single step microwave refluxing technique. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis demonstrates that samples were essentially single phase except for x = 0.5 sample. The X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) study for the samples demonstrated that Ce was present in both Ce3+ and Ce4+ states. The saturation magnetization value of the samples decreased sharply from 62 Am2/kg for x = 0.01 to 19 Am2/kg for x = 0.1. This value further decreased with increased Ce doping.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ni-Zn and Ni-Zn-Co ferrite powders with nominal compositions Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 and Ni0.5Zn0.3Co0.2Fe2O4 were prepared by the solid-state reaction synthesis with periodic regrinding during the calcination at 1073 K. The structure of Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 and Ni0.5Zn0.3Co0.2Fe2O4 was refined assuming space group F d-3m. Scanning electron microscopy revealed the average sizes of the crystalline ferrite particles are 130–630 nm for Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 and 140–350 nm for Ni0.5Zn0.3Co0.2Fe2O4. The room temperature saturation magnetizations are 59.7 emu/g for Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 and 57.1 emu/g for Ni0.5Zn0.3Co0.2Fe2O4. The coercivity of the samples is found to be much larger than that of bulk ferrites and increases with Co introduction. The Curie temperature tends to increase upon Zn substitution by Co, as well. The temperature dependences of magnetization measured using zero-field cooled and field cooled protocols exhibit large spin frustration and spin-glass-like behavior.© 2017We have studied the domain wall dynamics in Joule-annealed amorphous glass-covered microwires with positive magnetostriction in the presence of an electric current, in order to evaluate the profile and shape of the moving domain wall. Such microwires are known to present magnetic bi-stability when axially magnetized. The single domain wall dynamics was evaluated under different conditions, under an axially applied stress and an electric current. We have observed the well known increasing of the domain wall damping with the applied stress due to the increase in the magnetoelastic anisotropy and, when the current is applied, depending on the current intensity and direction, a modification on the axial domain wall damping. When the orthogonal motion of the domain wall is considered, we have observed that the associated velocity present a smaller dependence on the applied current intensity. It was observed a modification on both the domain wall shape and length. In a general way, the domain wall evolves from a bell shape to a parabolic shape as the current intensity is increased. The results were explained in terms of the change in the magnetic energy promoted by the additional Oersted field.© 2017In the present work samples of Ba2−xPrxFeMoO6 double perovskites with x=0 – 0.75 were synthesized at high temperature of 1523 K in the flowing of Ar+H2 forming gas with H2 concentration of 5%. The results of X-ray powder diffraction and Rietveld analysis indicate that the crystal structure of Ba2−xPrxFeMoO6 is cubic with space group of Fm3̅m. The Pr doping has reduced the lattice parameter and bond lengths of Pr/Ba-O and Fe/Mo-O which, have been estimated by Rietveld analysis (FULLPROF), consequently it enhances the ferrimagnetic transition temperature (TC). On the other hand, it increases gradually the probability of antisite disorder which is the main reason for the decrease of the magnetization. Also, it produces more conducting channels in the samples causing enhancement of conductivity at low doping ratio for x≤0.3 but the effect is reversed at higher doping ratio for x>0.3. The behavior of magnetoresistance (MR), with temperature shows intergrain magnetoresistance at low temperature which depends on the extrinsic properties, and intragrain magnetoresistance at room temperature which depends on intrinsic properties. Finally, it is worth mentioning that in the samples of x=0.1, 0.2 and 0.75 a considerable Curie temperature enhancement has occurred with reserving a reasonable magnetoresistance which may be promising in different applications.© 2017This paper presents an analytical model of resonant MEMS magnetic field sensor with electromagnetic induction sensing. The resonant structure vibrates in square extensional (SE) mode. By analyzing the vibration amplitude and quality factor of the resonant structure, the magnetic field sensitivity as a function of device structure parameters and encapsulation pressure is established. The developed analytical model has been verified by comparing calculated results with experiment results and the deviation between them is only 10.25%, which shows the feasibility of the proposed device model. The model can provide theoretical guidance for further design optimization of the sensor. Moreover, a quantitative study of the magnetic field sensitivity is conducted with respect to the structure parameters and encapsulation pressure based on the proposed model.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We used porous nanotubular templates of TiO2 for fabrication of Co/Pd antidot arrays with strong perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. The morphology of porous multilayers followed the features of the initial template demonstrating a pronounced relief consisting of the cells with periodic pores with small inclination. We confirmed the formation of Co0.4Pd0.6 alloy at the Co/Pd interface. We observed the conservation of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy in the Co/Pd porous film with coercive field HC = 2.7 kOe, enhanced with respect to the continuous film due to the pinning of magnetic moments on the nanopore edges. From angular dependence of the coercive field HC we deduced the change of the magnetization reversal mechanism from domain wall motion in the continuous film to the predominantly coherent rotation mechanism in the porous film.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Spinel ferrites with nominal composition MgPryFe2−yO4 (y = 0.00, 0.025, 0.05, 0.075, 0.10) were prepared by sol-gel method. Temperature dependent DC electrical conductivity and drift mobility were found in good agreement with each other, reflecting semiconducting behavior. The dielectric properties of all the samples as a function of frequency (1 MHz–3 GHz) were measured at room temperature. The dielectric constant and complex dielectric constant of these samples decreased with the increase of praseodymium concentration. In the present spinel ferrite, Cole–Cole plots were used to separate the grain and grain boundary's effects. The substitution of praseodymium ions in Mg-based spinel ferrites leads to a remarkable rise of grain boundary's resistance as compared to the grain's resistance. As both AC conductivity and Cole–Cole plots are the functions of concentration, they reveal the dominant contribution of grain boundaries in the conduction mechanism. AC activation energy was lower than dc activation energy. Temperature dependence normalized AC susceptibility of spinel ferrites reveals that MgFe2O4 exhibits multi domain (MD) structure with high Curie temperature while on substitution of praseodymium, MD to SD transitions occurs. The low values of conductivity and low dielectric loss make these materials best candidate for high frequency application.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The influence of Co content on the structural and hard magnetic properties of two sets of nanocrystalline Fe52−xCoxPt28B20 (x = 0–26) and Fe60−yCoyPt25B15 (y = 0–40) alloys was studied. The alloys were prepared as ribbons by the rapid quenching technique. The nanocomposite structure in the alloys was obtained by annealing at 840–880 K for 30 min. Structural characterization of the samples was performed using the Mössbauer spectroscopy and X-ray diffraction. Magnetic properties of the samples were studied by the measurements of the hysteresis loops and of the magnetization at increasing temperatures. An amorphous phase prevailed in the as-quenched Fe52−xCoxPt28B20 alloys while a disordered solid solution of fcc-(Fe,Co)Pt was a dominating phase in the Fe60−yCoyPt25B15 ribbons. Differential scanning calorimetry measurements revealed one or two exothermic peaks at temperatures up to 993 K, depending on the composition of the alloys. Thermal treatment of the samples led to the formation of the magnetically hard ordered L10 tetragonal (Fe,Co)Pt nanocrystallites and magnetically softer phases of (Fe,Co)B (for Fe52−xCoxPt28B20) or (Fe,Co)2B (for Fe60−yCoyPt25B15). Detailed Mössbauer spectroscopy studies revealed that cobalt substituted for iron in both the L10 phase and in iron borides. The nanocomposite Fe60−yCoyPt25B15 alloys exhibited significantly larger magnetic remanence and maximum energy products but a smaller coercivity than those observed for the Fe52−xCoxPt28B20 alloys. Co addition caused a reduction of the magnetization and the energy product in both series of the alloys. The largest magnetic remanence of 0.87 T and the highest energy product (BH)max = 80 kJ/m3 were obtained for the Co-free Fe52Pt28B20 alloy while the largest coercivity (HC > 950 kA/m) was observed for the Fe50Co10Pt25B15 and Fe30Co30Pt25B15 alloys. Differences in the hard magnetic properties of the nanocomposite alloys were related to different phase compositions influencing the strength of inter-phase exchange coupling interactions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The present study focused on structural, magnetic and electrical properties of Cu substituted Co-Ni ferrite nanoparticles synthesized by sol-gel combustion method. X-ray diffraction, Fourier Transform infra-red spectroscopy (FTIR), magnetization, magnetic permeability and resistivity measurements were carried out to study the structural, magnetic and electrical properties. X-ray diffraction pattern confirms single phase spinel formation. Crystallite size determined from Scherer's method increases with Cu concentration. Distribution of cations was estimated from X-ray line intensity calculations, suggest that the majority of Cu2+ ions occupy octahedral (B) site. Saturation magnetization exhibit increasing trend from 40 emu/g (x = 0.0) to 60 emu/g (x = 0.4) with Cu concentration, though higher magnetic moment Ni ions are replaced by lower magnetic moment Cu ions. Magnetic permeability increases with increasing Cu concentration and shows a flat profile in the frequency range 1–50 MHz. Significant modification in DC electrical resistivity and activation energy are explained on the basis of hopping mechanism.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Field computation in media exhibiting hysteresis is crucial to a variety of applications such as magnetic recording processes and accurate determination of core losses in power devices. Recently, Hopfield neural networks (HNN) have been successfully configured to construct scalar and vector hysteresis models. This paper presents an efficient hysteresis modeling methodology and its implementation in field computation applications. The methodology is based on the application of the integral equation approach on discretized triangular magnetic sub-regions. Within every triangular sub-region, hysteresis properties are realized using a 3-node HNN. Details of the approach and sample computation results are given in the paper.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic Heusler alloys of Co2MnSi were synthesized by mechanical alloying method at low temperature. The effect of milling time and annealing process on structural and magnetic properties of ferromagnetic alloy samples were studied by X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy and vibration sample magnetometer methods, respectively. Structural characteristics such as crystallite size, phase percentage, and lattice parameter determined using the Rietveld method. The values of these parameters were obtained 362.9 nm, 5.699 Å and 98.7%, respectively for annealed sample. Magnetization studies show that the Co2MnSi phase is formed at 15 h of milling and is optimized after 20 h of milling. VSM results showed that saturation magnetization (Ms) of milled samples reduces from 112 to 75 (emu/g) with increasing milling time and then increased gradually to 95 emu/g. The effect of post-annealing on the structural and magnetic properties of milled samples was also investigated. The saturation magnetization of annealed sample (120 emu/g) is higher than the optimum milled sample (95 emu/g) due to increasing preferential ordered L21 structure.© 2017Dynamics of spin ordering in the manganite Nd0.5Ca0.5MnO3 have been investigated in this paper. It was observed that the complex mixed magnetic ordering in pellets is comprised of antiferromagnetic ordering at 160 K (TN) and complete charge ordering at 250 K (TCO). Under ac field, appearance of unstable ferromagnetic correlations is observed above TCO, which is badly frustrated due to strong spin disorder induced by Jahn Teller distortions. Impedance measurements reveal the spin glass like scenario, suppressing the strong antiferromagnetic and charge ordering states below TN.© 2017The electronic, magnetic and optical properties of X-doped ScPdBi (X = Gd, Np, Cm) are investigated in the framework of density functional theory. The exchange-correlation potential is treated using generalized gradient approximation with Coulomb interaction parameter. The band order and energy band gap of X-doped ScPdBi are investigated by calculation of band structure. The effect of doping impurity on magnetic properties of ScPdBi compound is studied by calculation of total and partial magnetic moments of X-doped ScPdBi compound. Furthermore, the optical properties of X-doped ScPdBi are calculated and compared in the energy range of 0–25 eV.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The quantum phase transition and thermodynamics of a periodic Anderson-like polymer chain in a magnetic field are investigated by Green's function theory. The T-h phase diagram is explored, wherein a crossover temperature T∗ denoting the gapless phase crossover into quantum critical regimes, smoothly connects near the critical fields to the universal linear line T∗ ∼ (h − hc,s), and ends at hc,s, providing a new route to capture quantum critical point (QCP). The quantum critical scaling around QCPs is demonstrated by analyzing magnetization, specific heat and Grüneisen parameter Γh, which provide direct access to distill the power-law critical exponents (β, δ and α) obeying the critical scaling relation α + β(1 + δ) = 2, analogous to the quantum spin system. Furthermore, scaling hypothesis equations are proposed to check the scaling analysis, for which all the data collapse onto a single curve or two independent branches for the plot against an appropriate scaling variable, indicating the self-consistency and reliability of the obtained critical exponents.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we report on the critical analysis of the La0.5Sm0.1Sr0.4Mn1−xInxO3 (0⩽x⩽0.1) manganites near the ferromagnetic-paramagnatic phase transition temperature. Various techniques such as modified Arrott plot, Kouvel–Fisher method and critical isotherm were used to analyze the magnetic-field dependence of magnetization. The Curie temperature (TC) could be tuned over a wide temperature range, from 251 K to 310 K, with varying in content. Though the nature of this transition is found to be of second order, the estimated critical exponents β, γ, and δ obtained for different values of x are close to the theoretically predicted values for the three-dimensional (3D)-Ising interaction model (β = 0.324 ± 0.01, γ = 1.240 ± 0.13 at TC = 310 K for x = 0.00); (β = 0.329 ± 0.04, γ = 1.241 ± 0.001 at TC = 294 K for x = 0.05); (β = 0.332 ± 0.01, γ = 1.250 ± 0.04 at TC = 251 K for x = 0.10) and are very far away from any other known universality class. The critical isotherm M (TC, µ0H) gives δ = 5.02 ± 0.01 for x = 0.00. Thus, the scaling law δ=1+γ/β is fulfilled. The critical exponents obey the single scaling equation of M(μ0H,ε)=εβf±(μ0H/εβ+γ); where f+ for T > TC and f− for T < TC.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the evolution of microstructure and texture in Nickel–Cobalt electrodeposits fabricated by pulse electrodeposition (PED) technique and the correlation of these attributes with the magnetic properties. The structural and microstructural investigation using X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopic studies indicate the presence of nanocrystalline grains and nano-twins in the electrodeposits. Convoluted Multiple Whole profile fitting reveals an increase in dislocation density and twin density with increasing cobalt content in the as-deposited samples. Strengthening of <1 1 1> fibre texture and weakening of <2 0 0> fibre texture with increasing cobalt concentration has been observed with X-ray texture analysis. A corresponding significant increase in the saturation magnetization and coercivity observed with increasing cobalt content. A significant improvement in the soft magnetic character in the electrodeposits in terms of increase in saturation magnetization and decrease in coercivity has been observed with thermal annealing.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work explores, from a numerical perspective, the role of particle rotational inertia on the magnetization dynamics of ferrofluids. A robust numerical method is used for this purpose. The numerical research code is based on the use of a convergent long range dipolar interactions technique. These interactions are computed through a sophisticated Ewald summation procedure. The balance of linear and angular momentum is solved for N ensembles containing N particles each. Long range dipolar magnetic torques are solved in a periodic system of Lattices, spread in physical and reciprocal spaces to assure the convergence on the calculation of the suspension transport properties. A small effect of particle rotational inertia is considered. The system of equations of N particles distributed randomly in space is solved simultaneously for different parallel realizations in order to achieve a meaningful statistics of our many-body system. The results are focused on the behavior of the suspension magnetization for different particle concentrations and intensities of rotational inertia. The physical parameter used to express this effect is the particle rotational Stokes number. The simulations indicate that, from a numerical perspective, rotational inertia may induce a relevant, but often neglected, effect on the magnetization equilibrium of a ferrofluid. This finding is relevant for the community of numericists interested in using Langevin Dynamics applied to dipolar suspensions. We propose an expression with a correction on the effect of the particle rotational inertia to compute the magnetization of a magnetic fluid. The results obtained in this work are compatible with some insights previously pointed out in former scientifical works.© 2017In this work, for first time the ferrofluids based on the cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) nanoparticles were prepared by the co-precipitation method at different reaction times (0.5–6.5 h). Crystal structure, morphology and magnetic properties of the cobalt ferrite nanoparticles and the ferrofluids based on the nanoparticles were studied by X-ray diffraction (XRD), field emission scanning electron microscope (FESEM) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The XRD patterns of CoFe2O4 nanoparticles synthesized at different reaction times indicated that all samples are single phase in accordance with inverse cubic spinel structure with space group Fd-3m, and no impurity phase was observed. By increasing the reaction time to 3.5 h, the lattice parameter and the average crystallites size increased and then afterwards decreased by increasing the reaction time. The microscopic studies indicated the formation of nanosized particles with nearly spherical in shape, whereas the average particle size for all samples is found to be less than 50 nm. The results of VSM also showed that the saturation magnetization and coercivity field of the cobalt ferrite nanoparticles and the ferrofluids were influenced by reaction time, whereas the ferrofluids have lower values of magnetic parameters than that of nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In ACrF5 (A = Cs, Rb, K), Cr(IV) ions are coordinated by six fluoride ligands where the resulting CrF6 octahedra share cis vertexes to form infinite chains of ([CrIVF5]−)n. The geometry of the latter in Cs compound differs from that in K and Rb compounds. The results of investigations of the magnetic behaviour of these compounds have shown that an antiferromagnetic superexchange interaction is present within the chains with JCs = −10.2 cm−1, JRb = −13.3 cm−1, and JK = −13.1 cm−1. Additional ferromagnetic-like long-range ordering has been observed in KCrF5 and RbCrF5 below 6 K which can be explained, in a correlation with their crystal structures, as canted antiferromagnetism.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.New law of the approach to magnetic saturation is proposed based on scaling in ferromagnets with random magnetic anisotropy. This law is consistent with the known laws derived within perturbation theory in extreme cases, but it describes the transition mode between the power-low asymptotic regimes better. The improved law is proper for reliable fitting the approach magnetization to saturation in nanocrystalline and amorphous ferromagnets.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The electronic structure and the magnetocrystalline anisotropy of impurity (Li, Be, B, C, and N) doped α″-Fe16N2 were studied by using full potential linearized augmented plane wave method (FLAPW). From the formation energy calculations, it was evident that the 2s and 2p elements except Li could be easily doped into pure α″-Fe16N2. The impurity doping induced local lattice distortions near the impurity site and the magnetic moment near the impurity atom was substantially suppressed. However, the volume of the cell and the total magnetic moment of the doped systems were weakly suppressed compared to the pure α″-Fe16N2. Despite this relatively weak suppression in magnetization, the local distortion contributed to enhancing the magnetocrystalline anisotropy. Due to this enhancement in the anisotropy, the coercive field was also enhanced about 12–16% compared with that in pure structure. Along with the enlarged coercive field, the energy product was also increased. These results may suggest that impurity doped α″-Fe16N2 can be used as potential rare earth free permanent magnet.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe effect of employing different carrier gases (H2 only and 1:1 vol% N2:H2) in the p-type GaN (p-GaN) layer on the wall-plug efficiency (WPE) of high-power light-emitting diodes (LEDs) is studied. Since GaN crystal could be a two-dimension (2-D) growth mode in H2 ambient, better quality and smoother surface of the p-GaN were obtained. The current spreading performance of the p-GaN layer using H2 alone as the carrier gas was enhanced, resulting in advanced light output power (LOP). In addition, turn-on voltage and dynamic resistance at 500 mA, which can strongly contribute to the WPE, were also reduced by 0.12 V and 0.13 Ω, respectively. The studied device with H2 as the carrier gas in the p-GaN layer (p-H2 layer) exhibits 9.5% and 12.4% improvements in LOP and WPE at 500 mA over the device (N2/H2 = 1:1), as well as significantly better electrostatic discharge robustness. Therefore, the use of a p-H2 layer can effectively improve the performance of GaN-based LEDs for high power applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe high temperature DC characteristics of a high-voltage bulk Si lateral insulated-gate bipolar transistor in junction isolation (JI-LIGBT) technology is studied intensively in this paper. The current density distribution in the off-state at different temperatures of three types of device structure is compared. By using the Quasi-vertical DMOSFET (QVDMOS or multi-channel, MC) structure, the electron injection from the channel into the n-drift region is significantly enhanced, and the current density is improved. In addition, by extending the p-top layer to the NPN anode not only improves the breakdown voltage but also reduces the substrate current as well as ensures high temperature stability.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We performed ab initio computations of the magnetic properties of simple iron oxide clusters and slabs. We considered an iron oxide cluster functionalized by a molecule or glued to a gold cluster of the same size. We also considered a magnetite slab coated by cobalt oxide or a mixture of iron oxide and cobalt oxide. The changes in magnetic behavior were explored using constrained magnetic calculations. A possible value for the surface anisotropy was estimated from the fit of a classical Heisenberg model on ab initio results. The value was found to be compatible with estimations obtained by other means, or inferred from experimental results. The addition of a ligand, coating, or of a metallic nanoparticle to the systems degraded the quality of the description by the Heisenberg Hamiltonian. Proposing a change in the anisotropies allowing for the proportion of each transition atom we could get a much better description of the magnetism of series of hybrid cobalt and iron oxide systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Potential single-ion magnet Ni2+ systems: [Ni(Me6tren)Cl](ClO4) and [Ni(Me6tren)Br](Br) reveal unusually high zero field splitting (ZFS). The ZFS parameter (ZFSP) Dexpt = −120 to −180 cm−1 was determined indirectly by high-magnetic field, high-frequency electron magnetic resonance (HMF-EMR). Modeling ZFSPs using the density functional theory (DFT) codes predicts D values: −100 to −200 cm−1. Such ZFSP values may seem controversial in view of the D values usually not exceeding several tens of cm−1 for Ni2+ ions. To corroborate or otherwise these results and elucidate the origin of the huge ZFS (named inappropriately as ‘giant uniaxial magnetic anisotropy’) and respective wavefunctions, we have undertaken semiempirical modeling based on the crystal field (CF) and spin Hamiltonians (SH) theory. In this paper, a feasibility study is carried out to ascertain if superposition model (SPM) calculations may yield such huge D values for these Ni2+ systems. Using crystal structure data for [Ni(Me6tren)Cl](ClO4) and [Ni(Me6tren)Br](Br) as well as taking into account the Jahn-Teller distortions of five-fold coordinated Ni-complexes revealed by DFT geometry optimization, the ZFSPs are predicted for several structural models and wide ranges of model parameters. The results indicate that in the presence of the Jahn-Teller distortions, the SPM-predicted ZFSP D may achieve the observed magnitudes, whereas the positive as well as negative D-signs are obtainable. Further studies based on SPM calculations of CF parameters and diagonalization of the Hamiltonian (Hfree ion + HCF) will allow considering the wavefunctions compositions and thus actual origin of the splitting between the ground and first excited state.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A hexagonal nanowire consisting of a ferromagnetic spin-12 core, spin-1 inter core/shell and spin-32 outer shell coupled with ferrimagnetic interlayer couplings has been studied by the use of Monte Carlo simulation based on the heat bath algorithm. The exchange interactions and the uniaxial anisotropy effects on the magnetic properties of the system have been discussed. We found that, the system exhibits the compensation phenomenon, the first and the second order transitions. Moreover, we have obtained that, the existence of the tricritical point depend on the surface shell interaction.© 2017 The AuthorsNovel nanocomposite of (1-x)CuFe2O4/xMnO2 [x=10% to 50 wt%] has been synthesized by two step wet chemical route without impurity. The x-ray diffraction analysis shows the formation of both phases with crystallite size 40–100 nm which is consist ant with estimated size of SEM.The FTIR spectra confirms the characteristics vibration of ferrites atoms at tetrahedral and octahedral sites along with Mn-O vibration mode, which also confirms the coexistence of both phases. The dielectric properties studied by LCR meter in frequency range of 1 K Hz to 2 MHz.The dielectric constant and tangent loss shows same dispersion of ferrites while a.c. conductivity decreases with increase in MnO2 contents. The real and imaginary part of impedance also calculated which shows decreasing trend at higher frequency. The magnetic characterization performed by vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) at room temperature, which shows normal ferromagnetic behavior of ferrites but saturation magnetization and coercivity decreases with incorporation of MnO2 contents.© 2017We have studied the effect of replacing Mn3+by Cr3+on the structure, transport and magnetism in the bilayered manganite LaSr2Mn2O7. Although no structural transition was observed in LaSr2Mn2−yCryO7(0.1 ≤ y ≤ 0.6), the electrical transport and the magnetic properties were found to be affected significantly by this substitution. Substitution of Cr3+reduces the conductivity by restricting the hopping of small polarons. Magnetization increases with increasing Cr3+concentration suggesting that Cr3+-ions induce ferromagnetic moments. The ferromagnetic and an antiferromagnetic phase observed above ∼60 K merge into an inhomogeneous phase below this temperature. Thermopower yields an essentially concentration independent charge density nearly equal to its value for chromium free composition inspite of its expected decrease with this substitution suggesting that the small charge density of the insulating AFM phase is supplemented by the free carriers in the FM phase. The inhomogeneous phase shows a relaxor type behavior which contrasts with the spin glass behavior seen in La0.46Sr0.54Mn0.98Cr0.02O3having an identical AFM magnetic state. The difference is attributed to the non-JT character of Cr-ions which reduce the distortion of the Mn[sbnd]O octahedra located within the FM domains. With a higher lattice strain in the surrounding AFM matrix the carriers remain confined within the FM domains leading to the relaxor type behavior.© 2017In this paper, a new magnetic percolation phenomenon between the green compact density ρ and effective permeability μe in FeSi9.6Al6.5 magnetic powder cores, was discovered. The Magnetic Percolation Area of ρ is the range of 5.6 g/cm3 ∼ 5.78 g/cm3, and the percolation threshold is 5.78 g/cm3. As a result of the guidance of the percolation theory, the best comprehensive magnetic properties have been optimized through adjusting the distribution of powders. The special distribution of the magnetic powder cores with the best comprehensive magnetic properties was as follows: the content 60% with the particle size distribution of 100–200 mesh, the content 20% with the particle size distribution of 200–325 mesh and the content 20% with the particle size distribution of ≥400 mesh. When the green compact density ρ of cores was 5.79 g/cm3, and the frequency was in the range of 1 kHz ∼ 100 kHz, the best comprehensive magnetic properties were as follows: μe = 91, ∆μ = 0.61%, μe(H80 Oe) = 43, μe(H100 Oe) = 33, μe(H120 Oe) = 26, Pc(50 mT/20 kHz) = 30.58 kW/m3, Pc(50 mT/50 kHz) = 76.85 kW/m3, Pc(50 mT/100 kHz) = 178 kW/m3. Not only have those cores the excellent constant magnetic properties with frequency, the excellent DC superposition characteristic and the lower loss at high frequency, but also the effective permeability outstandingly goes up, which has important significance for the miniaturization of inductance components.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We studied the magnetic properties and domain wall (DW) dynamics of Fe47.4Ni26.6Si11B13C2 and Fe77.5Si7.5B15 microwires. Both samples present rectangular hysteresis loop and fast magnetization switching. Considerable enhancement of DW velocity is observed in Fe77.5Si7.5B15, while DW velocity of samples Fe47.4Ni26.6Si11B13C2 is less affected by annealing. The other difference is the magnetic field range of the linear region on dependence of domain wall velocity upon magnetic field: in Fe47.4Ni26.6Si11B13C2 sample is considerably shorter and drastically decreases after annealing. We discussed the influence of annealing on DW dynamics considering different magnetoelastic anisotropy of studied microwires and defects within the amorphous state in Fe47.4Ni26.6Si11B13C2. Consequently we studied the structure of Fe47.4Ni26.6Si11B13C2 sample using X-ray diffraction and the atom probe tomography. The results obtained using the atom probe tomography supports the formation of the B-depleted and Si-enriched precipitates in the metallic nucleus of Fe-Ni based microwires.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The estimation is obtained for the quenching time τlof the non-equilibrium orbital momentum of the electron that can be got after the excitation by the femtosecond optical pump. The quenching process of the l is supposed to be determined by the interaction of l with the crystal field and its deformations (phonons). The time τl is determined not only by the parameters of the crystal field but also by the speed of relaxation of the virtual phonon 1/τ(ω)with the frequency ω≈1/τl. Considering the frequency dependence of τ(ω)enlarges the estimated value of τlup to the microsecond scale. This value exceeds greatly the picoseconds times of the ultrafast magnetic dynamics (UMD) processes observed after the action of the femtosecond optical pump. This means that the results obtained in our work are not supposed to be compared with the experimental data on UMD. The presented description of the quenching of l is the solution of one of the auxiliary tasks that can be useful for construction of the UMD theory.© 2017We have investigated the crystallographic and magnetic properties of (Mn,Fe)3-δGa alloys. The hexagonal phase is stable between 600 and 700 °C and can be stabilized by quenching to room temperature. Mn3Ga is reported to be off-stoichiometric, but we show that using melt-spinning the stoichiometric compound is attainable. Below the antiferromagnetic transition temperature TN, the crystal undergoes a hexagonal to monoclinic transition at the distortion temperature Td. This gives rise to an in-plane rotation of the magnetic moments that is accompanied by a simultaneous increase in magnetization in a magnetic field of 1 T. Fe substitution for Mn removes the monoclinic distortion. Substitutional Fe weakens the antiferromagnetism and a paramagnetic to ferromagnetic transition is observed. The Mn sublattice couples antiparallel throughout the series. Substitution of Ga with Si preserves the monoclinic distortion.© 2017The magnetic properties of little examined CuCl2·2D2O are studied and compared with those of CuCl2·2H2O. New CuBr2·6H2O is also examined. Susceptibility maxima appear for chlorides at 5.35 and 5.50 K, in the above order, with estimated antiferromagnetic ordering at 4.15 and 4.25 K. Curie-Weiss fits yield g of 2.210 and 2.205, and Weiss θ of −6.0 and −4.7 K, respectively, in χM = C/(T − θ). One-dimensional Heisenberg model fits to susceptibilities, including interchain exchange in a mean-field approximation, are performed. Interchain exchange is significant but much weaker than intrachain. The bromide hexahydrate strongly differs magnetically from any chloride hydrate, but exhibits notable similarities and differences compared to previously studied CuBr2. A broad susceptibility maximum occurs near 218 K, only 4% lower than for CuBr2, but with almost twice the magnitude. Powder X-ray diffraction data for CuBr2·6H2O may be best accounted for by a monoclinic unit cell that is metrically orthorhombic. The volume per formula unit is consistent with trends in metal ionic radii. However, an alternative monoclinic cell with 5% smaller volume more readily rationalizes the magnetism.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Herein we report an intrinsic ferromagnetism in two-dimensional layered Cr3C2 material. The calculations based on the density-functional theory reveal that in a single Cr3C2 unit three Cr atoms are ferrimagnetically coupled, while the coupling between Cr3C2 units are ferromagnetic with a magnetic moment of 3.9μB/unit. The energy difference between the ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic configurations is larger than 344 meV per unit, indicating the observed ferromagnetic ordering is robust. Additionally, this ferromagnetic coupling can be enhanced under the external tensile strain. At the strain rising to 0.03, the Cr3C2 converts from metallic ferromagnet to half-metallic ferromagnet with the magnetic moment saturating to an integer value of 4.0μB/unit, and this half-metallic behavior can be maintained for larger strains. Our results highlight a new promising graphene-like half-metallic ferromagnetic material for nanoscale spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic behavior in aqueously well dispersible magnetite core-shell Fe3O4@SiO2 nanoparticles is presented. The magnetic properties of core-shell nanoparticles were measured with use of the DC, AC magnetometry and EPR spectroscopy. Particles where characterized by HR-TEM and Raman spectroscopy, showing a crystalline magnetic core of 11.5 ± 0.12 nm and an amorphous silica shell of 22 ± 1.5 nm in thickness. The DC, AC magnetic measurements confirmed the superparamagnetic nature of nanoparticles, additionally the EPR studies performed at much higher frequency than DC, AC magnetometry (9 GHz) have confirmed the paramagnetic nature of the nanoparticles. Our results show the excellent magnetic behavior of the particles with a clear magnetite structure, which are desirable properties for environmental remediation and biomedical applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effect (MCE) of polycrystalline gadolinium was studied in high steady magnetic fields up to 14 T by direct measurements of the adiabatic temperature change (ΔT) using an “extraction method”. Large MCE was observed at the ferromagnetic phase transition resulting in ΔT of 19.5 K at a field change of 14 T. The direct measurements of MCE were performed using the measuring system designed and constructed by the authors. It was shown that near the Curie temperature, the magnetic field dependence of the adiabatic temperature change is far from saturation even in a 14 T field and is adequately described by the thermodynamic Landau theory for magnetic second-order phase transitions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Relaxor ferroelectricity, ferromagnetism and Second Harmonic Generation properties were founded and studied as a function of a reduction heat treatment at 650 °C in a Ar-5%H2 atmosphere in stoichiometric La0.05Li0.85NbO3 nanoparticles of 40 nm. A diffuse dielectric anomaly related with relaxor behavior from 25 °C to 800 °C in a frequency range from 100 Hz to 1 MHz was founded. It also shows ferromagnetic anhysterestic type and ferroelectric hysteresis loops at room temperature with a magnetic spin remnant of 2.5 × 10−3 emu/g and polarization saturation of 0.235 μC/cm2, remnant polarization of 0.141 μC/cm2, coercive field of 1.35 kV/cm, respectively. It shows very good second harmonic generation signal at 450 nm and 500 nm. High Resolution Transmission Electron Microscopy, X-ray Photoelectron Spectroscopy and Raman spectroscopy, indicate an ABO3 perovskite structure, new electronic binding energy structure for La (5s, 4d), Li (1s), Nb (4s, 3d, 4p) and oxygen (1s, 2s) and new vibrations modes on octahedron NbO6 related to multiferroic single phase nanoparticles, respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work we report the synthesis and structural, electronic and magnetic properties of La1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6 double-perovskite. This is a re-entrant spin cluster material which exhibits a non-negligible negative exchange bias effect when it is cooled in zero magnetic field from an unmagnetized state down to low temperature. X-ray powder diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy and magnetometry results indicate mixed valence state at Co site, leading to competing magnetic phases and uncompensated spins at the magnetic interfaces. We compare the results for this Ca-doped material with those reported for the resemblant compound La1.5Sr0.5CoMnO6, and discuss the much smaller spontaneous exchange bias effect observed for the former in terms of its structural and magnetic particularities. For La1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6, when successive magnetization loops are carried, the spontaneous exchange bias field inverts its sign from negative to positive from the first to the second measurement. We discuss this behavior based on the disorder at the magnetic interfaces, related to the presence of a glassy phase. This compound also exhibits a large conventional exchange bias, for which there is no sign inversion of the exchange bias field for consecutive cycles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we report the magnetocaloric effect of Na vacancies in La0.8Na0.2−x□xMnO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) powder samples synthesized using the sol-gel technique. Structural investigations using X-ray diffraction show that all the elaborated compounds crystallise in the rhombohedral structure with R3¯c space group. Magnetic measurements versus temperature reveal a magnetic transition from ferromagnetic (FM) to paramagnetic (PM) phase when increasing temperature. The Curie temperature TC shifts to lower values with increasing sodium-deficiency. The Arrott plots indicate that a second order phase transition takes place. The effect of sodium-deficiency on the magnetocaloric properties has also been investigated. The maximum values of the magnetic entropy changes, |−ΔSM|max, under a magnetic field change of 5T are found to be 4.74; 4.13; 6.14 and 4.55 J/kg K for x = 0; 0.05; 0.1 and x = 0.15 respectively. The relative cooling power (RCP) and its field dependence are also analyzed. The obtained magnetic entropy changes are compared to calculated ones based on the Landau theory and a good concordance is observed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Here, we present a single-step process to synthesize the α-MnO2 nanorods forest using reactive DC magnetron sputtering for the application of magnetic memories. The structural and morphological properties of the α-MnO2 nanorods were systematically studied using numerous analytical techniques, including X-ray diffraction, Raman spectroscopy, field-emission scanning electron microscopy and transmission electron microscopy. The magnetic measurements suggest that the α-MnO2 nanorods exhibit spin glass and exchange bias behaviour at low temperature. Such low temperature behaviour is explained by the core-shell type structure of nanorods. Antiferromagnetic core and shell of uncompensated ferromagnetic spins leads to the formation of antiferromagnetic/ferromagnetic (AFM/FM) interfaces, which originates exchange bias in the sample.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the thermodynamic properties of selected intermetallic RAl2 (R = Er, Tm) compounds calculated by using a model Hamiltonian, including the Zeeman-exchange interactions and the crystalline electrical field, which are responsible for the magnetic anisotropy. The relationship between the behavior of the temperature-dependent magnetization, calculated in different crystallographic directions for several magnetic fields, and the influence of spin reorientation on the magnetocaloric effect, is discussed. In order to validate the obtained theoretical results, experimental data are compared to calculated data. Also, an optimum molar fraction of the ErAl2 and TmAl2 composite was determined theoretically, showing a high potential for use in a regenerative thermal cycle, especially close to the liquid helium temperature range.© 2017Manganese doped xBiFeO3-(1−x)BaTiO3(x=0.67–0.82) ceramics were prepared by solid-state method. The structural, dielectric and magnetic properties were investigated after annealing in vacuum at 773 K. X-ray diffraction analysis indicated that all samples crystallized in pure perovskite structure. The ceramics displays a typical ferroelectric loop, with a max remnant polarization Prof 25.6 µC/cm2. The piezoelectric coefficient d33of Manganese doped 0.67BiFeO30.33BaTiO3is 139 pC/N and its temperature dependence of dielectric constant exhibits a broad anomaly. The Manganese doped 0.75BiFeO30.25BaTiO3ceramic shows ferrimagnetism at room temperature, with remnant magnetization Mrof 0.31 emu/g and ferrimagnetic transition temperature TNof ~420 °C.© 2017Single crystals of (Nd1−xCex)2Fe14B, some reaching ∼6×8×8mm3 in volume, are grown out of Fe-(Nd, Ce) flux. This crystal growth method allows for large (Nd1−xCex)2Fe14B single crystals to be synthesized using a simple flux growth procedure. Chemical and structural analyses of the crystals indicate that (Nd1−xCex)2Fe14B forms a solid solution until at least x=0.38 with a Vegard-like variation of the lattice constants with x. Refinements of single crystal neutron diffraction data indicate that Ce has a slight site preference (7:3) for the 4g rare earth site over the 4f site. Magnetization measurements at 300 K show only small decreases with increasing Ce content in saturation magnetization (Ms) and anisotropy field (HA), and Curie temperature (TC). First principles calculations are carried out to understand the effect of Ce substitution on the electronic and magnetic properties. For a multitude of applications, it is expected that the advantage of incorporating lower-cost and more abundant Ce will outweigh the small adverse effects on magnetic properties. Ce-substituted Nd2Fe14B is therefore a potential high-performance permanent magnet material with substantially reduced Nd content.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Elastic-and magnetic properties of magnetic fluid confined by ponderomotive force in a tube fixed in horizontal position are considered. The system is placed in a strong magnetic field under the influence of external static and dynamic perturbations. An experimental setup has been developed. A theoretical basis of the processes of magnetic colloid elastic deformation has been proposed. The values of the static ponderomotive elasticity coefficient and the elasticity coefficient under dynamic action are experimentally determined. The calculations of the saturation magnetization for two magnetic fluid samples, carried out according to the equation containing the dynamic elasticity coefficient, are in good agreement with the experimental magnetization curve. The described method is of interest when studying magnetophoresis and aggregation of nanoparticles in magnetic colloids.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A hydrogel is a 3-D network of polymer chains in which water is the dispersion medium. Hydrogels have found extensive applications in the biomedical field due to their resemblance to living tissues. Furthermore, hydrogels can be endowed with exceptional properties by addition of synthetic materials. For example, magnetic field-sensitive gels, called ferrogels, are obtained by embedding magnetic particles in the polymer network. Novel living tissues with unique magnetic field-sensitive properties were recently prepared by 3-D cell culture in biocompatible ferrogels. This paper critically reviews the most recent progress and perspectives in their synthesis, characterization and biocompatibility evaluation. Optimization of ferrogels for this novel application requires low-density, strongly magnetic, multi-domain particles. Interestingly, the rheological properties of the resulting ferrogels in the absence of field were largely enhanced with respect to nonmagnetic hydrogels, which can only be explained by the additional cross-linking imparted by the embedded magnetic particles. Remarkably, rheological measurements under an applied magnetic field demonstrated that ferrogels presented reversibly tunable mechanical properties, which constitutes a unique advantage with respect to nonmagnetic hydrogels. In vivo evaluation of ferrogels showed good biocompatibility, with only some local inflammatory response, and no particle migration or damage to distant organs.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The influence of parallel and perpendicular homogenous magnetic field on the ferrofluid drop formation in dripping regime is studied experimentally. Experimental images are obtained using high-speed video camera with frame rate up to 25,000 fps. The detachment of a drop from the nozzle occurs via the formation of a neck which quickly narrows down until the drop pinches off. The formation of micro-thread from the primary neck is observed before the drop separation. Details of the shape and dynamics of the liquid neck are studied with regard to magnetic field. It is shown that near the detachment point scaled profiles exhibit self-similarity which is not affected by applied magnetic field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigated slow relaxations of the magnetostriction and residual magnetostriction of the phase-separated system (Eu1−xGdx)0.6Sr0.4MnO3, in which the metamagnetic transition from a paramagnetic insulating state to a ferromagnetic metallic state is accompanied by a lattice shrinkage. The relaxations are well fitted by a stretched exponential function, suggesting the strong frustration between the double exchange interaction and Jahn-Teller effect. We have revealed that the Gd substitution suppresses the frozen phase-separated phase at low temperatures and stabilizes the paramagnetic insulating state in the dynamic phase-separated phase at intermediate temperatures. The former origin would be the randomness effect and the latter would be the suppression of the double exchange interaction.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetite (Fe3O4) films were grown on glass substrates by formation and condensation of complex of iron oxides in an agarose hydrogel. The obtained films were characterized by Fourier Transform Infrared Spectroscopy (FTIR), Thermogravimetric Analysis (TGA), Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM), Room Temperature Mössbauer Spectroscopy (TMS), Vibrating Sample Magnetometry (VSM), Atomic Force Microscopy (AFM) and Voltage vs. Current measurements by the four-point method. FTIR and TGA measurements showed that some polymer chains of agarose remain linked to the surface of the magnetic particles of the films after heat treatment. SEM measurements showed that the films are composed by quasi spherical particles with sizes around 55 nm. Mössbauer spectroscopy measurements showed two sextets with broaden lines, which were assigned to magnetite with a distributed particle size, and two doublets, which were assigned to superparamagnetic phases of magnetite. For the specific dimensions of the films prepared, measurements of Voltage vs. Current showed an ohmic behavior for currents between 0 and 200 nA, with a resistance of 355 kΩ.© 2017 Elsevier LtdLow-temperature polycrystalline-silicon (poly-Si) thin-film transistors (TFTs) fabricated via metal-induced crystallization (MIC) are attractive candidates for use in active-matrix flat-panel displays. However, these exhibit a large leakage current due to the nickel silicide being trapped at the grain boundaries of the poly-Si. We reduced the leakage current of the MIC poly-Si TFTs by developing a gettering method to remove the Ni impurities using a Si getter layer and natively-formed SiO2 as the etch stop interlayer. The Ni trap state density (Nt) in the MIC poly-Si film decreased after the Ni silicide gettering, and as a result, the leakage current of the MIC poly-Si TFTs decreased. Furthermore, the leakage current of MIC poly-Si TFTs gradually decreased with additional gettering. To explain the gettering effect on MIC poly-Si TFTs, we suggest an appropriate model.© 2017The nonequilibrium processes of “self-heating” arising during the flow of electric current are studied for ferromagnetic semiconductors with colossal magnetoresistance near the Curie temperature. These processes lead to the emergence of “hot” paramagnons and the destruction of ferromagnetic order. The solution to the heat balance equation takes into account the temperature dependence of the electrical conductivity caused by Anderson localization of electrons due to their scattering on magnetic inhomogeneities. Description of delocalized electrons subsystem takes into account the spin-flip processes leading to the double exchange. At that, the value of the Anderson percolation threshold and the double exchange depends on the amplitude of spin fluctuations. It was found that N-shaped current-voltage characteristics and hysteresis dependencies of magnetization on the voltage arise in a steady state due to the emergence of “hot” (by internal sample temperature) semiconductor paramagnetic phase. It is shown that the occurrence of self-oscillations of current and magnetization there may be.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The microstructures and magnetic properties of FePt based thin films grown on TiN-ZrO2 and TiN-ZrO2/TiN intermediate layers were systematically investigated. The TiN-ZrO2 intermediate layer was granular consisting of grains of solid solution of Ti(Zr)ON segregated by amorphous ZrO2. It was found with doping ZrO2 into TiN intermediate layer, grain size of FePt-SiO2-C films significantly decreased. Simultaneously, the isolation was obviously improved and grain size distribution became more uniform. However, the magnetic properties of the FePt-SiO2-C films grown on TiN-ZrO2 intermediate layers were slowly deteriorated, which was due to the disturbance of the epitaxial growth of FePt by amorphous ZrO2 in TiN-ZrO2 intermediate layer. In order to improve the TiN-ZrO2 (0 0 2) texture and the crystallinity of TiN-ZrO2, TiN-ZrO2/TiN combined intermediate layer was introduced. And the magnetic properties were improved, simultaneously, achieving the benefit of grain size reduction. For the FePt 4 nm-SiO2 40 vol%-C 20 vol% film grown on TiN/TiN-ZrO2 30 vol% combined intermediate layer, well isolated FePt (0 0 1) granular films with coercivity higher than 17.6 kOe and an average size as small as 6.5 nm were achieved.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper reports the use of stacked resistive switches as logic gates for implementing the “AND” and “OR” operations. These stacked resistive switches consist of two resistive switches that share a middle electrode, and they operate based on the difference in resistance between the low and high resistance states indicating the logical states of “0” and “1”, respectively. The stacked resistive switches can perform either AND or OR operation, using two read schemes in one device. To perform the AND (or OR) operation, two resistive switches are arranged in a serial (or parallel) connection. AND and OR operations have been successfully demonstrated using the stacked resistive switches. The use of stacked resistive switches as logic gates that utilize the advantages of memristive devices shows the possibility of stateful logic circuits.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Controllable creation of magnetic skyrmions in nanostructures is a prerequisite for the application of skyrmions in spintronics. Here, we propose a new method for the creation of skyrmions. We show by using micromagnetic simulations that the skyrmions can be nucleated by resonantly exciting one of the skyrmion intrinsic oscillation modes. We first studied the dynamics of skyrmion in a ferromagnetic nanodisk with perpendicular anisotropy. One breathing mode and two non-degenerate gyrotropic modes are identified. Then we applied a circular-polarized microwave field to excite the uniformly magnetized nanodisk. When the frequency of the driving field is equal to the eigenfrequency of the skyrmion gyrotropic mode, stable skyrmions can be created from the initial uniform state. The number of skyrmions can be effectively controlled by appropriately choosing the duration of the driving field or tuning the field amplitude.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic nanoparticles are very important in biomedicine due to their various applications like drug delivery, gene delivery in the body and also used for hyperthermia. In the present work, superparamagnetic nanoparticles of Mn0.5Zn0.5GdxFe2-xO4 (x = 0, 0.025, 0.050, 0.075, 0.1) ferrites have been prepared by co-precipitation method. Thorough characterizations (XRD, FTIR, FE-SEM, EDS, VSM and fluorescence spectroscopy) have proved the formation of cubical spinel superparamagnetic nanoparticles of soft ferrites. A cation distribution has been proposed for the determination of various important theoretical parameters for these samples. With the addition of Gd3+ nanoparticles have shown the superparamagnetism at room temperature confirmed by VSM analysis. Photoluminescence (PL) spectra shows a blue shift (for x = 0.025, 0.075) which may be due to quantum confinement.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.By means of a post-processing technique, we succeeded in plotting magnetic Barkhausen noise energy hysteresis cycles MBNenergy(H). These cycles were compared to the usual hysteresis cycles, displaying the evolution of the magnetic induction field B versus the magnetic excitation H. The divergence between these comparisons as the excitation frequency was increased gave rise to the conclusion that there was a difference in the dynamics of the induction field and of the MBNenergy related to the domain wall movements. Indeed, for the MBNenergy hysteresis cycle, merely the domain wall movements were involved. On the other hand, for the usual B(H) cycle, two dynamic contributions were observed: domain wall movements and diffusion of the magnetic field excitation. From a simulation point of view, it was demonstrated that over a large frequency bandwidth a correct dynamic behavior of the domain wall movement MBNenergy(H) cycle could be taken into account using first-order derivation whereas fractional orders were required for the B(H) cycles. The present article also gives a detailed description of how to use the developed process to obtain the MBNenergy(H) hysteresis cycle as well as its evolution as the frequency increases. Moreover, this article provides an interesting explanation of the separation of magnetic loss contributions through a magnetic sample: a wall movement contribution varying according to first-order dynamics and a diffusion contribution which in a lump model can be taken into account using fractional order dynamics.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis experimental study focuses on the positive bias temperature instability (PBTI) in a fully recessed-gate AlGaN/GaN MOS-HEMT. A positive stress voltage to the gate results in positive threshold voltage shift (ΔVth), which is attributed to the trapping of electrons from the GaN layer into the pre-existing oxide traps. The trapping rate exhibits a universal decreasing behavior as a function of the number of filled traps, independently of stress time, stress voltage, stress temperature, and device-to-device variability. The stress-induced ΔVthcan be fully recovered by applying a small negative voltage, which causes the electron de-trapping. In the explored time window (between 1 s and thousands of s), the recovery dynamics is well described by the superimposition of two exponential functions associated with two different traps. Both trap time constants are independent of the stress voltage, decrease with temperature and increase with the recovery voltage. The activation energy of the slower trap is 0.93 eV, while the faster trap exhibits an activation energy with a large spread in the range between 0.45 eV and 0.82 eV.© 2017 Elsevier LtdCu(In, Ga)Se2 (CIGS) thin film solar cells were grown on polyimide (PI) and soda lime glass (SLG) substrates at low substrate temperatures between 400 °C and 500 °C. Different material properties of the CIGS thin films and photovoltaic performances of the solar cells were systematically investigated. It is found that the (112), (220)/(204) and (116)/(312) peaks from X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns show double-peak patterns as the substrate temperature decreases. The CIGS thin films grown on both PI and SLG substrates shows layered structures. The bottom and surficial layers of CIGS thin films display small size polycrystalline grains while the middle layers show large size polycrystalline grains. Both types of CIGS thin film solar cells exhibit similar efficiencies while CIGS thin film solar cells grown on PI substrates show lower open circuit voltage and fill factor but higher short circuit current density, as compared to those of CIGS thin film solar cells on SLG substrates. The highest efficiency of 6.14% has been achieved for the CIGS thin film solar cells on PI with the structure of PI/Mo/CIGS/CdS/i-ZnO/ZnO:Al/Al grid here.© 2017Structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of polycrystalline La0.65Ca0.35Mn1−xVxO3 have been investigated. Our samples were prepared using the solid state reaction method at high temperatures. X-ray diffraction analysis show that all samples crystallized in the orthorhombic structure with Pbnm space group with presence of LaVO4 as secondary phase. The SEM micrographs reveal micrometric grains with bimodal size distribution. Magnetic Measurements indicate that our samples exhibit a PM–FM transition, with a Curie temperature (TC) decreasing from 262 K for x = 0 to 208 K for x = 0.5; in addition to the presence of the Griffiths phase in the paramagnetic region. Using the isothermal magnetization versus magnetic applied field, we have deduced that the occured magnetic transition is of second order. Moreover, we have calculated the magnetic entropy change, which reaches 5.25 J/kg K for La0.65Ca0.35Mn0.5V0.5O3 compound under 5T. This value is associated to a relative cooling power (RCP) of 207 J/kg.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Microstructural changes and crystallographic orientation information in the hydrogenation-decomposition-desorption-recombination (HDDR) process of Nd-Fe-B alloy were investigated using electron backscatter diffraction (EBSD) and precession electron diffraction (PED) in order to understand the mechanism of anisotropy inducement in the HDDR process. Recombined Nd2Fe14B grains were found to nucleate at the interfaces between NdH2 and α-Fe grains and to have a [0 0 1]-oriented texture from the beginning of the recombination reaction. The Fe grains form with alignment of one of the 〈1 1 3〉 directions at decomposed stage. This suggests that α-Fe most likely induces texture development of recombined Nd2Fe14B.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The thickness dependencies of the structural and magnetic properties for bilayers of cubic Co-based Heusler alloys (CCHAs: Co2FeAl (CFA), Co2FeSi (CFS), Co2MnAl (CMA), and Co2MnSi (CMS)) and D022-MnGa were investigated. Epitaxy of the B2 structure of CCHAs on a MnGa film was achieved; the smallest thickness with the B2 structure was found for 3-nm-thick CMS and CFS. The interfacial exchange coupling (Jex) was antiferromagnetic (AFM) for all of the CCHAs/MnGa bilayers except for unannealed CFA/MnGa samples. A critical thickness (tcrit) at which perpendicular magnetization appears of approximately 4–10 nm for the CMA/MnGa and CMS/MnGa bilayers was observed, whereas this thickness was 1–3 nm for the CFA/MnGa and CFS/MnGa films. The critical thickness for different CCHAs materials is discussed in terms of saturation magnetization (Ms) and the Jex.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we present a completely analytical model for the 2DEG concentration in AlGaN/GaN HEMTs as a function of gate bias, considering the donor-like trap states present at the metal/AlGaN interface to be the primary source of 2DEG carriers. To the best of our knowledge, this is a completely new contribution of this work. The electric field in the AlGaN layer is calculated using this model, which is further used to model the gate leakage current under reverse bias. We have modified the existing TTT (Thermionic Trap-Assisted Tunneling) current model, taking into account the effect of both metal/AlGaN interface traps as well as AlGaN bulk traps. The gate current under forward bias is also modeled using the existing thermionic emission model, approximating it by its Taylor series expansion. To take into account the effect of non-zero drain-source bias (VDS), an empirical fitting parameter is introduced in order to model the channel voltage in terms of VDS. The results of our models have been compared with the experimental data reported in the literature for three different devices, and the match is found to be excellent for both forward and reverse bias as well as for zero and non-zero VDS.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Electrochemical alloying of immiscible Ag and Co was carried out at different current densities from electrolytes of two different concentrations, after optimizing the electrolytic bath and operating conditions. The samples obtained were characterized using X-ray diffraction to confirm the simultaneous deposition of Ag and Co and to determine their crystallographic structure. The atomic percentage of Ag and Co contents in the granular alloy was determined by ICP-OES analysis. The XPS spectra were observed to confirm the presence of Ag and Co in the metallic form in the granular alloy samples. The micrographs observed using scanning and transmission electron microscopes threw light on the surface morphology and the size of the particles. The magnetic nature of the samples was analyzed at room temperature by a vibration sample magnetometer. Their magnetic phase transition while heating was also studied to provide further evidence for the magnetic behaviour and the structure of the deposits.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigated interfacial exchange coupling effect in nano casted Co3O4 nanowires. Magnetometry measurements indicated that the magnetic response of the wires has two contributions. First one from the core of the wire which has characteristics of a 2D-DAFF(two-dimensional diluted antiferromagnet in a field). The second one is from uncompensated surface spins which get magnetically ordered towards the field direction once field cooled below 25 K. Below 25 K, the net magnetization of the core of the wire gets exchange coupled with the uncompensated surface spins giving rise to exchange bias effect. The unique 2D-DAFF/spin-glass core/shell heterostructure showed a pronounced training effect in the first field cycling itself. The magnitude of exchange bias field showed a maximum at intermediate cooling fields and for the higher cooling field, exchange bias got reduced.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We show that the longitudinal spin-orbit interactions (SOI) critically determine the fate of spontaneous magnetic order (SMO) in complex materials. To study the magnetic response of interacting electrons constituting the material, we implement an extension of the Hubbard model that faithfully accounts for the SOI. Next, we use the double-time Green functions of quantum statistical mechanics to obtain the spontaneous magnetization, Msp, and thence ascertain the possibility of SMO. For materials with quenched SOI, in an arbitrary dimension, Msp vanishes at finite temperatures, implying the presence of the disordered (paramagnetic) phase. This is consistent with and goes beyond the Bogolyubov's inequality based analysis in one and two dimensions. In the presence of longitudinal SOI, Msp, for materials in an arbitrary dimension, remains non-zero at finite temperatures, which indicates the existence of the ordered (ferromagnetic) phase. As a plausible experimental evidence of the present SOI-based phenomenology, we discuss, inter alia, a recent experimental study on Y4Mn1−xGa12−yGey, an intermetallic compound, which exhibits a magnetic phase transition (paramagnetic to ferromagnetic) upon tuning the fraction of Ge atoms and thence the vacancies of the magnetic centers in this system. The availability of Ge atoms to form a direct chemical bond with octahedral Mn in this material appears to quench the SOI and, as a consequence, favours the formation of the disordered (paramagnetic) phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.First-principles calculations techniques were employed to explore the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Neptunium chalcogenides (Np2X5, X = S, Se and Te). No experimental or theoretical studies of their physical properties have been previously reported in the literature. The presence of highly localized f states has requested the employment of the spin orbit coupling and GGA + U approach in order to describe correctly the f–f coupling. Np2X5 was found metallic with high magnetic character due to the Neptunium presence. Fermi surfaces of Np2Te5 have shown a greater electrical conductivity compared to Np2Se5 and Np2S5. The magnetic moment was found to be between 13.24 and 13.92μB, principally induced by Np f and d-orbitals as well as the spin-polarization of the chalcogenes (Te, Se, S) induced by Np. Neptunium chalcogenides have shown interesting magnetic properties and should be manipulated with precaution due to their radioactive properties.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We use the SU(3) Schwinger boson theory to study the spin transport properties of the two-dimensional anisotropic frustrated Heisenberg model in a honeycomb lattice at T=0 with single ion anisotropy and third neighbor interactions. We have investigated the behavior of the spin conductivity for this model that presents exchange interactions J1, J2 and J3. We study the spin transport in the Bose–Einstein condensation regime where the bosons tz are condensed. Our results show an influence of the quantum phase transition point on the spin conductivity behavior. We also have made a diagrammatic expansion for the Green-function and did not obtain any significant change of the results.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A generic analytical model has been developed to fully describe the flux closure through magnetic inductors. The model was applied to multiple device topologies including solenoidal single return path and dual return path inductors as well as spiral magnetic inductors for a variety of permeabilities and dimensions. The calculated inductance values from the analytical model were compared with simulated results for each of the analyzed device topologies and found to agree within 0.1 nH for the range of typical thin-film magnetic permeabilities (∼102 to 103). Furthermore, the model can be used to evaluate behavior in other integrated or discrete magnetic devices with either non-isotropic or isotropic permeability and used to produce more efficient device designs in the future.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in RNi (where R = Gd, Tb and Ho) compounds has been studied in their arc-melted and melt-spun forms. The compound GdNi has the orthorhombic CrB-type structure (Space group Cmcm, No. 63) and the compound HoNi has the orthorhombic FeB-type structure (Space group Pnma, No. 62) at room temperature regardless of their synthesis condition. However, arc-melted TbNi orders in a monoclinic structure (Space group P21/m, No. 11) and when it is rapidly quenched to a melt-spun form, it crystallizes in an orthorhombic structure (Space group Pnma, No. 62). The arc-melted GdNi, TbNi and HoNi compounds order ferromagnetically at ∼69 K, ∼67 K and ∼36 K (TC) respectively. While the melt-spun GdNi shows about 6 K increase in TC, the ordering temperature of TbNi remains nearly the same in both arc-melted and melt-spun forms. In contrast, a reduction in TC by about 8 K is observed in melt-spun HoNi, when compared to its arc-melted counterpart. Isothermal magnetic entropy change, ∆Sm, calculated from the field dependent magnetization data indicates an enhanced relative cooling power (RCP) for melt-spun GdNi for field changes of 20 kOe and 50 kOe. A lowered RCP value is observed in melt-spun TbNi and HoNi. These changes could have resulted from the competing shape anisotropy and the granular microstructure induced by the melt-spinning process. Tailoring the MCE of rare earth intermetallic compounds by suitably controlled synthesis techniques is certainly one of the directions to go forward in the search of giant magnetocaloric materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Hybridization between Ce f and conduction d states has been speculatively known to be one of the mechanisms responsible for magnetic instability of the ferromagnetic ground state of CeFe2. Substituting Fe by small amounts of certain elements stabilizes it to an antiferromagnetic state below the Curie temperature via a first-order second phase transition. In the present work, we seek any direct relation between the f–d hybridization and the second transition by measuring primarily dc magnetization and Ce M4,5 edge X-ray absorption spectra of Ce(Fe1-xMx)2 pseudobinaries, with M = Cr, Ag, and Au. X-ray diffraction and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy measurements are also performed essentially to monitor the quality of the samples. Whereas Cr impurity is found to cause the second transition, Ag and Au apparently do not induce any. In the former, the Curie and second transition temperatures vary systematically, but differently, with x. Our results imply that there is a definite proportionality between the x dependences of the second transition temperature and the f–d hybridization strength estimated qualitatively from the absorption spectra.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Low temperature Mössbauer spectroscopy together with isothermal magnetization and zero-field-cooled and field-cooled measurements have been used to perform a systematic investigation of the cation distributions and magnetic properties of solid solutions of NiFe2−xAlxO4 with x = 0.0, 0.4, 0.8, 1.2, 1.6, and 2.0. Mössbauer spectroscopy for the starting member of the series, NiFe2O4, shows that nickel atoms occupy the octahedral sites and are in 2+ oxidation state, while iron atoms, all in 3+ oxidation state, occupy equally the tetrahedral and the octahedral sites. When low concentration of aluminum, x = 0.4, is incorporated into the system, they substitute preferentially iron atoms in the octahedral sites. As the concentration of aluminum is increased, there are distributions of them in both the tetrahedral and octahedral sites leading to complex cation distributions. The magnetic characters of iron and nickel atoms and the diamagnetic nature of aluminum atoms and the complex cation distributions result in interesting magnetic properties for this class of materials. As the concentration of aluminum increases, the saturation magnetization decreases drastically and then gradually increases. In the end member of the series, NiAl2O4, the absent of any super-exchange interaction between the A-sites and the B-sites due to presence of Ni ions as the only magnetic atoms in the B-sites results in a paramagnetic structure and a magnetization close to zero although the nickel atoms have a spin moment of 2μB. This paramagnetic feature makes this compound to be considered as a magnetic resonant imaging agent. Another very interesting feature is the back and forth switching of the dominance of the magnetic moments in the tetrahedral sites and the octahedral sites as aluminum concentration increases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We examined the structural, magnetic, and dielectric properties of Co1−xMgxCr2O4 nanoparticles with composition x = 0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.5, 0.6, 0.8 and 1 in detail. X-ray diffraction (XRD) revealed normal spinel structure for all the samples. Rietveld refinement fitting results of the XRD showed no impurity phases which signifies the formation of single phase Co1−xMgxCr2O4 nanoparticles. The average crystallite size showed a peak behaviour with maxima at x = 0.6. Raman and Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy also confirmed the formation of single phase normal spinel for all the samples and exhibited dominant vibrational changes for x ≥ 0.6. For x = 0 (CoCr2O4), zero field cooled/field cooled (ZFC/FC) magnetization curves showed paramagnetic (PM) to ferrimagnetic (FiM) transition at Tc = 97 K and a conical spiral magnetic order at Ts = 30 K. The end members CoCr2O4 (x = 0) and MgCr2O4 (x = 1) are FiM and antiferromagnetic (AFM), respectively. Tc and Ts showed decreasing trend with increasing x, followed by an additional AFM transition at TN = 15 K for x = 0.6. The system finally stabilized and changed to highly frustrated AFM structure at x = 1 due to formation of pure MgCr2O4. High field FC curves (5T) depicted nearly no effect on spiral magnetic state, which is attributed to strong exchange B-B magnetic interactions at low temperatures. Dielectric parameters showed a non-monotonous behaviour with Mg concentration and were explained with the help of Maxwell-Wagner model and Koop's theory. Dielectric properties were improved for nanoparticles with x = 0.6 and is attributed to their larger average crystallite size. In summary, Mg doping has significantly affects the structural, magnetic, and dielectric properties of CoCr2O4 nanoparticles, which can be attributed to variations in local magnetic exchange interactions and variation in average crystallite size of these chromite nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier LtdCuxS-NiySz/FNBR and CuS-NiySz/FNBR nanocomposites (NCs) were prepared from β-NiS/FNBR by ion exchange method and dielectric characterized. Dielectric properties of NCs were investigated at the temperature of 26 °C–120 °C in 120–106 Hz frequency range. With measuring electric capacity and resistance of the samples at different frequency we have studied the dielectric permittivity, dielectric loss tangent, dielectric modulus, conductivity, relaxation times and Cole-Cole plots were obtained. At 120 °C measurement temperature, some of the destruction processes in polymers affect to interfacial interaction between the polymer and particles surface. After high temperature measurement all three samples were cooled to room temperature and their dielectric measurements were carried out at room temperature. It is observed that at high measurement temperature some of carriers transfer from one energy level to another and the dipole orientation did not return completely to the previous situation.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe influence of the temperature on Metal Gate/Al2O3/n-InGaAs stacks has been studied by means of capacitance-voltage (C-V) hysteresis and flat band voltage as function of both negative and positive stress fields. It was found that the de-trapping effect decreases at low-temperature, indicating that the de-trapping of trapped electrons from oxide traps may be performed via Al2O3/InGaAs interface defects. The dependence of the C-V hysteresis on the stress field at different temperatures in our InGaAs stacks can be explained in terms of the defect spatial distribution. An oxide defect distribution can be found very close to the metal gate/Al2O3 interface. On the other side, the Al2O3/InGaAs interface presents defects distributed from the interface into the bulk of the oxide, showing the influence of InGaAs on Al2O3 in terms of the spatial defect distribution.© 2017 Elsevier LtdVacuum field-effect transistors (VFETs) with channel lengths down to 500 nm (i.e., the deep submicron scale) were fabricated with the mature technology of the surface conduction electron emitter fabrication process in our former experiments. The vacuum channel of this new VFET was generated by using the electro-forming process. During electro-forming, the joule heat cracks the conductive film and then generates the submicron scale gap that serves as the vacuum channel. The gap separates the conductive film into two plane-to-plane electrodes, which serve as a source (cathode) electrode and a drain (anode) electrode of the VFET, respectively. Experimental results reveal that the fabricated device demonstrates a clear triode behavior of the gate modulation. Fowler-Nordheim theory was used to analyze the electron emission mechanism and operating principle of the device.© 2017The effect of sintering temperatures on the lattice parameters, microstructure and electrical properties of BaTi0.4(Fe0.5Nb0.5)0.6O3 perovskite ceramics were investigated. Impedance spectroscopy analysis confirms that this material is electrically heterogeneous which plays a major role for the high dielectric constant. The sintering temperatures have a sensitive influence on the values of the dielectric constant. High dielectric constant (12,708) with low dielectric loss (0.23) was achieved at room temperature for 1250 °C sintered ceramic. Activation energy was found to be 0.25 eV and 0.31 eV corresponding to grain and grain boundary, respectively which confirms that the grain boundaries are more insulating than grains. We observed the high magnetocapacitance (5.8%) at 9 kOe for 1250 °C sintered sample which is useful for the practical application. This study will help to modify the BaFe0.5Nb0.5O3 based materials and lead to more applications in the microelectronics devices.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper evaluates the capability of a broadband MEMS phase detector in the application of phase locked loops (PLLs) through the aspect of theory, measurement and modeling. For the first time, it demonstrates how broadband property and optimized structure are realized through cascaded transmission lines and ANSYS simulations. The broadband MEMS phase detector shows potential in PLL application for its dc voltage output and large power handling ability which is important for munition applications. S-parameters of the power combiner in the MEMS phase detector are measured with S11 better than −15 dB and S23 better than −10 dB over the whole X-band. Compared to our previous works, developed phase detection measurements are performed and focused on signals at larger power levels up to 1 W. Cosine tendencies are revealed between the output voltage and the phase difference for both small and large signals. Simulation approach through equivalent circuit modeling is proposed to study the PLL application of the broadband MEMS phase detector. Synchronization and tracking properties are revealed.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis study focuses on 3-D multilayer monolithic integration of vertical-oriented double-heterojunction AlGaAs/InGaAs/GaAs based pseudomorphic high electron mobility transistors. The effects of the presence of 3-D components above the active layer were accomplished by comparing three multilayer fabricated device of different thickness with a virgin device where the thickness of the 3-D components e.g., both metal and polyimide layer were varied. The output current, on-state gate leakage, transconductance are found to be decrease with the increase in thickness of the 3-D components and on the other hand, the on-state resistance, knee voltage and off-state gate leakage is increased. Lastly, the thermal influences on the device behaviour such as off-state and on-state gate leakage, barrier inhomogeneities at Schottky contacts, zero temperature coefficients at the transfer curve, and the threshold voltage as a function of drain bias were measured and analyzed for the both pre and post fabricated multilayer devices. These effective comparisons in terms of thickness and temperature of the both device are useful for future designs and optimizations of multilayer vertical stacked 3-D MMICs.© 2017In this paper, the HfO2-based resistive switching memory (RRAM) using carbon nanotubes (CNTs) as contact electrodes for high density integration is demonstrated. The Al/HfO2/CNTs devices show self-compliance, forming-free and low resistive state (LRS) nonlinearity with less than 130 nA reset current (Ireset). By contrast with the Al/HfO2/Ti devices, resistive switching behavior has been enhanced significantly by using CNTs electrode. For the Al/HfO2/CNTs devices, current–voltage (I-V) characteristics demonstrate that the current conduction in high resistive state (HRS) and low resistive state (LRS) is controlled by space-charge-limited current (SCLC) and trap-controlled SCLC mechanism, respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The polycrystalline ceramics of Y1−xHoxFe0.5Cr0.5O3 (x = 0, 0.05 and 0.1) are synthesized by a sol-gel method. The magnetization reversal and exchange bias effect are investigated in single phase bulk Y1−xHoxFe0.5Cr0.5O3. Magnetic Ho3+ ion as a dopant is introduced into the system to confirm the influence of A-site ion on the magnetic interactions. The dual reversal of exchange bias field for x = 0.05 is observed, and its characteristic temperatures are corresponding to the compensation temperatures of magnetization reversal. The exchange bias field of x = 0.1 is found to be ∼10.03 kOe at 4 K, revealing a large value compared with that of x = 0. A schematic diagram based on the competition between the single ion anisotropy and Dzyaloshinsky-Moriya interaction, and the antiparallel coupling between the Ho3+ moments and the canted Cr3+/Fe3+ moments, is used to understand the dual reversal phenomenon of magnetization and exchange bias effect.© 2017In the present study, a series of nanocrystalline Co2(Cr1−xFex)Al Heusler alloy powders were successfully prepared by high energy ball milling and the effect of substitution of Fe for Cr on the microstructure and magnetic properties was investigated in detail. The Co2CrAl alloy powder consisted of only A2 type disordered structure whereas the substitution of Cr by Fe led to the appearance of increasing amounts of B2 type disordered structure along with A2 type structure. All the Co2(Cr1−xFex)Al Heusler alloy powders demonstrated high spontaneous magnetization together with a very small hysteresis losses. The saturation magnetization, remanence, coercivity, and Curie temperature increased with increasing Fe content. The increasing magnetization with increasing Fe content was attributed to the replacement of antiferromagnetic Cr by strongly ferromagnetic Fe and an increasing amounts of relatively more ordered, atomically as well as ferromagnetically, B2 structure as compared to that of A2 phase. The increment in remanence and coercivity with increasing Fe content were associated with the variation in microstructural characteristics, such as grain size, lattice defects, and the presence of small amounts of magnetic/nonmagnetic secondary phases. The increment in Curie temperature with increasing Fe content was attributed to the enhancement of d-d exchange interaction due to the possible occupancy of vacant sites by Fe atoms. All the Heusler alloys indicated extremely low magnetic anisotropy and the relative anisotropy decreased with increasing Fe content.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A series of Tb0.2Nd0.8(Fe1−xCox)1.9 (0.0⩽x⩽0.4) Laves ribbons were prepared by arc-melting and subsequent melt-spinning technique. The effects of Co substitution for Fe on the structural and magnetostrictive properties of Tb0.2Nd0.8Fe1.9 ribbons were investigated. Tb0.2Nd0.8Fe1.9 ribbons consist of (Tb,Nd) Fe2 Laves phase and a minor of rare earth but free of (Tb,Nd) Fe3 phase. Almost single Laves ribbons can be obtained when x⩾0.1, which indicates that the Co substitution for Fe is beneficial for the formation of Laves ribbons. The lattice parameter of the Laves ribbons decreases with increasing x. The Curie temperature of the Laves phase and saturation magnetization of the ribbons both get maximum at x = 0.2. Meanwhile, the magnetostriction Tb0.2Nd0.8Fe1.9 ribbons can be improved by a proper amount of substitution of Co for Fe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, polyfuran and poly(vinyl acetate)/poly(vinyl chloride)/polyfuran ternary composites were synthesized via the chemical polymerization method. The temperature and magnetic field–sensitive novel composites and the nanocomposite were obtained in the form of powders and films. It was observed that the prepared novel conductive films have superior properties at a certain temperature range (25–50 °C) such as bending and folding. The structural properties, thermal behavior, surface morphology, internal structure, and surface roughness of the prepared samples were investigated by various characterization techniques. The conductivities of the samples were measured at room temperature and different temperatures by the four-point technique. X-ray Diffraction analysis results demonstrated that the PF and composites have an amorphous structure, whereas the nanocomposite is in crystalline form. The saturation magnetization (Ms) values of the magnetite and nanocomposite were found to be 58.9 and 5.3 emu g−1, respectively. It was found that magnetite-doped nanocomposite has superparamagnetic properties at room temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Austenitizing and tempering temperatures are the effective characteristics in heat treating process of AISI D2 tool steel. Therefore, controlling them enables the heat treatment process to be designed more accurately which results in more balanced mechanical properties. The aim of this work is to develop a multiresponse predictive model that enables finding these characteristics based on nondestructive tests by a set of parameters of the magnetic Barkhausen noise technique and hysteresis loop method. To produce various microstructural changes, identical specimens from the AISI D2 steel sheet were austenitized in the range 1025–1130 °C, for 30 min, oil-quenched and finally tempered at various temperatures between 200 °C and 650 °C. A set of nondestructive data have been gathered based on general factorial design of experiments and used for training and testing the multiple response surface model. Finally, an optimization model has been proposed to achieve minimal error prediction. Results revealed that applying Barkhausen and hysteresis loop methods, simultaneously, coupling to the multiresponse model, has a potential to be used as a reliable and accurate nondestructive tool for predicting austenitizing and tempering temperatures (which, in turn, led to characterizing the microstructural changes) of the parts with unknown heat treating conditions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic configurations in synthetic ferrimagnet CoFeB/Ta/CoFeB bilayer with strong perpendicular anisotropy have been systematically studied. Magnetization versus field hysteresis loop has been measured for different temperature ranging from 5 to 300 K. The applied field – temperature (H-T) magnetization switching diagram has been constructed by extracting the different switching fields as a function of temperature. This switching diagram can be well explained by considering the competition between energy barrier of layer's magnetization reversal, interlayer exchange coupling, and Zeeman energy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this article, we report the electrochemical synthesis and simultaneous in situ coating of magnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (MNPs) with polyvinylpyrrolidone (PVP) and polyethylenimine (PEI). The cathodic deposition was carried out through electro-generation of OH− on the surface of cathode. An aqueous solution of Fe(NO3)3·9H2O (3.4 g/L) and FeCl2·4H2O (1.6 g/L) was used as the deposition bath. The electrochemical precipitation experiments were performed in the direct current mode under a 10 mA cm−2 current density for 30 min. Polymer coating was performed in an identical deposition bath containing of 0.5 g PVP and 0.5 g PEI. The deposited uncoated and PVP-PEI coated MNPs were characterized through powder X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), thermogravimetric analysis (TGA), dynamic light scattering (DLS), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), and field-emission scanning and transmission electron microscopies (FE-SEM and TEM). Structural XRD and IR analyses revealed both samples to be composed of pure crystalline magnetite (Fe3O4). Morphological observations through FE-SEM and TEM proved the product to be spherical nanoparticles in the range of 10–15 nm. The presence of two coating polymers (i.e. PVP and PEI) on the surface of the electro-synthesized MNPs was proved by FTIR and DLS results. The percentage of the polymer coating (31.8%) on the MNPs surface was also determined based on DSC-TGA data. The high magnetization value, coercivity and remanence values measured by VSM indicated the superparamagnetic nature of both prepared MNPs. The obtained results confirmed that the prepared Fe3O4 nanoparticles had suitable physico-chemical and magnetic properties for biomedical applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.CoFeNiCrSiB amorphous ribbons have been prepared by rapid quenching and subjected to the post preparation heat treatments in air. Structure, magnetic properties and giant magnetoimpedance (MI) characteristics were investigated. Short annealing of the sample at 380°С for 4 min leads to a useful structural relaxation and the highest MI ratio ΔZ/Z =350% for the total impedance. In as prepared state “two-peak” MI field dependences were well correlating with effective magnetic anisotropy features. Post preparation treatment resulted in clear transformation into “one-peak” shaped MI curve typical for the ribbons with longitudinal effective anisotropy. Corresponding decrease of the field sensitivity by the order of magnitude as a result of short heat treatments in air shows their importance.© 2017 Elsevier LtdCurrent-mode active pixel sensor (C-APS) circuits based on amorphous indium-tin-zinc-oxide thin-film transistors (a-ITZO TFTs) are proposed for indirect X-ray imagers. The proposed C-APS circuits include a combination of a hydrogenated amorphous silicon (a-Si:H) p+-i-n+ photodiode (PD) and a-ITZO TFTs. Source-output (SO) and drain-output (DO) C-APS are investigated and compared. Acceptable signal linearity and high gains are realized for SO C-APS. APS circuit characteristics including voltage gain, charge gain, signal linearity, charge-to-current conversion gain, electron-to-voltage conversion gain are evaluated. The impact of the a-ITZO TFT threshold voltage shifts on C-APS is also considered. A layout for a pixel pitch of 50 μm and an associated fabrication process are suggested. Data line loadings for 4k-resolution X-ray imagers are computed and their impact on circuit performances is taken into consideration. Noise analysis is performed, showing a total input-referred noise of 239 e−.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The appearance of vacancy defects could produce appropriate magnetic moment in graphene and the sensitivity to absorb atoms/molecules also increases with this. In this direction, a DFT study of embedding V and Nb atom in graphene containing monovacancies (MV) and divacancies (DV) is reported. Complete/almost complete spin polarization is detected for V/Nb embedding. The origin of magnetism has been identified via interaction of 3d-states of embedded atom with C-p states present in the vicinity of embedded site. The band structures have been analyzed to counter the observed semiconducting nature of graphene in minority spin on embedding V/Nb atom. The isosurface analysis also confirms the induced magnetism of present nanosystems. The present results reveal that these nanosystems have the potential for futuristic applications like spintronics and energy resources.© 2017The aluminium substituted bismuth based manganates with nominal composition BiMn1−xAlxO3 (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6 and 0.8) were prepared by the simple microemulsion method. The alteration in their structural, electrical and dielectric parameters due to Al substitution has been investigated. The X-ray diffraction analysis (XRD) confirms the formation of single phase orthorhombic with crystallite size ranges from 32 to 52 nm. The morphological features and particle size were determined by using scanning electron microscopy (SEM). The dc electrical resistivity increased from 6 × 108 to 8 × 109 Ω cm with the increase in substituent concentration. The dielectric constant, dielectric loss tangent and dielectric loss factor decreased with the increase in frequency. The increase in electrical resistivity makes the synthesized materials paramount over other materials and can be useful for technological applications in microwave devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Co-substituted NiCu ferrite nanopowders with the chemical formula Ni0.5−xCu0.5−xCo2xFe2O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.50) were synthesized by sol-gel auto-combustion method. The effects of Co substitution on the cation distribution, structural and magnetic properties of the NiCu ferrite nanopowders have been investigated. Differential thermal analysis-thermogravimetry (DTA-TG), X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electron microscope (TEM) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) measurements were used to characterize the chemical, structural and magnetic properties of the ferrite nanopowders, respectively. The DTA-TG results indicate that there are three steps of the combustion process. XRD results indicate that there are Fe2O3 and CuO impurity phases when x ≤ 0.10. Furthermore, the lattice parameter increases, and the X-ray density and the average crystallite size decrease with increasing Co substitution. And the obtained particle size from TEM image is in very good agreement with the average crystallite size estimated by XRD measurements. The saturation magnetization and coercivity monotonically increase with the increase of Co substitution. The increase of the saturation magnetization is due to the substitution of Ni2+ and Cu2+ ions with lower magnetic moment by Co2+ ions with higher magnetic moment on the octahedral sites. And the increase of the coercivity is mainly due to the increase of magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanosized mixed ferrite Mn0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 with crystalline size ∼15 nm has been prepared by hydrothermal route. XRD patterns confirm that the crystallites have single phase cubic spinel structure. The dynamic scaling analysis on the frequency dependence of spin glass-like transition temperature well explains the model of a transition at finite temperature. The analysis gives critical exponent and parameters as: zν = 10.48, T0 = 190 K, f0 = 5.38 × 1010 and this confirms the occurrence of spin glass-like transition in Mn0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 particles. The saturation magnetization and the coercivity change with temperature. The effective magnetic anisotropy constant of sample was calculated using the law of approach to saturation. The coercivity at different temperatures was deduced using the mixed coercivity model. The calculated coercivity results are in a good agreement with the experimental ones. The magnetic heating ability of Mn0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 magnetic fluid was studied with an induction heating system. The calculated intrinsic loss power (ILP) was 3.75 g nHm2/kg. This study indicates that the resulting Mn0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 nanoparticles are promising materials in magnetic hyperthermia.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The temperature dependent magnetism of Fe-doped rare earth orthochromite HoCr1-xFexO3(x = 0, 0.2) was investigated by neutron powder diffraction. It is found that the magnetism of Cr(Fe)3+ can be well understood within mean field theory, while the ordering of Ho3+ was induced by the Cr(Fe)3+ sublattice and can be satisfyingly described by an effective S = 1/2 model. The absences of both the most common GxFz configuration of Cr3+ and the ordering of Ho3+ caused by Ho-Ho interaction evidence a strong Ho3+-Cr3+ interaction which dominates this system. On the other hand, a remarkable magnetoelastic strain was observed accompanying the Cr(Fe)3+ ordering. An analysis based on the equation of state with a Grüneisen approximation was performed and revealed magnetic origin of this strain.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study spin wave excitations in a three-dimensional nanocomposite magnet of exchange coupled hard (SmCo5) and soft (FeCo) phases. The dipolar interaction splits the spin wave energies into the upper and lower branches of the spin wave manifold. When the amount of the soft phase is increased the energy of low-lying spin excitations is considerably softened due to two reasons: (i) the low- lying mode locked into the soft phase region with a spin wave gap at k=0 which scales approximately proportional to the anisotropy constant of the soft phase and (ii) the internal dipolar field which comes from magnetic charges forming at hard-soft boundaries with normals parallel to the magnetization displaces the spin wave manifold toward the lower energies. With adding more soft phase the spin wave gap closes and the system moves to another ground state characterized by the magnetization mismatch between spins of the hard and soft phases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.For the balanced consumption of rare-earth elements, cerium (Ce) was partially used for NdFeB magnets instead of Nd. The corrosion behaviour of the (Nd,Ce)FeB magnet with different Ce contents in 3.5% NaCl solution was investigated by SEM, XRD, EDS and electrochemical tests. After immersion, the weight loss was calculated and the magnetic properties of the samples were measured. Results showed that Ce affected the corrosion of the (Nd,Ce)FeB magnet. Compared with the NdFeB magnet without Ce but of the same grade as the magnetic energy product, (Nd,Ce)FeB magnet showed better corrosion resistance. With increased Ce content, the corrosion resistances and magnetic properties of (Nd,Ce)FeB magnets were investigated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present experimental study, the influence of permanent and alternating magnetic fields on the flow and thermal behavior of MnFe2O4 magnetic nanofluid flowing through a circular open-cell metal foam tube is investigated under homogeneous heat flux conditions. The experiments are performed at various nanoparticle concentrations, Reynolds numbers and magnetic fields with different strengths and frequencies. According to the observations, the heat transfer rate enhances directly relative to nanoparticle concentration and Reynolds number in attendance of magnetic field, whereas its maximum value of 16.4% is found for 2 wt% nanoparticles at Re = 200 under alternating field with 400 G strength and 20 Hz frequency. Moreover, it is observed that the influence of strength and frequency of magnetic field is insignificant for the pressure drop. Hydrothermal efficiency as the ratio of the Nusselt number to the ratio of the pressure drop is defined in order to evaluate the privilege of using MnFe2O4 nanofluids in practical applications. The maximum efficiency of 1.25 is observed at 2 wt% under magnetic field with 400 G and 20 Hz at Re = 1000.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.ME composite materials with the general formula (x)Ni0.9Mg0.1Fe2O4 + (1 − x)BaZr0.2Ti0.8O3 (x = 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4 and 0.5) were synthesized by solid state reaction method. X-ray diffraction (XRD) study reveals the coexistence of piezomagnetic and piezoelectric phases without interacting with each other. The cubic spinel structure of Ni0.9Mg0.1Fe2O4 (NMFO) piezomagnetic phase and tetragonal perovskite structure of BaZr0.2Ti0.8O3 (BZT) piezoelectric phase for synthesized composites were confirmed by XRD measurements. The lattice constant of piezomagnetic and piezoelectric phases increases with increase in composition of the substituent. The dielectric constant and dielectric loss tangent of the composites measured as a function of frequency in the range 10 Hz–1 MHz at room temperature are found to decrease rapidly in low frequency regime and remain constant in high frequency regime shows the dielectric dispersion behavior. The magnetic properties of the composites have been studied using M-H hysteresis loops to see the response of the magnetic field on the NMFO phase in the composites. The saturation magnetization increases with increase in the mole% of piezomagnetic phase in the composites. The ME voltage coefficient measured as a function of the applied DC magnetic field; shows maximum value (8.622 mV cm−1 Oe) for (50%)NMFO + (50%)BZT bulk composites. The addition of NMFO and BZT enhances the ME properties of the composites.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study theoretically the spin torque of a ferromagnetic layer coupled to a silicene in the presence of the intrinsic Rashba spin orbit coupling (RSOC) effect. By using gauge field method, we find that under the applied current, the RSOC can induce an effective field which will result in the spin precession of conduction electron without applying any magnetic field. We also derive the spin torques due to the RSOC, which generalize the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) equation. The spin torques are related to the applied current, the carrier density and Rashba strength of the system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Investigation of magnetic properties and microwave resonance phenomena in nanocomposites based on opal matrices containing the particles of intermetallide of Fe3Ni2 and FeNi3 is carried out. The interactions which lead to the resonance changes of transmission and reflection coefficients are determined. Electromagnetic properties are measured in the millimeter frequency range. Special attention is paid to comparison between static and dynamic magnetic properties of nanocomposites. Frequency dependences of magnitude of lines of resonance features are obtained. Spectra of resonance and antiresonance are studied. The conditions when the magnetic antiresonance is observed are clarified. The X-ray phase analysis of the nanocomposites is performed and their structure is studied.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetostatic energy is calculated for a magnetic vortex in a noncircular elliptical nanodisk. It is well-known that the energy of a vortex in the circular disk is minimized though an ansatz that eliminates the magnetostatic charge at the disk edge. Beginning with this ansatz for the circular disk, a conformal mapping of a circle interior onto the interior of an ellipse results in the magnetization of the elliptical disk. This magnetization in the interior of an ellipse also has no magnetostatic charge at the disk edge also minimizing the magnetostatic energy. As expected the energy has a quadratic dependence on the displacement of the vortex core from the ellipse center, but reflecting the lower symmetry of the ellipse. Through numerical integration of the magnetostatic integral a general expression for the energy is obtained for ellipticity values from 1.0 to about 0.3. Finally a general expression for the gyrotropic frequency as described by the Thiele equation is obtained.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The X-ray diffraction were used to investigate the effects of Ru doping on the structural properties of La0.6Pr0.1Sr0.3Mn1−xRuxO3 (x = 0.00, 0.05 and 0.15). X-ray diffraction and magnetic measurements were used to investigate the effects of Dy doping on the physical properties of La0.6Pr0.1Sr0.3Mn1−xRuxO3. XRD data were analyzed by Rietveld refinement technique. Results showed that all obtained perovskite manganites were of a single phase type and crystallized in a rhombohedric structure with R3‾c space group. The heat capacity of the manganite La0.6Pr0.1Sr0.3Mn1−xRuxO3 (x = 0.00, 0.05 and 0.15) was measured in the temperature range 260–400 K. The nature of the ferromagnetic phase transition and the critical exponents of heat capacity near the Curie temperature have been studied. The regulations of variations in the universal critical parameters near the phase transition were established. On the other hand, we used Banerjee's criteria, modified Arrott plots and the scaling hypothesis to analyze magnetic-field dependence of magnetization near the ferromagnetic–paramagnetic (FM–PM) phase-transition temperature (TC). Experimental results revealed that all samples underwent a second-order phase transition. The estimated critical exponents obtained for x = 0.00 sample were close to the 3D Ising model (β = 0.321, γ = 1.20 and δ = 4.75 at TC = 360 K). Whereas, for a high amount of Ru, these exponents belong to a different universality class and are close to the Heisenberg model (β = 0.362, γ = 1.32 and δ = 4.57 at TC = 352 K for x = 0.05 sample) and (β = 0.361, γ = 1.33 and δ = 4.60 at TC = 345 K for x = 0.15 sample). A detailed analysis and a comparison of the received results obtained with the theoretical predictions and other experimental results were carried out.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electrical, and magnetic properties of La0.67Sr0.33Mn1−xCrxO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.10) manganites have been studied by substitution of antiferromagnetic trivalent Cr ion at Mn-site. Systematic efforts have been carried out to understand the electrical resistivity behavior in the ferromagnetic metallic and paramagnetic semi-conducting phases of Cr substituted La0.67Sr0.33Mn1−xCrxO3 manganites. Polycrystalline samples show a resistivity minimum at a temperature (Tmin) of <40 K in the ferromagnetic metallic phase. Tmin shifts to higher temperatures on application of magnetic fields. The appearance of this resistivity minimum was analyzed by fittings the data according to the model that considers e-e scattering caused by enhanced Coulombic interactions. The electrical resistivity data has been best fitted in the metallic and semiconducting regime using various models. Present results suggest that intrinsic magnetic inhomogeneity like Cr3+ ions in these strongly electron-correlated manganite systems is originating due to the existence of the ferromagnetic interactions.© 2017Effects of the HfO2/Co interface and the Co/HfO2 interface on thermal stability of anomalous Hall effect (AHE) in perpendicular Co/Pt multilayers have been studied. It is observed that thermally stable AHE behavior cannot be obtained in perpendicular Co/Pt multilayers with the HfO2/Co interface, mainly due to Co-Pt interdiffusion during annealing. In contrast, thermally stable AHE feature is observed in perpendicular Co/Pt multilayers with the Co/HfO2 interface despite Co-Pt interdiffusion, which is owing to the enhancement of the side jump and intrinsic contributions to the AHE through interfacial modification after annealing.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Using first-principles calculations based on the density functional theory we investigated the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of substitutional boron, nitrogen, and nickel impurities in germanium carbide (GeC) nanoribbons. Hydrogen terminated GeC ribbons with armchair and zigzag edges are considered here. We observed that all three impurities preferentially substitutes the Ge atom at the ribbon edge. In addition, the electronic band structures of the doped systems indicate that (i) the impurities could introduce impurity bands in the band gap and resulting in a reduction of the band gap of 7-AGeCNR, (ii) the metallic behavior of 4-ZGeCNR turns into semiconductor because of the incorporation of the impurities, (iii) the impurities could change the magnetic moment of 4-ZGeCNR and even introduce magnetic moment into the non-magnetic 7-AGeCNR.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we investigated the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Cd0.9375TM0.0625S (TM=Ni, Co and Fe) compounds in zinc blende (B3) ferromagnetic phase using all-electron full-potential linear muffin tin orbital (FP-LMTO) calculations within the frame work of the density functional theory and the generalized gradient approximation. The analysis of electronic structures shows that Cd0.9375Ni0.0625S, Cd0.9375Co0.0625S and Cd0.9375Fe0.0625S compounds are half-metallic ferromagnets with 100% spin polarization at the Fermi level. This half-metallic behavior is confirmed by the total calculated magnetic moment per Ni, Co and Fe substituted transition metal (TM) atom, which is found to be 2 µB, 3 µB and 4 µB for Cd0.9375TM0.0625S (TM=Ni, Co and Fe) compounds, respectively. Furthermore, we found that the TM-3d states are responsible for generating spin-polarization and magnetic moment in these compounds and we establish that the p-d hybridization reduces the local magnetic moment of TM atoms from its free space charge value and produces small local magnetic moments on nonmagnetic Cd and S host sites. Also, we predicted exchange splitting energy Δx(pd) and exchange constants N0α and N0β. The calculated values validate the ferromagnetic nature of these compounds.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We synthesized iron oxide nanoparticles using a simple hydrothermal approach and found several types of segments of their linear-chain self-assemblies as observed by field emission scanning electron microscopy. X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopy measurements confirm a well-defined single-phase FCC structure. Vibrating sample magnetometry measurements exhibit a ferromagnetic behavior. Micromagnetic numerical simulations show magnetic vortex states in the nanosphere model. Also, calculations of binding energies for different numbers of particles in the linear-chain assemblies explain a possible mechanism responsible for the self-assemblies of segments of the linear chains of nanoparticles. This work offers a step towards linear-chain self-assemblies of iron oxide nanoparticles and the effect of magnetic vortex states in individual nanoparticles on their binding energy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Manganese ferrite (MnFe2O4) nanoparticles were synthesized by sol-gel auto-combustion method using manganese nitrate and ferric nitrate as precursors and citric acid as a fuel. Scanning electron micrographs show irregularly shaped morphology of the particles. The as-prepared samples were annealed at 400, 500, 600 and 800 °C for 2 h in air. The phase identification and structural characterizations were performed using powder X-ray diffraction technique along with Mössbauer spectroscopy. Magnetization loops and 57Fe Mössbauer spectra were measured at RT. After annealing the sample at or below ∼ 500 °C, we observed two different spinel phases corresponding to two different lattice parameters. This is originating due to the partial oxidation of Mn2+ to Mn3+. At high annealing temperatures (∼ 600 °C or above) the spinel MnFe2O4 phase decomposes into crystalline α-Mn2O3 and α-Fe2O3 phases, and amorphous FeO phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.6.5 wt% Si steel thin sheets were usually fabricated by warm rolling. In our previous work, 6.5 wt% Si steel thin sheets with good magnetic properties had been successfully fabricated by cold rolling based on strip casting. In the present work, the main purposes were to find out the influences of warm rolling and cold rolling on microstructures and magnetic properties of the thin sheets with the thickness of 0.2 mm, and to confirm which rolling method was more suitable for fabricating 6.5 wt% Si steel thin sheets. The results showed that the cold rolled sheet could obtain good surface quality and flatness, while the warm rolled sheet could not. The intensity of γ-fiber rolling texture (<1 1 1>//ND) of cold rolled specimen was weaker than that of the warm rolled specimen, especially for the {1 1 1}<1 1 2> component at surface layer and {1 1 1}<1 1 0> component at center layer. After the same annealing treatment, the cold rolled specimen, which had higher stored energy and weaker intensity of γ-fiber rolling texture, could obtain smaller recrystallization grain size, weaker intensity of γ-fiber recrystallization texture and stronger intensity of λ-fiber recrystallization texture. Therefore, due to the good surface quality, smaller recrystallization grain size and optimum recrystallization texture, the cold rolled specimen possessed improved magnetic properties, and cold rolling should be more suitable for fabricating 6.5 wt% Si steel thin sheets.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A common method of realizing a magnetostructural coupling for MnNiSi is chemically alloying it with a ternary compound possessing a stable Ni2In-type structure. In this way, the substituting elements and levels are determined by the stoichiometry of counterpart compounds. In this work, chemical co-substitutions of Fe and Ga at three different atomic sites of MnNiSi were performed. The selections of substitution elements and levels were based on the site occupation rule and an analysis of the site-dependent substitutional effects on structural stability, Curie temperatures, and magnetic moment of MnNiSi. A broad Curie temperatures window of 285 K spanning room temperature was established in Mn1−xNi1−xFe2xSi1−xGax. Strong magnetostructural transformations with large magnetization difference were realized in this window. A relatively large magnetic entropy change of −38.1 J/kg K was observed for a field change of 5 T near room temperature in the alloy with x = 0.15.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically study the proximity effect in the thin-film layered ferromagnet (F) – superconductor (S) heterostructures in F1F2S design. We consider the boundary value problem for the Usadel-like equations in the case of so-called “dirty” limit. The “latent” superconducting pairing interaction in F layers taken into account. The focus is on the recipe of experimental preparation the state with so-called solitary superconductivity. We also propose and discuss the model of the superconducting spin valve based on F1F2S trilayers in solitary superconductivity regime.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) and the anomalous Nernst effect (ANE) in an exchange-biased bilayer consisting of a thin film of permalloy deposited on a single crystal antiferromagnetic NiO (1 0 0). The exchange bias field (HEB) value was obtained by means of AMR, ANE and magnetization hysteresis measurements. The shift of the hysteresis loop, measured with the three different techniques, yield approximately the same value of HEB. In spite of the measurement techniques be based in different physical phenomena, our results confirm the robustness of the exchange anisotropy at the Py/NiO interface. The strength of the anomalous Nernst effect for the exchange-biased permalloy film is compared to values measured in non biased films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Surface magnetic domain structure can be different from internal one. Both of them are influenced by structural randomness. Three-dimensional numerical simulations are performed using a model with random exchange interactions and dipolar interactions on a lattice with the periodic boundary condition for the horizontal directions to simulate infinite system in the directions and with the free boundary condition for vertical direction (z) to represent the existence of surface. The lattice sizes are 64×64×(2Lz+1) for Lz=1,2,4 and 32×32×(2Lz+1) for Lz=8,16. To simulate highly anisotropic materials, time dependent Ginzburg–Landau equation using a model with Ising symmetry is solved numerically. Dependence of magnetic domain patterns on thickness of the system and the degree of disorder is investigated for systems with small thickness. Magnetic structure factor for the surface layer is compared with that for the internal layer. The inverse of the wave number that gives the maximum value of the magnetic structure factor depends on the thickness of the system T as T0.3 approximately. The distribution of the local magnetization depends on the disorder rather differently for different thicknesses of the system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Electric machine cores are subjected to mechanical stresses due to manufacturing processes. These stresses include radial, circumferential and axial components that may have significant influences on the magnetic properties of the electrical steel and hence, on the output and efficiencies of electrical machines. Previously, most studies of iron losses due to mechanical stress have considered only radial and circumferential components. In this work, an improved toroidal tester has been designed and developed to measure the core losses and the magnetic properties of electrical steel under a compressive axial stress. The shape of the toroidal ring has been verified using 3D stress analysis. Also, 3D electromagnetic simulations show a uniform flux density distribution in the specimen with a variation of 0.03 T and a maximum average induction level of 1.5 T. The developed design has been prototyped, and measurements were carried out using a steel sample of grade 35WW300. Measurements show that applying small mechanical stresses normal to the sample thickness rises the delivered core losses, then the losses decrease continuously as the stress increases. However, the drop in core losses at high stresses does not go lower than the free-stress condition. Physical explanations for the observed trend of core losses as a function of stress are provided based on core loss separation to the hysteresis and eddy current loss components. The experimental results show that the effect of axial compressive stress on magnetic properties of electrical steel at high level of inductions becomes less pronounced.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on the effect of interparticle magnetic interactions in an ensemble of superparamagnetic magnetite particles with an average size of ~8.4 nm dispersed in the diamagnetic matrix on the blocking of this ensemble in external magnetic field. The two limit cases are investigated: the case of strongly interacting particles, when the value of magnetic dipole-dipole interaction between particles is comparable with the energy of other interactions in the ensemble (the interparticle distance is similar to the nanoparticle diameter) and the case of almost noninteracting particles distant from each other by about ten particle diameters. We demonstrate that the experimental dependence of the blocking temperature on external field is described well within the model [1], in which the density of particles in a nonmagnetic medium is taken into account and the correlation value depends on external magnetic field. The model for describing the magnetic properties of a disperse nanoparticle ensemble is proposed, which makes corrections related to the particle size and mean dipole-dipole interaction energy for the anisotropy constant. The surface magnetic anisotropy of Fe3O4 particles and parameters of the interparticle coupling are estimated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A high-Bs amorphous alloy with the base composition Fe83B11P3Si2C1 was used to study the effects of fluxing purification on amorphous forming ability and magnetic properties of the alloy prepared with raw materials in industrialization. By using fluxing purification, the surface crystallization was suppressed and fully amorphous Fe83B11P3Si2C1 ribbons with a maximum thickness of 48 μm were successfully achieved by using an industrial process and materials. The amorphous ribbons made with industrial-purified alloys exhibit excellent magnetic properties, containing high-Bs of 1.65 T, low Hc of 2.0 A/m, and high μe of 9.7 × 103 at 1 kHz. Impurities in the melting alloys exist in three forms and have different effluences on magnetic properties. The surface crystallization was triggered by the impurities which exist as high melting point inclusions serving as nuclei. Thus, fluxing purification is a feasible way for industrialization of high-Bs FeBPSiC amorphous alloys.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we introduced expanded perlite (EP) into the system of ferrite composites for the first time. By sol-gel self-propagating combustion method, expanded perlite/barium ferrite (EP/BaFe12O19) was prepared, and then ternary composites of expanded perlite/barium ferrite/polyaniline (EP/BaFe12O19/PANI) were obtained by in-situ oxidative polymerization of aniline on EP/BaFe12O19 mixture. Although, as is well known, the values of saturation magnetization (Ms), remnant magnetization (Mr) and coercivity (Hc) of composites are all lower than the pure BaFe12O19 particles owing to the existence of the nonmagnetic EP and PANI, the EP/BaFe12O19/PANI composites exhibit absorption characteristics at the range of 2–18 GHz, the effective absorption bandwidth (less than −4 dB) reached 12.12 GHz and the minimum reflection loss of −5.66 dB at 8.48 GHz with only 2 mm thickness of absorbing layer. So the composites could resist urban electromagnetic pollution, such as wireless network, communication and so on, effectively.© 2017 Elsevier LtdDouble-sides of aluminum sheet were anodized; at first, one side (front-side) of aluminum sheet was anodized, and the pores were filled with nickel using electroplating technique. Next, the other side (back side) of aluminum sheet was anodized. After formation of electrodes on both sides of anodic porous alumina, the current–voltage characteristics were examined, and reversible change in the resistance between metallic and insulating states was measured during mono-polar operation. This switching behavior could be measured for the sample with the depth of backside pores of about 100 μm. The bias voltage, at which the resistance state changed into the lower-resistance state from the higher-resistance state, decreased with decreasing the depth of backside pores, and the bias voltage was about 1 V in the case of the backside pores of about 10 μm.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn the present work, multi-level resistive switching (RS) in W/Co:TiO2/FTO structures induced by a multi-mixed mechanism was studied. It was found that the devices could be reproducibly programmed into three non-volatile resistance states. And the directly switching between any resistance states was realized. This increases the operation speed and lowers the complexity of controlling circuit of multi-level non-volatile memory.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe have demonstrated that a thin layer of Al2O3 grown by wet-oxidation of wet-recessed AlGaN barrier layer in an AlGaN/GaN heterostructure can significantly improve the performance of GaN based high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs). The wet-etching leads to a damage free recession of the gate region and compensates for the decreased gate capacitance and increased gate leakage. The performance improvement is manifested as an increase in the saturation drain current, transconductance, and unity current gain frequency (fT). This is further augmented with a large decrease in the subthreshold current. The performance improvement is primarily ascribed to an increase in the effective velocity in two-dimensional electron gas without sacrificing gate capacitance, which make the wet-recessed gate oxide-HEMTs much more scalable in comparison to their conventional counterpart. The improved scalability leads to an increase in the product of unity current gain frequency and gate length (fT × Lg).© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates the influence of heat treatment on the magnetic properties of alloy samples prepared, in the form of ribbons, using a rapid-cooling method. The adopted isothermal annealing processes were found to lead: to the homogenization of the composition, to relaxation of the structure in the amorphous state, and to nanocrystallization. It has been shown that structural relaxation, occurring within the volume of the tested samples, exerts a large influence on the magnetic properties. Observed changes in the distribution of the induction hyperfine field at the 57Fe nuclei represent direct proof that chemical and topological disorder exists within the volume of the alloy, and the annealing process reduces the internal energy of the entire system. Considering the random anisotropy model for nanocrystalline materials, it can be concluded that the factor that increases, for example, the saturation magnetization is an increase in strength of exchange interactions, which is a measure of the ferromagnetic correlation interactions.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA nonlinear and scalable model suitable for predicting high frequency noise of N-type Metal Oxide Semiconductor (NMOS) transistors is presented. The model is developed for a commercial 45 nm CMOS SOI technology and its accuracy is validated through comparison with measured performance of a microwave low noise amplifier. The model employs the virtual source nonlinear core and adds parasitic elements to accurately simulate the RF behavior of multi-finger NMOS transistors up to 40 GHz. For the first time, the traditional long-channel thermal noise model is supplemented with an injection noise model to accurately represent the noise behavior of these short-channel transistors up to 26 GHz. The developed model is simple and easy to extract, yet very accurate.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Quasi-two-dimensional magnetite epitaxial thin films have been synthesized by pulsed laser deposition technique at various oxygen pressures. The saturation magnetizations of the magnetite films were found to decrease from 425 emu/cm3, which is close to the bulk value, to 175 emu/cm3 as the growth atmospheres varying from high vacuum (∼1 × 10−8 mbar) to oxygen pressure of 1 × 10−3 mbar. The ratio of the Fe3+ to Fe2+ increases from 2 to 2.7 as oxygen pressure increasing shown by XPS fitting, which weakens the net magnetic moment generated by Fe2+ at octahedral sites as the spins of the Fe3+ ions at octahedral and tetrahedral sites are aligned in antiparallel. The results offer direct experimental evidence of the influence to the Fe3+/Fe2+ ratio and the magnetic moment in magnetite epitaxy films by oxygen pressure, which is significant for spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Hybrid Nb(tNb)/Co(10 nm)/IrMn(15 nm)/Nb(10 nm) heterostructured materials were prepared by DC Magnetron Sputtering and systematically studied by X-ray, magnetization and ferromagnetic resonance techniques. For thinner Nb buffer layer (≤10 nm), it was found that there is an inter-diffusion at Co/IrMn interface, which favors double-like hysteresis loop. For thicker Nb layers, however, a gradual transition from double to single-like hysteresis loops is observed and it is associated with the reduction of the Nb roughness, which also enhances the exchange coupling at the Co/IrMn interface. Nb grown on IrMn layer induces the formation of an NbIrMn alloy layer, while no evidence of inter-diffusion at the Co/Nb interface is observed. For rougher Nb buffer layers (tNb < 50 nm), exchange bias and Co uniaxial anisotropies are pointing at the same direction (β∼zero), but for smoother Nb buffer layer (tNb = 50 nm) a β angle of 150o is found. Exchange bias effect was measured in as-prepared and in field-cooled samples; being its presence, in as-prepared sample, attributed to the unidirectional anisotropy of the Co layer (its intensity is modified in case of sample with a CoIrMn alloy layer). Considering that the Si/Nb/Co/IrMn interfaces have different β values (tNb = 35 and 50 nm), a study of the influence of magnetization direction, governed by exchange-biased layers, on superconducting properties of Nb films can be successfully done in this hybrid system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we present the effect of Strontium vacancies on the structure and magnetic properties of La0.7Sr0.3−x□xMnO3 nano-sized compounds (x = 0; 0.01; 0.03 and 0.05), synthesized using the sol-gel method. X-ray diffraction revealed that these manganites crystallized in the rhombohedral structure with space group R3-C. From magnetization measurements as function of temperature and magnetic applied field, we have noticed a large magnetic entropy change (∆SM) around Curie temperature. ∆SM is found to decrease with the deficiency content (2.30 J/kg·K for x = 0–1.33 J/kg·K for x = 0.05 under magnetic field change µ0∆H = 5 T). This behavior is accompanied by a slight reduction of the Curie temperature (TC = 338 and 328 K for x = 0 and 0.05, respectively). These results show that our materials are potential candidates for magnetic refrigerants working in above room temperature. The refined values of the critical exponents β, γ and δ obtained from the modified Arrott plots and Kouvel-Fisher method indicated that the behavior of the parent sample and the samples with 1and 3% of strontium-deficient are characterized by long-range mean-field behavior (with β = 0.50; γ = 1). However, for 5% lacuna, the magnetic behavior is close to the theoretical 3D-Heisemberg prediction with short-range exchange coupling.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the design and characterization of a radar absorbing material (RAM) was investigated at microwave frequency. Ba0.2Sr0.2La0.6MnO3 magnetic nanoparticles was synthesized thru a facile hydrothermal method in the presence of polymethyl methacrylate (PMMA) and the possibility of shape and size-controlled synthesis of nanoparticles (NPs) over the range 15–50 Nm was also explored. Afterward, the effect of shape and size of the synthesized Ba0.2Sr0.2La0.6MnO3 NPs on microwave absorption properties was investigated in KU-band. The crystal structures and morphology of as-synthesized nanoparticles were characterized and confirmed by FESEM, XRD, VSM, FTIR analysis. The RAM samples were prepared by dispersion of magnetic NPs in silicone rubber in an ultrasonic bath. The maximum reflection loss (RL) values NPs were 12.04 dB at 14.82 GHz and a broad absorption band (over 1.22 GHz) with RL values <−10 dB are obtained and the maximum reflection loss (RL) values of decrease and shaped NPs were 22.36 dB at 14.78 GHz and a broad absorption band (over 2.67 GHz) with RL values <−10 dB are obtained. The results indicated that the particle size and shape play a major role on the absorption properties of the composites in the 12.4–18 GHz frequency range. It is observed that microwave absorption properties increased with the decrease in average particle size of NPs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Tb and Al substitution within the rare earth and cobalt sublattices on structural and magnetothermal properties of Dy0.5Ho0.5Co2 has been studied. Multicomponent Laves phase alloys Tbx(Dy0.5Ho0.5)1−xCo2−yAly (x = 0, 0.3, 0.4, 0.5; y = 0, 0.25) synthesized using high-purity metals have been studied using X-ray diffraction analysis, heat capacity and magnetocaloric measurements. Dy0.5Ho0.5Co2 has a first order phase transition at the Curie temperature TC ≈ 110 K. Both Tb and Al substitution leads to increase of the TC. The increasing Tb content leads to the decreases slightly the MCE and all the transitions near the Curie temperature are of the first order. As for the Al-containing compounds, MCE measurements show that the phase transition type changes from the first to the second-order. The advantage of Tbx(Dy0.5Ho0.5)1−xCo1.75Al0.25 as compared with Al-free alloys is ‘table-like’ behavior of MCE.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper we provide solutions to update a long channel model in order to take into account the short channel effects. The presented model is for the junctionless GAA MOSFETs. The resulting model is analytical, explicit and valid for depletion and accumulation regimes, and consists of simple physically based equations, for better understanding of this device, and also easier implementation and better computation speed as a compact model. The agreement with TCAD simulations is very good.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Cu ferrite and In substituted Cu ferrite has been successfully synthesized (InxCu1−xFe2O4; x = 0.0, 0.2) at pH 11 and sintered at 300 °C, 600 °C, 900 °C. From the XRD analysis, the ferrite phase is confirmed and particle size varied from 28 to 37 nm owing to sintering temperature. TEM microstructure confirms that samples having polycrystalline nature because of superimposition of bright spots. FT-IR spectra exhibit general behaviour of ferrite. The significant change of dielectric constant has been noticed from dielectric measurement while substitution of In element. The room temperature magnetic measurements demonstrate a solid impact of sintering temperature and In substitution on saturation magnetization and coercivity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of a sigma-phase Fe60V40 intermetallic compound were studied by means of ac and dc magnetic susceptibility and magnetocaloric effect measurements. The compound is a soft magnet yet it was found to behave like a re-entrant spin-glass system. The magnetic ordering temperature was found to be TC ≈ 170 K, while the spin-freezing temperature was ∼164 K. Its relative shift per decade of ac frequency was 0.002, a value smaller than that typical of canonical spin-glasses. Magnetic entropy change, ΔS, in the vicinity of TC was determined for magnetic field, H, ranging between 5 and 50 kOe. Analysis of ΔS in terms of the power law yielded the critical exponent, n, vs. temperature with the minimum value of 0.75 at TC, while from the analysis of a relative shift of the maximum value of ΔS with the field a critical exponent Δ = 1.7 was obtained. Based on scaling laws relationships values of other two exponents viz. β = 0.6 and γ = 1 were determined.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Thin-gauge cold-rolled grain-oriented (TG-CRGO) silicon steels were fabricated using the acquired inhibitor method, in which the behaviors of inhibitor are strongly influenced by the final annealing atmosphere and differ from that of the TG-CRGO silicon steel. In this study, macrostructures, grain orientations, and evolution of inhibitors in two gauges of thickness (0.23 and 0.18 mm) of steels were studied and compared in five different annealing atmospheres. The second-phase particles in samples were observed by field-emission scanning electron microscopy. Distribution densities and mean diameter of particles were statistically calculated to illustrate the effect of Zener factor. Results indicated that the inhibitor behaviors in the two thickness samples are similar with the change of N2 proportion in annealing atmosphere, i.e., nitrogen loss, decomposition, coalescence, and ripening of particles would be strongly suppressed with the increase of N2 content. However, in comparison with the 0.23-mm samples, the nitride precipitation, decomposition and inhibitor coarsening of the 0.18-mm specimens are more likely to occur at a lower temperature because of the thinner thickness. Furthermore, the value of Zener factor implies that for thinner samples, more N2 should be employed when nitrides are used the main inhibitor; this condition would inhibit the development of undesirable deviated Goss grains. This study showed that the 0.23-mm sample could achieve the best magnetic properties (B8) at 1.92 T in the atmosphere containing 25% N2. The 0.18-mm sample could achieve the best magnetic properties (B8) at 1.93 T in the atmosphere containing 75% N2.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Thin films of Ni52Mn35−xIn11+xSi2 were fabricated by magnetron sputtering on MgO (0 0 1) single crystal substrates. Magnetization as function of temperature for Ni52Mn35In11Si2 exhibits features consistent with a magnetostructural transition (MST) from an austenitic phase to a martensitic phase, similar to the bulk material. We observed that the martensitic transformation is externally sensitive to small changes in chemical composition and stoichiometry. It has been found that thin films of Ni52Mn34−xIn11+xSi2 with x = 0 and 1 undergo a temperature-induced MST or remain in a stable austenitic phase, respectively. Comparison of magneto-optical transverse Kerr effect spectra obtained at 0.5–4.0 eV in the 35–300 K temperature interval reveal insignificant differences between the martensitic and austenite phases. We found that the field and temperature dependencies of the transverse Kerr effect are quite different from the magnetization behavior, which is attributed to magnetic inhomogeneity across the films. To elucidate the effects of magnetostructural phase transitions on the electronic properties, we performed density functional calculations of the magneto-optical Kerr effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Porous spherical aggregates of barium hexaferrite (BaFe12O19) with 1.5 µm in diameter were synthetized by the surfactant-assisted sol-gel method. The surfactant Tween20 (C58H114O26), which enables mesoporous structures, as well as polystyrene spheres (PS), as the template agent for the formation of macropores, were used. Two synthetic routes (hereafter named A and B), whose difference was the absence or presence of PS, were followed for synthesis. X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM) in high resolution mode (HRTEM) were used for characterization. Size and morphology of the spheres were similar in both cases and they resemble a nest or ball-of-yarn type structure. Pore size and BaFe12O19 crystal size produced by the two routes are different. The magnetic properties of the spheres were evaluated using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) as function of the calcination temperature. The spheres present ferromagnetic behavior in both routes.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the angle-dependent orbital and spin magnetic moments of the [Co/Pd] multilayer (ML) films with intervening CoO layers under annealing by employing angle-dependent soft X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD). After annealing, the orbital magnetic moments of Co ions are found to be enhanced, with the maximum values along the perpendicular direction of [Co/Pd] ML, providing evidence for the origin of the improved perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) being the interface spin–orbit coupling. The induced Pd polarization was observed after annealing, demonstrating the strong Co-Pd hybridization arising from the Co-Pd alloy formation near the interface. The angle-dependent coercivity follows the 1/cosθ behavior, suggesting that the magnetization reversal in the hysteresis curve in [Co/Pd] ML occurs mainly through the pinning mechanism.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In our present study we have reported the magnetic properties of highly Ca-doped polycrystalline compound La0.1875Ca0.8125MnO3. Along with the conventional charge ordered antiferromagnetic ground state, a small ferromagnetic phase fraction is present at the low temperature. The effect of the external magnetic field markedly modifies the ground state of the compound. Our experimental results indicate that in addition to the ferromagnetic phase fraction, another field induced super paramagnetic phase grow at low temperature (T < 50 K) above H = 10 kOe magnetic field within the charge ordered antiferromagnetic matrix. The nature of the temperature dependent magnetization curves influenced by the external applied magnetic field was observed and analyzed using Langevin theory of super paramagnetism.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this research, inverse spinel copper ferrite nanoparticles (CuFe2O4 NPs) were synthesized via citrate-nitrate combustion method. The crystal structure, particle size, morphology and magnetic studies were investigated using various instrumental tools to illustrate the formation of the inverse spinel structure. Mossbauer spectrometry identified Fe is located both in the tetrahedral and octahedral site in the ratio (40:60) and the observed magnetic parameters values such as saturation magnetization (Ms = 20.62 emu g−1), remnant magnetization (Mr = 11.66 emu g−1) and coercivity (Hc = 63.1 mTesla) revealed that the synthesized CuFe2O4 NPs have a typical ferromagnetic behaviour. Also tested CuFe2O4 nanoparticles as a photocatalyst for the decolourisation of methylene blue (MB) in the presence of peroxydisulphate as the oxidant.© 2017In this paper, the experimental off-state drain leakage current behavior is systematically explored in n- and p-channel junctionless nanowire transistors with HfSiON/TiN/p+-polysilicon gate stack. The analysis of the drain leakage current is based on experimental data of the gate leakage current. It has been shown that the off-state drain leakage current in n-channel devices is negligible, whereas in p-channel devices it is significant and dramatically increases with drain voltage. The overall results indicate that the off-state drain leakage current in p-channel devices is mainly due to trap-assisted Fowler-Nordheim tunneling of electrons through the gate oxide of electrons from the metal gate to the silicon layer near the drain region.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Zr and Cu Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 ferrites have been prepared by the sol-gel auto combustion method using the nitrates. The ethylene glycol and citric acid were mixed as the combustion agents. The synthesized powders were calcinate at 800 °C for 3 h and they are pressed in desired shaped and sintered at 1200 °C for 2 h in air atmosphere. The X-ray diffraction analysis confirms the single phase cubic spinel structure. The SEM pictures revels that the substitution of higher valence ions results fine grained intragranular pore free microstructure. The dielectric properties of substituted ferrites exhibits decreasing trend at lower frequencies up to 1000 Hz beyond which it should in stable response. All the results are explained in terms of compositional and frequency variation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt ferrite CoxFe3−xO4 thin films with composition within the miscibility gap were grown using Dynamic Aurora pulsed laser deposition. X-ray diffraction patterns reveal as-grown phase separation to Fe-rich and Co-rich phases with no post-deposition annealing. The interconnected surface microstructure of thin film shows that this phase separation occurs through spinodal decomposition enhanced by magnetic-field-induced ion-impingement. The lattice parameter variation of the thin films with the magnetic field indicates that the composition fluctuations can be enhanced further by increasing the magnetic field. Results show that spinodal decomposition enhancement by magnetic-field-induced ion-impingement is independent of the lattice-mismatch-induced strain. This approach can promote spinodal decomposition in any thin film with no post-deposition annealing process.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The possibility of high coercive force in FeCo particles was examined focusing on distortion introduced in the particles. The particles were synthesized via co-precipitation of Fe and Co ions, heat-treatment in potassium bromide flux for particle growth, and reduction using hydrogen gas. The particle shape was spherical or a slightly elongated with the size of approximately 30–200 nm, and the composition with approximately Fe60Co40 was determined from the D-spacing of (110) peak. The coercive force of approximately 90 kA/m was obtained in particles with the saturation magnetization of approximately 150 Am2/kg. The coercive force was higher than those in reported FeCo particles with same level of saturation magnetization. As one of the reason of high coercive force, we expected the possibility of occurrence of magnetic anisotropy based on the anisotropic distortion generated between FeCo alloy and surface oxides in a slightly elongated particles.© 2017 Elsevier LtdRecently, integrated passive devices have become increasingly popular; inductor realization, in particular, offers interesting high performance for RF modules and systems. In this paper, a development of differential inductor fabricated by integrated passive devices technology using a double air-bridge structure is presented. A study of the model development of the differential inductor is first demonstrated. In this model section, a segment box analysis method is applied to provide a clear presentation of the differential inductor. Compared with other work that only shows a brief description of the process, the integrated passive devices process used to fabricate the inductor in this study is elaborated on. Finally, a characterization of differential inductors with different physical layout parameters is illustrated based on inductance and quality factors, which provides a valuable reference for realizing high performance. The proposed work provides a good solution for the design, fabrication and practical application of RF modules and systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The performance of magnetic nanoparticles in different applications is severely depended on their size characteristics, so the study of effective parameters on these properties can play significant roles in qualifications of nanoparticles. In present work, some important factors on size features of CoFe2O4 superparamagnetic nanoparticles include the mixing order of synthesis components, the utilized reduction agents, stabilization process, and chelating mechanisms were investigated. Moreover, in order to optimize several influential factors such as the temperature, pH, and cation ratio of reaction, the experimental design was done by using central composite design method of response surface methodology. The simultaneous effects on the particles size and their size distribution were investigated by different methods i.e. dynamic light scattering, X-ray diffraction, Fourier transform inferred spectroscopy, vibration sample magnetometer, and transmission electron microscopy. Results demonstrated the mixing order of reduction agent to salt solution and also the employing of NH4OH as a reduction agent could cause to significant decreasing of particles size and size distribution. Furthermore, the nitric acid could stabilize and chelate nanoparticles more appropriate than citric acid. Based on the optimization results, the quadratic polynomial models were fitted on the responses which could predict their amounts, while temperature, pH, and their interactions had higher effectiveness. In addition, the optimum amounts of particle size (14 nm) and size distribution (4.61 nm) were achieved while temperature, pH, and cation ratio amounts are equal to 89.82 °C, 11, and 0.52, respectively.© 2017 Elsevier LtdMulti-angle modulation properties of electrolyte gated graphene visible-infrared modulators with supercapacitor structures have been examined in both experiment and theory. Both transmission and reflection geometries have been studied, and the results show that all the modulations of these devices are gate voltage and wavelength dependent. Maximum modulation depths for transmission device ∼3% and reflection modulator ∼5% are obtained, which can be attributed to the electrolyte assistant considerable change of the Fermi energy with tunable gate voltage. Moreover, little incident angle dependency can be observed with a certain gate voltage. Theoretical analysis based on the different tangential and normal optical responses of the quartz/graphene/eletrolyte interface has been used to explain the phenomena, which indicated a common effect of p-polarized and s-polarized light. This work offers useful insight into a multi-angle application of the graphene-based optical modulator in visible-infrared region.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present a computational study of the magnetic anisotropy energy for a given concentration of the Mn-ions in the GaAs host, in the framework of the density functional theory. We focus on the influence of a different kind of strains: biaxial, shear, and hydrostatic on the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy parameters K1 and K2, which reflect the magnetic anisotropy energy out- and in- (001) plane, respectively. We have shown that the general trends for the applied biaxial strain on anisotropy parameters are consistent with the experimental data. We have predicted the critical strains, for which the magnetization vector changes its direction. Our results have shown that it is not possible to modify considerably the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy parameters, exposing (Ga,Mn)As to hydrostatic pressure of a magnitude reasonable from experimental point of view.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we comprehensively investigate the dynamic magnetic properties of FeSiAl-NiZnFeO thin films prepared by the oblique deposition method via a shorted microstrip perturbation technique. For the films with higher oblique angle and NiZn ferrite doping amount, there are two ferromagnetic resonance peaks observed in the permeability spectra, and both of the two peaks originate from FeSiAl. Furthermore, the magnetic anisotropy field HK of the ferromagnetic resonance peak at higher frequency is enhanced with increasing doping amount, which is interpreted in terms of the contribution of reinforced stress-induced anisotropy and shape anisotropy brought about by doping elements and oblique sputtering method. In addition, the thermal stability of the ferromagnetic resonance frequency fFMR of FeSiAl-NiZnFeO films with oblique angles of 35° and 45° with respect to temperature ranging from 300 K to 420 K is deteriorated with increasing ferrite doping amount, which is mainly ascribed to the influence of pair-ordering anisotropy and/or the reduction of the FeSiAl grain size.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Micromagnetic simulation for detecting magnetic nanobeads is performed by using spin torque oscillation as the detector. The non-uniform stray field generated by magnetic beads can induce a detectable frequency shift of a spin torque oscillator. Simulations indicate that an 80-nm-diameter magnetic bead can be detected with a frequency shift of 1.2 GHz and a maximum linewidth of 28 MHz. Due to the non-uniform stray field, the frequency shift and linewidth vary with the bead position. For multiple beads detection, the oscillation frequency is linear with the number of 40-nm-diameter beads, namely 0.16 GHz/bead on average.© 2017The angular dependence of the exchange bias (ADEB) has been investigated in detail when the exchange-coupled ferromagnetic (FM)/antiferromagnetic (AFM) bilayer is in the bistable state. Complete and incomplete jump phenomena were found at the intrinsic easy and hard axes, when they pass through two special positions making the angular deviation of 58.2826° and 121.7174° from the easy axis of the uniaxial anisotropy, respectively. The combination of these different types of the jump phenomena at the intrinsic easy and hard axes yields five distinct types of the ADEB. The physical condition for each type of ADEB is established. Additionally, the extreme value problem of the exchange bias field and coercivity are also discussed, which is an important technological issue in the design of the magnetoresistive and spintronic devices. These results enable us to make a comprehensive understanding of the experimental ADEB curves.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The synthesis conditions of buffer-free (00l) oriented YCo5 and Y2Co17 thin films onto Al2O3 (0001) substrates have been explored by molecular beam epitaxy (MBE). The manipulation of the ratio of individual atomic beams of Yttrium, Y and Cobalt, Co, as well as growth rate variations allows establishing a thin film phase diagram. Highly textured YCo5±x thin films were stabilized with saturation magnetization of 517 emu/cm3 (0.517 MA/m), coercivity of 4 kOe (0.4 T), and anisotropy constant, K1, equal to 5.34×106 erg/cm3 (0.53 MJ/m3). These magnetic parameters and the perpendicular anisotropy obtained without additional underlayers make the material system interesting for application in magnetic recording devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline NdFe0.5Cr0.5O3 has orthorhombic structure with Pnma space group and is magnetically ordered at room temperature as confirmed by neutron diffraction. The magnetic structure involves CxGyFz type ordering of Fe3+/Cr3+ ions. NdFe0.5Cr0.5O3 shows magnetization reversal and sign reversal of exchange bias at ~16 K. Nd3+ moments that get induced by the internal field of |Fe+Cr| sublattice couple antiferromagnetically with the ferromagnetic component of |Fe+Cr| sublattice. Nd3+ moments overcome the |Fe+Cr| moments at ~16 K below which the material shows negative magnetization and positive exchange bias.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.DC current induced magnetization reversal and magnetization oscillation was observed in 500 nm large size Co90Fe10/Cu/Ni80Fe20 pillars. A perpendicular external field enhanced the coercive field separation between the reference layer (Co90Fe10) and free layer (Ni80Fe20) in the pseudo spin valve, allowing a large window of external magnetic field for exploring the free-layer reversal. A magnetic hybrid structure was achieved for the study of spin torque oscillation by applying a perpendicular field >3 kOe. The magnetization precession was manifested in terms of the multiple peaks on the differential resistance curves. Depending on the bias current and applied field, the regions of magnetic switching and magnetization precession on a dynamical stability diagram has been discussed in details. Micromagnetic simulations are shown to be in good agreement with experimental results and provide insight for synchronization of inhomogeneities in large sized device. The ability to manipulate spin-dynamics on large size devices could be proved useful for increasing the output power of the spin-transfer nano-oscillators (STNOs).© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of iron deficiency on the structural, electrical, ferroelectric and magnetic properties of nano PbFe12-xO19-δ (where x=0.0, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75, 1.0) hexaferrites prepared by sol-gel auto combustion and processed by microwaves are investigated. X-ray analysis confirms single phase magneto-plumbite phase formation. The surface morphology is studied from Field Emission Scanning Electron Microscope. Further, optical properties are investigated using Fourier Transform Infrared spectra and UV–visible spectra. AC electrical conductivity is estimated as a function of temperature and frequency in the range of room temperature (RT) to 500 °C and 100 Hz to 5MHz. AC electrical conduction analysis shows that conduction is mainly due to small polaron hopping mechanism. The variation of polarization with applied electric field exhibits hysteresis loop confirming the ferroelectric nature. The initial permeability studies with varying temperature reveals that the Curie transition temperature for the present series is around 400 °C. Variation of initial permeability with frequency ranging from 100 to 5 MHz shows a constant value (except for x=0.0) opening avenues for high frequency applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.With the aim to discover new diluted magnetic semiconductors, the present study describes the use of first principles calculations that were performed to study Ti doped AlN in search of potential functional materials. Based on our calculations, the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of the material revealed that Ti substituted on cationic sites introduces ferromagnetic ground state in the host. In addition to using the standard GGA approximation, Hubbard correction was also applied, which revealed an increase in magnetic moment as well as opening of band gap due to shift of Ti-3d states towards valance band. The analysis of structural optimization and density of states indicated the presence of 3d-3d superexchange electronic interaction mediated through p-d hybridization between Ti-3d and N-2p. The findings of this work predicted Ti:AlN to be a wide band gap n-type high Curie temperature ferromagnetic semiconductor, making it a potential candidate for applications in future spintronics devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic hyperthermia ablates tumor cells by absorbing the thermal energy from magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) under an external alternating magnetic field. The blood vessels (BVs) within tumor region can generally reduce treatment effectiveness due to the cooling effect of blood flow. This paper aims to investigate the cooling effect of BVs on the temperature field of malignant tumor regions using a complex geometric model and numerical simulation. For deriving the model, the Navier-Stokes equation for blood flow is combined with Pennes bio-heat transfer equation for human tissue. The effects on treatment temperature caused by two different BV distributions inside a mammary tumor are analyzed through numerical simulation under different conditions of flow rate considering a Fe-Cr-Nb-B alloy, which has low Curie temperature ranging from 42 °C to 45 °C. Numerical results show that the multi-vessel system has more obvious cooling effects than the single vessel one on the temperature field distribution for hyperthermia. Besides, simulation results show that the temperature field within tumor area can also be influenced by the velocity and diameter of BVs. To minimize the cooling effect, this article proposes a treatment method based on the increase of the thermal energy provided to MNPs associated with the adoption of low Curie temperature particles recently reported in literature. Results demonstrate that this approach noticeably improves the uniformity of the temperature field, and shortens the treatment time in a Fe-Cr-Nb-B system, thus reducing the side effects to the patient.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nowadays, nanoparticles (NPs) are used in a variety of biomedical applications including brain disease diagnostics and subsequent treatments. Among the various types of NPs, magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) have been implemented by many research groups for an array of life science applications. In this paper, we studied MNPs controlled delivery into the endothelial cells using a magnetic field. Dynamics equations of MNPs were defined in the continuous domain using control theory methods and were applied to crossing the cell membrane. This study, dedicated to clinical and biomedical research applications, offers a guideline for the generation of a magnetic field required for the delivery of MNPs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties have been investigated of FeCuxC1−x for a Fe atom chain wrapped in armchair (N,N) carbon nanotubes (N = 4,6,8,10,12) diluted by Cu2+ ions using Monte Carlo simulations. The thermal total magnetization and magnetic susceptibility are found. The reduced transition temperatures of iron and carbon have been calculated for different N and the exchange interactions. The total magnetization is obtained for different exchange interactions and crystal field. The Magnetic hysteresis cycles are obtained for different N, the reduced temperatures and exchange interactions. The multiple magnetic hysteresis is found. This system shows it can be used as magnetic nanostructure possessing potential current and future applications in permanent magnetism, magnetic recording and spintronics.© 2017 Elsevier LtdAn accurate charge-based compact MOSFET model is developed using the third order Hermite interpolation polynomial to approximate the relation between surface potential and inversion charge in the channel. This new formulation of the drain current retains the same simplicity of the most advanced charge-based compact MOSFET models such as BSIM, ACM and EKV, but it is developed without requiring the crude linearization of the inversion charge. Hence, the asymmetry and the non-linearity in the channel are accurately accounted for. Nevertheless, the expression of the drain current can be worked out to be analytically equivalent to BSIM, ACM and EKV. Furthermore, thanks to this new mathematical approach the slope factor is rigorously defined in all regions of operation and no empirical assumption is required.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new type of study is presented for magnetic and structural characterization of amorphous or nanocrystalline metallic alloys in ribbon or wire-shaped samples. A single sample is subjecting to successive steps of flash isocurrent heat treatments with increasing duration in time, followed by a rapid cooling, while magneto-electric properties evolution are scanned in situ at room temperature. When one set of isocurrent heat treatments is finished, the annealing current is increased and a new set of isocurrent treatments starts. The properties studied were the saturation magnetization and the coercive field at 50 Hz, magnetic permeability at 100 kHz and electrical resistance from where we also obtained the crystalline fraction. The method was applied on two samples of Finemet-like alloys and the results were analyzed from the perspective of current literature. With the present method it is possible to obtain a general and meticulous understanding of the structural and magnetic evolution of the samples tested, with a considerable saving of time and samples.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Based on Monte Carlo numerical simulations: results for the magnetization reversal process in thin circular Ni dots connected by a bridge are presented. The dependence of the process on both the width of the bridge and the orientation of the applied magnetic field has been investigated. It was found that when the applied magnetic field is set parallel to the bridge, the hysteresis curves are weakly dependent on the width of the bridge, being rather close to that of a single dot of the same diameter. On the other hand, when the magnetic field is applied perpendicularly to the bridge, a significant reduction in the coercivity of the system is obtained, even in the case of narrower bridges.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic behavior of nickel modulated nanowires embedded in porous alumina membranes is investigated. Their diameters exhibit a sharp transition between below (35 nm) and above (52 nm) the theoretical limit for transverse and vortex domain walls. Magnetic hysteresis loops and first-order reversal curves (FORCs) were measured on several ordered nanowire arrays with different wide-narrow segment lengths ratio and compared with those from homogenous nanowires. The experimental magnetic response evidences a rather complex susceptibility behavior for nanowires with modulated diameter. Micromagnetic simulations on isolated and first-neighbors arrays of nanowires show that the domain wall structure, which depends on the segment diameter, suffers a transformation while crossing the diameter modulation, but without any pinning. The experimental array magnetic behavior can be ascribed to a heterogeneous stray field induced by the diameter modulation, yielding a stronger interaction field at the wide extremity than at the narrow one. The results evidence the possibility to control the domain wall propagation and morphology by modulating the lateral aspect of the magnetic entity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate theoretically the propagation of electromagnetic oscillating soliton in the form of breather in an anisotropic ferromagnetic medium. The interaction of magnetization with the magnetic field component of the electromagnetic (EM) wave has been studied by solving Maxwell's equations coupled with a Landau–Lifshitz equation for the magnetization of the medium. We made a small perturbation on the magnetization and magnetic field along the direction of propagation of EM wave in the framework of reductive perturbation method and the associated nonlinear magnetization dynamics is governed by a generalized derivative nonlinear Schrödinger (DNLS) equation. In order to understand the dynamics of the concerned system, we employ the Jacobi elliptic function method to solve the DNLS equation and deduce breatherlike soliton modes for the EM wave in the medium.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A temporal evolution of spin accumulation of Co/MgO/Ag spin valves have been studied by using the nonlocal spin detection technique over almost a 3-month period in the ambient environment after the fabrication of the devices. Three different stages of the spin accumulation are first observed due to aging effect. The aging effect comes from two contributions–the gradual oxidation of the Ag/MgO and MgO/Co interfaces at the junctions’ areas which arises from the annealing process and the oxidation of the side surfaces of the Ag channels. The theories of S. Takahashi and A. Fert are introduced to evaluate the different evolution stages of spin accumulation.© 2017LiFe0.9Mg0.1PO4 sample was prepared by using a solid–state reaction method, and the temperature-dependent magnetic properties of the sample were studied. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) pattern showed an olivine-type orthorhombic structure with space group Pnma based on Rietveld refinement method. The effect of Mg substitution in antiferromagnetic LiFe0.9Mg0.1PO4 was investigated using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and Mössbauer spectroscopy. The temperature-dependence of the magnetization curves of LiFe0.9Mg0.1PO4 shows abnormal antiferromagnetic behavior with ordering temperature. Sudden changes in both the magnetic hyperfine field (Hhf) and its slope below 15 K suggest that magnetic phase transition associated to the abrupt occurrence of spin-reorientation. The Néel temperature (TN) and spin-reorientation temperature (TS) of LiFe0.9Mg0.1PO4 are lower than those of pure LiFePO4 (TN = 51 K, TS = 23 K). This is due to the Fe–O–Fe superexchange interaction being larger than that of the Fe–O–Mg link. Also, we have confirmed a change in the electric quadrupole splitting (ΔEQ) by the spin-orbit coupling effect and the shape of Mössbauer spectrum has provided the evidence for TS and a strong crystalline field. We have found that Mg ions in LiFe0.9Mg0.1PO4 induce an asymmetric charge density due to the presence of Mg2+ ions at the FeO6 octahedral sites.© 2017An investigation of the angular dependence of the dynamic permeability spectra has been performed. Three Permalloy films with different thickness were used as the study samples that possess the stripe domains. In order to better understand the magnetization distribution in stripe domains, a theoretical approach was proposed to analyze the variation of the resonance intensity of permeability spectra. By fitting the angular dependence of the μ″max using a theoretical function, a coefficient Λ that can be used to evaluate the average value of the periodic function of the anting angle θ in a periodic stripe is obtained. As the film thickness increases, the decrease of the ratio between domain wall width and stripe domain width is happen. This enables that the coefficient Λ decreases with the increase of film thickness. By deducing this coefficient Λ, one can estimate the maximum canting angle θ0 ∼ 8° for the Permalloy films in our experiments.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.L11-CoPt/Ta/NiFe trilayers are chosen as model films for probing the role of spacer layer on tuning the tilt angle magnetization (θM) in such exchange springs. For this purpose, a non-magnetic layer (Ta) with varying thickness (tTa) from 0 to 2.5 nm was inserted between 10-nm thick CoPt film exhibiting strong perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) and 4-nm thick NiFe film having in-plane magnetic anisotropy (IMA). With the insertion of Ta-spacer, the magnetic hysteresis loops become more and more tilted as tTa increases. Upon increasing the tTa from 0 to 2.5 nm, the estimated SQR⊥ (=Mr⊥/Ms⊥) from the M–H loops is found to decrease moderately; while the θM increases significantly from 43° to 77°. MFM images revealed maze-like domain patterns and the domain size tends to increase at the expense of magnetic phase contrast with increasing tTa. Micro-magnetic simulation of tilt in the anisotropy axis with respect to the bare CoPt-layer showed a trend similar to that of those observed with the M–H loops obtained by VSM measurements. The results of present study suggest that the insertion of Ta-spacer is not only beneficial in terms of preserving the competing anisotropies such as PMA and IMA of CoPt and NiFe-layers respectively through weakened exchange coupling; but also, act as an appropriate means for realizing tunable tilted magnetic anisotropy in the L11-CoPt/NiFe exchange springs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In our present study we highlight the observations of external magnetic field induced sharp meta-magnetic transition in polycrystalline bulk as well as nanocrystalline form of Pr0.65(Ca0.7Sr0.7)0.35MnO3 compound. Interestingly, such behavior persists in the nanoparticles regardless of the disorder broadened transition. However, higher magnetic field is required for nanoparticles having average particle size ∼40 nm for such meta-magnetic transition, which differs from the general trends of the pure charge ordered nano materials. The interfacial strain between the different magnetic domains plays the important role in magnetic isothermal properties of nanoparticles, when the samples are cooled down in different cooling field. Additionally, both the bulk and nanoparticle compounds exhibit spontaneous phase separation and significantly large magnetoresistance at the low temperature region due to the melting of charge ordered fraction.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Topology optimization using isoparametric projection for the design of permanent magnet patterns in Halbach arrays is proposed. Based on isoparametric shape functions used in the finite element analysis, the permanent magnet strength and magnetization directions in a Halbach array are simultaneously optimized for a given design goal. To achieve fabrication feasibility of a designed Halbach magnet array, two design schemes are combined with the isoparametric projection method. First, a penalization scheme is proposed for designing the permanent magnets to have discrete magnetization direction angles. Second, an extrusion scheme is proposed for the shape regularization of the permanent magnet segments. As a result, the method systematically finds the optimal permanent magnet patterns of a Halbach array considering manufacturing feasibility. In two numerical examples, a circular shaped permanent magnet Halbach array is designed to minimize the magnitude of the magnetic flux density and to maximize the upward direction magnetic flux density inside the magnet array. Logical extension of the method to the design of permanent magnet arrays in linear actuators is provided, where the design goal is to maximize the actuator magnetic force.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present a theoretical method to calculate specific magnetic properties, e.g. magnetization curves, magnetic susceptibility and probability landscapes along the [100], [110] and [111] crystallographic directions of a crystal of cubic symmetry. The probability landscape displays the evolution of the most probable angular orientation of the magnetization vector, for selected temperatures and magnetic fields. Our method is based on the premises of classical statistical mechanics. The energy density, used in the partition function, is the sum of magnetic anisotropy and Zeeman energies, however no other energies e.g. elastic or magnetoelastic terms are considered in the present work. Model cubic systems of diverse anisotropies are analyzed first, and subsequently material magnetic systems of cubic symmetry; namely iron, nickel and Cox Fe100−x compounds, are discussed. We highlight a correlation between magnetization curves and the associated probability landscapes. In addition, determination of easiest axes of magnetization, using energy consideration, is done and compared with the results of the present method.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have grown rarely studied Gd1-x CaxMnO3 (GCMO) and Sm1-xCaxMnO3 (SCMO) thin films on SrTiO3 (1 0 0) single crystal substrates with pulsed laser deposition in order to optimize the magnetic and structural properties for e.g. memristor-like applications. To enable the Mott insulator to metal transition with practicable external stimulus, the previously unstudied x=0.4 doping was chosen. The deposition temperature was 500 °C or 700 °C and the oxygen post-annealing was done in situ at 500 °C or 700 °C. All the films were fully textured and (0b0) oriented, but the ones made at 700 °C had better crystalline quality. For the same pulse amounts, GCMO films were clearly thinner than the SCMO films. Magnetically, all the films showed a charge/orbital order phase transition around 360 K and a ferrimagnetic transition around 70 K. The saturation magnetization at 10 K was highest in the films deposited and oxygen annealed at 700 °C. The samples deposited and annealed at 500 °C contained an unknown ferromagnetic impurity, which was invisible in structural characterization and not observed in the other samples. The samples made at 700 °C had a hysteretic I(V)-curves typical for materials used in memristors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Landau–Lifshitz–Gilbert (LLG) equation describes the dynamics of a damped magnetization vector that can be understood as a generalization of Larmor spin precession. The LLG equation cannot be deduced from the Hamiltonian framework, by introducing a coupling to a usual bath, but requires the introduction of additional constraints. It is shown that these constraints can be formulated elegantly and consistently in the framework of dissipative Nambu mechanics. This has many consequences for both the variational principle and for topological aspects of hidden symmetries that control conserved quantities. We particularly study how the damping terms of dissipative Nambu mechanics affect the consistent interaction of magnetic systems with stochastic reservoirs and derive a master equation for the magnetization. The proposals are supported by numerical studies using symplectic integrators that preserve the topological structure of Nambu equations. These results are compared to computations performed by direct sampling of the stochastic equations and by using closure assumptions for the moment equations, deduced from the master equation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have used the Monte Carlo (MC) simulation method with Metropolis algorithm to study the finite temperature phase transition properties of a binary alloy spherical nanoparticle with radius r of the type ApB1-p. The system consists of two different species of magnetic components, namely, A and B with spins σ=1/2 and S=1, respectively. A complete picture of phase diagrams, total magnetizations and susceptibilities in related planes have been presented, and the main roles of the radius of nanoparticle, active concentration value of type-A atoms as well as other system parameters on the thermal and magnetic phase transition features of the considered system have been discussed in detail. Our MC investigations clearly show that it is possible to control the critical characteristic behaviors of the system with the help of adjustable Hamiltonian parameters.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe effect of the velocity saturation region (VSR) on the impedance field of proto-type MOSFET devices, which operate in the saturation region, was investigated to analyze the drain thermal noise. An enhanced impedance field for the drain thermal noise was derived based on the well-known physical analyses of MOSFET noise. The mechanism of the VSR in inducing the drain thermal noise has been explicated by using a self-consistent equivalent circuit model of the saturated MOSFETs. This alternative description was found to be consistent with the analytical derivation. The present analysis has been demonstrated to be consistent with the behavior of empirical drain thermal noise.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Self-consistent ab initio calculations, based on Density Functional Theory approach and using full potential Linear Augmented Plane Wave method, are performed to investigate both electronic and magnetic properties of the CoCr2O4 and NiCr2O4. Magnetic moment considered to lie along (010) axes are computed. Obtained data from ab initio calculations are used as input for the high temperature series expansions calculations to compute other magnetic parameters. The high temperature series expansions of the magnetic susceptibility are given up to seventh order series in (x=JMn-Mn/kBT) of CoCr2O4 and NiCr2O4. The Néel temperature TN(K) and critical exponent γ associated with the magnetic susceptibility are obtained as well for both compounds.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic transition with a temperature hysteresis of about 7 K was observed in the martensitic phase of Ni51.9Mn27Ga211. The measurements of AC magnetic susceptibility in constant magnetic fields up to 570 kA/m have proved its magnetic origin. The transport and caloric measurements were used to gain better understanding of the nature of this phenomenon. The variation of the martensite lattice parameters with temperature is suggested to account for the hysteresis of the magnetic transition.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The solution combustion synthesis of porous magnetite (Fe3O4) powders by a mixture of glycine and urea fuels was investigated concerning the thermodynamic aspects and powder characteristics. The adiabatic combustion temperature and combusted species were thermodynamically calculated as a function of the fuel to oxidant molar ratio (ϕ). The combustion behavior, phase evolution, porous structure and magnetic properties were characterized by thermal analysis, X-ray diffractometry, N2 adsorption–desorption, electron microscopy and vibrating sample magnetometry techniques. Nearly single phase Fe3O4 powders were synthesized by the mixture of fuels at ϕ values of 0.75 and 1. The as-combusted Fe3O4 powders at ϕ = 1 exhibited porous structure with the specific surface area of 83.4 m2/g. The highest saturation magnetization of 75.5 emu/g and the lowest coercivity of 84 Oe were achieved at ϕ = 1, due to the high purity and large crystallite size, inducing from the highest adiabatic combustion temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A study of the multilayer system MgO/CoFeB(1.1 nm)/Ta(t)/CoFeB(0.8 nm)/MgO is presented, where the two CoFeB layers are separated by a Ta interlayer of varying thickness t. The magnetization properties deduced from complementary techniques such as superconducting quantum interference magnetometry, ferromagnetic resonance frequency measurements and Brillouin light scattering spectroscopy can be tuned by changing the Ta thickness between t = 0.25 nm, 0.5 nm and 0.75 nm. For t = 0.5 nm, a ferromagnetic coupling is observed, whereas for t = 0.75 nm, the antiferromagnetic coupling needed to construct a synthetic ferrimagnet is realized. In the latter case, the shape of magnetic domain walls between two ferrimagnetic alignments or between a ferro- and a ferrimagnetic alignment is very different. This behavior can be interpreted as a result of the change in dipolar as well as interlayer exchange energy and domain wall pinning, which is an important conclusion for the realization of data storage devices based on synthetic ferri- and antiferromagnets.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization reversal and magnetic microstructure of top soft magnetic layer (Fe) in exchange spring coupled L10 FePt/Fe is studied using high resolution Kerr microscopy. With remnant state of the hard magnetic layer (L10 FePt) as initial condition, magnetization loops along with magnetic domains are recorded for the top soft magnetic layer (Fe) using Kerr microscopy. Considerable shifting of Fe layer hysteresis loop from center which is similar to exchange bias phenomena is observed. It is also observed that one can tune the magnitude of hysteresis shift by reaching the remanent state from different saturating fields (HSAT) and also by varying the angle between measuring field and HSAT. The hysteresis loops and magnetic domains of top soft Fe layer demonstrate unambiguously that soft magnetic layer at remanent state in such exchange coupled system is having unidirectional anisotropy. An analogy is drawn and the observations are explained in terms of established model of exchange bias phenomena framed for field-cooled ferromagnetic - antiferromagnetic bilayer systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Since their birth or mergence the late 1980s, the nanocrystalline ultrasoft magnetic materials are taking a great importance in power electronic systems conception. One of the main advantages that make them more attractive nowadays is their ability to be packaged since the reduction of the magnetostrictive constant to almost zero. In aircraft applications, due to the high component compactness and to their location (for example near the jet engine), the operating temperature increases and may reach easily 200 °C and more. Consequently, the magnetic thermal ageing may occur but is, unfortunately, weakly studied. This paper focuses on the influence of the coating (packaging type) on the magnetic nanocrystalline performances during a thermal ageing. This study is based on monitoring the magnetic characteristics of two types of nanocrystalline cores (naked and coated) during a thermal activated ageing (100, 150 and 200 °C). Based on a dedicated monitoring protocol, a large magnetic characterization has been done and analyzed. Elsewhere, X-Ray Diffraction and magnetostriction measurements were carried out to support the study of the anisotropy energies evolution with ageing. This latter is discussed in this paper to explain and give hypothesis about the ageing phenomena.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper is dedicated to investigate the effect of Co2+ ions in magnetite Fe3O4 nano-particles with stoichiometric formula CoxFe3-xO4 where (x = 0, 0.05, 0.1 and 0.15) prepared by co-precipitation method. The structural, thermal, morphological, magnetic and optical properties of magnetite and Co2+ doped magnetite nanoparticles have been carried out using X-ray Diffractometer, Fourier Transform Infrared Spectroscopy, Themogravimetric Analysis, Scanning Electron Microscopy, Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM) and UV–Vis Spectrometer (UV–Vis) respectively. Structural analysis verified the formation of single phase inverse spinel cubic structure with decrease in lattice parameters due to increase in cobalt content. FTIR analysis confirms the single phase of CoxFe3-xO4 nanoparticles with the major band at 887 cm−1, which might be due to the stretching vibrations of metal-oxide bond. The DSC results corroborate the finding of an increase in the maghemite to hematite phase transition temperature with increase in Co2+ content. The decrease in enthalpy with increase in Co2+ concentration attributed to the fact that the degree of conversion from maghemite to hematite decrease which shows that the stability increases with increasing Co2+ content in B-site of Fe3O4 structure. SEM analysis demonstrated the formation of spherical shaped nanoparticles with least agglomeration. The magnetic measurements enlighten that the coercivity and anisotropy of CoxFe3-xO4 nanoparticles are significantly increased. From UV–Vis analysis it is revealed that band gap energy increases with decreasing particle size. This result has a great interest for magnetic fluid hyperthermia application (MPH).© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, heavily boron-doped hydrogenated Ge epilayers are grown on Si substrates at a low growth temperature (220 °C). The quality of the boron-doped epilayers is dependent on the hydrogen flow rate. The optical emission spectroscopic, X-ray diffraction and Hall measurement results demonstrate that better quality boron-doped Ge epilayers can be obtained at low hydrogen flow rates (0 sccm). This reduction in quality is due to an excess of hydrogen in the source gas, which breaks one of the Ge-Ge bonds on the Ge surface, leading to the formation of unnecessary dangling bonds. The structure of the boron doped Ge epilayers is analyzed by transmission electron microscopy and atomic force microscopy. In addition, the performance, based on the I-V characteristics, of Ge/Si photodetectors fabricated with boron doped Ge epilayers produced under different hydrogen flow rates was examined. The photodetectors with boron doped Ge epilayers produced with a low hydrogen flow rate (0 sccm) exhibited a higher responsivity of 0.144 A/W and a lower dark current of 5.33 × 10−7 A at a reverse bias of 1 V.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.FePt-C granular films deposited on MgO underlayers are the prototype media for heat-assisted magnetic recording. To reduce the in-plane magnetic component in the FePt-C media, we investigated the effect of Cr buffer layers on the crystallographic textures of the MgO underlayers and the resultant magnetic properties of the FePt-C layers. By growing a MgO underlayer on a Cr buffer layer, the (0 0 1) texture of the MgO underlayer is improved, on which the in-plane component of a FePt-C film is substantially reduced. We conclude that the growth in the grain size of the MgO underlayer is the key factor in reducing the in-plane component in the FePt-C recording layer.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on a component-selective and vectorial magneto-optical imaging setup for the visualization of magnetization processes with picosecond temporal resolution. The stable imaging setup is suitable for the investigation of high excitation frequency magnetization dynamics, including domain wall motion, precession of magnetization, and spin-waves. The orthogonally aligned in-plane and out-of-plane components of magnetization are separated by untangling the superpositioned longitudinal and polar magneto-optical effects. Combining images obtained with varying plane and angle of incidence of illumination allow for the quantitative and time-dependent extraction of the spatial magnetization response. The capabilities of the setup are demonstrated with the phase-locked imaging of spin precession and spin-waves in a structured Co40Fe40B20 thin film at the precessional frequency of the magnetic microstructure at 1.9 GHz.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Based on the Maxwell equation, the electromagnetic model in the coaxial fiber was described. The interaction with electromagnetic wave was analysed and the theoretical formula of axial permeability (μ∥), axial permittivity (ε∥), radial permeability (μ⊥) and radial permittivity (ε⊥) of Fe-C coaxial fiber were derived, and the demagnetization factor (N) of fibrous material was revised. Calculation results indicate that the composite fiber has stronger anisotropy and better EM dissipation performance than the hollow carbon fiber and solid iron fiber with the same volume content. These properties can be enhanced through increasing aspect ratio and carbon content. The μ‖ is 5.18-4.46i, μ⊥ is 2.58-0.50i, ε∥ is 7.63-6.97i, and ε⊥ is 1.98-0.15i when the electromagnetic wave frequency is 5 GHz with the outer diameter of 0.866 μm, inner diameter of 0.500 μm, and length of 20 μm. The maximum of the imaginary part of μ∥ and ε∥ are much larger than that of μ⊥ and ε⊥ when the structural parameters change, and the maximum of μ∥ and ε∥ can reach 6.429 and 23.59. Simulation results show that greater conductivity, larger aspect ratio, thin iron shell play important roles to improve the electromagnetic matching ability and microwave attenuation for the Fe-C coaxial fibers.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study three distinct types of planar, spherically symmetric and localized structures, one of them having non-topological behavior and the two others being of topological nature. The non-topological structures have energy density localized in a compact region in the plane, but are unstable against spherically symmetric fluctuations. The topological structures are stable and behave as vortices and skyrmions at larger distances, but they engender interesting compact behavior as one approaches their inner cores. They are semi-compact skyrmion-like spin textures generated from models that allow to control the internal behavior of such topological structures.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The dispersive composition, dynamic susceptibility and spectrum of times of magnetization relaxation for six samples of magnetic fluid obtained by centrifuging two base colloidal solutions of the magnetite in kerosene was investigated experimentally. The base solutions differed by the concentration of the magnetic phase and the width of the particle size distribution. The procedure of cluster analysis allowing one to estimate the characteristic sizes of aggregates with uncompensated magnetic moments was described. The results of the magnetogranulometric and cluster analyses were discussed. It was shown that centrifugation has a strong effect on the physical properties of the separated fractions, which is related to the spatial redistribution of particles and multi-particle aggregates. The presence of aggregates in magnetic fluids is interpreted as the main reason of low-frequency (0.1–10 kHz) dispersion of the dynamic susceptibility. The obtained results count in favor of using centrifugation as an effective means of changing the dynamic susceptibility over wide limits and obtaining fluids with the specified type of susceptibility dispersion.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study an s–p model magnetic system with a triplet ground state coupled to two temperature baths. By varying the temperatures we both generate non-thermal electronic distributions and create additional coherences in the density matrix of the system. Thus the thermally-induced magnetic response goes beyond the simple picture of majority-minority population dynamics. Furthermore, we discuss the influence of temperature induced relaxation effects on the dynamics induced by an optical perturbation for this quantum system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A series of ceramic samples YCr1−xMnxO3 (0.15 ⩽ x ⩽ 0.4) with orthorhombic phase were prepared by a modified Pechini method, the structure and magnetic properties were studied in details. Our experiments revealed remarkable negative magnetization induced by the competition among multiple exchange interactions. The negative magnetization is result from the antiferromagnetic coupling of weak ferromagnetic moments of Mn3+–Mn3+ and Cr3+–Cr3+ with that of Cr3+–Mn3+ interactions. And the strength of the magnetization is closely related to the temperature, magnetic field and the value of x. Below the compensation temperature, the absolute of negative magnetization firstly increases and then decreases with the increase of x, which is correlated with the weakening of Cr3+–Cr3+ interaction and the enhancement of Mn3+–Mn3+ interaction. The increase of magnetization obtained from the hysteresis loops is attributed to the ferromagnetic exchange interaction between Cr3+ and Mn3+. Moreover, the magnetic switching by only changing the magnetic field strength and both normal and inverse magnetocaloric effects were demonstrated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Ca-La-Co-doped M-type Sr-hexaferrite (Sr0.1Ca0.45La0.45Fe11.7Co0.3O19) decomposed into three different phases of orthorhombic, spinel, and hexagonal structures after annealing at 1200 °C in nitrogen atmosphere while the non-substituted SrFe12O19 maintained the hexagonal structure after annealing at the same condition. It is suggested that the charge-imbalance substitution of La3+/Co2+ = 1.5 induces phase instability of the M-type structure and it causes the phase transformation during the N2 annealing. In film experiment, polycrystalline Sr-hexaferrite films (SrFe12O19) have been prepared by pulsed laser deposition and post-annealing processes. When the film was annealed in vacuum at 500 °C, the magnetization value at the magnetic field H = 15 kOe increased by ∼80% and the coercivity decreased significantly without microstructural change.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Based on the experimental finding of the exchange bias in amorphous carbon samples with embedded Co nanoparticles and on the graphited character of the amorphous carbon interface confirmed by molecular dynamics simulations we have proposed the interface of graphited carbon to be antiferromagnetic. A theoretical model, which comprises the Kondo interactions in the interfaces of Co nanoparticles and the induced antiferromagnetic interactions in the graphited carbons, is employed to evaluate the ferromagnetism of the interfaces of Co nanoparticles. We have shown that the ferromagnetism of interfaces of Co nanoparticles will be enhanced by the increase of antiferromagnetic interaction as well as the increase of electron density in the graphited carbons. In particular, we found that the antiferromagnetic interactions in graphited carbons will change the spin-wave excitation in interfaces of Co nanoparticles from the quasiacoustic mode to the quasioptical one.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The samples of Ga-doped Cr2O3 have been prepared using chemical co-precipitation route. X-ray diffraction pattern and Raman spectra have indicated rhombohedral crystal structure with space group R3¯C. Magnetic measurements indicated diluted antiferromagnetic (AFM) spin order in Ga-doped α-Cr2O3 and ferrimagnetic ordering of spins at about 50–60 K is confirmed from the analysis of the temperature dependence of dc magnetization and ac susceptibility data. Apart from magnetic dilution effect, the samples have shown superparamagnetic behavior below 50 K due to frustrated surface spins of the nano-sized grains. The samples have shown non-linear electronic properties. The current-voltage (I-V) characteristics of the Ga-doped α-Cr2O3 samples are remarkably different from α-Cr2O3 sample. The bi-stable electronic states and negative differential resistance are some of the unique non-linear electronic properties that the I-V curves of Ga-doped samples have exhibited. Optical study revealed three electronic transitions in the samples associated with band gap energy at about 2.67–2.81 eV, 1.91–2.11 eV, 1.28–1.35 eV, respectively. The results indicated multi-level electronic structure in Ga-doped α-Cr2O3 system.© 2017Stress measurement that provides early indication of stress status has become increasingly demanding in the field of Non-destructive testing and evaluation (NDT&E). Bridging the correlation between micro magnetic properties and the applied tensile stress is the first conceptual step to come up with a new method of non-destructive testing. This study investigates the characterization of applied tensile stress with in-situ magnetic domain imaging and their dynamic behaviors by using magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) microscopy assisted with magneto-optical indicator film (MOIF). Threshold magnetic field (TMF) feature to reflect 180° domain wall (DW) characteristics behaviors in different grains is proposed for stress detection. It is verified that TMF is a threshold feature with better sensitivity and brings linear correlation for stress characterization in comparison to classical coercive field, remanent magnetization, hysteresis loss and permeability parameters. The results indicate that 180° DWs dynamic in the inner grain is highly correlated with stress. The DW dynamics of turn over (TO) tests for different grains is studied to illustrate the repeatability of TMF. Experimental tests of high permeability grain oriented (HGO) electrical steels under stress loading have been conducted to verify this study.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Electric field control of magnetism has many potential applications in magnetic memory storage, sensors and spintronics. Epitaxial heterostructure involving ferroelectric (FE), ferromagnetic (FM) materials is one of the possible routes towards the realization of devices exploiting sizable magnetoelectric effects. In this study, we prepared multiferroic composite ferromagnet/ferrite/ferroelectric thin films on SrTiO3(1 1 1) substrate by electron beam evaporation and pulsed laser deposition. This system represents a prototypical example of interface between body-centered-cubic Fe, spinel NCZF (Ni0.25Cu0.05Zn0.7Fe1.96O3.96) and perovskite PZT (PbZr0.52Ti0.48O3), respectively. Magnetoelectric effects measured as a function of bias voltage on these heterostructures have been investigated via magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE). The magnetic coercivity (Hc) considerably decreased as a voltage was applied. The Hc values exhibited the similar variation whether the applied voltage was positive or negative and the reversibility was demonstrated. The strain coupling-mediated magnetoelectric effect and local heating effect are supposed to be the possible origins of Hc variation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Results on the magnetic and structural properties of Ce10+xFe78−xB6 (x = 0, 2, 4, 6) ribbons with good potential for the manufacturing of permanent magnets are presented. Ce–Fe–B based ribbons have been prepared by melt-spinning technique. The as-spun ribbons reveal either amorphous or nanocrystalline structure depending on the velocity of the wheel. In order to obtain ribbons with optimum nanocrystalline structure and magnetic properties, the as-spun ribbons with amorphous structure were annealed for different periods of time at temperatures ranging between 650 and 750 °C. It was found that the nanocrystalline ribbons obtained by optimal annealing of amorphous precursors presented better magnetic properties compared to the nanocrystalline ribbons obtained directly by rapid quenching from the melt. The best magnetic properties have been obtained for the amorphous Ce14Fe80B6 ribbons after annealing at 700 °C for 20 min. when the coercivity was about 6.08 kOe, remanence about 7.7 kG and energy product of 8.21 MGOe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report systematic studies on non-magnetic Ta underlayer and cap layer driven microstructural and magnetic properties at a wide temperature range for CoFe films. All the films were grown at room temperature and post annealed at different annealing temperatures (TA = 200 °C, 250 °C, 300 °C, 350 °C, 400 °C and 450 °C). The in-plane magnetic hysteresis (M–H) loops of 10 nm thick CoFe single layer films, grown directly on thermally oxidized Si substrate, exhibit anisotropic nature for TA above 250 °C. However, the CoFe (10 nm) films grown on the 5 nm thick Ta underlayer show reduced anisotropy. Moreover, with underlayer and cap layers (2 nm) the anisotropy is disappeared. The in-plane coercivity (HC) shows a strong variation with TA, underlayer and cap layers. HC increases significantly with Ta underlayer and cap layers. The out of plane M–H loops exhibit increase in the remanence magnetization and squareness with both Ta underlayer and cap layers due to transition of in-plane magnetization component to the out of plane direction. The atomic force microscopic observations revealed that grain/particle size and shape depend strongly on TA and Ta layers. Moreover, a large reduction in the surface roughness is observed with the Ta cap layer. The magnetic domain patterns depend on the TA, and Ta layers. However, for Ta/CoFe/Ta films no clear domains were observed for all the TA. Hence, the Ta cap layers not only protect the CoFe magnetic layer against the heat treatment, but also show a smooth surface at a wide temperature range. These results could be discussed on the basis of random anisotropy model, TA, underlayer and cap layers driven microstructure and magnetization orientation of the CoFe films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of interfacial oxidation on electronic structure and magnetic properties at the FeRh/MgO (0 0 1) interface is studied by ab initio methods. The results show the formation of an interfacial FeO-like layer between the FeRh and the MgO barrier, which has a direct impact on Fe eg states at the interface. It is shown that these eg states are more affected than that the t2g states at the Fermi level due to the strong hybridization of these states with the p-states of oxygen. Thus, the oxidation modifies crucially the electronic structure and the magnetic properties as compared to those of an ideal interface. In particular, it was found that spin polarization of the ferromagnetic state is substantially enhanced. A simple two-current Julliere model shows that the TMR increases with oxidation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new scaling approach has been proposed for the spin exchange and the dipole–dipole interaction energy as a function of the system size. The computed scaling laws are used in atomistic Monte Carlo simulations of magnetic moment evolution to predict the transition from single domain to a vortex structure as the system size increases. The width of a 180° – domain wall extracted from the simulated structures is in close agreement with experimentally values for an F–Si alloy. The transition size from a single domain to a vortex structure is also in close agreement with theoretically predicted and experimentally measured values for Fe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The chemically synthesized high purity spinel NiCr2−xDyxO4 (x = 0, 0.1) samples have been characterized using magnetic and dielectric measurements in presence of high magnetic field. Crystal and magnetic structure of the samples have been determined by analyzing neutron diffraction data recorded between temperature of 6 K and 300 K. NiCr2O4 crystallizes in tetragonal phase with the space group of I41/amd whereas NiCr1.9Dy0.1O4 crystallizes in the mixed phase of cubic (space group of Fd3¯m) and tetragonal phases at room temperature. An additional phase of DyCrO3 with orthorhombic structure has been found in the Dy doped compound. The lattice parameter a increases and the c decreases in tetragonal structure with the substitution of Dy in Cr site. Both the samples show superlattice reflection peak indicating the presence of long range AFM ordering (transverse component) below 40 K. But the saturation magnetization slightly increases after Dy doping. An anomaly observed near Curie temperature in ε′ (T) of NiCr2O4 and NiCr1.9Dy0.1O4 demonstrates the contribution of coupling between ferroelectricity and ferrimagnetism in the compounds. A linear correlation between the difference in dielectric constant and the field dependent squared magnetization for both the samples has been observed. The spin–spin interactions are most likely responsible for the observed magnetodielectric (MD) effect due to the magnetodielectric hysteresis in both parent and doped samples. Interestingly the MD% is found to increase with Dy doping.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The dynamic and static magnetic properties of Ga0.99Yb0.01FeO3 are studied in detail using ac susceptibility and dc magnetization measurements. The study shows that the compound undergoes a spin-glass freezing at Tg≈213K. The dynamic scaling analysis of ac susceptibility data reveals typical features characteristic of canonical spin-glasses, i.e., relaxation time τ∗∼10-14s, critical exponent νz=4.1±0.2, and frequency sensitivity parameter δf∼10-3 within three frequency decades. The analysis of the critical behaviour of the static nonlinear susceptibility yields the critical exponents γ=4.3±0.1,β=1.0±0.1, and δ=5.5±0.5, which lie between those typical of three-dimensional (3D) weakly anisotropic Heisenberg and Ising spin glasses. The analysis of the field-cooled and zero-field-cooled magnetization data allows to define two characteristic temperatures depending on the applied magnetic field. The upper one, TirrH, is the threshold temperature corresponding to the appearance of weak irreversibility, whereas the lower one, TsH, marks the onset of strong irreversibility. The resulting field-temperature phase diagram turns out to be in good quantitative agreement with the mean-field predictions for 3D Heisenberg spin-glass with random magnetic anisotropy, and appears consistent with the chiral driven freezing scenario.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.CoNiGa ternary alloy nanowire arrays were successfully fabricated by simple DC electrodeposition into the anodized aluminum oxide (AAO) templates. A systematic study of the potential and components of the electrolyte were conducted to obtain different components of CoNiGa nanowires. The largest Ga content in the prepared alloy nanowires was about 17%, while for Co and Ni contents which can be controlled in a wide range by adjusting the composition and pH value of the electrolyte appropriately. X-ray diffraction analysis confirmed that the as-grown CoNiGa nanowire arrays were polycrystal with fcc phase of Co where Co atoms partially substituted by Ni and Ga. Magnetization curves of samples with different composition were measured at room temperature as well as low temperature. The results showed that the components of the alloy nanowires have a great impact on its magnetic properties. For Co55Ni28Ga17 nanowires, the magnetization reversal mode changes from curling mode to coherent rotation as the angle increases, and the temperature dependence of coercivity can be well described by the thermal activation effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The crystal and magnetic structure of the oxygen deficient double perovskite NdBaCuFeO5 was studied, using neutron powder diffraction data. The structure was refined from neutron powder diffraction data using the space groups P4/mmm and P4mm. For 2K⩽T⩽TN2=260K three families of magnetic Bragg peaks exist. These peaks can be indexed with commensurate propagation vectors k1=0 and the incommensurate k3= 0.4. Above TN2 only magnetic Bragg peaks originated from k1 and k2 propagation, were observed. The incommensurate magnetic structure can be attributed to a circular inclined spiral ordering as in YBaCuFeO5 compound.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new hysteresis operator for the simulation of Goss-textured ferromagnets is here defined. The operator is derived from the classic Stoner–Wohlfarth model, where the anisotropy energy is assumed to be cubic instead of uniaxial, in order to reproduce the magnetic behavior of Goss textured ferromagnetic materials, such as grain-oriented Fe–Si alloys, Ni–Fe alloys, and Ni–Co alloys. A vector hysteresis model based on a single hysteresis operator is then implemented and used for the prediction of the rotational magnetizations that have been measured in a sample of grain-oriented electrical steel. This is especially promising for FEM based calculations, where the magnetization state in each point must be recalculated at each time step. Finally, the computed loops, as well as the magnetic losses, are compared to the measured data.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Graphene spin valves can be optimized for various spintronic applications by tuning the associated experimental parameters. In this work, we report the angle dependent magnetoresistance (MR) in graphene spin valve for different orientations of applied magnetic field (B). The switching points of spin valve signals show a clear shift towards higher B for each increasing angle of the applied field, thus sensing the response for respective orientation of the magnetic field. The angular variation of B shifts the switching points from ±95 G to ±925 G as the angle is varied from 0° to 90° at 300 K. The observed shifts in switching points become more pronounced (±165 G to ±1450 G) at 4.2 K for similar orientation. A monotonic increase in MR ratio is observed as the angle of magnetic field is varied in the vertical direction at 300 K and 4.2 K temperatures. This variation of B (from 0° to 90°) increases the magnitude of MR ratio from ∼0.08% to ∼0.14% at 300 K, while at 4.2 K it progresses to ∼0.39% from ∼0.14%. The sensitivity related to angular variation of such spin valve structure can be employed for angle sensing applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe use of a GeO2 interfacial layer (IL) between a high-k dielectric and a Ge substrate helps to reduce the interface state density in Ge MOS devices. We report that the presence of the GeO2 IL changes the effective work function (eWF) of the gate stack when annealed after high-k dielectric deposition. The eWF is reduced from 4.31 eV to 3.98 eV for TaN and from 5.00 eV to 4.44 eV for Ni. Consequently, the threshold voltage (Vth) decreases from 0.69 V to 0.21 V for Ni after post deposition annealing. Our investigation confirms that the generation of oxygen vacancies in the GeO2 IL near the Ge substrate is the main cause of the eWF modulation. In addition, the reliability of the GeO2 IL is investigated via the conductance method and a constant-current stress test.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Two-dimensional (2D) materials have been proposed as promising candidate for spintronic applications due to their atomic crystal structure and physical properties. Here, we introduce exfoliated few-layer tungsten diselenide (WSe2) as spacer in a Py/WSe2/Py vertical spin valve. In this junction, the WSe2 spacer exhibits metallic behavior. We observed negative magnetoresistance (MR) with a ratio of −1.1% at 4 K and −0.21% at 300 K. A general phenomenological analysis of the negative MR property is discussed. Our result is anticipated to be beneficial for future spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdNitride-based heterostructures with InGaN/GaN multiple quantum wells in active region were investigated by electroreflectance spectroscopy. Two spectral lines with the stable difference between their phase parameters and slightly different energies were observed in the electroreflectance spectra under various bias voltages. Using models taking into account interference effects it was shown that electroreflectance signal at low amplitude of modulation voltage originates from the first and the last quantum wells in active region. The difference between built-in electric field strengths in these two quantum wells were estimated as 270–320 kV/cm.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this work we report the fabrication of N channel transistors based on IF(CN2)2 meta molecule. The effect of IF(CN2)2 meta evaporation parameters on corresponding TFTs performances, is evaluated and highlighted here. Since the effect of deposition conditions for this molecule type has not been reported yet, here we report an improvement about 20 times of field effect mobility when deposited at substrate temperature of 80 °C and deposition rate of 0.7 Å/s, and then annealed at low temperature. Reached mobility of 2.2 × 10−3 cm2/V·s, is comparable to reported μFE of single crystal indenofluorene TFTs. The optimum mobility in these evaporation conditions was explained by the best compromise between the grain size and packing density of films. Fabricated IF(CN2)2 meta based devices are combined to 6,13-Bis(triisopropylsilylethynyl)pentacene devices and then integrated into a CMOS inverter logic circuit. The inverter's VTC shows large output voltage swing. Electrical stability of the performed inverter was also evaluated and the inverter shows a correct electrical stability, after 3 h of non-stop operation and the peak to peak magnitude corresponding to VOUT decreases only by 2.6%.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Micromagnetic simulations for Cobalt hexagonal shape nanorings show onion (O) and vortex state (V) along with new state named “tri-domain state”. The tri-domain state is observed in sufficiently large width of ring. The magnetic reversible mechanism and transition of states are explained with help of vector field display. The transitions from one state to other occur by propagation of domain wall. The vertical parts of hexagonal rings play important role in developing the new “tri-domain” state. The behaviors of switching fields from onion to tri-domain (HO-Tr), tri-domain to vortex state (HTr—V) and vortex to onion state and “states size” are discussed in term of geometrical parameter of ring.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe optical response of strained SiGe alloys, as well as thin Si layers, is analyzed using a sp3d5s∗ tight-binding model within the independent particle approximation. The theoretical results are compared to measurements obtained on samples with various Ge content and layer thicknesses. The dielectric function is extracted from spectroscopic ellipsometry allowing a separation of its real and imaginary parts. Theory and simulation show similar trends for the variation of the dielectric function of SiGe with varying Ge content. Variations are also well reproduced for thin Si layers with varying thickness and are attributed to quantum confinement.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the processing of commercial rare earth permanent magnets, use of external magnetic fields is limited mainly to the alignment of anisotropic particles and the polarization of the finished magnets. Here we explore the effects of high magnetic fields on earlier stages of magnet synthesis, including the crystallization and chemical phase transformations that produce the 2:14:1 phase in the Pr-Co-B system. Pr2Co14B alloys produced by melt-spinning were annealed in the presence of strong applied magnetic fields (H=90 kOe). The resulting materials were characterized by x-ray diffraction, electron microscopy, and magnetization measurements. We find that magnetic fields suppress the nucleation and growth of crystalline phases, resulting in significantly smaller particle sizes. In addition, magnetic fields applied during processing strongly affects chemical phase selection, suppressing the formation of Pr2Co14B and α-Co in favor of Pr2Co17. The results demonstrate that increased control over key microstructural properties is achievable by including a strong magnetic field as a processing parameter for rare-earth magnet materials.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Theoretical and experimental results on deformation and disintegration on parts (topological instability) of semi-bounded magnetic fluid drop placed on horizontal plate in the presence of gravity and vertical external uniform magnetic field, and the influence of acoustic wave on these processes, as well as an experimental results of acoustic fountain on free surface of magnetic fluid are presented. The role of individual mechanisms leading to disintegration is analyzed, and analytical relationships and experimental dependences for critical parameters are established.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the present work we use molecular dynamics simulations and graph-theory based cluster analysis to compare self-assembly in systems of magnetic spheres, and cubes where the dipole moment is oriented along the side of the cube in the [001] crystallographic direction. We show that under the same conditions cubes aggregate far less than their spherical counterparts. This difference can be explained in terms of the volume of phase space in which the formation of the bond is thermodynamically advantageous. It follows that this volume is much larger for a dipolar sphere than for a dipolar cube.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA new body tied to gate (BTG) n-channel metal-oxide-semiconductor field-effect-transistor (NMOSFET) with a diode in partially depleted SOI (PD SOI) is proposed and investigated. We first compare the transfer and output characteristics between the regular and BTG NMOSFETs with grounded body and floating body. The steep subthreshold slope (<6 mV/dec) and low OFF current (∼0.01 pA/μm) of the BTG NMOSFET with floating body are observed at VD = 3.3 V. Mechanisms of the floating body effect (FBE) and the diode are analyzed to explain the outstanding performance. The hysteresis characteristics of BTG NMOSFETs are also presented in comparison to regular ones. Finally, the steep subthreshold characteristics of the BTG NMOSFET with floating body at low drain voltage are studied for ultralow power application.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fe–6.5 wt%Si electrical steel characterized with excellent soft magnetic properties such as almost zero magnetostriction, low eddy current and hysteresis losses characteristics has been widely applied in high frequency fields. In this work, the role of texture evolution and ordered phase transition in soft magnetic properties of annealed sheets was explored using EBSD, XRD and TEM. The results demonstrate that accompanied with the increase of annealing temperatures, an increase on the B8 is attributable to a contribution combining the sizes of recrystallization grains with APBs of ordered phases as pinning the migration of magnetic domain wall. Whereas B50 declines to a minimum value (1.479 T) and then increases to a certain value (1.695 T) due to different types and intensities of textures affecting on the magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy. Meanwhile, the dislocation density gradually decreases and corresponding to a gradual decline in the internal stress, which makes the coercive force (Hc) decrease monotonically.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA further leakage reduction of AlGaN/GaN HEMTs with cap gate (CG-HEMTs) has been achieved by optimizing the gate structure and the gate etching process. The optimized CG-HEMTs single finger power HEMTs deliver IDSmax = 533 mA/mm at least with gate length of 0.5um and show a median gate leakage current of 20 nA/mm 25 °C measured at a drain voltage of 200 V. The breakdown voltage (BV) of CG-HEMTs was evaluated by the variation of drain-to-gate spacing (LDG) larger than 8 μm. Furthermore, we show that the forward voltage of CG-HEMTs can be improved by shrinking the lateral dimension of the edge termination due to reduced series resistance.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A quadruple quantum-dot (QQD) cell is proposed as a spin filter. The transport properties of the QQD cell were studied in linear response regime on the basis of the equations of motion for retarded Green's functions. The developed approach allowed us to take into account the influence of both intra- and interdot Coulomb interactions on charge carriers' spin polarization. It was shown that the presence of the insulating bands in the conductance due to the Coulomb correlations results in the emergence of spin-polarized windows (SPWs) in magnetic field leading to the high spin polarization. We demonstrated that the SPWs can be effectively manipulated by gate fields and considering the hopping between central dots in both isotropic and anisotropic regimes.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a unified analytical model for the drain current of a symmetric Double-Gate Junctionless Field-Effect Transistor (DG-JLFET) is presented. The operation of the device has been classified into four modes: subthreshold, semi-depleted, accumulation, and hybrid; with the main focus of this work being on the accumulation mode, which has not been dealt with in detail so far in the literature. A physics-based model, using a simplified one-dimensional approach, has been developed for this mode, and it has been successfully integrated with the model for the hybrid mode. It also includes the effect of carrier mobility degradation due to the transverse electric field, which was hitherto missing in the earlier models reported in the literature. The piece-wise models have been unified using suitable interpolation functions. In addition, the model includes two most important short-channel effects pertaining to DG-JLFETs, namely the Drain Induced Barrier Lowering (DIBL) and the Subthreshold Swing (SS) degradation. The model is completely analytical, and is thus computationally highly efficient. The results of our model have shown an excellent match with those obtained from TCAD simulations for both long- and short-channel devices, as well as with the experimental data reported in the literature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The shape of a magnetic fluid bridge between a horizontal ferrite rod of circular cross-section and a horizontal plate above the rod in a vertical applied uniform magnetic field is studied. Various static shapes of the bridges are obtained theoretically and experimentally for the same magnetic field value. Abrupt changes and the hysteresis of the bridge shape in alternating magnetic fields are observed experimentally.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In our earlier work (Steinbach et al., 2016 [1]) we investigated a homogeneous system of magnetically capped colloidal particles that self-assembled via two structural patterns of different symmetry. The particles could form a compact, equilateral triangle with a three-fold rotational symmetry and zero dipole moment and a staggered chain with mirror symmetry with a net magnetisation perpendicular to the chain. The system exhibited a bistability already in clusters of three particles. Based on observations of a real magnetic particles system, analytical calculations and molecular dynamics simulations, it has been shown that the bistability is a result of an anisotropic magnetisation distribution with rotational symmetry inside the particles. The present study is a logical extension of the above research and forms a preparatory stage for the study of a self-assembly of such magnetic particles under the influence of an external magnetic field. Since the magnetic field is only an additive contribution to the total ground state energy, we can study the interparticle interaction energies of candidate ground state structures based on the field-free terms.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.An exact solution for a generalized Ising model describing single-chain magnet [FeIII(Tp*)(CN)3]2FeII(bpmh)}·2H2O with alternating high-spin and low-spin iron ions and double-zigzag magnetic topology has been calculated making use of the transfer-matrix technique. The introduction of a statistical ensemble taking into account the presence of iron ions with high-spin (HS) and low-spin (LS) states made it possible to describe the modification of magnetic susceptibility under optical irradiation. It has been shown that joint implementation of iron ions with photoinduced magnetic states and non-magnetic intersite repulsion ions of these states is caused by the difference of the ionic radii of HSFeII and LSFeII leads to the quantum phase transitions in the system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Using augmented plane wave+local orbital basis, we have calculated the electronic structure and magnetic properties of X2YZ (X=Cr; Y=Co and Ni; Z=Al, Ga, In, Si, Ge, Sn, Sb) inverse Heusler alloys from first principles. We employ the Hg2CuTi type L21 structure which indeed provides the low energy solution. The calculated total magnetic moments considered here follow the generalized Slater-Pauling behavior (Zt−24) except Cr2NiSb, which shows (Zt−28) instead. These materials show a systematic trend of ferrimagnetic Cr-Cr exchange interaction which increases with the number of valence electrons. The half-metallic and ferrimagnetic behaviors make them promising candidates for spintronic materials and devices.© 20173D SnO2 nanoflowers (NFs) assembled by rod-like nanostructures were synthesized by a facile hydrothermal method only using simple and inexpensive SnCl4·5H2O and NaOH as the starting materials, without using any surfactants or templates. The as-synthesized 3D SnO2 NFs were further functionalized by Pt nanoparticles (NPs) by a simple ammonia precipitate method, and the derived Pt NP-functionalized 3D SnO2 NFs were further investigated for gas sensor application using ethanol as a probe gas. Obtained results showed that the Pt NP-functionalized 3D SnO2 NF sensor exhibited much higher response in comparison with pure SnO2 sensor, altogether with short response/recovery times and good reproducibility. The enhanced gas sensing performances could be attributed to spill-over effect of Pt NPs for promoting gas sensing reactions, the synergic electronic interaction between Pt NPs and SnO2 support, the high surface-to-volume ratio and good electron mobility of the 1D SnO2 nanorod units, and unique 3D hierarchical flower-like nanostructures. It is also expected that the as-prepared 3D SnO2 NFs and Pt NP-functionalized product can be used in other fields such as optoelectronic devices, Li-ion battery and dye sensitized solar cells.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The given report is devoted to the study of anomalous Hall resistance of donor electron system of hybridized states of transition element impurities of low concentration in quantum oscillation regime. There presented theoretical description of predicted specific behaviors on the base of the ideas about thermodynamic anomalous Hall effect. In experiments on mercury selenide crystals with cobalt impurities of low concentration one revealed the quantum oscillations of anomalous contribution to the Hall resistance corresponding to the developed concepts.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Using the diagram technique for Matsubara Green's functions it is shown that the dynamics of the localized spin subsystem in the s–d(f) model can be described in terms of an effective spin model with multi-site spin–spin interactions. An exact representation of the action for the effective purely spin model is derived as an infinite series in powers of s–d(f) exchange interaction J. The indirect interactions of the 2nd, 3rd and 4th order are discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, (SrFe12O19 and NiFe2O4) nanostructure ferrite particles were synthesized via the co-precipitation of chloride salts utilizing the sodium hydroxide solution. The resulting precursors were heat-treated at 1100 °C for 4 h. After cooling in the furnace, the ferrite powders were pressed at 0.1 MPa and then sintered at 1200 °C for 4 h. The spectroscopy and characterization of peaks at the microwave range (X-band) for the nanostructure ferrite particles were investigated by the ferromagnetic resonance/transmit-line theories and Reflection Loss (RL) plots. The extracted data from these theoretical and experimental results showed that the natural ferromagnetic resonance can be lead to the narrow peaks and the width of the peaks can be related to the periodic effects. Two kinds of peaks were seen for NiFe2O4 at X-band (8–12 GHz); the narrow peak at (9.8 GHz) was remaining unchanged and consistent while the wide one was shifted from 11 GHz to 8.5 GHz by decreasing the thickness of the samples. These phenomena were also happened for SrFe12O19 samples. The natural resonance was not happened due to the hard magnetic properties of these nano structure particles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The metallurgical understanding of the deformation processes during the fabrication of non-oriented electrical steels plays a key role in improving their final properties. Texture control and optimization is critical in these steels for the enhancement of their magnetic properties. The aim of the present work is to study the texture evolution of six non-oriented experimental silicon steel grades during hot rolling. These steels were low carbon steel with a silicon content from 0.5 to 3.0 wt%. The first rolling schedule was performed in the austenitic (γ-Fe) region for the steel with a 0.5 wt% of silicon content, while the 1.0 wt% silicon steel was rolled in the two-phase (α+γ) region. Steels with higher silicon content were rolled in the ferritic (α-Fe) region. The second rolling schedule was performed in the α-Fe region. Samples of each stage were analyzed by means of Electron Backscatter Diffraction (EBSD). Findings showed that the texture was random and heterogeneous in all samples after 60% of rolling reduction, which is due to the low deformation applied during rolling. After the second rolling program, localized deformation and substructured grains near to surface were observed in all samples. The Goss {110}<001>texture-component was found in the 0.5 and 1.0 wt.-%silicon steels. This is due to the thermomechanical conditions and the corresponding hot band microstructure obtained after the first program. Moreover, the α<110>//RD and the γ <111>//ND fiber components of the texture presented a considerable increment as the silicon content increases. Future research to be published soon will be related to the texture evolution during the cold-work rolling process.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Presets work aims to investigate the natural convection inside a cylindrical annulus mold containing molten gallium under a horizontal magnetic field in three-dimensional coordinates. The modeling system is a vertical cylindrical annulus which is made by two co-axial cylinders of internal and external radii. The internal and external walls are maintained isothermal but in different temperatures. The upper and lower sides of annulus are also considered adiabatic while it is filled by an electrical conducting fluid. Three dimensional cylindrical coordinates as (r,θ,z) are used to respond the velocity components as (u,v,w). The governing equations are steady, laminar and Newtonian using the Boussinesq approximation. Equations are nonlinear and they must be corresponded by applying the finite volume approach; so that the hybrid-scheme is applied to discretize equations. The results imply that magnetic field existence leads to generate the Lorentz force in opposite direction of the buoyancy forces. Moreover the Lorentz force and its corresponded electric field are more significant in both Hartmann layer and Roberts layer, respectively. The strong magnetic field is required to achieve better quality products in the casting process of a liquid metal with a higher Prandtl number.© 2017The magnetocaloric effect in the vicinity of the martensitic transformation for a single crystalline alloy with a composition close to the stoichiometric Ni2MnGa has been determined indirectly by M(T,H) magnetization measurements. It has an inverse character. The magnetocaloric parameters, i.e., the magnetic entropy change, refrigeration capacity and various hysteretic effects have been calculated from the M(T,H) dependences. Besides the martensitic transition a weak entirely separated intermartensitic transition was observed. These two successive magneto-structural transformations give contributions to the observed magnetocaloric effect. Unusual dependence of entropy change as a function of magnetic field has been explained as arising because of two different mechanisms. Additionally, to confirm that studied martensitic transformation is a first order phase transition electrical resistivity and thermoelectric power measurements have been performed.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA vertical MOS architecture implemented on Si nanowire (NW) array with a scaled Gate-All-Around (14 nm) and symmetrical diffusive S/D contacts is presented with noteworthy demonstrations in both processing (layer engineering at nanoscale), and in electrical properties (high electrostatic control, low defect level, multi-Vt platform). Furthermore, the versatility and reliability of this technology is evidenced with a CMOS inverter, providing bright perspectives for ultimate scaling.© 2017We report on the magnetic and Mössbauer properties of polycrystalline HoFe1-xCrxO3 (0≤x≤1) compounds. Magnetization data reveals the continuous tailoring of magnetic transition due to weakening of Ho3+-Fe3+ and Fe3+-Fe3+ interactions in the entire temperature range by replacing the Fe3+ ions with Cr3+ ions. The observed decrease in Néel temperature (TN) and increase in spin re-orientation transition temperature (TSR) with the replacement of Fe3+ with Cr3+ is ascribed to the weakening of Fe(Cr)-O-Fe(Cr) antiferromagnetic exchange interaction. In addition, we also attribute such a change in TN to the enhancement of ferromagnetic interaction of adjacent Cr3+ moments through t-e hybridization as a result of the structural distortion. The decrease in isomer shift (IS) suggests enhancement of the interaction between nuclear charge with the 3s electrons as a result of decrease in radial part of 3d wave function with Cr addition. In this paper we also discuss about the variation of quadrupole splitting (QS) and hyperfine fields (Hhf) with Cr addition in HoFe1-xCrxO3 (0≤x≤1) compounds.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Laminar fully developed mixed convection of magnetohydrodynamic nanofluids inside microtubes at a constant wall temperature (CWT) under the effects of a variable directional magnetic field is investigated numerically. Nanoparticles are assumed to have slip velocities relative to the base fluid owing to thermophoretic diffusion (temperature gradient driven force) and Brownian diffusion (concentration gradient driven force). The no-slip boundary condition is avoided at the fluid-solid mixture to assess the non-equilibrium region at the fluid-solid interface. A scale analysis is performed to estimate the relative significance of the pertaining parameters that should be included in the governing equations. After the effects of pertinent parameters on the pressure loss and heat transfer enhancement were considered, the figure of merit (FoM) is employed to evaluate and optimize the thermal performance of heat exchange equipment. The results indicate the optimum thermal performance is obtained when the thermophoresis overwhelms the Brownian diffusion, which is for larger nanoparticles. This enhancement boosts when the buoyancy force increases. In addition, increasing the magnetic field strength and slippage at the fluid-solid interface enhances the thermal performance.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Co-Ti co-substituted SrM hexagonal ferrite (SrCo1.5Ti1.5Fe9O19) was synthesized by sol-gel combustion and solid state route. The effects of sources of TiO2 raw materials; titanium tetra-isopropoxide (TTIP) and titanyl nitrate (TN) on the phase formation behavior and properties of the ferrite were studied. The thermal decomposition behavior of the gel was studied using TG-DSC. The phase formation behavior of the ferrite was studied by using X-ray powder diffraction and FTIR analysis. Phase formation was comparatively easier in the TN-based sol-gel process. The morphology of powder and sintered ferrite was investigated using scanning electron microscope. Magnetic properties like magnetization, coercivity, permeability, tan δµ and dielectric properties were investigated. The ferrite synthesized by sol-gel based chemical route showed higher saturation magnetization, permeability and permittivity compared to the ferrite synthesized by solid state route.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The spatial period of magnetization perturbations that occur near the surface of magnetic nanotube or nanowire under the influence of surface magnetic anisotropy is determined by means of numerical simulation as a function of the sample geometry and material parameters. The surface magnetization distribution obtained is then used to estimate the period of the surface magnetic texture in amorphous microwire of several micrometers in diameter by means of appropriate variational procedure. The period of the surface magnetic texture in amorphous microwire is found to be significantly smaller than the wire diameter.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Graphene has been explored as a promising candidate for spintronics due to its atomically flat structure and novel properties. Here we fabricate two spin valve junctions, one from directly grown graphene on Ni electrode (DG) and other from transferred graphene (TG). The magnetoresistance (MR) ratio for DG device is found to be higher than TG device i.e. ~0.73% and 0.14%, respectively. Also the spin polarization of Ni electrode is determined to be 6.03% at room temperature in case of DG device, however it reduces to 2.1% for TG device. From this analysis, we infer how environmental exposure of the sample degrades the spin properties of the magnetic junctions. Moreover, the transport measurements reveal linear behavior for current-voltage (I-V) characteristics, indicating ohmic behavior of the junctions. Our findings unveil the efficiency of direct growth of graphene for spin filtering mechanism in spin valve devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Hard magnetic thin films with high coercivity were fabricated by magnetron sputtering on MgO(100) and quartz substrates. The films were grown by depositing sequentially Sm and Co layers at an elevated substrate temperature of 500 °C. Subsequent post-annealing was carried out at various temperatures in range of 500–700 °C to form Sm-Co hard magnetic thin films. X-ray diffraction studies revealed the formation of randomly oriented SmCo5 crystallites on quartz substrate, whereas, a textured growth of Sm2Co7 with strong (110) crystalline phases was observed on MgO substrate. Microstructural analyses were carried out using Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM) for samples grown on MgO substrate at 650 °C and inferred the presence of high density planar defects along with large grain boundaries. Further microdiffraction studies confirmed the presence of SmCo3 as an impurity phase in the films. Magnetic hysteresis measurements indicate the square hysteresis behaviors with high coercivity value of 3.1 T and 2.7 T for 650 °C annealed samples on both MgO and quartz substrates, respectively. The origin of such high coercivity value was then correlated with pinning type of spin reversal mechanism as confirmed through the analyses of demagnetization curves. The magnetic force microscopy images for films on MgO substrate, annealed at 650 °C, revealed the presence of magnetic domains with size higher than 1 µm. The formed magnetic domains lacked well defined boundaries indicating an enhanced exchange coupling between the grain clusters.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of cobalt dications on the transformation of 2-line ferrihydrite (2LF) has been studied. The products of the transformation reaction were characterized by X-ray diffraction, Mössbauer spectroscopy (MS), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), magnetometry, and first-order reversal curve (FORC) diagrams. It was found that the concentration of cobalt dications plays an important role on the structural and magnetic properties of the products; i.e., for low cobalt concentrations, cobalt-substituted hematite is formed, while higher concentrations promote the formation of cobalt-substituted magnetite. Structural results revealed that formation of other iron oxide polymorphs is avoided and residual 2LF is always present in the final products. In this way, hematite/2LF and magnetite/2LF nanocomposites were formed. For all the samples, magnetic measurements yielded non-saturated hysteresis loops at a maximum field of 12 kOe. For cobalt-substituted hematite/2LF samples, FORC diagrams revealed the presence of multiple single-domain (SD) components which generate interaction coupling between SD with low and high coercivity. Moreover, for cobalt-substituted magnetite/2LF samples, the FORC diagrams revealed the components of wasp-waist hysteresis loops which consist of mixtures of SD and superparamagnetic particles. One of the goals of the present study is the rigorous, experimental documentation of ferrihydrite/hematite mixtures as a function of reaction conditions for use as analytical standards research.© 2017Ba1−xZnxFe12O19 (0.0≤x≤0.3) hexaferrites were produced via sol-gel auto combustion technique. XRD patterns show that all the samples are single-phase M-type barium hexaferrite (BaM). Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) revealed that grains have a size range of 0.5–2 µm. The magnetic hysteresis (σ-H) loops revealed the ferromagnetic nature of NPs. The average crystallite sizes were calculated by applying Scherrer equation on the base of XRD powder patterns of all samples and found to be in the range of 16.78–48.34 nm. In particular, Ba1−xZnxFe12O19 (0.0≤x≤0.3) hexaferrites have suitable magnetic characteristics (saturation magnetization in a range of 63.00–67.70 emu/g and coercive field in a range of 822–1275 Oe) for magnetic recording and permanent magnets. Effective crystalline anisotropy constants (Keff) are between 4.20×105 and 4.84×105 Erg/g. Magnetic moment increased by the substitution of non-magnetic Zn2+ ions. The anisotropy field (Ha) or intrinsic coercivity values above 13255 Oe reveals that all samples are magnetically hard materials. Tauc plots were drawn to specify the direct optical energy band gap (Eg) of NPs. The Eg values are in a narrow range between 1.69 eV and 1.76 eV.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanoscale magnetic alloy wires are being actively investigated, providing fundamental insights into tuning properties in magnetic data storage and processing technologies. However, previous studies give trivial information about the crossover angle of magnetization reversal process in alloy nanowires (NWs). Here, magnetic alloy NW arrays with different compositions, composed of Fe, Co and Ni have been electrochemically deposited into hard-anodic aluminum oxide templates with a pore diameter of approximately 150 nm. Under optimized conditions of alumina barrier layer and deposition bath concentrations, the resulting alloy NWs with aspect ratio and saturation magnetization (Ms) up to 550 and 1900 emu cm−3, respectively, are systematically investigated in terms of composition, crystalline structure and magnetic properties. Using angular dependence of coercivity extracted from hysteresis loops, the reversal processes are evaluated, indicating non-monotonic behavior. The crossover angle (θc) is found to depend on NW length and Ms. At a constant Ms, increasing NW length decreases θc, thereby decreasing the involvement of vortex mode during the magnetization reversal process. On the other hand, decreasing Ms decreases θc in large aspect ratio (>300) alloy NWs. Phenomenologically, it is newly found that increasing Ni content in the composition decreases θc. The angular first-order reversal curve (AFORC) measurements including the irreversibility of magnetization are also investigated to gain a more detailed insight into θc.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effects of annealing treatment on the microstructure, thermal stability, and magnetic properties of the mechanical alloyed FeSiBAlNiM (M=Co, Cu, Ag) amorphous high entropy alloys (HEAs) have been investigated in this project. The simple crystallization products in FeSiBAlNi amorphous HEAs with Co and Ag addition reveal the high phase stability during heating process. At high annealing treatment, the crystallized HEAs possess the good semi-hard magnetic property. It can conclude that crystallization products containing proper FeSi-rich and FeB-rich phases are beneficial to improve the magnetic property. Annealing near the exothermic peak temperature presents the best enhancing effect on the semi-hard magnetic property of FeSiBAlNiCo. It performs both large saturated magnetization and remanence ratio of 13.0 emu/g and near 45%, which exhibit 465% and 105% enhancement compared with as-milled state, respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.CoPt nanodot arrays were fabricated by combining electrodeposition and electron beam lithography (EBL) for the use of bit-patterned media (BPM). To achieve precise control of deposition uniformity and coercivity of the CoPt nanodot arrays, their crystal structure and magnetic properties were controlled by controlling the diffusion state of metal ions from the initial deposition stage with the application of bath agitation. Following bath agitation, the composition gradient of the CoPt alloy with thickness was mitigated to have a near-ideal alloy composition of Co:Pt =80:20, which induces epitaxial-like growth from Ru substrate, thus resulting in the improvement of the crystal orientation of the hcp (002) structure from its initial deposition stages. Furthermore, the cross-sectional transmission electron microscope (TEM) analysis of the nanodots deposited with bath agitation showed CoPt growth along its c-axis oriented in the perpendicular direction, having uniform lattice fringes on the hcp (002) plane from the Ru underlayer interface, which is a significant factor to induce perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. Magnetic characterization of the CoPt nanodot arrays showed increase in the perpendicular coercivity and squareness of the hysteresis loops from 2.0 kOe and 0.64 (without agitation) to 4.0 kOe and 0.87 with bath agitation. Based on the detailed characterization of nanodot arrays, the precise crystal structure control of the nanodot arrays with ultra-high recording density by electrochemical process was successfully demonstrated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Transient magnetization dynamics are calculated from the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation. The internal fields are described by partial derivatives of the sample's free energy density. This description allows the calculation of the magnetization trajectory of homogeneously magnetized samples for all kinds of energy contributions. It provides a general solution for transient magnetization dynamics. The model is used to determine the magnetization response to excitation profiles like rectangular or Gaussian pulses, frequency bursts, wavelet excitations, and chirped THz pulses.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the impact of a severe on-state stress on the IDS (VDS, VGS) characteristics of AlInN/GaN devices is analyzed by electroluminescence technique performed at room temperature. In fact, the devices operate in bias conditions that allow measuring the bell- shaped gate current. To our knowledge, it is the first time that a bell-shaped gate current centered at a positive VGS and measured at room temperature has been shown for an AlInN/GaN transistor. We have also highlighted that electroluminescence spectra are related to the superposition of intraband radiative electron transitions, Fabry-Perot oscillations, and emission bands induced by recombination of electrons due to electron traps. In these conditions, it is not so easy to extract energies levels of electron traps existing in unstressed and stressed AlInN/GaN HEMTs from electroluminescence spectra. Thus, we have also shown that the electrical degradations induced by on-state stress are mainly related to the trapping of hot electron by deep pre-existing electron traps in the devices. Moreover, we have highlighted the existence of two electron traps activated at 1.6 and 1.8 eV in the devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.For an investigation of the quantum Hall effect on n-In0.85Ga0.18As/In0.82Al0.82As metamorphic nanoheterostructures with high InAs content the longitudinal and Hall magnetoresistances were measured in magnetic fields up to 9 T at T=(1.8÷30)K. The results for a temperature dependence of conductivity on the delocalized states at the center of Landau level were analysed within the scaling concept for a plateau-plateau transition in quantum Hall regime.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization distribution of a bilayer exchange spring system with mutually orthogonal anisotropies was investigated by micromagnetic simulation. Results showed that the spatial change rate of the magnetization direction could be engineered by varying the material parameters, layer thicknesses, and magnetic field. When no magnetic field is applied, this angular change rate is determined by three parameter ratios: a ratio of the exchange energy and anisotropy constants of both layers and two thickness ratios of both layers. If these three ratios are kept invariant, the ratio of the angular change of the soft layer over the hard layer will remain the same. When a magnetic field is applied, two more ratios concerning the magnetic field should be added to determine the spatial angular change of the magnetization direction.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetocrystalline anisotropy (MCA) at Fe/MgO interfaces with insertions of 3d (Co, Ni), 4d (Ru, Rh, Pd), and 5d (Os, Ir, Pt) elements in external electric fields was investigated from first-principles calculations. The MCA energy and the electric-field-induced MCA modification dramatically depend on the inserted elements. Large MCA modification may be achieved by heavy-metal insertions, in which the strength of spin-orbit coupling of inserted elements and the position of the Fermi level relative to d band level play key roles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Iron, an essential element of the human body, is a significant risk factor, particularly in the case of its concentration increasing above the specific limit. Therefore, iron is stored in the non-toxic form of the globular protein, ferritin, consisting of an apoferritin shell and iron core. Numerous studies confirmed the disruption of homeostasis and accumulation of iron in patients with various diseases (e.g. cancer, cardiovascular or neurological conditions), which is closely related to ferritin metabolism. Such iron imbalance enables the use of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) as a sensitive technique for the detection of iron-based aggregates through changes in the relaxation times, followed by the change in the inherent image contrast. For our in vitrostudy, modified ferritins with different iron loadings were prepared by chemical reconstruction of the iron core in an apoferritin shell as pathological model systems. The magnetic properties of samples were studied using SQUID magnetometry, while the size distribution was detected via dynamic light scattering. We have shown that MRI could represent the most advantageous method for distinguishing native ferritin from reconstructed ferritin which, after future standardisation, could then be suitable for the diagnostics of diseases associated with iron accumulation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Understanding the interaction of live cells with macromolecules is crucial for designing efficient therapies. Considering the functional heterogeneity found in cancer cells, real-time single cell analysis is necessary to characterize responses. In this study, we have designed and fabricated a microfluidic channel with patterned micromagnets which can temporarily immobilize the cells during analysis and release them after measurements. The microchannel is composed of plain coverslip top and bottom panels to facilitate easy microscopic observation and undisturbed application of analytes to the cells. Cells labeled with functionalized magnetic beads were immobilized in the device with an efficiency of 90.8±3.6%. Since the micromagnets are made of soft magnetic material (Ni), they released cells when external magnetic field was turned off from the channel. This allows the reuse of the channel for a new sample. As a model drug analysis, the immobilized breast cancer cells (MCF7) were exposed to fluorescent lipid nanoparticles and association and dissociation were measured through fluorescence analysis. Two concentrations of nanoparticles, 0.06 µg/ml and 0.08 µg/ml were tested and time lapse images were recorded and analyzed. The microfluidic device was able to provide a microenvironment for sample analysis, making it an efficient platform for real-time analysis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this article, three-dimensional (3D) forced-convection heat transfer of magnetic nanofluids in a pipe subject to constant wall heat flux in the presence of single or double permanent magnet(s) or current-carrying wire has been investigated and compared. In this regard, laminar fluid flow and equilibrium magnetization for the ferrofluid were considered. In addition, variations of magnetic field in different media were taken into account and the assumption of having a linear relationship of magnetization with applied magnetic field intensity was also relaxed. Effects of magnetic field intensity, nanoparticle volume fraction, Reynolds number value, and the type of magnetic field source (i.e., a permanent magnet or current-carrying wire) on the forced-convection heat transfer of magnetic nanofluids were carefully investigated. It was found that by applying the magnetic field, the fluid mixing could be intensified that leads to an increase in the Nusselt number value along the pipe length. Moreover, the obtained simulation results indicate that applying the magnetic field induced by two permanent magnets with a magnetization of 3×105 (A/m) (for each one), the fully developed Nusselt number value can be increased by 196%.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Lock-in thermography (LIT) is a sensitive imaging technique generally used in engineering and materials science (e.g. detecting defects in composite materials). However, it has recently been expanded for investigating the heating power of nanomaterials, such as superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs). Here we implement LIT as a rapid and reproducible method that can evaluate the heating potential of various sizes of SPIONs under an alternating magnetic field (AMF), as well as the limits of detection for each particle size. SPIONs were synthesized via thermal decomposition and stabilized in water via a ligand transfer process. Thermographic measurements of SPIONs were made by stimulating particles of varying sizes and increasing concentrations under an AMF. Furthermore, a commercially available SPION sample was included as an external reference. While the size dependent heating efficiency of SPIONs has been previously described, our objective was to probe the sensitivity limits of LIT. For certain size regimes it was possible to detect signals at concentrations as low as 0.1 mg Fe/mL. Measuring at different concentrations enabled a linear regression analysis and extrapolation of the limit of detection for different size nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Single phase samples of GdCr1-xMnxO3 (x=0−0.50) were prepared and their magnetic properties were studied by measuring temperature and field variations of magnetization. The Neel temperature, TN is found to decrease from TN=174 K for x=0 to 91 K for x=0.50. The magnetization reversal persists upto 5 at% of Mn substitution with a magnetic compensation temperature, Tcomp of 136 K and 139 K for x=0 and 0.05 respectively. However, spin reorientation induced magnetization reversal emerges for x=0.40 and 0.50 samples around 30 K. Tunable positive and negative exchange bias fields in the range of −1.0 kOe to +1.6 kOe have been observed. The origin of magnetization reversal and exchange bias field is explained in terms of antiparallel alignment of canted ferromagnetic component of Cr3+ ions and the paramagnetic moments of Gd3+ and Mn3+ ions under the influence of negative internal field due to antiferromagnetically ordered Cr3+ ions.© 2017Spherical nickel particles with size in the range of 100–400 nm were synthesized by non-aqueous liquid phase benzyl alcohol method. Being developed for magnetically guided biomedical applications, the particles were coated by conformal and antimicrobial thin titanium oxide films by atomic layer deposition. The particles retained their size and crystal structure after the deposition of oxide films. The sensitivity of the coated particles to external magnetic fields was increased compared to that of the uncoated powder. Preliminary toxicological investigations on microbial cells and small aquatic crustaceans revealed non-toxic nature of the synthesized particles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work we address the ground state magnetization in graphene, considering the Zeeman effect and taking into account the conduction electrons in the long wavelength approximation. We obtain analytical expressions for the magnetization at T=0 K, where the oscillations given by the de Haas van Alphen (dHvA) effect are present. We find that the Zeeman effect modifies the magnetization by introducing new peaks associated with the spin splitting of the Landau levels. These peaks are very small for typical carrier densities in graphene, but become more important for higher densities. The obtained results provide insight of the way in which the Zeeman effect modifies the magnetization, which can be useful to control and manipulate the spin degrees of freedom.© 2017 Elsevier LtdAn analytical model for the thin-film silicon-on-insulator pin-diode leakage current is presented. Particularly the back-gate potential influence on the leakage current is addressed. The two-dimensional Poisson equation is simplified and then solved including the influence of the back-gate potential. Subsequently the analytical model is verified by comparison with numerical simulation and measurements. For the verification of the model the dependence on the back-gate potential, reverse voltage, device geometry, doping concentration and -polarity is considered. In this procedure the interface recombination velocity is used as fitting parameter. The model verification shows an accurate modeling of the leakage current at full depletion in combination with a back-gate potential dependence. The usage of the model is limited to back-gate and reverse potentials close to full depletion state of the pin-diode.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of cobalt ferrite of different particle size were prepared using sol-gel method. Powder X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and Mössbauer spectroscopy techniques were employed for characterization of nanoparticles for structural and magnetic properties. The particle size and saturation magnetization increase with the increase of sintering temperature. The saturation magnetization increases from 53 to 85 emu/g as the sintering temperature increases from 300 to 900 °C. The remanence increases while the coercivity decreases slightly with the increase of sintering temperature. Mössbauer spectra show the ferrimagnetic nature of all the samples and the cation distribution strictly depends on the sintering temperature. The stoichiometry of the cobalt ferrite formed was estimated to be (Co2+xFe3+1−x)[Co2+1−xFe3+1+x]O4, based on our Mössbauer analysis. The inverse spinel structure gradually transforms towards the normal spinel structure as the sintering temperature increases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The behavior of boundary layer over a stretching plate filled with ferromagnetic Fe3O4 nanoparticles and subjected to magnetic field with hall current, joule heating and nonlinear thermal radiation has been investigated. The modeling based on nonlinear partial differential equations due to continuity, momentum and heat equations, these equations transformed to a system of nonlinear ordinary differential equations using similarity transformation technique then solved numerically. The effect of hall current, joule heating and thermal radiation on the physical quantities such as surface shear stress and heat flux have been investigated and discussed. Moreover, the velocities and temperature profiles of the boundary layer under the influence of the presented external forces plotted and discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Co-Fe alloy is an important component for reader-writer in hard disk drive. The surface of the alloy is exposed to the environment both in gas phase and in liquid phase during manufacturing process. The study of corrosion behavior of Co-Fe alloys can provide useful fundamental data for reader-writer production planning especially when corrosion becomes a major problem. The corrosion study of electrodeposited Co-Fe alloys from cyclic galvanodynamic polarization was performed using potentiodynamic polarization technique. The composition of electrodeposited Co-Fe alloys was determined by X-ray fluorescence spectrometry. The patterns from X-ray diffractometer showed that the crystal structure of electrodeposited Co-Fe alloys was body-centered cubic. A vibrating sample magnetometer was used for magnetic measurements. The saturation magnetization (Ms) was increased and the intrinsic coercivity (Hci) was decreased with increasing Fe content. The corrosion rate study was performed in aerated deionized water and aerated acidic solutions at pH 3, 4 and 5. The corrosion rate diagram for Co-Fe alloys was constructed. It was found that the corrosion rate of Co-Fe alloys was increased with increasing Fe content in both aerated deionized water and aerated acidic solutions. In aerated pH 3 solution, the Co-Fe alloy containing 78.8% Fe showed the highest corrosion rate of 7.7 mm yr−1 with the highest Ms of 32.0 A m2 kg−1. The corrosion rate of the alloy with 23.8% Fe was at 1.1 mm yr−1 with Ms of 1.2 A m2 kg−1. In aerated deionized water, the alloy with the highest Fe content of 78.5% still showed the highest corrosion rate of 0.0059 mm yr−1 while the alloy with the lowest Fe content of 20.4% gave the lowest corrosion rate of 0.0045 mm yr−1.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A set of thin film MnxSi1-x alloy samples with different manganese concentration x≈0.44−0.63 grown by the pulsed laser deposition (PLD) method onto the Al2O3 (0001) substrate was investigated in the temperature range 4–300 K using ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) measurements in the wide range of frequencies (f=7−60GHz) and magnetic fields (H=0−30kOe). For samples with x≈0.52−0.55, FMR data show clear evidence of ferromagnetism with high Curie temperatures TC∼300K. These samples demonstrate a complex magnetic anisotropy described phenomenologically as a combination of the essential second order easy plane anisotropy contribution and the additional fourth order uniaxial anisotropy contribution with easy direction normal to the film plane. The observed anisotropy is attributed to a polycrystalline (mosaic) structure of the films caused by the film-substrate lattice mismatch. The existence of extra strains at the crystallite boundaries initiates a random distribution of local in-plane anisotropy axes in the samples. As a result, the symmetry of the net magnetic anisotropy is axial with the symmetry axis normal to the film plane. The principal features of the observed anisotropy are explained qualitatively within the proposed microscopic model.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Carboxylated magnetite nanoparticles (MNPs) are frequently used to develop materials with enhanced properties for MRI and hyperthermia. The controlled clustering of MNPs via covalent or electrostatic approaches provides opportunity to prepare high quality materials. MNPs were prepared by co-precipitation and coated by poly(acrylic acid-co-maleic acid) (PAM@MNP). The clusters were synthesized from purified PAM@MNPs and polyethylenimine (PEI) solution via electrostatic interaction and covalent bond formation (ES-cluster and CB-cluster, respectively). The electrostatic adhesion (–NH3 + and –COO–) and the formed amide bond were confirmed by ATR-FTIR. The averaged area of CB-clusters was about twice as large as that of ES-cluster, based on TEM. The SAXS results showed that the surface of MNPs was smooth and the nanoparticles were close packed in both clusters. The pH-dependent aggregation state and zeta potential of clusters were characterized by DLS and electrophoresis measurements, the clusters were colloidally stable at pH>5. In hyperthermia experiments, the values of SAR were about two times larger for the chemically bonded cluster. The MRI studies showed exceptionally high transversion relaxivities, the r2 values are 457 mM−1 s−1 and 691 mM−1 s−1 for ES-cluster and CB-cluster, respectively. Based on these results, the chemically clustered product shows greater potential for feasible biomedical applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdVertically aligned ZnO nanowire arrays on the paper substrate are integrated into a novel, sound-driven, piezoelectric nanogenerator device. The intrinsic impedance of the circuit causes phase differences between the input and output signals. For the input sound of around 40 db, an AC output voltage of about 5 mV is achieved. Because of the paper substrate allows the acoustic energy to dissipate, the fabricated device has detected a 4.88 db loss in the input sound signal.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The aim of magnetic drug targeting (MDT) is to transfer a therapeutic drug coupled to magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) to desired disease locations (e.g. tumor region) with the help of magnetic field gradients. To transfer the MDT approach into clinical practice a number of important issues remain to be solved. We developed and characterized an in-vitro flow phantom to provide a defined and reproducible MDT environment. The tube system of the flow phantom is directed through the detection coil of a magnetic particle spectroscopy (MPS) device to determine the targeting efficiency. MPS offers an excellent temporal resolution of seconds and an outstanding specific sensitivity of some nanograms of iron. In the flow phantom different MNP types, magnet geometries and tube materials can be employed to vary physical parameters like diameter, flow rate, magnetic targeting gradient, and MNP properties.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic separation of biological entities in microfluidic environment is a key task for a large number of bio-analytical protocols. In magnetophoretic separation, biochemically functionalized magnetic beads are allowed to bind selectively to target analytes, which are then separated from the background stream using a suitably imposed magnetic field. Here we present a numerical study, characterizing the performance of a magnetophoretic hybrid microfluidic device having two inlets and three outlets for immunomagnetic isolation of three different species from a continuous flow. The hybrid device works on the principle of split-flow thin (SPLITT) fractionation and field flow fractionation (FFF) mechanisms. Transport of the magnetic particles in the microchannel has been predicted following an Eulerian-Lagrangian model and using an in-house numerical code. Influence of the salient geometrical parameters on the performance of the separator is studied by characterizing the particle trajectories and their capture and separation indices. Finally, optimum channel geometry is identified that yields the maximum capture efficiency and separation index.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Emerging nanotechnologies have enabled the use of magnetic forces to guide the movement of magnetically-labeled cells, drugs, and other therapeutic agents. Endothelial cells labeled with superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPION) have previously been captured on the surface of magnetizable 2205 duplex stainless steel stents in a porcine coronary implantation model. Recently, we have coated these stents with electrospun polyurethane nanofibers to fabricate prototype stent-grafts. Facilitated endothelialization may help improve the healing of arteries treated with stent-grafts, reduce the risk of thrombosis and restenosis, and enable small-caliber applications. When placed in a SPION-labeled endothelial cell suspension in the presence of an external magnetic field, magnetized stent-grafts successfully captured cells to the surface regions adjacent to the stent struts. Implantation within the coronary circulation of pigs (n=13) followed immediately by SPION-labeled autologous endothelial cell delivery resulted in widely patent devices with a thin, uniform neointima and no signs of thrombosis or inflammation at 7 days. Furthermore, the magnetized stent-grafts successfully captured and retained SPION-labeled endothelial cells to select regions adjacent to stent struts and between stent struts, whereas the non-magnetized control stent-grafts did not. Early results with these prototype devices are encouraging and further refinements will be necessary in order to achieve more uniform cell capture and complete endothelialization. Once optimized, this approach may lead to more rapid and complete healing of vascular stent-grafts with a concomitant improvement in long-term device performance.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Here we review experimental data on the peak in inelastic neutron scattering (INS) and superconducting gaps extracted from various experimental techniques. Comparison of energy scales gives the confidence that the observed peak in INS for most materials is the true spin resonance.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The use of magnetophoretic mobility as a surrogate for fluorescence intensity in quantitative cell analysis was investigated. The objectives of quantitative fluorescence flow cytometry include establishing a level of labeling for the setting of parameters in fluorescence activated cell sorters (FACS) and the determination of levels of uptake of fluorescently labeled substrates by living cells. Likewise, the objectives of quantitative magnetic cytometry include establishing a level of labeling for the setting of parameters in flowing magnetic cell sorters and the determination of levels of uptake of magnetically labeled substrates by living cells. The magnetic counterpart to fluorescence intensity is magnetophoretic mobility, defined as the velocity imparted to a suspended cell per unit of magnetic ponderomotive force. A commercial velocimeter available for making this measurement was used to demonstrate both applications. Cultured Gallus lymphoma cells were immunolabeled with commercial magnetic beads and shown to have adequate magnetophoretic mobility to be separated by a novel flowing magnetic separator. Phagocytosis of starch nanoparticles having magnetic cores by cultured Chinese hamster ovary cells, a CHO line, was quantified on the basis of magnetophoretic mobility.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.To improve the coercivity and thermal stability of the Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets simultaneously, the Dy80Al20 (at%) powders with low melting point were introduced into the Nd-Fe-B magnets. Additionally, the magnetic properties, microstructure and thermal stability of the sintered magnets with different amounts of Dy80Al20 were investigated. By adding a small amount of Dy80Al20, the coercivity was significantly increased from 12.72 to 21.75 kOe. As indicated by the microstructure analysis, a well-developed core-shell structure was formed in the magnets with the addition of Dy80Al20. The improvement of magnetic properties could be attributed to the refined and uniform matrix phase, continuous grain boundaries and a (Nd, Dy)2Fe14B hardening shell surrounding the matrix phase grains. With the addition of 0–4 wt% Dy80Al20 powder, the reversible temperature coefficients of remanence (α) and coercivity (β) of the magnets could be improved from −0.117 to −0.108%/°C and −0.74 to −0.66%/°C in the range of 20–100 °C, respectively. Additionally, the irreversible loss of magnetic flux (hirr) decreased sharply as Dy80Al20 powder was added. The results of temperature-dependent magnetic properties suggest that, the thermal stability of the magnets was effectively improved with the intergranular addition of Dy80Al20 alloy. Also, the corrosion resistance was found to be improved through small addition of Dy80Al20 powders This was partly due to the stability enhancement of the (Pr, Nd)-rich intergranular phase by Dy80Al20.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The partial substitution of Fe3+ by Cr3+ in strontium hexaferrite has shown to be an effective method to tailor anisotropy for many novel microwave applications. Some basic studies have revealed that this substitution leads to unusual interactions among the magnetic sublattices of the hexaferrite. In order to investigate these interactions, Cr3+ doped SrCrxFe12−xO19 (x=0.0, 0.1, 0.3, 0.5, 0.7 and 0.9) (m-type) hexaferrites were prepared by microwave-hydrothermal (m-H) method and subsequently sintered at 950 °C/90 min using microwave furnace. The magnetic hysteresis (m-H) loops revealed the ferromagnetic nature of nanoparticles (NPs). The coercive field was increasing from 3291 Oe to 7335 Oe with increasing chromium content. This resulting compacts exhibited high squareness ratio (Mr/Ms–80%). The intrinsic coercivity (Hci) above 1,20,000 Oe and high values of magnetocrystalline anisotropy revealed that all samples are magnetically hard materials. A material with high loss as well as high dielectric constant may be desired in applications such as electromagnetic (EM) wave absorbing coatings. The room temperature complex dielectric and magnetic properties (ε′, ε′′, µ′ and µ′′) of Cr3+ doped SrFe12O19 were measured in X-band region. The frequency dependent dielectric and magnetic losses were increasing to large extent. The reflection coefficient varied from −16 to −33 dB at 10.1 GHz as Cr3+ concentration increased from x=0.0 to x=0.9. Ferromagnetic resonance spectra (FMR) were measured in the X-band (9.4 GHz), linewidth decreases with chromium concentration from 1368 to 752 Oe from x=0.0 to x=0.9, which is quite low compared to commercial samples. We also have detailed origins of the FMR linewidth broadenings in terms of some important theoretical models. These results show that chromium doped strontium hexaferrites are useful for microwave absorption in the X-band frequency and also have potential for use in low frequency self-biased microwave/millimeter devices such as circulators and isolators.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Fine-grained, heavy rare earth free Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets were prepared from He jet milled powders with an average particle size of 1.5 µm by low temperature sintering at 920 °C or 980 °C. A coercivity of >1600 kA/m was achieved for an average grain size of 1.68 µm. Transmission electron microscopy showed that the distribution and composition of intergranular and grain boundary junction phases was similar to that in conventionally processed magnets. Microstructural analysis on different length scales revealed the occurrence of abnormal grain growth, which is unexpected for sintering temperatures below 1000 °C. A larger area fraction of abnormal grains was observed in the sample sintered at 920 °C compared to that sintered at 980 °C. Microtexture investigation showed a better crystallographic alignment of the abnormal grains compared to the fine-grained matrix, which is explained by a size dependent alignment of the powder particles during magnetic field alignment prior to sintering. Slightly larger particles in the initial powder show a better alignment and will act as nucleation sites for abnormal grain growth. Magneto-optical Kerr investigations confirmed the lower switching field of the abnormal grains compared to the fine-grained matrix. The demagnetisation curve of the sample sintered at 920 °C showed reduced rectangularity and this was attributed to a cooperative effect of the larger fraction of abnormal grains with low switching field and, as a minor effect, a reduced degree of crystallographic texture in this sample compared to the material sintered at 980 °C, which did not show the reduced rectangularity of the demagnetisation curve.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We studied the surface spins disorder in uncoated and silica (SiO2) coated maghemite (γ-Fe2O3) nanoparticles using temperature and time dependent magnetization. The average crystallite size for SiO2 coated and uncoated nanoparticles was about 12 and 29 nm, respectively. Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) showed that the nanoparticles are spherical in shape and well separated. Temperature scans of zero field cooled (ZFC)/field cooled (FC) magnetization measurements showed lower average blocking temperature (TB) for SiO2 coated maghemite nanoparticles as compared to uncoated nanoparticles. The saturation magnetization (Ms) of SiO2 coated maghemite nanoparticles was also lower than the uncoated nanoparticles and is attributed to smaller average crystallite size of SiO2 coated nanoparticles. For saturation magnetization vs. temperature data, Bloch's law (M(T)= M(0).(1− BTb)) was fitted well for both uncoated and SiO2 coated nanoparticles and yields: B =3×10−7 K-b, b=2.22 and B=0.0127 K-b, b=0.57 for uncoated and SiO2 coated nanoparticles, respectively. Higher value of B for SiO2 coated nanoparticles depicts decrease in exchange coupling due to enhanced surface spins disorder (broken surface bonds) as compared to uncoated nanoparticles. The Bloch's exponent b was decreased for SiO2 coated nanoparticles which is due to their smaller average crystallite size or finite size effects. Furthermore, a sharp increase of coercivity at low temperatures (<25 K) was observed for SiO2 coated nanoparticles which is also due to contribution of increased surface anisotropy or frozen surface spins in these smaller nanoparticles. The FC magnetic relaxation data was fitted to stretched exponential law which revealed slower magnetic relaxation for SiO2 coated nanoparticles. All these measurements revealed smaller average crystallite size and enhanced surface spins disorder in SiO2 coated nanoparticles than in uncoated γ-Fe2O3 nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.One of the major societal challenges is reducing the power consumption of information technology (IT) devices and numerous data centers. Distinct from the current approaches based on switching of magnetic single-domain nanostructures or on movement of domain walls under high currents, an original magnetic skyrmion technology offers ultra-low power, fast, high-density, and scalable spintronic devices, including non-volatile random access memory. Using data-driven micromagnetic simulations, we demonstrate the possibility of spontaneous nucleation and stabilization of different skyrmionic states, such as skyrmions, merons, and meron-like configurations, in heavy metal/ferromagnetic nanodisks with the interfacial Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya interaction (iDMI) as a result of quasi-static magnetization reversal only. Since iDMI is not easily modulated in real systems, we show that skyrmion stabilization is easily achievable by manipulating magnetic anisotropy, saturation magnetization, and the diameters of nanodisks. The state diagrams, presented in terms of the topological charge, allow to explicitly distinguish the intermediate states between skyrmions and merons and can be used for developing a skyrmionic medium, which has been recently proposed to be a building block for future spin-orbitronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.One of the fundamental magnetic properties – the low-temperature magnetization as well as the exchange interactions derived by using a spin-wave excitation theory – has been well studied in glassy ribbons rather than bulk metallic glasses. The paper studies the temperature-dependent magnetization of a bulk Fe40Ni40P14B6 alloy, derives the range and fluctuation of exchange interactions, and compares these magnetic behaviors with those of well-studied glassy ribbons. The low-temperature magnetization of our bulk glass can be well expressed by a spin-wave excitation theory, which has been widely utilized to study the temperature-dependent magnetization of ferromagnetic glassy ribbons. Moreover, both the derived spin-wave stiffness coefficient and the derived range and fluctuation of exchange interactions in our bulk metallic glass are very similar to those in glassy ribbons, indicative of the similarity in magnetic exchange interaction between bulk metallic glasses and glassy ribbons.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present the electronic and magnetic properties of bare armchair BC2N nanoribbons (ABC2NNRs) in the view of density functional calculations. We consider three types of edge terminations with a width of 0.75 ~ 2.10 nm. All the investigated ribbons exhibit magnetic ground states with the magnetic moments mainly located on the edge C atoms. Room temperature accessible magnetic stabilities are obtained for ABC2NNRs with NC-NC and NC-BC edge alignments. We find the ABC2NNRs have various electronic structures, where half-metal, metal, and semiconductor are all acquired depend on the edge alignment and magnetic coupling state. The results show the ABC2NNRs can be a promising candidate material in nanoelectronics and nanospintronics.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The crystal structure of new CeNi3-type {Y, Gd–Tm}3Co7Al2 (P63/mmc. N 194, hP24) compounds has been established using powder X-ray diffraction studies. The magnetism of Tb3Ni8Si and Dy3Ni8Si is dominated by rare earth sublattice and the magnetic properties of R3Co7Al2 (R =Gd–Er) and Dy3Co7.68Si1.32 are determined by both rare earth and cobalt sublattices. Magnetization data indicate ferromagnetic ordering of {Tb, Dy}3Ni8Si at 32 K and 21 K, respectively. Gd3Co7Al2 and Tb3Co7Al2 exhibit ferromagnetic ordering at 309 K and 209 K, respectively, whereas Dy3Co7Al2, Ho3Co7Al2, Er3Co7Al2 and Dy3Co7.68Si1.32 show a field dependent ferromagnetic-like ordering at 166 K, 124 K, 84 K and 226 K, respectively followed by a low temperature transition at 34 K for Dy3Co7Al2, 18 K for Ho3Co7Al2, 56 K for Er3Co7Al2, 155 K and 42 K for Dy3Co7.68Si1.32. Among these compounds, Dy3Ni8Si shows largest magnetocaloric effect (isothermal magnetic entropy change) of −11.6 J/kg·K at 18 K in field change of 50 kOe, whereas Tb3Co7Al2, Dy3Co7Al2 and Dy3Co7.68Si1.32 exhibit best permanent magnet properties in the temperature range of 2–5 K with remanent magnetization of 11.95 μB/fu, 12.86 μB/fu and 14.4 μB/fu, respectively and coercive field of 3.0 kOe, 1.9 kOe and 4.4 kOe, respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.By controlling the onset temperature of secondary recrystallization and the temperature interval for grain growth, the annealing atmosphere is the key factor affecting the grain size and texture of grain-oriented silicon steel. The thin-gauge cold-rolled grain-oriented silicon steel (TG-CRGO) is not only more sensitive to annealing atmosphere than the thick-gauge grain-oriented silicon steel, but also requires a different annealing atmosphere. In this paper, the evolution of microstructures and textures in 0.18 mm TG-CRGO steel during high-temperature annealing in five different annealing atmospheres are detected through EBSD technique. The results show that excellent magnetic properties (B8=1.93 T) can be obtained when annealing atmosphere as 75%N2+25%H2 (volume ratio). Secondary recrystallization occurs in all the specimens that were prepared in five different annealing atmospheres, which causes significant differences in secondary recrystallized microstructures and textures. As N2 content rises, the average secondary recrystallized grain sizes increased and reaches a maximum average grain size in 75%N2 atmosphere and then decreases along with N2 content over 75%. When N2 content is 75%, Goss grains show preferential abnormal growth at 1050–1055 °C, which is a very narrow temperature range for secondary recrystallization. In conclusion, proper annealing atmosphere is one of the important measures to control and enable the grain-oriented silicon steel to get the sharp Goss texture.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new self-consistent approximation proposed earlier, is compared with various existing approximations, as well as with a numerical simulation of solutions of the wave equation for a medium with one-dimensional inhomogeneities. The Green's function, found using the new approach, is the closest to the result obtained by the numerical simulation. The results of the work show that the new approach has undoubted advantages in the study of stochastic problems in media with longwave inhomogeneities. The new self-consistent approximation in some cases has advantages over a numerical method: a more rapid process of calculation and the possibility of consideration of three-dimensional problems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Iron-borosilicate soft magnetic composites are suitable magnetic materials for high temperature and high frequency applications. In this research two different techniques have been applied to fabricate these composites: uniaxial pressing following by sintering and spark plasma sintering. Different processing parameters including the content of borosilicate, the amount of compaction pressure and the size of iron particles have been evaluated through the study of microstructure and magnetic properties. The microstructural observations showed that the borosilicate is distributed on the iron grain boundaries enhancing the resistivity and causing the loss of eddy currents. Increasing the compaction pressure was led to the decrease of electrical resistivity. By increasing the frequency both real and imaginary parts of permeability decreased. The use of higher content of borosilicate resulted in the lower decreasing slop of permeability. Best combination of density, permeability and electrical resistivity was obtained in the sample with 2 wt% of borosilicate. In addition, the densification of powders with fine particles was more difficult than coarse particles due to the inter particles friction and bridging effects. Furthermore, as the particles size increases the size of open porosities before sintering where the borosilicate could aggregate enhances. This could yields to the increase in the electrical resistivity. The high ratio of surface to the volume in the powders with fine particles results in the developing the demagnetizing fields and subsequently, decreasing the permeability. The highest relative density (99.99% of theoretical density) with best distribution of borosilicate was achieved in the composites produced by spark plasma sintering (SPS). The relaxation frequency, obtained from imaginary part of permeability, was found as 340 Hz in the composites made by SPS.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) with spinel structure has achieved a great interest as a very important magnetic material which has covered a wide range of applications. The formation condition and energy of possible intrinsic point defects have been investigated by the first-principles calculations, and the effects of the intrinsic point defects on the electronic and magnetic properties of CoFe2O4 have been analyzed. It is found that the growth conditions have a great effect on the formation energy of intrinsic point defects, and each point defect with its fully ionized state is the most stable for the intrinsic point defects with various charge states. In an oxygen rich environment, the cation vacancies are easy to form shallow acceptors，which is conducive to the strength of the p-type conductivity. While in the metal rich environment, the oxygen vacancies tend to form donors which lead to the n-type conductivity. There exists extra levels in the band gap when point defects are present, resulting in a reduction of the band gap. The net magnetic moment depends highly on the defects.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new universal method is developed for determination of nanostructure kinetic stability (KS) at high temperatures, when nanostructures can be destroyed by chemical bonds breaking due to atom thermal vibrations. The method is based on calculation of probability for any bond in the structure to stretch more than a limit value Lmax, when the bond breaks. Assuming the number of vibrations is very large and all of them are independent, using the central limit theorem, an expression for the probability of a given bond elongation up to Lmax is derived in order to determine the KS. It is shown that this expression leads to the effective Arrhenius formula, but unlike the standard transition state theory it allows one to find the contributions of different vibrations to a chemical bond cleavage. To determine the KS, only calculation of frequencies and eigenvectors of vibrational modes in the groundstate of the nanostructure is needed, while the transition states need not be found. The suggested method was tested on calculating KS of bonds in some alkanes, octene isomers and narrow graphene nanoribbons of different types and widths at the temperature T=1200 K. The probability of breaking of the C–C bond in the center of these hydrocarbons is found to be significantly higher than at the ends of the molecules. It is also shown that the KS of the octene isomers decreases when the double C˭C bond is moved to the end of the molecule, which agrees well with the experimental data. The KS of the narrowest graphene nanoribbons of different types varies by 1–2 orders of magnitude depending on the width and structure, while all of them are by several orders of magnitude less stable at high temperature than the hydrocarbons and benzene.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we have investigated the effects of strain on DC transverse and spin-valley Hall conductivity (SHC-VHC) of two-dimensional buckled materials ferromagnetic graphene's analog, MoS2 and silicene due to their spin–orbit coupling. The Kubo formalism has been used to investigate the dynamics of carriers under strain along the armchair (AC) direction of systems in the context of the Kane–Mele Hamiltonian and the Dirac cone approximation. The effective mass of carriers increases with strain and this leads to the reduction of their transport. We have found that SHC-VHC changes symmetrically with respect to a critical strain around 13% and 45% for MoS2 and silicene, respectively. Furthermore, the reflection symmetry of silicene has been broken with electric field and a phase transition to topological insulator for strained ferromagnetic silicene has been seen.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The exchange bias effect in nano-objects is modelled by adding to the magnetic energy two terms allowing for two kinds of anisotropy, viz. a fixed-axis and a rotatable one. The signature of the second contribution is an isotropic shift HRA of the ferromagnetic resonance field. The temperature dependence of HRA that is due to the superparamagnetic theory is obtained in the framework of kinetic theory. Our analysis predicts that the temperature behaviors of HRA are qualitatively different depending on the possible symmetry type of the rotatable anisotropy energy term: unidirectional or uniaxial.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present paper, we investigated the influence of permeability of the carrier particle and stress jump condition on the porous spherical surface in magnetic drug targeting through a permeable microvessel. The nature of blood is defined by non-Newtonian Casson fluid in the core region of the microvessel and Newtonian fluid in the peripheral region which is located near the surface of the wall of the microvessel. The magnetic particles are considered as spherical and in nanosize, embedded in the carrier particle along with drug particles. A magnet is placed near the tumor position to generate a magnetic field. The relative motion of the carrier particle is the resultant of the fluidic force, magnetic force and Saffman drag force which are calculated for the spherical carrier particle. Trajectories of the carrier particle along the radial and axial direction are calculated. Effect of different parameters such as stress-jump constant, permeability of the carrier particle, pressure gradient, yield stress, Saffman force, volume fraction of the embedded magnetic nanoparticles, permeability of the microvessel wall, and the radius of the carrier particle on the trajectory of the carrier particle are discussed and displayed graphically.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work we study the period effect on the local magnetic moment and the related magnetic hyperfine field at non-magnetic s-p impurities (Cu, Ag, Au) diluted in GdZn, the impurity occupying a Zn site. The period effect refers to the difference of the local moment and the hyperfine fields in these noble isoelectronic (nd10ms1, n=3, 4, 5, m=4, 5, 6) impurities that apparently would have similar moments and hyperfine fields, which is not the case. We show that the difference on the local moments is due to the differences of volumes of the impurities with respect to the host Zn ion while the difference of the hyperfine fields is due to different contact parameter A(Zimp), which depend mainly on the principal quantum numbers of the impurity shell m. We further extend our model to calculate the temperature variation of the local magnetic moment and of the hyperfine field for each impurity; for this calculation we adopt a functional integral approach in the static approximation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Using the diagram technique for the Hubbard operators an integral equation that determines the order parameter of the superconducting phase Δ(p) was obtained in the framework of t–J–V and t–J*–V models on triangular lattice. It is shown that there are two scenarios of formation of superconducting phase with gapless spectrum at the critical concentration of carriers xc. The effect of three-center terms on implementation of this phase was also considered.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This work investigates the Si/Fe flux ratio (2 and 0.34) influence on the growth of β-FeSi2 polycrystalline thin films on Si(100) substrate at 630 °C. Lattice deformations for the films obtained are confirmed by X-ray diffraction analysis (XRD). The volume unit cell deviation from that of β-FeSi2 single crystal are 1.99% and 1.1% for Si/Fe =2 and Si/Fe =0.34, respectively. Absorption measurements show that the indirect transition (~ 0.704 eV) of the Si/Fe =0.34 sample changes to the direct transition with a bandgap value of ~0.816 eV for the sample prepared at Si/Fe =2. The absorption spectrum of the Si/Fe =0.34 sample exhibits an additional peak located below the bandgap energy value with the absorption maximum of ~0.36 eV. Surface magneto-optic Kerr effect (SMOKE) measurements detect the ferromagnetic behavior of the β-FeSi2 polycrystalline films grown at Si/Fe =0.34 at T=10 K, but no ferromagnetism was observed in the samples grown at Si/Fe =2. Theoretical calculations refute that the cell deformation can cause the emergence of magnetization and argue that the origin of the ferromagnetism, as well as the lower absorption peak, is β-FeSi2 stoichiometry deviations. Raman spectroscopy measurements evidence that the film obtained at Si/Fe flux ratio equal to 0.34 has the better crystallinity than the Si/Fe =2 sample.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.It is shown that the Rashba spin–orbit coupling induces the spatially nonuniform spin state in the square-shaped 1D wire. The electron states of this type are characterized with spin orientation changing according to the harmonic motion along the square side. The period of the oscillation is determined only by the spin–orbital coupling and the hopping parameters ratio. The modulation of spin orientation is caused by step-like changing of Rashba field direction. The obtained results were generalized on the case of polygon-shaped wire.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Within the spin-fermion model for cuprate superconductors, the influence of the intersite Coulomb interactions V2 and V′2 between holes located at the next-nearest-neighbor oxygen ions of CuO2 plane on the implementation of the dx2−y2-wave pairing is studied. It is shown that d-wave pairing can be suppressed only for unphysically large values of V2 and V′2.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Bimetallic alloy nanoparticles of 3d elements are known for their tunable shape, size and magnetic anisotropy and find extensive applications ranging from magneto-mechanical to biomedical devices. This paper reports the polyol-mediated synthesis of Fe-rich polyacrylic acid (PAA)-Fe3Ni alloyed microspheres and its morphological and structural characterizations with scanning electron microscopy and X-ray diffraction studies. Magnetorheological fluid was prepared by dispersing the 10 vol% microparticles in silicone oil. The room temperature viscoelastic characterization of the fluid was performed under different magnetic fields. The field-dependent yield stresses were scaled using Klingenberg model and found that static yield stress was more accurately described by an ~M3 dependence, where M is particle magnetization. We proposed a multipolar contribution and ascertained the fact that simple dipolar description was insufficient to describe the trend in a complex rheological fluid. Temperature-dependent oscillatory rheological studies under various fields were also investigated. This demonstrated a strong temperature-induced thinning effect. The temperature-thinning in complex moduli and viscosity were more pronounced for the samples at higher magnetic field owing to quasi-solid behavior.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The problem of determining the magnitude of the atomic magnetic moments in compounds with rare-earth and transition elements using the X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) is investigated. The standard sum rules approach usually gives the moment values by several times smaller than their bulk values obtained from the direct magnetic measurements. We attribute this to the strong spin fluctuations in the surface layer which actually formed the soft XMCD signal. A method of determining the value of the local magnetic moments in the presence of strong fluctuations is proposed. The magnetic interactions in La0.5Pr0.2Ca0.3MnO3 are investigated by x-ray absorption spectroscopy, XMCD and bulk magnetization measurements. The proposed procedure is used to determine the values of atomic magnetic moments of transition and rare-earth elements as well as net magnetization on the surface and in the bulk from experimental Mn L2,3 and Pr M4,5 XMCD spectra.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Here we present the investigation of Y2SiO5 monocrystals doped by isotopically pure 143Nd3+(0.025%) impurity by X-ray and electron spin resonance methods. The crystal structure parameters of Y2SiO5 monocrystal and microscopic parameters: g-tensors and hyperfine structure parameters of two nonequivalent Nd3+ paramagnetic centers were determined.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The algorithm of approximate solution was developed for the differential equation describing the anharmonical change of the spin orientation angle in the model of ferromagnet with the exchange competition between nearest and next nearest magnetic neighbors and the easy axis exchange anisotropy. The equation was obtained from the collinearity constraint on the discrete lattice. In the low anharmonicity approximation the equation is resulted to an autonomous form and is integrated in quadratures. The obvious dependence of the angle velocity and second derivative of angle from angle and initial condition was derived by expanding the first integral of the equation in the Taylor series in vicinity of initial condition. The ground state of the soliton solutions was calculated by a numerical minimization of the energy integral. The evaluation of the used approximation was made for a triple point of the phase diagram.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a top-down approach was applied to high crystallinity BaFe12O19 bulks, breaking them into smaller nanoparticles by mechanochemical route. The effects of milling time, reaction mechanisms and structural information were investigated. Interestingly, three distinct stages of the mechanochemical mechanism were observed. The XRD results indicated that the BaFe12O19 phase existed even though the mechanical energy had induced the formation of an amorphous phase in the material. The average crystallite size decreased during the first stage and the intermediate stage, and increased during the final stage of the mechanical alloying. A Rietveld refinement analysis suggested the deformation of a mechanically-triggered polyhedral in the magnetoplumbite structure. FESEM micrographs indicated that fragmentation predominated during the first and intermediate stages, until a steady equilibrium state was achieved at in the final stage, where a narrow particle size distribution was observed. HRTEM micrographs suggested the formation of a non-uniform nanostructure shell surrounding the ordered core materials at the edge-interface region. The thickness of the amorphous surface layer extended up to 12 nm during the first and intermediate stages, and diminished to approximately 3 nm after 20 h milling. VSM results showed a mixture of ferromagnetic, superparamagnetic, and paramagnetic behaviours. However, different magnetic behaviours predominated at different milling time, which strongly related to the defects, distorted polyhedra, and non-equilibrium amorphous layers of the material.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The article presents the results of electron spin resonance (ESR) studies for aqueous solutions of functionalized superparamagnetic iron(II,III) oxide nanoparticles. The samples studied differed in type of organic ligands at the magnetite surface, type of coating agent and pH value of aqueous solutions. The ESR spectra of the samples were obtained at room temperature and at 230 K. The field cooling (FC) experiment was performed for selected samples, and the effective anisotropy field (HK2) and the first order magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant (K1) was calculated. The process of the nanoparticles diffusion in different environments (human blood, human serum) forced by an inhomogeneous magnetic field was monitored and their interactions with different solvents have been discussed. It has been shown that ESR method is useful to observe the impact of organic ligands at the magnetite surface, type of coating agent and pH value of aqueous solutions on the properties of iron(II,III) oxide nanoparticles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Extremely large magnetotransport phenomena were found in the simple devices fabricated on base of the Me/SiO2/p-Si hybrid structures (where Me are Mn and Fe). These effects include gigantic magnetoimpedance (MI), dc magnetoresistance (MR) and the lateral magneto-photo-voltaic effect (LMPE). The MI and MR values exceed 106% in magnetic field about 0.2 T for Mn/SiO2/p-Si Schottky diode. LMPE observed in Fe/SiO2/p-Si lateral device reaches the value of 104% in a field of 1 T. We believe that in case with the Schottky diode MR and MI effects are originate from magnetic field influence on impact ionization process by two different ways. First, the trajectory of the electron is deflected by a magnetic field, which suppresses acquisition of kinetic energy and therefore impact ionization. Second, the magnetic field gives rise to shift of the acceptor energy levels in silicon to a higher energy. As a result, the activation energy for impact ionization significantly increases and consequently threshold voltage rises. Moreover, the second mechanism (acceptor level energy shifting in magnetic field) can be responsible for giant LMPE.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A depth-resolved method for the investigation of the local atomic structure by combining data of X-ray reflectivity and angle-resolved EXAFS is proposed. The solution of the problem can be divided into three stages: 1) determination of the element concentration profile with the depth z from X-ray reflectivity data, 2) determination of the X-ray fluorescence emission spectrum of the element i absorption coefficient μia(z,E) as a function of depth and photon energy E using the angle-resolved EXAFS data Iif(E,ϑl), 3) determination of partial correlation functions gij(z,r)as a function of depth from μi(z,E). All stages of the proposed method are demonstrated on a model example of a multilayer nanoheterostructure Cr/Fe/Cr/Al2O3. Three partial pair correlation functions are obtained. A modified Levenberg-Marquardt algorithm and a regularization method are applied.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Using DFT GGA calculations, electronic structure and magnetic properties of wide family of transition metal trihalides (TMHal3) (Zr, Ti and Nb iodides, Mo, Ru, Ti and Zr bromides and Ti or Zr chlorides) are investigated. These structures consist of transition metal atoms chains surrounded by halides atoms. Chains are connected to each other by weak interactions. All TMHal3 compounds were found to be conductive along chain axis except of MoBr3 which is indirect gap semiconductor. It was shown that NbI3 and MoBr3 have large magnetic moments on metal atoms (1.17 and 1.81 µB, respectively) but other TMHal3 materials have small or zero magnetic moments. For all structures ferromagnetic and anti-ferromagnetic phases have almost the same energies. The causes of these properties are debated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The x-ray absorption near edge structure (XANES) and the x-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) measurements in the hard X-ray range at the Ni and Mn K edges and Tb, Dy L2, 3 edges were carried out in TbNi2Mn and DyNi2Mn in magnetic field up to 6 T at 10 K. XMCD on the Dy and Tb L-edges reaches 3.2%. The spin and orbital d-projected density of states on Tb and Dy atoms were obtained from the XMCD spectra. The Ni and Mn K-edges absorptions are practically identical in both compounds, as well as the dichroism spectra. The magnitude of dichroism is less than 0.5% and its length of about 50 eV. Scattering of outgoing p-wave on magnetic atoms environment is the main source of the K-edge dichroism. Element-specific magnetic hysteresis-loops measurements on TbNi2Mn and DyNi2Mn were performed by X-ray magnetic circular dichroism.© 2017 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic and thermodynamic properties of polycrystalline multiferroic Bi 0.65 La 0.35 Fe 0.5 Sc 0.5 O 3 synthesized under high-pressure and high-temperature conditions are reported. Magnetic properties were studied using a SQUID magnetometer technique over the temperature range of 5−300 K in magnetic fields up to H=10 kOe. The field dependent magnetization M(H) was measured in magnetic fields up to 50 kOe at different temperatures up to 230 K after zero-field cooling procedure. A long-range magnetic ordering of the AFM type with a weak FM contribution occurs below the Néel temperature T N ~237 K. Magnetic hysteresis loops taken below T N show a huge coercive field up to H c ~10 kOe. A strong effect of magnetic field on the magnetic properties of the compound has been found. Derivative of the initial magnetization curves demonstrates a temperature-dependent anomaly in fields of H=15−25 kOe. Besides, an anomaly of the temperature dependent zero-field cooled magnetization measured in magnetic fields of 6−7 kOe has been found. Origin of both anomalies is associated with inhomogeneous magnetic state of the compound. The heat capacity has been measured from 2 K up to room temperature and a significant contribution from the magnon excitations at low temperatures has been detected. From the low-temperature heat capacity, an anisotropy gap of the magnon modes of the order 3.7 meV and Debye temperature T D =189 K have been determined.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In current work, Nd15−xDyxFe77.5B7.5 (at%) nanoparticles with different Dy-content (x=0.0, 0.5, 1.0, 1.5, 2.0, 2.5, 3.0) were synthesized by sol–gel method followed by a reduction-diffusion process. The effects of Dy on the magnetic properties and the relations between the microstructure and the coercivity of Dy-substituted Nd–Fe–B nanoparticles have been studied. The coercivity of Nd–Fe–B nanoparticles with the addition of Dy first increase, reaches a maximum, and then starts to decrease. The coercivity of Dy-substituted Nd–Fe–B nanoparticle synthesized by sol–gel method increased from 938.9 to 1663.9 kA/m while the remanence decreased slightly from 1.16 to 1.06 T. The results show that with an increase in Dy content the variation of maximum energy product ((BH)max), lowest-order uniaxial magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant (Ku1), and Curie temperature (Tc) had a trend as same as the coercivity. The Henkel plot showed that the existence of exchange coupling interaction between grains, and the exchange coupling interactions increased with increasing x from 0.0 to 2.0 and then decrease with further increasing x≥2.5. The optimum magnetic properties of Nd–Fe–B nanoparticles with (BH)max =40.38 MGOe, Hc=1663.9 kA/m, Br=1.08 T were obtained by substituted 2.0 at% Dy. The effects of increasing temperature on magnetic properties of Dy-substituted Nd–Fe–B nanoparticle magnets with 2.0 at% Dy was investigated. The reduced spin-reorientation temperature was obtained for Dy-substituted Nd–Fe–B nanoparticles with 2.0 at% Dy. Below 100 K a spin-reorientation transition was takes place. The temperature coefficient of coercivity (β) was −0.36, −0.46, −0.41, −0.34, −0.29, −0.24, −0.25%/°C at different temperature 50, 100, 150, 200, 250, 300, 350 °C, respectively. Mössbauer spectroscopy was applied to study the composition and properties of Dy-substituted Nd–Fe–B magnet. Microstructure analysis showed a homogeneous distribution of Dy in produced samples. The possible reason for observed magnetic behavior is improving the intrinsic material parameter and optimizing the microstructure by a uniform enhancement of magnetocrystalline anisotropy by formation the nanocrystalline compound (Nd,Dy)2Fe14B.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work we report on new magneto-ellipsometry set-up that allows to grow thin films and nanostructures by ultrahigh vacuum thermal evaporation as well as to conduct in situ measurements during the growth in order to analyze and control nanostructures properties. Ellipsometry and transverse magneto-optical Kerr effect measurements can be performed in situ inside this set-up. A uniform magnetic field of high intensity (more than 1 kOe) can be applied to samples inside the vacuum chamber. Also, we report on the developed method of data interpretation that is the base of the set-up software. Thus, we present a powerful tool for nanostructures synthesis and characterization.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The spin-Hall effect is the generation of a transverse spin-current induced by a longitudinal electric field. Among the various scattering mechanisms which can induce a finite spin-Hall effect we focus on the intrinsic contribution arising from a Rashba-type spin–orbit (RSO) coupling which for couplings linear in momentum usually vanishes. Here we show that non-homogeneity in the spin–orbit coupling arising from structure inversion asymmetry gives rise to a finite spin-Hall effect which we exemplify for a system with striped Rashba spin–orbit coupling.© 2017In order to promote the magnetically favourable <001>//ND texture (θ-fibre) and minimize the unfavourable <111>//ND fibre (γ-fibre) in non-oriented electrical steel, an unconventional cold rolling scheme was employed in this study, in which the cold rolling was carried out at an angle (i.e. 30°, 45°, 60°, and 90°) to the hot rolling direction (HRD). After annealing, two steel sheets (i.e. those after cold rolling at 60° and 45° to the HRD) were found to have considerably different textures from other sheets, i.e. showing the strongest and the weakest θ-fibre textures, respectively. These two sheets were then subjected to skin pass rolling to various reduction rates from 5–20% to investigate the effect of rolling reduction on the evolution of texture. It was found that during skin pass rolling, the cube texture ({001}<100>) was gradually weakened and the rotated cube orientation ({001}<110>) was strengthened. With the increase of the reduction rate, the {112}<110> orientation on the α-fibre became a major component. Upon final annealing, the cube texture was slightly restored, but the volume fraction was considerably lower than that before skin pass rolling.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the effect of Dy2O3/S co-doping on the magnetic properties and microstructure was studied in Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets. With S co-doping, the coercivity increased due to grain boundary modification and Dy selective introduction. Continuous grain boundary phases were formed in the co-doped magnets with smaller grain size. The average grain size after a doping of 0.2 wt% S is 7.25 µm, which is approximately 2.37 µm smaller than that of the S-free sintered magnets(9.62 µm). The coercivity of the Dy2O3/0.2 wt% S co-doped magnets could be increased from 20.9 to 22.8 kOe with changing the remanence and the maximum magnetic energy product slightly. S precipitates in the Nd-rich phases were hexagonal Nd2O2S phase. Dy avoided the Nd2O2S phase in the triple junction region, resulting in more available Dy atoms diffusing into the Nd2Fe14B phase grains to enhance the anisotropy field. Dy-saving was achieved by forming Nd2O2S phase in the Dy2O3/S co-doped magnets.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Composite materials of Cu0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 (CZF) and barium titanate (BT) with different concentrations were prepared by high energy ball milling method. The composite samples of CZF and BT were studied using Infrared, ESR and positron annihilation Doppler broadening (PADB) spectroscopy techniques as well as thermo-electric power measurements. The results confirm formation of the composite, and presence of two ferrimagnetic and ferroelectric phases, simultaneously. In addition, Fe–O bond for both tetrahedral and octahedral sites, population and distribution of cations at A and B sites are varied with BT content. The values of resonance field, line width of ESR spectrum and charge carrier concentration increase by increasing BT content. The value of the g factor for our samples with low BT content is greater than g-factor value of the isolated free electron. On the contrary, the g-factor values for samples with high BT content are smaller than the free isolated electron. PADB line-shape S-parameter suggests that there are increases of the density of the delocalized electrons, defect size and concentration caused by highly adding BT phase. In addition, PADB results confirm the homogeneity of composite phases and same structure of defects in BT-CZF composite samples.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The ground-state magnetic phase diagram is calculated within the Hubbard and s-d exchange (Kondo) models for square and simple cubic lattices vs. band filling and interaction parameter. The difference of the results owing to the presence of localized moments in the latter model is discussed. We employ a generalized Hartree-Fock approximation (HFA) to treat commensurate ferromagnetic (FM), antiferromagnetic (AFM), and incommensurate (spiral) magnetic phases. The electron correlations are taken into account within the Hubbard model by using the Kotliar-Ruckenstein slave boson approximation (SBA). The main advantage of this approach is a correct qualitative description of the paramagnetic phase: its energy becomes considerably lower as compared with HFA, and the gain in the energy of magnetic phases is substantially reduced.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report non-equilibrium dynamics and giant spontaneous exchange bias obtained in zero field cooled mode for Ni46Mn43In11 alloy. The dc magnetic measurements indicate a super spin glass type magnetic ground state in the system. This SSG state is formed when superparamagnetic domains are collectively frozen inside strong antiferromagnetic matrix at low temperature. The ZFCEB arises due to the development of strong superferromagnetic unidirectional anisotropy at the interface of SSG and AFM during the initial magnetization processes. The temperature variation of field cooled exchange bias and ZFCEB is almost similar whilst their field dependency is different. Possible reasons for observed behaviors are comprehensively discussed in this article.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Here we report the magnetic susceptibility measurements of magnetron sputtered orthorhombic manganite RMnO3 (R=Yb, Gd) thin films deposited on dielectric LaAlO3 and ferroelectric SrTiO3, LiNbO3 substrates. We observed that all of investigated o-RMnO3 films show a splitting in the temperature dependence of ZFC and FC magnetization curves. We found that the substrate can impact on the splitting temperature ZFC-FC curves and absolute value of the magnetization of thin films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nano-sized Zr-Co doped nickel ferrites with nominal composition, NiZrxCoxFe2-2xO4 (x=0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8) were synthesized using the micro-emulsion route. The structural elucidation of the synthesized materials was carried out by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy. The XRD analysis confirmed face centered cubic (FCC) structure of all compositions of NiZrxCoxFe2-2xO4 nanocrystallites. Crystallite size was calculated by Scherrer's formula found in the range 10–15 nm. The variation in lattice parameter as determined by XRD data agreed with size variation of host (Fe3+) and guest (Zr4+ and Co2+) cations. FTIR spectra of doped NiFe2O4 exhibited the typical octahedral bands at 528.4 cm−1 which is the characteristic feature of spinel structure of spinel ferrites. The characterized spinel NiZrxCoxFe2-2xO4 nano-ferrites were evaluated for their potential applications by magnetic hysteresis loops and dielectric measurements. The value of saturation magnetization (Ms) decreased from 47.9 to 13.09 emu/g up to x=0.8 with ups and downs fluctuations in between x=0.0 to x=0.8. The high values of Ms of some compositions predicted the potential applications in high density perpendicular recording media and microwave devices. The frequency dependent behavior of permittivity (ε') is recorded and discussed with the help of hopping mechanism of both holes and electrons. The dielectric and magnetic data of NiZrxCoxFe2-2xO4 nano-ferrites suggested the potential applications of these ferrite nanoparticles in high frequency and magnetic data storage devices fabrication.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The possibilities for preparation of bilayers containing magnetic Fe-oxide (Fe-O) and high temperature superconducting (HTS) YBa2Cu3O7−x (YBCO) thin films were investigated. For this purpose, Fe-O films were deposited using reactive magnetron sputtering at comparatively low temperatures T≤250 °C onto dielectric (for example, LaAlO3 (LAO)) substrates, covered with a HTS YBCO film. The sputtering of the Fe-O layer at such conditions did not lead to a crucial damage of the critical temperature TC of the YBCO film, but could affect the width of the superconducting transition. A decrease of the critical temperature of the (Fe-O)/YBCO/LAO bilayer kept at ambient conditions was observed, possibly due to the negative effects of the water vapour on the sample characteristics. The double peak structure of the imaginary component of the response signal to the AC harmonic magnetic field, observed in such a (Fe-O)/YBCO/LAO sample, was ascribed from two possible views: as a consequence of morphology determined inter- and intra-granular contributions and/or as transitions from dominant irreversible processes as Bean-Livingston barrier to vortex state chains formation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we study the non-equilibrium properties of Ising ferromagnetic films using Monte Carlo simulations by short-time dynamic method. We have found thickness dependency of critical exponents z, θ′ and β/ν. Ageing effects were observed in non-equilibrium critical behavior. Former was carried out both from high-temperature and low-temperature initial states. A characteristic time of relaxation, which diverges at a transition temperature in the thermodynamic limit, is obtained as a function of the system size and waiting time.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The facile co-precipitation process of synthesising Superparamagnetic Iron Oxide Nanoparticles (SPIONs) especially magnetite was investigated and simplified, to develop a reproducible and scaled up synthesis process under air, for producing particles with enhanced percentage of magnetite, thus eliminating the crucial and complicated need of using the inert atmosphere. Presence of magnetite was confirmed by XRD, TEM, and Raman spectroscopy. Efficiency of synthesising magnetite was increased up to approx. ∼58 wt%, under air with no other phases but maghemite present. Alkali concentration was optimised, and particles with better magnetisation values were synthesised. The approximate weight percentage of magnetite was calculated using the simple and rapid XRD peak deconvolution method. Higher pH values from 13 to14 were investigated in the study while alkali concentration was varied from 0.5 to 4 M. 1Molar NaOH with a final pH of 13.4 was found to be optimum. Well crystallised particles with approx. 6–12 nm size, narrow size distribution and cubo-spheroidal shape were synthesised. Particles were Superparamagnetic with high values of saturation magnetisation of up to 68 emu/g and negligible values of remanence and coercivity. A reaction yield of up to 62% was obtained. Hydrophilic coated particles were produced in a single, one step facile process for biomedical applications, using optimised parameters of pH and alkali concentration obtained in the study. Single domain particles with good magnetisation formed stable aqueous dispersions. FTIR, UV-Visible and DLS were used to confirm the coating and dispersion stabilities of the particles. These particles have the requisite properties required for application in different biomedical fields.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Arrays of tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) nanowires were synthesized for the first time by filling Fe/MgO/Fe inside vertically grown and substrate supported carbon nanotubes. The magnetic properties of nanowires and planar nanoscale thin films of Fe/MgO/Fe showed several similarities, such as two-fold magnetic symmetry and ratio of orbital moment to spin moment. Nanowires of Fe/MgO/Fe showed higher saturation magnetization by a factor of 2.7 compared to planar thin films of Fe/MgO/Fe at 1.5 kOe. The enhanced magnetic properties likely resulted from shape anisotropy of the nanowires and as well as the hybridization that occur between the π- electronic states of carbon and 3d-bands of the Fe-surface.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Mn-Zn ferrites prepared by different sintering schedules at 1325 °C, 1340 °C, and 1360 °C, have been characterized from the structural, electrical, and magnetic viewpoint. Magnetic losses and complex permeability have been, in particular, measured and analyzed from quasi-static excitation up to 1 GHz. It is observed that lower sintering temperatures and shorter treatment times lead to more homogeneous grain structure and better soft magnetic response at all frequencies. It is shown, however, that, once the contribution by eddy currents is singled out, the energy losses tend to coincide beyond a few MHz in the differently treated samples. The interpretative approach consists in separating the contributions by the domain wall displacements and the magnetization rotations to complex permeability and losses as a function of frequency. This can be accomplished in a relatively simple way in the low induction region described by the Rayleigh law, where these quantities can be quantitatively related and the linear Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation applies, account being taken of the distribution in amplitude and orientation of the local anisotropy fields.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work we demonstrate the occurrence of the characteristic spatial scale in the distribution of magnetization unrelated to the domain wall or crystallite size with using computer simulation of magnetization in a polycrystalline ferromagnetic nanowire. This is the stochastic domain size. We show that this length is included in the spectral density of the pinning force of domain wall on inhomogeneities of the crystallographic anisotropy. The constant and distribution of easy axes directions of the effective anisotropy of stochastic domain, are analytically calculated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present here a brief overview of current-induced spin polarization in bulk semiconductors and semiconductor structures of various dimension. The role of band structure and spin relaxation processes is discussed. The related phenomena, such as spin Hall effect, inverse spin Hall effect and other are discussed. Our recent results in this field are presented as well.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work we present the way of ferromagnetic films study by means of magneto-ellipsometry. The method of interpretation of in situ magneto-optical ellipsometry spectra for real time growth control is described. The method has been successfully tested on Si/SiO2/Fe films within the model of a homogeneous semi-infinite medium. As a result, the dielectric tensor components for Fe layer were calculated using a developed approach.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The structure and the magnetic anisotropy of the films obtained by simultaneous deposition of iron and silicon on n-Si(111) 7×7 at 130 °C are investigated. It is found the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy field for the Fe1−xSix films with x=0.25 (Fe3Si stoichiometric ratio) deposited on Si(111) 7×7 depends on both the surface miscut angle and the oblique sputtering direction and changes from 0.82 Oe up to 117.26 Oe.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Macroscopic and local magnetic anisotropy of [CoFeB-SiO2/α-Si:H]60 multilayer films was studied in comparison with that for the thick CoFeB-SiO2 granular films. The volume fraction of magnetic component Co40Fe40B20 is ranged from 0.34 to 0.70. In the multilayer films the magnetic layer and silicon spacer thicknesses are 2.5÷4.5 nm and 3.5 nm correspondingly. The magnetization curves and ferromagnetic resonance measurements were used to determining magnetic anisotropy energy constants. The main contribution to the local magnetic anisotropy energy constant is found to be from surface magnetic anisotropy of magnetic granules. It is found that the magnetic percolation point of multilayer films (XC~40) is shifted in comparison with that in granular films (XC~30). Surface magnetic anisotropy energy constants of multilayer films with different X evaluated from the surface modes of spin-wave resonance are in the range 0.5< Ks <0.9 erg/cm2.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanostructured epitaxial [57Fe(1.2 Å)/Cr(10.5 Å)]30 multilayer with ultrathin Fe layers, demonstrated Kondo-like behavior, has been investigated by means of the nuclear resonance reflectivity at low temperatures (down to 4 K) in magnetic fields up to 4 T. We detected the beginning of the magnetic phase transition at 150 K which correlates with the minimum on the electrical resistivity curve. The determined magnetic hyperfine field distribution P(Bhf) indicates an inhomogeneity of the iron environments. When we apply the very high external magnetic field up to 4 T, it aligns Bhf(i) along the direction of the external field only partially. Also it has been noticed that Bhf(i) orientations depend on the magnetic pre-history.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Sm17Co83 (at%) films are prepared on bcc-Cr(211), bcc-Fe(211), bcc-Fe65Co35(211), and hcp-Co(11(_)00) underlayers hetero-epitaxially grown on MgO(110) substrates at 500 °C by using a UHV-MBE system. The growth behavior and the structures are investigated by in-situ reflection high-energy electron diffraction and X-ray diffraction. Sm-Co(11(_)00) single-crystal films of RT5 ordered structure with the c-axis lying in the film plane grow epitaxially on the underlayers. Small volumes of amorphous phases are interpreted to be involved in the films deposited on these underlayers. The crystal lattice of RT5 magnetic film is slightly deformed from the bulk hexagonal structure, which is caused possibly by the lattice mismatch with the underlayer. The order degree of film deposited on Cr underlayer is higher (S=0.77) than those prepared on Fe, Fe65Co35, and Co underlayers (S: 0.67–0.71). The films show in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropies reflecting the magnetocrystalline anisotropy of SmCo5 crystal.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magnetothermal properties have been studied for the La0.75Sm0.25Mn2Si2 compound which has the spontaneous first-order antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic (AF-F) transition at a temperature of 160 K. The transition is accompanied by the anisotropic lattice distortion. Isothermal entropy change has been estimated for different magnetic states using the heat capacity and magnetization data. Direct measurements of the adiabatic temperature change have been performed in the fields applied both along the easy c–axis and in the basal plane of a quasi-single crystal. Near the transition temperature, the AF-F transition can be realized in low magnetic fields, which makes such compounds attractive for magnetoelastic and magnetothermal applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Induced spin polarization of π-conjugated carbon and h-BN low dimensional fragments at the interfaces formed by deposition of pentacene molecule and narrow zigzag graphene and h-BN nanoribbons on MnO2-terminated LSMO(001) thin film was studied using GGA PBE+U PAW D3-corrected approach. Induced spin polarization of π-conjugated low-dimensional fragments is caused by direct exchange with Mn ions of LSMO(001) MnO-derived surface. Due to direct exchange, the pentacene molecule changes its diamagnetic narrow-band gap semiconducting nature to the ferromagnetic semiconducting state with 0.15 eV energy shift between spin-up and spin-down valence bands and total magnetic moment of 0.11 μB. Direct exchange converts graphene nanoribbon to 100% spin-polarized half-metal with large amplitude of spin-up electronic density at the Fermi level. The direct exchange narrows the h-BN nanoribbon band gap from 4.04 to 1.72 eV in spin-up channel and converts the h-BN ribbon semiconducting diamagnetic nature to a semiconducting magnetic one. The electronic structure calculations demonstrate a possibility to control the spin properties of low-dimensional π-conjugated carbon and h-BN fragments by direct exchange with MnO-derived LSMO(001) surface for spin-related applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The microstructure and morphology of superconducting Nb3Sn layers in multifilamentary composites differing in the fabrication route (bronze technology and internal-tin method), the shape of Nb filaments (continuous, coupled and tubular) and in the mode of Ti doping (doping of bronze matrix or Nb filaments) have been studied. Significant factors determining critical current density of these wires are the average grain sizes and the fraction of equiaxed grains in the superconducting layers. The minimal grain sizes are characteristic of the composites with tubular Nb filaments, whereas the maximal fraction of equiaxed grains is obtained in the internal-tin wires.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The purpose of this work was to research the influence of interparticle interactions, the elastic properties of matrix and the method of particles preparation on the magnetic properties of the magnetoactive elastomers based on polyurethane rubber containing magnetic particles with high coercivity both conducting and non-conducting. Magnetostatic properties measurements of magnetoactive elastomers were carried out using Vibrating Sample Magnetometer. The diagonal components of susceptibility tensor were found. The dynamic magnetic susceptibility (non-diagonal components) of magnetoactive elastomers was found with immitance-meter using a coil with an elastomeric core. The measured static and dynamic parameters of different samples were compared with each other. Mechanisms of magnetization changes in parallel and crossed magnetic fields are discussed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A statistical model of highly concentrated polydisperse ferrocolloids is proposed. The study approach is based on the second-order modified mean-field theory (MMF2) [A.O. Ivanov, O.B. Kuznetsova, Magnetic properties of dense ferrofluids: an influence of interparticle correlations, Phys. Rev. E 64 (2001) 041405-1–12]. To increase the accuracy of the analytical expression of the magnetization we calculate the contribution of the dipole–dipole interaction energy up to the 2nd order in the pair distribution function for ferroparticles system. The obtained expression of magnetization corresponds to the theoretical expression of initial magnetic susceptibility proposed by the new polydisperse theory [A.O. Ivanov, E.A. Elfimova, Low-temperature magnetic susceptibility of concentrated ferrofluids: the influence of polydispersity, J. Magn. Magn. Matter. 374 (2015) 327–332] exactly. In conjunction it can be applied for magnetogranulometric analysis of polydisperse concentrated ferrofluids.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study the phase transition in a helimagnetic film with Heisenberg spins under an applied magnetic field in the c direction perpendicular to the film. The helical structure is due to the antiferromagnetic interaction between next-nearest neighbors in the c direction. Helimagnetic films in zero field are known to have a strong modification of the in-plane helical angle near the film surfaces. We show that spins react to a moderate applied magnetic field by creating a particular spin configuration along the c axis. With increasing temperature (T), using Monte Carlo simulations we show that the system undergoes a phase transition triggered by the destruction of the ordering of a number of layers. This partial phase transition is shown to be intimately related to the ground-state spin structure. We show why some layers undergo a phase transition while others do not. The Green's function method for non collinear magnets is also carried out to investigate effects of quantum fluctuations. Non-uniform zero-point spin contractions and a crossover of layer magnetizations at low T are shown and discussed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Using the non-equilibrium statistical operator (NSO) method, we have investigated the spin transport through the interface in a semiconductor/ferromagnetic insulator hybrid structure. We have analyzed the effective parameters approximation, when each of the considered subsystems (conduction electrons, magnons, and phonons) is characterized by its effective temperature. We have constructed the macroscopic equations describing the spin-wave current caused by both the resonantly exciting spin subsystem of conduction electrons and an inhomogeneous temperature field in the ferromagnetic insulator. We have shown that the spin-wave current excitation under combined resonance conditions exhibits a resonant nature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The relation between microstructural and magnetic properties of thin obliquely deposited films has been studied by means of numerical techniques. Using our developed simulation code based on ballistic deposition model and Fourier space approach, we have investigated dependences of magnetometric tensor components and magnetic anisotropy parameters on the deposition angle of the films. A modified Netzelmann approach has been employed to study structural and magnetic parameters of an isolated column in the samples with tilted columnar microstructure. Reliability and validity of used numerical methods is confirmed by a good agreement of the calculation results with each other, as well as with our experimental data obtained by the ferromagnetic resonance measurements of obliquely deposited thin Ni80Fe20 films. The combination of these numerical methods can be used to design a magnetic film with a desirable value of uniaxial magnetic anisotropy and to extract the obliquely deposited film structure from only magnetic measurements.© 2016 Elsevier LtdFor super thin dielectric MOS capacitor, capacitance extraction by using two-element model is erroneous. Three-element model, considering parasitic parameters of parallel resistance Rp and series resistance Rs, is necessary. In this paper, we develop a single frequency correction method by combining capacitance-voltage (C-V) and current-voltage (I-V) data. By equating impedances of three-element model with that of two-element model, we obtain two characteristic equations. By using a differential resistance dV/dI, we obtain the third equation. Consequently, three real parameters for the capacitance C, the Rp and the Rs are solved. As an application example of Al/HfO2/n-Si MOS, we demonstrate physically reasonable values for all three real parameters. Furthermore, dielectric loss tangent tan δ is calculated as 0.005–0.022 at 1.5 V. A simplified expression of measured capacitance Cm about the C, the Rp, the Rs and angular frequency ω has been deduced. A constraint condition for large ratio Cm/C suggests the reduction of the ratio Rs/Rp and Rs. Considering suitable values for tan δ and ratio of Cm/C, applicable frequency range is from 15 kHz to 1.1–2.1 MHz.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We discuss magnetically ordered (“superfluid”) phase near quantum transition to Bose-glass phase in a simple modeling system, Heisenberg antiferromagnet in spatial dimension d>2 in external magnetic field with disorder in exchange coupling constants. Our analytical consideration is based on hydrodynamic description of long-wavelength excitations and it is valid in the entire critical region near the quantum critical point (QCP). We demonstrate that the system behaves in full agreement with predictions by Fisher et al. (Phys. Rev. B 40, 546 (1989)) in close vicinity of QCP. On the other hand, we show that many recent experimental and numerical results obtained in various 3D systems can be described by our formulas using percolation critical exponents. Then, it is a possibility that a percolation critical regime arises in the ordered phase in some 3D systems not very close to QCP.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Using the strong coupling diagram technique for calculating the electron Green's function of the two-dimensional Hubbard model we have summed infinite sequences of ladder diagrams, which describe interactions of electrons with spin and charge fluctuations. For sufficiently low temperatures and doping a pronounced four-band structure is observed in spectral functions. Its appearance is related to the proximity of the transition to the long-range antiferromagnetic order.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Various nanoparticle systems have been developed for medical applications in recent years. For constant improvement of efficacy and safety of nanoparticles, a close interdisciplinary interplay between synthesis, physicochemical characterizations and toxicological investigations is urgently needed. Based on combined toxicological data, we follow a “safe-by design” strategy for our superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPION). Using complementary interference-free toxicological assay systems, we initially identified agglomeration tendencies in physiological fluids, strong uptake by cells and improvable biocompatibility of lauric acid (LA)-coated SPIONs (SPIONLA). Thus, we decided to further stabilize those particles by an artificial protein corona consisting of serum albumin. This approach finally lead to increased colloidal stability, augmented drug loading capacity and improved biocompatibility in previous in vitro assays. Here, we show in whole blood ex vivo and on isolated red blood cells (RBC) that a protein corona protects RBCs from hemolysis by SPIONs.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Y0.75Nd0.25Ba2Cu3O7−d superconductor has the peak effect with pronounced fishtail feature on magnetization hysteresis. The magnetic field of the peak effect maximum is in ~4 times higher than one of NdBa2Cu3O7−d. The magnetization hysteresis is tilted anticlockwise due to paramagnetic Nd3+ ions occurred on the surface of grains and in the vortex cores.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The experimental studies on R3+Fe3+Ti2O7 (R=Sm, Gd, Tb, Tm, Dy) magnetic properties evidence the low temperature spin glass state in all compounds. The possibility of rare-earth cation substitution allows the investigation of the role of magnetic iron Fe3+ ions and rare earth R3+ ions subsystems in a ground state formation in these oxide compounds.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe anisotropic carrier trapping behaviors was demonstrated for ambipolar tin monoxide (SnO) thin-film transistors (TFTs). On one hand, the TFTs exhibited good stability with almost no changes in transfer characteristics under negative gate-bias stress (NGBS). On the other, under positive gate-bias stress (PGBS), the transfer curves presented parallel and positive shift with no degradation in field-effect mobility and subthreshold voltage swing. The stress-time evolution of the turn-on voltage shift, induced by different positive stress voltages and temperatures, could be described by the stretched exponential model. The relaxation time was extracted to be 1.6 × 104 s at room temperature with activation energy of 0.43 eV, indicating that the ambipolar SnO TFTs under PGBS approach the stability of amorphous indium-gallium-zinc oxide based TFTs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Metal-filled carbon nanocomposites containing 20 wt% of metallic FeCo nanoparticles were synthesized by means of infrared heating of precursors (polyacrylonitrile – iron acetylacetonate - cobalt acetate). This fabrication approach shows promise for making radiation-absorbent materials in short one-step process with ability to control the size of nanoparticles and attune the composition of the metallic components. In this work the magnetic behavior of reaction products obtained at different stages of the synthesis have been investigated in detail. We report on the influence of the annealing temperature on evolution of the structure, chemical composition, size, surface morphology, spontaneous magnetization and coercivity of the FeCo nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A study of the magnetoelastic (ME) and thermal effects governing the phase (φ) and amplitude of magnetostatic surface spin wave (MSSW) pulses propagating in Ga:YIG/GGG and permalloy magnonic waveguides is presented. The ME effects were studied in a flexural configuration, under punctual mechanical force (F). Thermally induced ME and demagnetization phenomena were controlled by optically injected thermal power Pth. It was determined that in an unclamped Ga:YIG waveguide, the force F that induces the phase shift Δφ=π, decreases by a quadratic law in the range from 1 mN to nN, and the Pth at which Δφ=π decreases linearly from mW to μW as the waveguide volume decreases from mm3 to nm3. For nano-volume waveguides the ME control energy (Eme) can be of order of aJ, and the thermal control energy (ΔEth) can be as small as 50 fJ. The response time of these effects lies in the ns time scale. Both the mechanical and the thermo-magnetic forces provide an effective control of MSSW pulse amplitude, in addition to its phase shift. The thermo-magnetic effect allows one to realize variable delays of a MSSW pulse.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe voltage and current oscillations occasionally occur during the reverse recovery transient of the superjunction MOSFET body diode. This paper identifies the unique reverse recovery oscillation characteristics of the superjunction MOSFET body diode. Base on the experimental investigation and theoretical analysis, the various reverse recovery oscillation mechanisms are clarified. At first, with a discrete 650 V/47 A superjunction MOSFET utilized, the high-frequency and low-frequency oscillation characteristics during the reverse recovery transient are obtained by the double-pulse test. After the theoretical analysis, it is found that the superjunction MOSFET body diode has various oscillation mechanisms depending on its drift region injection level. Under high-level injection condition, the high-frequency oscillation occurs due to the plasma extraction transient-time (PETT) effect. Under low-level injection condition, the body diode's snappy reverse recovery results in the low-frequency LC oscillation. In the end of the paper, the oscillation behaviors under both high and low level injection conditions are reproduced by the mixed-mode numerical simulation, the simulation results validate the proposed oscillation mechanisms.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we reported the synthesis of NiO/Ni bilayer nanotubes by electrodeposition and thermal oxidation using anodic aluminum oxide templates. The morphology, structure, chemical composition and magnetic properties, especially magnetic exchange bias induced by subsequent magnetic field cooling, in this one-dimensional antiferromagnetic/ferromagnetic hybrid system were investigated. It was found that the effect of the annealing temperature, which mainly dominated the thickness of the NiO layer, and the annealing time, which mainly dominated the grain size of the NiO, on the exchange bias field showed competitive relationship. The optimized exchange bias field was achieved by the combination of the shorter annealing time and higher annealing temperature.© 2017 The AuthorsAnnealing (at multiple cooling rates) and quenching (with tempering) was performed on specimens of cast steel of varying composition. The aim was to devise a method for selecting the steel with the highest permeability, from any given range of steels, and then increasing the permeability by heat treatment. Metallographic samples were imaged using optical microscopy to show the effect of the applied heat treatments on the microstructure. Commonly cast steels can have DC permeability altered by the careful selection of a heat treatment. Increases of up to 381% were achieved by annealing using a cooling rate of 6.0 °C/min. Annealing was found to cause the carbon present in the steel to migrate from grain boundaries and from within ferrite crystals into adjacent pearlite crystals. The migration of the carbon resulted in less carbon at grain boundaries and within ferrite crystals reducing the number of pinning sites between magnetic domains. This gives rise to a higher permeability. Quenching then tempering was found to cause the formation of small ferrite crystals with the carbon content of the steel predominately held in the martensitic crystal structures. The results show that with any given range of steel compositions the highest baseline DC permeability will be found with the steel that has the highest iron content and the lowest carbon content. For the samples tested in this paper a cooling rate of 4.5 °C/min resulted in the relative permeability of the sample with the highest baseline permeability, AS4, increasing from 783 to 1479 at 0.5 T. This paper shows how heat treatments commonly applied to hypoeutectoid cast steels, to improve their mechanical performance, can be used to also enhance electromagnetic properties of these alloys. The use of cast steels allows the creation of DC components for electrical machines not possible by the widely used method of stacking of electrical grade sheet steels.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Cubic bixbyite In2O3 nanoparticles with room temperature d0 ferromagnetism were prepared by sol-gel method with the air annealing temperature ranging from 500 to 900 °C. X-ray diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, Raman-scattering and photoluminescence were carried out to demonstrate the presence of oxygen vacancies. The lattice constant, the atomic ratio of crystal O and In, the Raman peak at 369 cm−1, the PL emission peak at 396 nm and the saturation magnetization of d0 ferromagnetism all had a consistent non-monotonic change with the increasing annealing temperature. With further considering the relation between the grain size and the distribution of oxygen vacancies, we think that d0 ferromagnetism in our samples is directly related with the singly charged oxygen vacancies at the surface of In2O3 nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A series of CoFe/IrMn exchange bilayers was grown by DC-sputtering at different ultra-low argon pressures ranging from 0.008 to 0.1 Pa. This pressure range was one to two orders lower than the normal sputtering pressure. Results revealed that the exchange bias increased from 140 to 250 Oe in CoFe(10 nm)/IrMn (15 nm) bilayers of fixed thickness because of the improved crystalline structure and morphological uniformity of films. Since ferromagnetic /antiferromagnetic (FM/AF) bilayers are always used in linear magnetic sensors as detection layers, the varying exchange bias can successfully achieve tunable linear range in a crossed pinning spin valve. The linear range could be adjustable from −80 Oe – +80 Oe to −150 Oe – +150 Oe on the basis of giant magnetoresistance responses. Therefore, this method provides a simple method to tune the operating range of magnetic field sensors.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this work we investigate the impact of quantum mechanical effects on the device performance of n-type silicon nanowire transistors (NWT) for possible future CMOS applications at the scaling limit. For the purpose of this paper, we created Si NWTs with two channel crystallographic orientations 〈1 1 0〉 and 〈1 0 0〉 and six different cross-section profiles. In the first part, we study the impact of quantum corrections on the gate capacitance and mobile charge in the channel. The mobile charge to gate capacitance ratio, which is an indicator of the intrinsic performance of the NWTs, is also investigated. The influence of the rotating of the NWTs cross-sectional geometry by 90° on charge distribution in the channel is also studied. We compare the correlation between the charge profile in the channel and cross-sectional dimension for circular transistor with four different cross-sections diameters: 5 nm, 6 nm, 7 nm and 8 nm. In the second part of this paper, we expand the computational study by including different gate lengths for some of the Si NWTs. As a result, we establish a correlation between the mobile charge distribution in the channel and the gate capacitance, drain-induced barrier lowering (DIBL) and the subthreshold slope (SS). All calculations are based on a quantum mechanical description of the mobile charge distribution in the channel. This description is based on the solution of the Schrödinger equation in NWT cross sections along the current path, which is mandatory for nanowires with such ultra-scale dimensions.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we propose two threshold voltage (VTH) tuning methods for bulk FinFETs with replacement high-k metal gate. The first method is to perform a vertical implantation into fin structure after dummy gate removal, self-aligned forming halo & punch through stop pocket (halo & PTSP) doping profile. The second method is to execute P+/BF2+ ion implantations into the single common work function (WF) layer in N-/P-FinFETs, respectively. These two methods have been investigated by TCAD simulations and MOS-capacitor experiments respectively, and then integrated into FinFET fabrication successfully. Experimental results show that the halo & PTSP doping profile can reduce VTH roll off and total variation. With P+/BF2+ doped WF layer, the VTH-sat shift −0.43 V/+1.26 V for N-FinFETs and −0.75 V/+0.11 V for P-FinFETs, respectively, with gate length of 500 nm. The proposed two methods are simple and effective for FinFET VTH tuning, and have potential for future application of massive production.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, room temperature magnetoelectric properties of (0−3) particulate composites of non lead based piezoelectric BNTKNNLTS [0.97(Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3)–0.03(K0.47Na0.47Li0.06Nb0.74Sb0.06Ta0.2O3) and magnetostrictive CZFMO (Co0.6Zn0.4Fe1.7Mn0.3O4) are presented. Composite samples of (1-x)(BNTKNNLTS)-x(CZFMO), with x=0.1 and 0.5, are synthesized by solid state reaction route. X-ray diffraction confirms the single phase formation of parent phases and the presence of two phases in the composites. Similar sintering conditions of the two individual components lead to optimal ferroelectric and ferromagnetic properties in the composites. A large self-biased magnetoelectric (ME) coupling ~74 mV/cm.Oe for the sample with x=0.1 (measured in longitudinally magnetized-transversely polarized configuration) is observed at room temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we systematically investigate the dynamic magnetic properties of FeSiAl-Al2O3 thin films fabricated by hybrid oblique gradient-composition sputtering technique with respect to temperature ranging from 300 K to 420 K. The magnetic anisotropy field HK and ferromagnetic resonance frequency fFMR can be tuned from 14.06 to 110.18 Oe and 1.05–3.05 GHz respectively, by changing the oblique angle, which can be interpreted in terms of the contribution of stress-induced anisotropy and shape anisotropy. In addition, the thermal stability of FeSiAl-Al2O3 films in terms of magnetic anisotropy HK and ferromagnetic resonance frequency fFMR are enhanced with the increase of oblique angle up to 35° while the thermal stability of effective Gilbert damping factor αeff and the maximum imaginary permeability μ’’max are improved with the increase of oblique angle up to 45°.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.By using the Green's function formalism, we investigate the effects of single particle energy levels of a quantum dot on the spin-dependent transmission properties through a triple-quantum-dot ring structure. In this structure, one of the quantum dots has been regarded to be non-magnetic and the Rashba spin-orbit interaction is imposed locally on this dot while the two others can be magnetic. The on-site energy of dots, manipulates the interference of the electron spinors that are transmitted to output leads. Our results show that the effects of magnetic dots on spin-dependent transmission properties are the same as the difference of on-site energies of the various dots, which is applicable by a controllable lateral bias voltage externally. Besides, by tuning the parameters such as Rashba spin-orbit interaction, and on-site energy of dots and magnetic flux inside the ring, the structure can be indicated the spin-flip effect and behave as a full spin polarizer or splitter.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we have calculated analytically the magnetostatic interaction between two wire-tube nanostructures as a function of their magnetic and geometric parameters. As expected, the interaction energy increases as the nanostructures approach, but interestingly when the nanostructures are close enough, a non-monotonic behavior with the wire-tube portions is reported. Besides, we investigate the hysteresis loop for two interacting Ni81Fe19 wire-tube nanostructures by micromagnetic simulations in order to study how the interaction affects the magnetic properties of these nanostructures. This work allows for the study of magnetostatic interactions between wire-tube nanostructures that have been proposed as an interesting alternative to store information or even perform logic functions, because to their ability to pin a domain wall.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe low-temperature mobility of two-dimensional electron gas (2DEG) limited scattering by ionized impurities, alloy disorder, acoustic and optical phonons, and interface roughness was calculated for novel pseudomorphic modulation-doped by donors and acceptors InGaAs/AlGaAs quantum well structures promising for high power microwave transistors. Due to the high 2DEG density in the quantum well intersubband transitions were taken into account. Scattering by the ionized donors from δ-layer located in AlGaAs barriers dominates, whereas scattering by the ionized acceptors occupying the most part of AlGaAs barriers is negligibly weak. The width of donor doping profile is a key parameter to control 2DEG mobility, thus, increasing of the profile width from 0.25 nm to 4 nm due to segregation and diffusion of donor atoms halves the mobility. We have proposed a few approaches for the weakening of Coulomb scattering and the increase in 2DEG mobility in the novel heterostructures. The predicted mobility enhancement due to δ-layer splitting into two δ-sublayers was verified experimentally.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic compensated materials attracted much interests due to the observed large exchange bias and large coercivity, and also their potential applications in the antiferromagnetic spintronics with merit of no stray field. In this work, by using ab-initio studies, we designed several Ni (Pd, Pt) doped Mn3Ge-based D022-type tetragonal Heusler alloys with fully compensated states. Theoretically, we find the total moment change is asymmetric across the compensation point (at ~x=0.3) in Mn3-xYxGe (Y=Ni, Pd, Pt). In addition, an uncommon discontinuous jump is observed across the critical zero-moment point, indicating that some non-trivial properties may emerge at this point. Further electronic analyses of these compensated alloys reveal high spin polarizations at the Fermi level, which is advantageous for spin transfer torque applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the current study, 1,4-dihydropyridine and polyhydroquinoline derivatives were efficiently synthesized under solvent-less conditions with a magnetic catalyst containing novel acidic ionic liquid functionalized silica modified Fe3O4 nanoparticles through a four component combination of β-ketoester, aldehydes and ammonium acetate (1, 2, 2). Several approaches have been reported for synthesizing these derivatives, while each of these approaches have some weaknesses including long time of reaction, excess of volatile organic solvent, low efficiency, costly reagents, complex operation, high temperatures, production of a number of side products, and difficult catalyst recovery. The simple operation, short time of reaction (5–30 min) and the high efficiency (80–94%) are the special advantages of this technique. The immobilized catalyst exhibited an appropriate thermal stability and excellent recyclability. Different methods such as FT-IR, SEM, EDX, TGA-DTA, and VSM were used to confirm and characterize the catalyst.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new approach for modeling high gradient magnetic separation (HGMS)-type systems during the time-dependent capture and accumulation of magnetic particles by a ferromagnetic wire was developed. This new approach assumes the fluid (slurry) viscosity, comprised of water and magnetic particles, is a function of the magnetic particle concentration in the fluid, with imposed maxima on both the particle concentration and fluid viscosity to avoid unrealistic limits. In 2-D, the unsteady-state Navier-Stokes equations for compressible fluid flow and the unsteady-state continuity equations applied separately to the water and magnetic particle phases in the slurry were solved simultaneously, along with the Laplace equations for the magnetic potential applied separately to the slurry and wire, to evaluate the velocities and concentrations around the wire in a narrow channel using COMSOL Multiphysics. The results from this model revealed very realistic magnetically attractive and repulsive zones forming in time around the wire. These collection zones formed their own impermeable viscous phase during accumulation that was also magnetic with its area and magnetism impacting locally both the fluid flow and magnetic fields around the wire. These collection zones increased with an increase in the applied magnetic field. For a given set of conditions, the capture ability peaked and then decreased to zero at infinite time during magnetic particle accumulation in the collection zones. Predictions of the collection efficiency from a steady-state, clean collector, trajectory model could not show this behavior; it also agreed only qualitatively with the dynamic model and then only at the early stages of collection and more so at a higher applied magnetic field. Also, the collection zones decreased in size when the accumulation regions included magnetic particle magnetization (realistic) compared to when they excluded it (unrealistic). Overall, this might be the first time a mathematical model was shown to be capable of realistically predicting the dynamic nature of magnetic particle capture and accumulation around a wire in HGMS-type systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, an experimental evaluation on the viscosity of water-based manganese ferrite nanofluid with and without magnetic field with 100, 200, 300, and 400 G intensities has been conducted. The Brookfield DV-I PRIME viscometer is implemented to measure the MnFe2O4/water nanofluid viscosity and to evaluate the influence of different volume concentrations (from 0.25% to 3%) and various temperatures (from 20 to 60 °C) on the viscosity. According to the measurements, viscosity incrementally increases with the augmentation of nanoparticles concentration while it remarkably decreases at higher temperatures under absence and attendance of magnetic field. The maximum viscosity ratio of 1.14 is achieved at 3 vol% of nanoparticles and 20 °C under no magnetic field, whereas it increments to maximum viscosity ratio of 1.75 at 3 vol% of nanoparticles and 40 °C under 400 G magnetic field. Furthermore, new correlation is proposed for determination of viscosity of MnFe2O4/water nanofluids in terms of magnetic field intensity, volume concentration and temperature.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe mechanism and distribution of drain disturb (DD) are investigated in silicon-oxide-nitride-oxide-silicon (SONOS) flash cells. It is shown that DD is the only concern in this paper. First, the distribution of trapped charge in nitride layer is found to be non-localized (trapped in entire nitride layer along the channel) after programming. Likewise, the erase is also non-localized. Then, the main disturb mechanism: Fowler Nordheim tunneling (FNT) has been confirmed in this paper with negligible disturb effect from hot-hole injection (HHI). And then, distribution of DD is confirmed to be non-localized similarly, which denotes that DD exists in entire tunneling oxide (Oxide for short). Next, four process optimization ways are proposed for minimization of DD, and VTH shift is measured. It reveals that optimized lightly doped drain (LDD), halo, and channel implant are required for the fabrication of a robust SONOS cell. Finally, data retention and endurance of the optimized SONOS are demonstrated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Chaining of magnetic nanoparticles in a microscopic ferrogel (MFG) due to interparticle interaction and external field is analyzed by the coarse-grained molecular dynamics. The embedded nanoparticles, unlike existing conventional models, are assumed to possess uniaxial magnetic anisotropy. By that, the consideration is brought closer to reality. Evolution of particle chains, both in length and straightness, is handled with the aid of “axial” radial distribution function that is sensitive to orientation of the aggregates. The effect of the particle magnetic anisotropy on the structural alterations as well as on volume changes of MFGs is demonstrated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We use the SU(N) Schwinger boson formalism to study the spin transport in the S=1 biquadratic frustrated Heisenberg antiferromagnetic model in the triangular lattice, considering the next-nearest-neighbors interactions J2. We have obtained a jump in the spin conductivity in the point of cusp of the phase diagram −η vs. −α of the model at T=0, which represents the force of the biquadratic coupling versus the next-nearest-neighbor coupling (K vs. J2). We have obtained also a superfluid behavior for the spin transport in the DC limit for this system similar to ones recently obtained for other two-dimensional frustrated spin systems. We consider all the couplings, first and second couplings as antiferromagnetic.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThis paper reports a lateral PIN polysilicon photodiode on standard bulk complementary metal-oxidesemiconductor (CMOS) process for monolithically integrated high-speed optoelectronic integrated circuits (OEIC). A nominal undoped polysilicon as the photodetection area is intentionally created without introducing any process modification. With the device area of 50 × 50 μm2, a measured responsivity of 46 mA/W and a quantum efficiency of 11% were observed under the reverse voltage of 10 V and the wavelength of 520 nm. A compact equivalent circuit model for the proposed lateral photodiode is built to analyze the frequency response, and a bandwidth of over 20 GHz was obtained from the measured data, which is to the best of our knowledge the largest bandwidth ever reported based on standard bulk CMOS process.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present a new technique for experimental study of kinetics of phase transitions (PTs) and direct measurement of the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in pulsed magnetic fields by using the fast response temperature probe with infrared fiber optical (IRFO) sensor. As demonstration of the new technique, the results are presented of MCE measurements for Gd near Curie point: ΔTad = 21.3 K under pulsed magnetic field µ0H = 12.7 T; and inverse MCE for Fe48Rh52 sample at initial temperature 305.1 K: ΔTad = −4.5 K under pulsed magnetic field µ0H = 8.5 T. Also, the energy losses on magnetization near the 1st order PT were calculated from the results of direct measurements of magnetization versus time for Fe48Rh52 sample: W = 45 J/kg.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this short review various magnetoelectric phenomena in micromagnetism are considered. The new results such as electric field effect on the Bloch lines as well as the electric field blowing of magnetic bubble domains are presented. The possible application in magnetophotonics is also considered.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper addresses the effect of nano-TiC addition on sintered Nd-Fe-B permanent magnets. TiC nanoparticles were added to sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets with a specific aim to improve the Curie temperature and thermal stability. A standard powder metallurgy route was adopted to prepare the magnets. It was found that introducing nano-TiC prior to jet milling was effective as the nanoparticles dispersed in the final alloy, concentcalcrating in the neodymium-rich phase of the magnets. Magnets with optimal properties were obtained with the addition of 1 wt% TiC nanoparticles. The hysteresis loop for such magnets showed an improved shape and VSM analysis a coercivity value of 1188 kA/m, a remanence value of 0.96 T and a maximum energy product of 132 kJ/m3. The maximum working point and the Curie temperature of the developed magnets were 373 K and 623 K respectively.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Development of the interpretation of the phenomenon of the lift of the magnetic resonance frequencies degeneracy caused by the magnetostatic interaction in assemblies of nanodisks has been done. The difference of the resonance behavior of magnetic vortexes in a round and rectangular nanodots has been studied experimentally and explained.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We discuss the conditions under which Majorana zero modes can be implemented in the coexistence phase of chiral superconductivity and 120°-type noncollinear spin structure on the triangular lattice. It is shown that the gapless elementary excitations exist on the finite region in the parameter space consisting of the effective exchange field, the chemical potential, and the superconducting order parameter. The range of parameters supporting Majorana edge states with exactly zero excitation energy has also been found.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Synthesis technology of nano-scale Bi-substituted iron garnets films with high magneto-optic activity for photonics and plasmonics applications were proposed. The micro-scale single-crystal garnet films with different types of magnetic anisotropy as a magneto-optic sensors were synthesized. It was shown that easy-axis anisotropy films demonstrated the best results for visualization of redistribution eddy current magnetic field near defects.© 2016We report the fabrication of epitaxial ferromagnetic Pd3Fe thin films on SrTiO3(001) substrates by promoting the interdiffusion of an Fe/Pd multilayer heterostructure using thermal annealing. Prior to annealing, the results of in-situ Reflection High-Energy Electron Diffraction characterization suggest that each Fe and Pd layer exhibited an in-plane epitaxial relationship with the SrTiO3(001) substrate. X-Ray diffraction and magneto-optic Kerr effect characterization, conducted post-annealing, demonstrate that the film composition is majority Pd3Fe and exhibits in-plane magnetization reversal with a moderate coercive field of ≈760 Oe. This demonstration of an ordered atomic layer heterostructure grown on a perovskite substrate suggests a route to epitaxial interfacial structures which can achieve strain-assisted magnetic switching.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic particle imaging (MPI) is a new medical imaging technology with a number of potential applications. It is based on utilizing the non-linear magnetization response for magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs). We have proposed a method to improve the detection sensitivity for the magnetization of MNPs, and their imaging technique, based on the detection of a second harmonic of the response using a high Tc SQUID. The advantage of using the second harmonic is that the response can be measured even with small amplitudes. In this paper, superparamagnetic MNPs with different diameters and different compositions of materials were analyzed by this method. In the MNPs, Resovist was found to be almost one order of magnitude larger than that of the other MNPs tested. The magnetic moments of the MNPs were estimated by fitting with the Langevin function to obtain the magnetic moments m of Resovist of 3.62×10−18 [J/T]. The magnetic moment m of Resovist was 7.4 times larger than the other MNPs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the magnetic properties of the mixed spin σ=± Ising ferrimagnetic system in a graphene layer by means of Monte Carlo simulations. The effects of next-nearest neighbors exchange interactions and crystal field anisotropy on the critical and compensation behavior of the system have been investigated. The results show that, for a system with given values of the crystal field anisotropy and exchange interaction constants, a compensation point only exists if the values of the spins in the ground state are such that |S|>|σ| and Jσ is higher than a certain value Jσmin. It was shown that the relationship between Jσmin and JS is linear for a given value of the crystal field constant. The compensation and the critical temperature are very sensitive to the change of JS and Jσ, respectively, while the crystal field anisotropy affects both temperatures to a large extent.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present an analytical study of effects from circularly polarized light illumination on controlling spin-valley currents in a dual ferromagnetic-gated silicene. Two different perpendicular electric fields are applied into the ferromagnetic (FM) gates and the photo-irradiated normal (NM) area between the gates. One parallel (P) and two anti-parallel (AP) configurations of exchange fields applied along with chemical potential to the gates are used in this investigation. Interestingly, the studied junction might give rise to polarized-photon frequency filter. Spin-valley filtering can be achieved at the off-resonant frequency region with appropriate direction of electric fields and the configuration of exchange fields (AP-1 or AP-2). Under the photo irradiation, this study found that tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) is controllable to achieve giant magnetoresistance (GMR) by adjusting electric fields or chemical potentials. Our study suggests the potential of photo-sensing devices in spin-valleytronics realm.© 2016 Elsevier LtdTransconductance (gm) and its derivative (dgm/dVg) of junctionless transistors (JLTs), considered as a possible candidate for future CMOS technology, show their unique operation properties such as bulk neutral and surface accumulation conduction. However, source/drain series resistance (Rsd) causes significant degradation of intrinsic gm and dgm/dVg behavior in JLTs. In this letter, the Rsd effects on the operation of JLTs were investigated in detail and also verified with analytical modeling equations. This work provides helpful information for a better understanding of the operation mechanism of JLTs with de-embedded Rsd effects.© 2017 The AuthorsThe catalytic activity of hematite (α-Fe2O3) nanowires under the influence of magnetic field on urea synthesis is considered green. The adsorption and subsequent dissociative reaction of hydrogen, nitrogen and carbon dioxide gases on the α-Fe2O3 (111) nanowires were investigated using the density functional theory (DFT) method. The average adsorption energy is −4.12 kcal/mole at different sites. The adsorption of gases resulted in a difference in density and net spin of electrons from 68 to 120 and 0–21 respectively. In addition, it induces magnetic moment value of 36.33 µB, which confirms the enhanced magnetic behaviour of hematite. α-Fe2O3 nanowires (NWs) synthesized by heating iron wire in a box furnace at (750−800) °C and as synthesized α-Fe2O3 nanoparticles (NPs) were received to use as a catalyst in the magnetic reaction of urea synthesis. X-ray Diffractometer (XRD) confirms the peaks of rhombohedral structure of α-Fe2O3 and Raman spectrum analyses confirms the α-Fe2O3 peaks at 410 cm−1, 500 cm−1 and 616 cm−1. The needle-like shape of hematite nanowires with length ranging from 16–25) μm and diameter from 74 to 145 nm confirmed by Field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM). The magnetic properties of the nanowires exhibited different levels of saturation magnetization, for α-Fe2O3 perpendicularly aligned direction (13.18 emu/g) and random direction (10.73 emu/g). Urea synthesis was done under magnetic field ranges from 0.0 to 2.5 T. The activation energy of α-Fe2O3 NWs for urea production is lower than NPs in the range of 0–1 T, whereas it is reversed for higher magnetic induction values. Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) confirmed the formation of urea at the peaks of 1690–1600 cm−1. This green urea employing magnetically induced method could be a contender to the Haber-Bosch process currently used by the current industry which utilizes high temperature and high pressure.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report here in about the formulation and evaluation of Magnetic Prednisolone Microcapsules (MPC) developed in order to improve the therapeutic efficacy relatively at a low dose than the conventional dosage formulations by means of magnetic drug targeting and thus enhancing bioavailability at the arthritic joints. Prednisolone was loaded to poly (sodium 4-styrenesulfonate) (PSS) doped calcium carbonate microspheres confirmed by the decrease in surface area from 97.48 m2/g to 12.05 of m2/g by BET analysis. Adsorption with oppositely charged polyelectrolytes incorporated with iron oxide nanoparticles was confirmed through zeta analysis. Removal of calcium carbonate core yielded MPC with particle size of ~3.48 µm, zeta potential of +29.7 mV was evaluated for its magnetic properties. Functional integrity of MPC was confirmed through FT-IR spectrum. Stability studies were performed at 25 °C±65% relative humidity for 60 days showed no considerable changes. Further the encapsulation efficiency of 63%, loading capacity of 18.2% and drug release of 88.3% for 36 h and its kinetics were also reported. The observed results justify the suitability of MPC for possible applications in the magnetic drug targeting for efficient therapy of rheumatoid arthritis.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Due to the peculiar magnetic properties and the ability to function in cell-level biological interaction, superparamagnetic nanoparticles (SMNP) have been being the attractive carrier for gene delivery. The superparamagnetic nanoparticles with surface-bound gene vector can be attracted to the surface of cells by the Kelvin force provided by external magnetic field. In this article, the influence of the oscillating magnetic field on the characteristics of magnetofection is studied in terms of the magnetophoretic velocity. The magnetic field of a cylindrical permanent magnet is calculated by equivalent current source (ECS) method, and the Kelvin force is derived by using the effective moment method. The results show that the static magnetic field accelerates the sedimentation of the particles, and drives the particles inward towards the axis of the magnet. Based on the investigation of the magnetophoretic velocity of the particle under horizontally oscillating magnetic field, an oscillating velocity within the amplitude of the magnet oscillation is observed. Furthermore, simulation results indicate that the oscillating amplitude plays an important role in regulating the active region, where the particles may present oscillating motion. The analysis of the magnetophoretic velocity gives us an insight into the physical mechanism of the magnetofection. It's also helpful to the optimal design of the magnetofection system.© 2016 Elsevier LtdA forming-free, compliance-current needless and hard-breakdown depressed resistive switching is demonstrated in Cu2O film. Different from the conventional resistive switching behaviors, this reversible switch is free from the forming process, and does not dependent on the direction of the initial electric field. The resistive switching effect may be triggered by the break and recovery of natural conductive path, and a dynamic model is proposed to explain the switching process. Meanwhile, the influence of degradation in local region is also discussed, which is important for switching mechanism understanding. These results are an important step towards the development of resistive switching devices and their applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A number of ferromagnetic alloys in the bulk-form “thermoseeds” have been investigated for localized self-controlled hyperthermia treatment of cancer by substituting V, Mo, Cu, and Ga for Ni. The samples were prepared by arc-melting technique and annealed at 1223 K (950 °C) for 12 h in sealed quartz tubes. The structural, magnetic, and magnetocaloric properties of the samples were studied, using room temperature X-ray diffraction and a Superconducting Quantum Interference Device (SQUID) magnetometer. The magnetocaloric parameters (magnetic entropy changes, refrigeration capacity (RC), and hysteretic effects) have been calculated. It has been shown that recrystallization, i.e., annealing time and temperature, is crucial for controlling the heating characteristics of the seeds. A linear decrease in Curie temperature (TC) from 380 K (107 °C) to 200 K (−73 °C) was observed with increasing substitution of Ni by V, Mo, Cu, and Ga, while the magnetization value remained nearly constant for all substitutions. The optimal composition of these Ni-based alloys has been determined in order to allow self-controlling hyperthermia, implying a Curie temperature near the therapeutic level, 315–318 K (41–45 °C). The results showed that an extraordinary self-regulating heating effect has been achieved in Ni-based magnetic materials, which may create new vistas for hyperthermia cancer treatment.© 2016 Elsevier LtdA new method to extract parasitic capacitances and inductances for high electron-mobility transistors (HEMTs) is proposed in this paper. Compared with the conventional extraction method, the depletion layer is modeled as a physically significant capacitance model and the extrinsic values obtained are much closer to the actual results. In order to simulate the high frequency behaviour with higher precision, series parasitic inductances are introduced into the cold pinch-off model which is used to extract capacitances at low frequency and the reactive elements can be determined simultaneously over the measured frequency range. The values obtained by this method can be used to establish a 16-elements small-signal equivalent circuit model under different bias conditions. The results show good agreements between the simulated and measured scattering parameters up to 30 GHz.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we realize the coexistence of bipolar and unipolar resistive switching (RS) in one Pt-Ir/NiO/TiB1+δ cell. The types of RS are controlled by polarity of set voltage and are free from the current compliance. Based on this coexistence, the set voltage and characters of filaments formed in RS are studied. The results show that the types of filaments also show polarity dependence on the set voltage. The positive set voltage can induce metallic filaments while the negative set voltage can result in semiconductor filaments. It reveals that the distribution of magnitude of set voltage shows abnormal polarity dependence in our devices. The combination the theory of interaction between oxygen vacancy defects and one-carrier impact ionization theory of breakdown account for these results. The influence of filament properties on RS types is also discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study the influence of the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy on the voltage-induced ferromagnetic resonance in magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJs). An MTJ response to the applied radio-frequency voltage excitation is investigated using micromagnetic calculations with the free layer oriented both in-plane and out-of-plane. Our model allows for a quantitative description of the magnetic system parameters such as resonance frequency, sensitivity or quality factor and for a distinction between material-dependent internal damping and disorder-dependent effective damping. We find that the sensitivity abruptly increases up to three orders of magnitude near the anisotropy transition regime, while the quality factor declines due to effective damping increase. We attribute the origin of this behaviour to the changes of the exchange energy in the system, which is calculated using micromagnetic approach.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.By introducing a substantial amount of non-magnetic impurities into an antiferromagnetic 2d Potts model on a triangular lattice it is that the impurities in spin systems described by this model result in the change of a first-order to a second-order phase transition. The systems with linear sizes L×L=N, L=18−48 are considered. Investigations are performed using the standard Metropolis algorithm along with Monte-Carlo single-cluster Wolff algorithm.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Small magnetic nanoparticles with a narrow size distribution are of great interest for several biomedical applications. When the size of the particles decreases, the magnetic moment of the particles decreases. This leads to a significant increase in the separation time by several orders of magnitude. Therefore, in the present study the separation processes of bionized nanoferrites (BNF) with different sizes and concentrations were investigated with the commercial Sepmag Q system. It was found that an increasing initial particle concentration leads to a reduction of the separation time for large nanoparticles due to the higher probability of building chains. Small nanoparticles showed exactly the opposite behavior with rising particle concentration up to 0.1 mg(Fe)/ml. For higher iron concentrations the separation time remains constant and the measured Z-average decreases in the supernatant at same time intervals. At half separation time a high yield with decreasing hydrodynamic diameter of particles can be obtained using higher initial particle concentrations.© 2016 Elsevier LtdA V-band power amplifier in a bulk 65 nm CMOS technology with a peak gain 14.5 dB and 3-dB bandwidth of 28.8 GHz (50.8–79.6 GHz) is presented. The techniques to boost bandwidth and power efficiency are presented. In addition, the design of dummy filling to satisfy manufacturing density requirements while having negligible effects on performances is discussed in details. The PA features a three stage transformer coupled differential architecture with integrated input and output baluns on-chip. The PA achieves a measured saturated output power of 15.1 dBm and output 1 dB compression power of 12.9 dBm at 65 GHz. The peak power-added efficiency is 18.9%. The entire PA occupies area of 0.31 mm2, while consuming 150 mW from a 1.25 V supply.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a superparamagnetic fluid based on Fe3O4 hollow nanospheres was developed and the influence of the particle structure on the rheological properties was investigated. The Fe3O4 hollow nanospheres which were prepared by using the hydrothermal method presented the superparamagnetic characteristic, and the magnetic fluid thereof showed well magnetorheological (MR) effect. The stable magnetic fluid had a high yield stress even at low shear rate and its maximal yield stress was dramatically influenced by the measurement gap. In comparison to the Fe3O4 nanoparticles based magnetic fluid (MF), the Fe3O4 hollow nanospheres based MF exhibited better MR effect and higher stability since the unique hollow nanostructure. The shear stress of the hollow nanospheres is about 1.85 times larger than the nanoparticles based MF because it formed stronger chains structure under applying a magnetic field. To further investigate the enhancing mechanism, a molecule dynamic simulation was conducted to analyze the shear stress and the structure evolution of the Fe3O4 hollow nanospheres based MF and the simulation matched well with the experimental results.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.An energy based model for temperature dependent anhysteretic magnetization curves of ferromagnetic materials is proposed and benchmarked against experimental data. This is based on the calculation of macroscopic magnetic properties by performing an energy weighted average over all possible orientations of the magnetization vector. Most prior approaches that employ this method are unable to independently account for the effect of both inhomogeneity and temperature in performing the averaging necessary to model experimental data. Here we propose a way to account for both effects simultaneously and benchmark the model against experimental data from ~5 K to ~300 K for two different materials in both annealed (fewer inhomogeneities) and deformed (more inhomogeneities) samples. This demonstrates that this framework is well suited to simulate temperature dependent experimental magnetic behavior.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A method for determining magnetic anisotropy parameters of a thin single-crystal film on vicinal (111) substrate as well as substrate miscut angles from angular dependence of ferromagnetic resonance field has been proposed. The method is based on the following: (i) a new approach for the solution of the system of nonlinear equations for equilibrium and resonance conditions; (ii) a new expression of the objective function for the fitting problem. The study of the iron silicide films grown on vicinal Si(111) substrates with different miscut angles confirmed the efficiency of the method. The proposed method can be easily generalized to determine parameters of single-crystal films grown on substrates with an arbitrary cut.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Barkhausen Noise (MBN) and Magneto Acoustic Emission (MAE) were studied in A508 Class II forged steel used for pressure vessels in nuclear power stations. The magnetic experimental determinations were completed with a macro graphic study of sulfides and the texture analysis of the material. The analysis of these results allows us to determine connections between the magnetic anisotropy, texture and microstructure of the material. Results clearly suggest that the plastic flow direction is different from the forging direction indicated by the material supplier© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The shape and magneto-crystalline anisotropies of 10 nm thick Co sputtered films have shown to be dependent on the oblique deposition angle (αi), the angular velocity of the substrate-holder (ωS) and the applied magnetic field (H0) during the deposition. Oblique deposition geometry is natural in our sputtering setup, being α equal to 22° at the edge of 4 in. sample-holder and 32° at its central part. X-ray diffraction analysis has evidenced a (111) texturized fcc structure for all films. Ferromagnetic resonance has shown that samples prepared under H0 of 250 Oe present dominantly the uniaxial HU field contribution independent of the ωS-value, however its magnitude depends on αi. For a non-magnetic holder, Co films show a mixture of twofold (uniaxial) with fourfold (cubic) in-plane magnetic anisotropies. The fourfold contribution is small and it is not influenced by αi or ωS within the experimental error, while the dominant twofold contribution, which is governed by the shadowing effect, is reduced for higher ωS and for samples positioned at the center of the sample-holder. In addition, the intrinsic isotropic Gilbert damping dominates the relaxation process, which is followed by anisotropic twofold scattering mechanism due to stripes and defects, interestingly not influenced by the substrate rotation during depositions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline Co1−xZnxFe2O4 ferrites (0.0≤x≤0.1) were synthesized via simple, economic and environmentally friend sucrose auto-combustion method. An appropriate mechanism for complexation process as well as ferrites formation was suggested and discussed. The detailed structural studies were estimated through X-ray diffractometer (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM) measurements. The results confirmed the formation of mixed spinel phase with cubic structure and exhibited a gradual decrease in the crystal size from 58 nm to 20 nm by the addition of zinc. Based on the obtained structural parameters, an appropriate cation distribution was suggested and reinforced via electrical and magnetic properties measurements. Hysteresis loops measurements, indicated ferromagnetic characteristics, with hard magnetic properties, for the samples with 0.0≤x≤0.6. The samples with higher Zn-content exhibited paramagnetic properties. The changes in the magnetization and coercivity by the addition of zinc can be discussed in the view of the influence of cationic stoichiometry and magneto-crystalline anisotropy, respectively. The huge decrease in the magnetization value at x≥0.8 suggested a shift from ferromagnetic to paramagnetic characteristics. Ac-conductivity as well as dielectric constant behaviors reinforced this magnetic transition. The obtained Curie transition temperatures (TC) were gradually shifted to lower temperatures by the addition of zinc. The addition of zinc results in the substitution of Co2+ ions in the octahedral sites thus, decreases B-B hopping probability, decreases conductivity and consequently increases activation energy. The most predominant conduction mechanisms in the ferromagnetic and paramagnetic regions are expected to be due to electron hoppings between different valence state ions and small positive polaron migration, respectively.© 2016Nanocrystalline Bi1-xBaxFeO3 (0≤x≤0.3) multiferroics were efficiently obtained by sol–gel method after sintering at 800 °C for one hour. The Ba substitution in BiFeO3 (BFO) strongly modifies its structural and multiferroic properties. XRD studies revealed the structural transition from distorted rhombohedral (R3c) to pseudo-cubic (Pm3m) crystal symmetry. The magnetization increases appreciably for x=0.1, which is due to spin canting of magnetic moments at the nanoparticle surfaces and decreases afterward. From the temperature dependent magnetization studies, it is found that magnetic transition temperature (TN) is 620 K for x=0 and 640 K for x=0.1. Besides, the maximum polarisation value decreases with increasing Ba content. SEM micrographs revealed the formation of cubic nanocrystallites with increased porosity on Ba substitution. FTIR analysis of the samples also supports the structural change towards increased crystal symmetry.© 2016 Elsevier LtdA lightly doped P-well field-limiting rings (FLRs) termination on 4H-SiC vertical double-implanted metal-oxide-semiconductor field-effect transistors (VDMOSFETs) has been investigated. Based on the simulation, the proposed termination applied to 4H-SiC VDMOSFET could achieve an almost same breakdown voltage (BV) and have the advantage of lower ion-implantation damage comparing with P+ FLRs termination. Meanwhile, this kind of termination also reduces the difficulty and consumption of fabrication process. 4H-SiC VDMOSFETs with lightly doped P-well (FLRs) termination have been fabricated on 10 μm thick epi-layer with nitrogen doping concentration of 6.2 × 1015 cm−3. The maximum breakdown voltage of the 4H-SiC VDMOSFETs has achieved as high as 1610 V at a current of 15 μA, which is very close to the simulated result of 1643 V and about 90% of the plane parallel breakdown voltage of 1780 V. It is considered that P-well FLRs termination is an effective, robust and process-tolerant termination structure suitable for 4H-SiC VDMOSFET.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A two dimensional (2D) mechanical-magneto-thermal model of direction-dependent magnetoelectric (ME) effect in Terfenol-D/PZT/Terfenol-D laminated composites is established. The expressions of ME coefficient at low and resonance frequencies are derived by the average field method, respectively. The prediction of theoretical model presents a good agreement with the experimental data. The combined effect of orientation-dependent stress and magnetic fields, as well as operating temperature on ME coefficient is discussed. It is shown that ME effect presents a significantly nonlinear change with the increasing pre-stress under different loading angles. There exists an optimal angle and value of pre-stress corresponding to the best ME effect, improving the angle of pre-stress can get more prominent ME coupling than in x axis state. Note that an optimal angle of magnetic field gradually increases with the rise of pre-stress, which can further lead to the enhancement of ME coefficient. Meanwhile, reducing the operating temperature can enhance ME coefficient. Furthermore, resonance frequency, affected by pre-stress, magnetic field and temperature via “ΔE effect”, can enhance ME coefficient about 100 times than that at low frequency.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the magnetic switching behavior of L10-ordered FePt films with varying thickness. It was found that coercivity is strongly dependent on the film thickness. The obvious variations of the coercivity in the thin films are confirmed by the measurements of structural and magnetic properties. With increasing thickness, the degree of L10 chemical ordering increased, while the magnetization reversal process transforms from a pinned two-steps magnetization reversal to a comparatively smooth domain wall motion behavior. Although considering anisotropy, exchange interaction and applied magnetic field, the switching behavior in films is quite complex, the main features of the magnetization reversal mechanism can be understood by performing detailed investigation on the effect of the deposition temperature and the angle of magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we report a novel synthesis method, characterization and application of a new class of ferromagnetic cubic cobalt ferrite magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) for hyperthermia therapy and temperature triggered drug release. The MNPs are characterized by XRD, TEM, FESEM, AC magnetic hysteresis and VSM. These MNPs were coated with folic acid and loaded with an anticancer drug. The drug release studies were done at two different temperatures (37 °C and 44 °C) with progress of time. It was found that higher release of drug took place at elevated temperature (44 °C). We have developed a temperature sensitive drug delivery system which releases the heat sensitive drug selectively as the particles are heated up under AC magnetic field and controlled release is possible by changing the external AC magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetostriction of HoMnO3 hexagonal single crystals was investigated for a wide range of applied magnetic fields with strengths up to H=14 T for all possible combinations of magnetic field orientation H and magnetostriction ΔL/L. The anomalies found in the magnetostriction measurements of HoMnO3 correlate well with the phase diagram of these compounds. For the first time the measurements of magnetostriction of HoMnO3 single crystal were made in all five possible configurations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Giant magnetocaloric effect in Ni-Mn-X (X=In, Sn, Sb) Heusler alloys has been revealed due to the significant shift of the martensite transformation temperatures under a bias magnetic field. However, the magnetic hysteresis during the magnetization and demagnetization cycles creates a large hysteresis loss and reduces the refrigeration capacity. Here we demonstrated that the magnetic hysteresis loss in Ni-Mn-Sb alloys was effectively reduced by Si-doping. The quaternary Ni49.0Mn38.4Sb11.7Si0.9 alloy exhibited martensite and magnetic transitions around room temperature. Maximum magnetic entropy change ΔSm 9.4 J/kg K and working temperature interval 7.0 K were achieved attributed to the martensite transformation under a magnetic field of 5 T. Meanwhile, the average magnetic hysteresis loss for Ni49.0Mn38.4Sb11.7Si0.9 alloy was 2.1 J/kg, much smaller than that for Ni49.0Mn38.5Sb12.5 alloy, 11.4 J/kg. As a result, a refrigeration capacity of 50.2 J/kg was obtained in the Ni49.0Mn38.4Sb11.7Si0.9 alloy. This result shows that Si-doped Ni-Mn-Sb alloys may act as a potential material system for magnetic refrigeration.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Experimental data on the monolayer niobium diselenide show that the single band crosses the Fermi energy. This is in striking contrast to the bulk systems in which at least three bands contribute to the Fermi surface of the material. Together with the fact that the charge density wave (CDW) transition temperature Tc of a bulk system and of a single layer are the same one concludes that it should allow description of the two dimensional system by a single band in the tight-binding approximation. We analyse the development of CDW order of triangular symmetry in two-dimensional lattice of hexagonal symmetry. We assume the existence of four sublattices and calculate the resulting density of states and the formation of CDW gap for systems with varying carrier concentration. The mechanism of CDW instability, most probably related to the strong electron-phonon coupling in the material, is modeled by the local attractive interaction U of the same strength on all sites.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the ohmic contact of AlGaNGaN HEMT was optimized by introducing patterned etching in ohmic area, and the conventional structure and whole etching structure were investigated for comparison. The contact resistance decreased from 0.46 Ω mm for conventional to 0.35 Ω mm and 0.18 Ω mm respectively for the whole etching and patterned etching structures. The current-voltage characteristics between the ohmic electrodes presented sharper slope, higher saturation current and lower knee voltage on patterned etching structures. After Cl2 plasma etching on ohmic area surface of AlGaN, the surface oxide layers and the pollutants were removed, therefore, the surface roughness of the ohmic metal reduced obviously, and the surface morphology improved. Meanwhile, the side area induced in patterned etching provided more extra contact area, which increased the tunneling current. The different apertures and the duty factor of patterned etching were investigated, and the results indicated that the quantity of side area produced in patterned etching dominated the reduction effect of ohmic contact resistance.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, Sm0.3Tb0.7FeO3 single crystal was successfully grown by optical floating zone method. Sm0.3Tb0.7FeO3 samples with a-, b-, and c-orientation were manufactured by means of Laue photograph. Magnetic properties of Sm0.3Tb0.7FeO3 single crystals are studied over a wide temperature range from 2 to 400 K. Spin reorientation transition from Γ2 to Γ4 are observed by means of the temperature dependence of magnetization It indicated the reorientation transition temperature of Sm1−xTbxFeO3 single crystals is lowered with the contents of Tb contents rising based on this work and our previous works, thus the spin reorientation transition temperature can be adjusted through changing the compound in orthoferrites materials, which means that we can get orthoferrites single crystals with high magnetism property in various temperature through material design.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Inductive heating of electrically insulating materials like fiberglass reinforced thermoplastics (FRTP) without susceptors is not possible. However, due to their low thermal conductivity a volumetric heat generation method is advisable to reach short heating times to melt this material for reshaping. This can be done with magnetic nanoparticles as susceptors within the thermoplastic of the FRTP using Néel relaxation. During the heating process the particle's magnetic moment rotates with the field while the particle itself is fixed within the thermoplastic. Therefore the heat dissipation of each particle depends on its orientation within the field. To achieve the maximum heat generation of the particles we pre-oriented the particles within a plastic at the best angle to the applied AC field for induction. To do this, five mass percent nanoparticles were dispersed in an epoxy resin, which was then hardened at room temperature in a static three Tesla magnetic field. After its solidification the heating behavior of the sample was compared to a reference sample, which was hardened without a field. The oriented particles showed an increased heating rate when oriented parallel to the applied AC field. The absorption rate was 3.3 times as high as the undirected reference sample. When the alternating electromagnetic field was perpendicular to the oriented particles, the specific absorption rate was similar to that of the reference sample. We compare this result with theory and with calculations from literature, and conduct a numerical simulation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The nanocomposites of (SnO2)x(CuFe2O4)(1−x) (where x=0–100 wt%) have been successfully synthesized via two steps chemical method. XRD pattern has revealed the formation of inverse spinal phases with tetragonal crystal structure without any impurity phases for CuFe2O4 sample. The thermodynamic solubility limit of SnO2 in CuFe2O4 matrix has been found to be 30 wt% and above this percentage crystal phases related to SnO2 started to appear. The average particle size and shape of CuFe2O4 nanoparticles have been strongly influenced by addition of SnO2 as depicted by TEM results. FTIR results have confirmed the existence of cation vibration bands at tetrahedral and octahedral sites along with Sn-O vibration band at higher concentrations, which also validates the formation of nanocomposites. Furthermore, the dielectric constant, tangent loss and conductivity of CuFe2O4 nanoparticles have been found to increase up to 30 wt% addition of SnO2 and then decreases with further increase which is attributed to variations in resistivity and space charge carriers. Magnetic measurements have shown that saturation magnetization decreases from 35.68 emu/gm to 10.26 emu/gm with the addition of SnO2 content.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the synthesis and magnetic properties of unique magnetite-chitosan nanostructures synthesized by the chemical precipitation of magnetite nanoparticles in the presence of chitosan. The influence of varying synthesis parameters on the morphology of the magnetic composites is determined. Depending on the synthesis parameters, magnetite-chitosan nanostructures of spherical (9–18 nm), rice-seed-like (75–290 nm) and lumpy (75–150 nm) shapes were obtained via self-assembly. Spherical nanostructures encapsulated by a 9–15 nm chitosan layer were assembled as well. The prospective morphology of the nanostructures is combined with their excellent magnetic characteristics. It was found that magnetite-chitosan nanostructures are ferromagnetic and pseudo-single domain. Rice-seed-like nanostructures exhibited a coercivity of 140 Oe and saturation magnetization of 56.7 emu/g at 300 K. However, a drop in the magnetic properties was observed for chitosan-coated spherical nanostructures due to the higher volume fraction of chitosan.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Hydrodynamic interactions between magnetic nanoparticles suspended in the Newtonian liquid are accounted for using a combination of the lattice Boltzmann method and molecular dynamics simulations. Nanoparticle is modelled by the system of molecular dynamics material points (which form structure resembles raspberry) coupled to the lattice Boltzmann fluid. The hydrodynamic coupling between the colloids is studied by simulations of the thermo-induced rotational diffusion of two raspberry objects. It was found that for the considered range of model parameters the approaching of the raspberries leads to slight retard of the relaxation process. The presence of the weak magnetic dipolar interaction between the objects leads to modest decrease of the relaxation time and the extent of the acceleration of the diffusion is intensified along with magnetic forces.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Confronting with the gigantic volume of data produced every day, raising integration density by reducing the size of devices becomes harder and harder to meet the ever-increasing demand for high-performance computers. One feasible path is to actualize more logic functions in one cell. In this respect, we experimentally demonstrate a prototype spin-orbit torque based spin logic cell integrated with five frequently used logic functions (AND, OR, NOT, NAND and NOR). The cell can be easily programmed and reprogrammed to perform desired function. Furthermore, the information stored in cells is symmetry-protected, making it possible to expand into logic gate array where the cell can be manipulated one by one without changing the information of other undesired cells. This work provides a prospective example of multi-functional spin logic cell with reprogrammability and nonvolatility, which will advance the application of spin logic devices.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe work presented in this paper analyse the influence of gate underlap region (present either near the source end or near the drain end) on the performance of FinFET using an efficient quasi 3D analytical model carried out by using separation of variable technique. Various parameters analysed in this work are: surface potential, electric field, threshold voltage (Vth), Subthreshold slope (SS), Drain Induced Barrier Lowering (DIBL) and sub-threshold drain current for different channel and underlap length. Analytical results obtained from the developed model are validated by 3-D ATLAS device simulation software results. Analog and RF performance metrics are also extracted for different lengths of underlap region and compared with the conventional FinFET through extensive device simulation. The influence of the back gate voltage on the electrostatics of the underlap FinFET is also investigated. The single stage common source amplifier using conventional and underlap FinFET has also been analysed. Apart from this, switching speed of the device is also investigated by comparing Ion/Ioff ratio and delay for different underlap and channel length.© 2016 Elsevier LtdAn Al-rich AlOxNy thin film based reversible Write-Once-Read-Many-Times (WORM) memory device with MIS structure could transit from high resistance state (HRS, ∼1011 Ω) to low resistance state (LRS, ∼105 Ω) by sweeping voltage up to ∼20 V. The first switching could be recorded as writing process for WORM device which may relate to conductive path are formed through the thin film. The conductive path should be formed by both Al nano phase and oxygen vacancies. Among of them, Al nano phases are not easy to move, but oxygen vacancies could migrate under high E-field or at high temperature environment. Such conductive path is not sensitive to charging effect after it formed, but it could be broken by heating effect, which may relate to the migration of excess Al ions and oxygen vacancies at high temperature. After baking LRS (ON state) WORM device at 200 °C for 2 min, the conductivity will decrease to HRS which indicates conductive path is broken and device back to HRS (OFF state) again. This phenomenon could be recorded as recovery process. Both writing and recovery process related to migration of oxygen vacancies and could be repeated over 10 times in this study. It also indicates that there is no permanent breakdown occurred in MIS structured WORM device operation. We suggest that this conductive path only can be dissolved by a temperature sensitive electro-chemical action. This WORM device could maintain at LRS over 105 s with on-off ratio over 4 orders.© 2016 Elsevier LtdA simulation study exploring the possibility of performance improvements for GaSb/InAs nanowire TFETs under appropriate stress conditions is carried out. It is demonstrated that biaxial tensile strain induces a remarkable enhancement of the on-state current thanks to bandgap reduction; however, a degradation of the ambipolar behavior is observed as well. Some stress intensity values and device geometry configurations are investigated. The best simulated device can achieve an on/off current ratio of about 3×107 with ION≈0.33 mA/μm at VDD=0.3 V.© 2016 The AuthorsChanges in particles and aggregates size distribution in diluted kerosene based magnetic fluids is studied by dynamic light scattering method. It has been found that immediately after dilution in magnetic fluids the system of aggregates with sizes ranging from 100 to 250–1000 nm is formed. In 50–100 h after dilution large aggregates are peptized and in the sample stationary particles and aggregates size distribution is fixed.© 2016We coated inorganic layer containing oxygen, aluminium, phosphorus, and negligible sodium (APO) on stainless steel (STS) by using slot-die coating method and studied its application prospects as a substrate for flexible devices. The APO layer was compositionally uniform in overall area with an amorphous crystal structure. Surface morphology characterization of STS exhibited an improved flatness after the APO layer coating process. The optical property characterization of the APO film carried out by measuring optical reflectance spectrum and refractive index. We also investigated the electrical-transport mechanism in the APO layer. These experimental observations imply the possibility of potential application of APO-STS as a substrate for flexible devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.It is demonstrated how the high degree of powder alignment in PLP magnets can be achieved by loading the powder into a container placed in a magnetic field of moderate strength. The strip-cast alloy with a composition of 30.00 Nd, 1.95 Dy, 66.42 Fe, 0.99 B, 0.54 Co, 0.1 Ga (wt%) was subjected to hydrogen decrepitation and then milled in a vibratory mill in toluene to an average particle size of 2.9 µm determined by the FSSS method. The powder was compacted in the magnetic field of 0.2 – 1.2 T to the filling density 2.6 – 3.2×103 kg/m3. It is shown that loading the powder into a container placed in a magnetic field enhances the degree of powder alignment in sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets produced from non-pressed powder. At the filling density less than 3.2×103 kg/m3, the density of magnets is high but insufficient, because of the formation of magnetostatic chains of particles, which impedes the powder compaction. The simulation by the discrete-element method qualitatively proves that the magnetostatic interaction of the chains of particles that are formed in the course of loading in the magnetic field stimulates a decrease in the density of the sintered magnets and its non-uniform distribution over the sample. As a result of the optimization of the parameters of the alignment and compaction of the powder loaded in a magnetic field, PLP magnets with Br ≥1.34 T, Нc ≥950 kA/m, (BH)max ≥340 kJ/m3, and the degree of alignment exceeding 96% were produced.© 2016 Elsevier LtdWe investigated the effect of well layer thicknesses on the external quantum efficiency (EQE) and energy conversion efficiency (ECE) for InGaN/GaN multiple quantum well (MQW) solar cells grown on sapphire substrates by metalorganic chemical vapor deposition. The results indicated that EQE and ECE have maximum values at a specific well thickness. When the well thickness is sufficiently thin, EQE and ECE increase with an increase in the well thickness owing to an increase in light absorption. Then, once the well thickness surpasses a critical thickness, EQE and ECE begin to decrease owing to the influence of nonradiative recombination processes, which was indicated by the static and dynamic photoluminescence analyses. The critical well thickness probably depends not only on the MQW design but also on growth conditions. Further, we confirmed that the increased total thickness of the stacked well layers leads to increased light absorption and thereby contributes to the improvement of solar cell performance. A high short circuit current density of 1.34 mA/cm2 and a high ECE of 1.31% were achieved for a InGaN/GaN MQW solar cell with a 3.2-nm-thick InGaN well with total well thickness of 115 nm.© 2016 Elsevier LtdGummel Symmetry Test (GST) has been a benchmark industry standard for MOSFET models and is considered as one of important tests by the modeling community. BSIM4 MOSFET model fails to pass GST as the drain current equation is not symmetrical because drain and source potentials are not referenced to bulk. BSIM6 MOSFET model overcomes this limitation by taking all terminal biases with reference to bulk and using proper velocity saturation (v-E) model. The drain current equation in BSIM6 is charge based and continuous in all regions of operation. It, however, adopts a complicated method to compute source and drain charges. In this work we propose to use conventional charge based method formulated by Enz for obtaining simpler analytical drain current expression that passes GST. For this purpose we adopt two steps: (i) In the first step we use a modified first-order hyperbolic v-E model with adjustable coefficients which is integrable, simple and accurate, and (ii) In the second we use a multiplying factor in the modified first-order hyperbolic v-E expression to obtain correct monotonic asymptotic behavior around the origin of lateral electric field. This factor is of empirical form, which is a function of drain voltage (vd) and source voltage (vs). After considering both the above steps we obtain drain current expression whose accuracy is similar to that obtained from second-order hyperbolic v-E model. In modified first-order hyperbolic v-E expression if vd and vs is replaced by smoothing functions for the effective drain voltage (vdeff) and effective source voltage (vseff), it will as well take care of discontinuity between linear to saturation regions of operation. The condition of symmetry is shown to be satisfied by drain current and its higher order derivatives, as both of them are odd functions and their even order derivatives smoothly pass through the origin. In strong inversion region and technology node of 22 nm the GST is shown to pass till sixth-order derivative and for weak inversion it is shown till fifth-order derivative. In the expression of drain current major short channel phenomena like vertical field mobility reduction, velocity saturation and velocity overshoot have been taken into consideration.© 2016 Elsevier LtdA new method is proposed to extract the trap states in p-channel SnO thin-film transistors (TFTs). In this method, the dominant conduction mechanisms under different temperatures have been taken into account. There are percolation and multiple trapping conduction mechanisms. Combined with the drain current-temperature (Ids-T) and capacitance-voltage (C-V) measurements, the variation of trap states concentrations with the surface potential is derived. Results show that energy-dependent density of states (DOS) is in the order of 1019 eV/cm3. And the maximum of the density of states at the interface between the gate dielectric and the SnO channel is Nss = 1.77 × 1014 cm−2 eV−1.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.X-ray diffraction, electrical resistivity and thermal expansion measurements are used to study the interrelation between the structural, magnetic and electron-transport peculiarities in RBaCo2O5+x (R=Y, Gd) over a wide range of oxygen contents. We find that the anisotropic lattice strain caused by the oxygen chain ordering in these compounds favors the metallic state and is a necessary condition for the coupled insulator-to-metal and spin-state phase transitions to occur. The obtained data point to the key role of the crystal lattice in selecting the preferred spin and orbital states of cobalt ions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The article presents an account on some new designs, which have been developed for the magnetic fluid sensor with a movable sensor based on permanent magnets with the support of Ivanovo State Power Engineering University. The research carried out is aimed at elucidating the influence of the detector sensing element on its operating performance.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline spinel ferrite of composition Cu0.2Ni0.2Mg0.2Ca0.4Fe2O4 is synthesized by wet hydroxyl co-precipitation method in ethylene glycol as chelating agent and sodium hydroxide as precipitator at pH 8. Ethylene glycol is utilized as the medium which serves as the dissolvable and in addition a complexing specialist. The synthesized particles are annealed at various temperatures. Thermogravimetric investigation affirms that at 280 °C ethylene glycol is dissipated totally and stable phase arrangement happens over 680 °C. FTIR spectra of as synthesized and annealed at 1050 °C recorded between 400 cm−1 and 4000 cm−1. Structural characterizations of all the samples are carried out by X-ray diffraction (XRD) technique. Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and scanning electron microscopy (SEM) affirm that the particles are spherical and cubic shape with the crystallite size of 12 nm to 32 nm. Magnetic measurements are performed utilizing vibrating sample magnetometer at room temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The requirement for low-power consumption advances the development of antiferromagnetic (AFM) spintronics manipulated by electric fields. Here we report an electrical manipulation of metallic AFM moments within IrMn/[Co/Pt] by interface engineering, where ultrathin non-magnetic metals are highlighted between IrMn and ferroelectric substrates. Ultrathin Pt seed layers are proved to be vital in elevating the blocking temperature and enhancing the perpendicular exchange coupling through modulating the domain structures of as-prepared IrMn AFM. Further electrical manipulations of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy crucially verify the indispensable role of pre-deposited ultrathin Pt layers in modulating IrMn antiferromagnetic moments, which is confirmed by the intimate correlation between the electrically manipulating AFM and improving its blocking temperature. Instead of immediate contact between IrMn AFM and ferroelectric substrates in a conventional way, interface engineering by adopting ultrathin seed layers here adds a new twist to the electrical modulation of AFM metals. This would provide scientific basis on how to manipulate AFM moments and optimize the design of practical AFM spintronics.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the thermodynamic properties of Heusler compounds Fe2−xCoxmnSi (0.00≤x≤2.00). The specific heats CP(T) for compounds with x≤0.1 exhibit a λ-type anomaly arising from spin rearrangements at TR. With increasing x, TR decreases linearly and vanishes at x∼0.169. The magnetic entropy, STR, derived from the magnetic specific heat, Cm(T), released at TR decreases by increasing x. This means the canting angle of spins from the [111] direction decreases by the substitution of Fe atoms with Co atoms, based on the magnetic structure model of Fe2MnSi proposed by Miles et al. For compounds with 0.5≤x, CP(T) in the low-T range can be reproduced by Debye T3 law. The electronic specific heat coefficient decreases monotonically with x.© 2016We propose a model of hybrid magnetic elastomers filled with a mixture of magnetically soft and magnetically hard microparticles. The magnetically hard particles are described by the Stoner–Wohlfarth model, the magnetically soft phase obeys the Fröhlich–Kennelly equation. The interaction between the two types of particles is described by the mean-field approach. First-order reversal curve (FORC) diagrams were calculated for different values of the elastomer matrix elasticity. We demonstrate that the diagrams display specific new features, which identify the presence of both a deformable matrix and the two types of magnetic particles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Single-core iron-oxide nanoparticles with nominal core diameters of 14 nm and 19 nm were analyzed with a variety of non-magnetic and magnetic analysis techniques, including transmission electron microscopy (TEM), dynamic light scattering (DLS), static magnetization vs. magnetic field (M-H) measurements, ac susceptibility (ACS) and magnetorelaxometry (MRX). From the experimental data, distributions of core and hydrodynamic sizes are derived. Except for TEM where a number-weighted distribution is directly obtained, models have to be applied in order to determine size distributions from the measurand. It was found that the mean core diameters determined from TEM, M-H, ACS and MRX measurements agree well although they are based on different models (Langevin function, Brownian and Néel relaxation times). Especially for the sample with large cores, particle interaction effects come into play, causing agglomerates which were detected in DLS, ACS and MRX measurements. We observed that the number and size of agglomerates can be minimized by sufficiently strong diluting the suspension.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the recent study given by Insinga et al. [J. Magn. Magn. Mater. 407, 369–376 (2016)], two kind of magnetic hysteresis loops, magnetization versus magnetic field strength (M-H), and magnetic induction versus magnetic field strength (B-H) of the permanent magnetic material with finite coercivity are involved. However, M-H and B-H functions are sensitive to the shape of magnetic element, moreover, M and B are possibly the multivalue functions at H=Hc, perhaps the third kind magnetic hysteresis loop of magnetization versus magnetic induction (M-B) is more appropriate for predicting the phenomena of demagnetization and reversal of original remanence in magnet array.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe dark count noise mechanisms of single-photon avalanche diodes (SPADs) fabricated in deep sub-micron (DSM) CMOS technologies are investigated in depth. An electric field dependence of tunneling model combined with carrier thermal generation is established for dark count rate (DCR) prediction. Applying the crucial parameters provided by Geiger mode TCAD simulation such as avalanche triggering probability and electric field distribution in the SPAD avalanche region, the individual contribution of each noise source to DCR is calculated for several SPADs in DSM CMOS technologies. The model calculation results reveal that the trap-assisted tunneling is the main DCR generation source for these DSM CMOS SPADs. With the increase of doping levels in the device avalanche region, the band-to-band tunneling will be the dominant factor that could lead to the higher DCR in scaled DSM CMOS technologies.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We reply to Dr. Xu's comment on our paper ‘Performance of Halbach magnet arrays with finite coercivity’ (JMMM 407 (2016), 369–376). Contrary to Dr. Xu's objections we show that the procedure employed by us correctly accounts for the shape effects of the magnet elements. We show that the partial differential equation for the magnetic vector potential, derived from the Maxwell equations, incorporates all shape effects. On the other hand, the local constitutive relations express a point-wise link between, e.g., magnetic field and magnetic flux density, and are as such independent of geometry. We confirm that the results of our computations are perfectly consistent with the constitutive relation which is assumed as starting point.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we report a diamond-shaped body contact (DSBC) for silicon-on-insulator (SOI) LDMOSFET. Several DSBC devices along with conventional body contact (CBC) structures are laid out using 0.35 μm SOI MOSFET foundry process. The DSBC device is designed using the same standard layers as in the CBC structure and the contact layout is adapted to process design rules. Experimental characterization of the CBC and DSBC devices in terms of off-state breakdown voltage (BVoff), on-state breakdown voltage (BVon), on-resistance (Ron) and device foot print showed 19% improvement in BVon compared DSBC device with that of the CBC structure. BVoff and Ron of both of the devices are identical. The device foot print is smaller in DSBC device by 11% compared with that of the CBC structure leading to enhanced “On-resistance × Area” figure of merit where smaller high voltage SOI LDMOSEFT reduces the area and cost of power integrated circuits. In order to explain BVon improvement of DSBC structures, three-dimensional (3-D) device simulation is carried out to clarify the lateral BJT action and breakdown mechanism. It is demonstrated that the number of P+ diffusions in DSBC device can be increased to improve BVon without increasing “On-resistance × Area”. The on-state breakdown voltage improvement and area efficiency of the diamond-shaped body contact proposes it as a promising candidate for reliable operation of SOI LDMOSFET.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe dynamic avalanche has a huge impact on the switching robustness of carrier stored trench bipolar transistor (CSTBT). The purpose of this work is to investigate the CSTBT's dynamic avalanche mechanism during clamped inductive turn-off transient. At first, with a Mitsubishi 600 V/150 A CSTBT and a Infineon 600 V/200 A field stop insulated gate bipolar transistor (FS-IGBT) utilized, the clamped inductive turn-off characteristics are obtained by double pulse test. The unclamped inductive switching (UIS) test is also utilized to identify the CSTBT's clamping voltage under dynamic avalanche condition. After the test data analysis, it is found that the CSTBT's dynamic avalanche is abnormal and can be triggered under much looser condition than the conventional buffer layer IGBT. The comparison between the FS-IGBT and CSTBT's experimental results implies that the CSTBT's abnormal dynamic avalanche phenomenon may be induced by the carrier storage (CS) layer. Based on the semiconductor physics, the electric field distribution and dynamic avalanche generation in the depletion region are analyzed. The analysis confirms that the CS layer is the root cause of the CSTBT's abnormal dynamic avalanche mechanism. Moreover, the CSTBT's negative gate capacitance effect is also investigated to clarify the underlying mechanism of the gate voltage bump observed in the test. In the end, the mixed-mode numerical simulation is utilized to reproduce the CSTBT's dynamic avalanche behavior. The simulation results validate the proposed dynamic avalanche mechanisms.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of a nanoisland with a ferrimagnetic spin configuration, described by the transverse Ising model, are studied by the effective-field theory with correlations. The hexagonal prismatic nanoisland consists of the bilayer with core-shell structure. The phase transition, the magnetization, the susceptibility and the internal energy of the system have been calculated for different values. A lot of novel features, such as the reentrant phenomenon, have been found in the phase transition diagrams of the nanoisland. They are heavily dependent on the exchange coupling, the single-ion anisotropy and the transverse field. These theoretical results may have guiding significance for preparing nanoisland experimentally.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Flower and easy-axis vortex states are well-known magnetic configurations that can be stabilized in small particles. However, <111> vortex (V<111>), i.e. a vortex state with its core axis along the hard-axis direction, has been recently evidenced as a stable configuration in Fe nanocubes of intermediate sizes in the flower/vortex transition. In this context, we present here extensive micromagnetic simulations to determine the different magnetic ground states in ferromagnetic nanocuboids exhibiting cubic magnetocrystalline anisotropy (MCA). Focusing our study in the single-domain/multidomain size range (10–50 nm), we showed that V<111> is only stable in nanocuboids exhibiting peculiar features, such as a specific size, shape and magnetic environment, contrarily to the classical flower and easy-axis vortex states. Thus, to track experimentally these V<111> states, one should focused on (i) nanocuboids exhibiting a nearly perfect cubic shape (size distorsion <12%) made of (ii) a material which combines a zero or positive MCA and a high saturation magnetization, such as Fe or FeCo; and (iii) a low magnetic field environment, V<111> being only observed in virgin or remanent states.© 2016 Elsevier LtdA novel diode with a unique trench shape is predicted by TCAD simulation to have high performance. The novel 600 V vertical PiN diode with hole pockets by the Bosch deep trench process shows a better trade-off curve between reverse recovery loss and forward voltage. The reverse recovery loss is reduced by half. In addition, the active chip size of the novel diode is reduced to two-thirds that of the conventional PiN diode in the same forward voltage. Thanks to the hole pockets with an electric field in the diagonal direction, the remaining hole suppresses the surge voltage with noise for high performance. In this paper, we specially focus on the analysis of phenomenon and the noise suppression mechanism during reverse recovery. The novel diode structure is a strong candidate when developing the fabrication process after silicon trench etching is established.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the work characteristic areas of magnetic fluid flow are experimentally determined in the gap between the cylinders: the area of strong dipole-dipole interaction between magnetite particles 0<Ta<8, the laminar flow 8<Ta<41,2, the area of Taylor vortex flow Ta>41,2. For areas with high flow losses in viscous friction is shown the possibility of reducing the introduction of magnetic fluid of carbon nanotubes and creating a rotating magnetic field.© 2016The influence of a temperature gradient and the Soret effect on the distribution of particles in a magnetic fluid seal (MFS) is studied. The heating of the MFS is found to be an effective method of homogenizing the magnetic fluid in the seal; in addition, the influence of the Soret effect on this process is found to be essential.© 2016A high-performance MRI contrast agent and a drug nanocarrier have been realized in porous Fe3O4@SiO2 nanorods (NRs). The Fe3O4@SiO2 NRs of length ~520 nm and diameter ~180 nm are synthesized by annealing FeOOH@SiO2 nanorods at a temperature of 300 ℃ under continuous flow of forming gas. The magnetic measurement confirms that the Fe3O4@SiO2 NRs is ferrimagnetic in nature with magnetization of 20 emu/g and coercivity HC ~450 Oe. The aqueous suspension of the NRs is stable over a time frame of one month and exhibits a high R2 relaxivity value of 192 mM−1 s−1. The R2 darkening effect is also observed in HeLa cells incubated with NRs in comparison to untreated control cells. The porous Fe3O4@SiO2 NRs further work as an excellent carrier for doxorubicin (DOX) drug with loading efficiency of 65%. The drug release study shows a pH-dependent behavior and is higher in acidic pH (4.3) as compared to the physiological pH (7.4). After 72 h, the cumulative DOX release is found to be ~58% at pH 4.3 and ~17% at pH 7.4. The induction heating studies of the NRs exhibit a sharp increasing trend of SAR value with the increase of magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Bilayer of nickel and nickel oxide were deposited on glass substrates using RF magnetron sputtering technique. The magnetic properties of the prepared thin films were carried out at room temperature in both parallel and perpendicular magnetic field to the sample. The Preisach model was applied to provide a mathematical model of the magnetic hysteresis loop in the case of parallel geometry, along the easy axis of the bi-layer NiO / Ni. Good agreement was obtained between the theoretical and experimental results.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a small-signal characterization work on a recently developed 55 nm SiGe BiCMOS technology from STMicroelectronics. The SiGe HBT from a prototype BiCMOS 55 nm process was investigated up to 325 GHz. The full S-parameters from DC to 325 GHz under multiple bias conditions are presented for the first time for a SiGe HBT. A usual and simple approach for the off-wafer calibration associated to an on-wafer de-embedding procedure was used and remained valid up to 325 GHz thanks to a size reduction of the test structures. The extracted 300/325 GHz fT/fMAX couple, reached at 14 mA/μm2 collector density and 1.2 V collector-emitter voltage, was validated up to 325 GHz.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties tuning and volume dependence in the series of quaternary full Heusler alloys with formula Co2Cr1−xYxGa (Y=Ti, V, Mn, Fe, Co, Ni) were studied with a detailed first-principles exploration. We employ the density functional KKR method with the coherent potential approximation, estimating effective Heisenberg exchange constants via the magnetic force theorem together with mean-field Curie temperature (TC) and magnetic moment for compositions in the whole concentration range. The volumetric dependency of these magnetic properties is studied, particularly the pressure derivatives of TC at equilibrium. Our ternary alloy calculations show good agreement with local-density and generalized gradient approximations in the literature. The quaternary alloys show a wide range of tunable magnetic properties, where magnetic moments range from 0.8 to 4.9 μB, TC from 130 K to 1250 K, and dTC/dV values range from −7 to +6.3KÅ−3.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we are applying the ab initio calculations to study the magnetic properties of vanadium doped CdTe. This study is based on the Korringa–Kohn–Rostoker method (KKR) combined with the coherent potential approximation (CPA), within the local density approximation (LDA). This method is called KKR-CPA-LDA. We have calculated and plotted the density of states (DOS) in the energy diagram for different concentrations of dopants. We have also investigated the magnetic and half-metallic properties of this compound and shown the mechanism of exchange interaction. Moreover, we have estimated the Curie temperature Tc for different concentrations. Finally, we have shown how the crystal field and the exchange splittings vary as a function of the concentrations.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.MgFe2O4/ZrO2 composites containing ZrO2 in different weight percentages from 0% to 80% were prepared via the citrate gel technique as potential candidate materials for magnetic hyperthermia. The biocompatible ceramic ZrO2 was introduced to prevent MgFe2O4 nanoparticles from aggregation and to reduce their dipolar interactions in order to enhance the specific absorption rate (SAR). Structural and magnetic properties of the samples were studied using powder X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). Magnetically induced heating in radio frequency (RF) magnetic fields was observed in all samples. Most significantly, the sample with only 20 wt% MgFe2O4 has been found to have a SAR that is larger than that of pure MgFe2O4. This is an important finding from the point of view of biomedical applications, because ZrO2 in known to have low toxicity and a higher biocompatibility as compared to ferrites.© 2016 Elsevier LtdWe report a novel method to reduce source and drain (S/D) resistances, and to form a lightly doped layer (LDL) of bottom-gate polycrystalline silicon (poly-Si) thin-film transistors (TFTs). For application in driving TFTs, which operate under high drain voltage condition, poly-Si TFTs are needed in order to attain reliability against hot-carriers as well as high field-effect mobility (μFE). With an additional doping on the p+ Si layer, sheet resistance on S/D was reduced by 37.5% and an LDL was introduced between the channel and drain. These results contributed to not only a lower leakage current and gate-induced drain leakage, but also high immunity of kink-effect and hot-carrier stress. Furthermore, the measured electrical characteristics exhibited a steep subthreshold slope of 190 mV/dec and high μFE of 263 cm2/Vs.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe influence of mesa edge capacitance on the frequency characteristics of AlGaN/GaN HEMTs with 90 nm gate length was studied in this paper. To extract mesa edge capacitances, a small-signal equivalent circuit model considering mesa edge capacitances was provided. Based on the model, the intrinsic gate capacitances of AlGaN/GaN HEMTs with 2 × 20 μm, 2 × 30 μm, 2 × 40 μm, and 2 × 50 μm gate widths were extracted, respectively. Through linear fitting along gate width for the extracted results and simulations, 8.06 fF/μm2 of mesa edge capacitances at Vgs = −4.5 V and Vds = 8 V in the devices with 2 × 20 μm gate width was obtained, which can be about 33.2% of the total gate capacitance. Mesa edge capacitances results in a significant drop of current-gain cut-off frequency (fT), and the effect is more serious in the shorter gate length devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We developed a micromagnetic method for modeling magnetic systems with periodic boundary conditions along an arbitrary number of dimensions. The main feature is an adaptation of the Ewald summation technique for evaluation of long-range dipolar interactions. The method was applied to investigate the hysteresis process in hard-soft magnetic nanocomposites with various geometries. The dependence of the results on different micromagnetic parameters was studied. We found that for layered structures with an out-of-plane hard phase easy axis the hysteretic properties are very sensitive to the strength of the interlayer exchange coupling, as long as the spontaneous magnetization for the hard phase is significantly smaller than for the soft phase. The origin of this behavior was discussed. Additionally, we investigated the soft phase size optimizing the energy product of hard-soft nanocomposites.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The correlation between magnetic damping and perpendicular magnetic anisotropy has been investigated in Cu(tCu)/[Ni/Co]N multilayers by time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect. The uniaxial magnetic anisotropy constant Ku is varied in the range of 3.0–3.6 Merg/cm3 by tuning either multilayer repetition number N or Cu thickness tCu. It is found that the PMA strength Ku increases with the increase of N, while the damping constant α0 keeps nearly a constant of 0.025, implying the intrinsic damping is independent of the Ku tuned by N. In contrast, as tCu increases from 2.5 to 20 nm, the α0 value rises continuously up to 0.040, in spite of the rather weak enhancement in Ku and its non-monotonic variation behavior. We consider the constant α0 with N is due to the unchanged spin-orbit coupling strength at each Co/Ni interface, while the obvious enhancement in α0 with tCu results mainly from the increased degree of spin disordering at the rougher Cu/Ni interface.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Pure pseudo cubic shaped copper ferrite nanoparticles with narrow size distribution in the range 6–17 nanometer are prepared by hydrothermal method under various synthesis conditions namely, hydrothermal temperature, heating time, and pH. The structural and morphological studies are carried out in detail using XRD and TEM analysis. The crystallite size and particle size are calculated from different characterization techniques. The distribution of cations among the tetrahedral and octahedral sites is determined from the XRD intensity calculation. Compositional features are determined from EDS analysis. Magnetic studies are carried out using VSM at room temperature and the important magnetic parameters are extracted from it. Contributions due to various types of magnetization to the total magnetization are determined from the theoretical fitting of the magnetization curve. Excellent fits are obtained for all samples prepared under various conditions. The ferromagnetic, superparamagnetic and paramagnetic contributions to the magnetization are determined from the analysis of fitted M-H curve. It is observed that the hydrothermal reaction time and temperature has little effect on the structural and magnetic parameters of the material. However, pH plays a crucial role in the physical properties of nanoparticles. Optimized synthesis conditions are identified for changing the soft ferrimagnetic nature of copper ferrite nanoparticles to superparamagnetic nature.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this work the Line-TFET performance is compared with MOSFET and Point-TFET devices, with different architectures (FinFET and GAA:Gate-All-Around) at both room and high temperatures. This analysis is based on the experimental basic analog parameters such as transconductance (gm), output conductance (gD) and intrinsic voltage gain (AV). Although the Line-TFETs present worse AV than the point-TFETs, when they are compared with MOSFET technology, the line-TFET shows a much better intrinsic voltage gain than both MOSFET architectures (FinFET and GAA). Besides the AV, the highest on-state current was obtained for Line-TFETs when compared with other two TFET architectures, which leads to a good compromise for analog application.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The state diagram of a magnetic tunnel junction with perpendicularly magnetized electrodes in the presence of spin-transfer torques is computed in a macrospin approximation using a power dissipation model. Starting from the macrospin's energy we determine the stability of energy extremum in terms of power received and dissipated, allowing the consideration of non-conservative torques associated with spin transfer and damping. The results are shown to be in agreement with those obtained by direct integration of the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert-Slonczewski equation. However, the power dissipation model approach is faster and shows the reason certain magnetic states are stable, such as states that are energy maxima but are stabilized by spin transfer torque. Breaking the axial system, such as by a tilted applied field or tilted anisotropy, is shown to dramatically affect the state diagrams. Finally, the influence of a higher order uniaxial anisotropy that can stabilize a canted magnetization state is considered and the results are compared to experimental data.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Techniques of synthesis of RE diborides (RB2) are developed (R=Tb, Dy, Ho, Er, Lu). Temperature dependence of magnetisation, a heat capacity, a lattice parameters of diborides in the range of 2–300 K are measured. According to joint calorimetric and X-ray research the analysis of a phonon component of a heat capacity and thermal expansion of RE-diborides is carried out by Debye-Einstein's models, the parameters of the model are determined. The change of magnetisation of the ferromagnetic RB2 compounds with growth of temperature caused by violation of ordering in the system of the atomic magnetic moments is compared with the change of entropy of a magnetic subsystem calculated from calorimetric data. Analytical expansion for calculation of a magnetic component of a heat capacity by RB2 magnetisation data at the temperatures of 2–300 K is obtained.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIndium-based ternary-barrier high-electron-mobility transistors (HEMT) directly on Si substrate are demonstrated in this work, using a structure of In0.18Al0.82N/AlN/GaN-on-Si for high-power applications. The advantages of HEMTs on Si substrates are the low cost and high throughput, which are beneficial for large wafer scale. The thermal dissipation of Si occurs between SiC and the sapphire substrate. The proposed InAlN-barrier HEMTs exhibit a high ON/OFF ratio with >7 orders of magnitudes and an excellent subthreshold swing (SS) below 100 mV/dec, owing to high polarization and less lattice mismatch with GaN. The IDsat is measured to be 163 mA/mm at VDS = 10 V and VG = 2 V with LG = 2 μm. When compared with the control InAlN/AlN/GaN-on-Si MIS-HEMTs with Ohmic contacts, the OFF current is reduced by one order magnitude when using the Schottky-drain contact technology.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The dielectric parameters and ac electrical conductivity of Mg0.8Zn0.2CrxFe2−xO4; (0≤x≤0.025) nanoferrites synthesized citrate–nitrate auto-combustion method were studied using the complex impedance technique in the frequency and temperature ranges 4 Hz–5 MHz and 303–873 K respectively. Hopping of charge carriers plus interfacial polarization could interpret the behaviors of dielectric constant (ε′), dielectric loss tangent (tanδ) and ac electrical conductivity (σac) with frequency, temperatures and composition. The up-normal behavior observed in tanδ trend with temperatures confirms the presence of relaxation loss (dipoles losses). Correlated barrier hopping (CBH) of electron is the conduction mechanism of the investigated nanoferrites. Cole-Cole plots at different temperatures emphasize the main role of grain and grain boundaries in the properties of the investigated nanoferrites. Cr3+ substitution can control the dielectric parameters and ac electrical conductivity of Mg-Zn nanoferrites making it candidates for versatile applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report synthesis, structural details and electrical transport properties of topological insulator Bi2Te3. The single crystalline specimens of Bi2Te3 are obtained from high temperature (950 °C) melt and slow cooling (2 °C/hour). The resultant crystals were shiny, one piece (few cm) and of bright silver color. The Bi2Te3 crystal is found to be perfect with clear [00l] alignment. The powder XRD pattern being carried out on crushed crystals showed that Bi2Te3 crystallized in R3̅m symmetry with a=b=4.3866(2) Å, c=30.4978(13) Å and γ=120°. The Bi position is refined to (0, 0, 0.4038 (9)) at Wyckoff position 6c and of Te are (0, 0, 0) at Wyckoff position 3a and at (0, 0, 0.2039(8)) at 6c. Ambient pressure and low temperature (down to 2 K) electrical transport measurements revealed metallic behavior. Magneto transport measurements under magnetic field showed huge non saturating magneto resistance (MR) reaching up to 250% at 2.5 K and under 50 kOe field. Summarily, the short communication clearly demonstrates that Bi2Te3 topological insulator exhibit non-saturating large positive MR at low temperature of say below 10 K. The non saturating MR is seen right up to room temperature albeit with much decreased magnitude. Worth mentioning is the fact that these crystals are bulk in nature and hence the anomalous MR is clearly an intrinsic property and not due to the size effect as reported for nano-wires or thin films of the same.© 2016A new modelless method of determining the element concentration profile of metallic multilayer nanoheterostructures for low-contrast systems is applied to study periodical and aperiodical multilayer Fe/Cr system by X-ray reflectivity. As a special case, we discuss a cluster-layered Fe/Cr film with Kondo-like behavior of the resistance. The method does not require any a priori information on the structure of the multilayer nanostructures, such as position and width of interfaces, as well as, their shape. The method is based on solution of the Fredholm integral equation of the first kind, which relates the reflection coefficient and the concentration profile of the chemical elements of the sample. The ill-posed inverse problem of determination of the element concentration profile is solved by the regularization method. Efficiency of the method is confirmed by model calculations.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The influence of applied elastic tensile stress up to 120 MPa and compressive stress up to 35 MPa on the magnetic hysteresis curves of non-oriented Fe-3%Si steel is studied. In two tensile stress ranges the hysteresis loop changed monotonously – low stress below 10 MPa facilitated the magnetization process, while above 15 MPa tension deteriorated magnetic properties. This difference in behavior corresponds to two different mechanisms – 1) favoring by tensile stress magnetic easy axes closest to the filed direction and 2) appearance of large demagnetizing fields at grain boundaries and the sample surface. Compression continuously deteriorated magnetic properties and made the hysteresis loop constricted above a few MPa. The effective field as a product of two functions – of the magnetization and of the stress gave excellent agreement with experimental curves for both tensile stress ranges and for compression. The sensitivity of magnetization to compression was approximately five times larger than to tension. The complex hysteresis loop behavior under tension and compression was explained on the basis of our previous results on stressed grain-oriented steel of the same composition, in which the magnetic domains were also studied.© 2016We report the first RF characterization of short-channel replacement metal gate (RMG) InGaAs-OI nFETs built in a 3D monolithic (3DM) CMOS process. This process features RMG InGaAs-OI nFET top layer and SiGe-OI fin pFET bottom layer. We demonstrate state-of-the-art device integration on both levels. The bottom layer SiGe-OI pFETs are fabricated with a Gate-First (GF) process with fins and featuring epitaxial raised source drain (RSD) as well as silicide contact layer. The top layer InGaAs nFETs are fabricated with a RMG process featuring a self-aligned epitaxial raised source drain (RSD). We show that the 3D monolithic integration scheme does not degrade the performance of the bottom SiGe-OI pFETs owing to an optimized thermal budget for the top InGaAs nFETs. From the RF characterizations performed (post-3D monolithic process) on multifinger-gate InGaAs-OI nFETs, we extract a cut-off frequency (Ft) of 16.4 GHz at a gate-length (Lg) of 120 nm. Measurements on various gate lengths shows increasing cut-off frequency with decreasing gate-length.© 2016 Elsevier LtdEffective work function and equivalent oxide thickness are fundamental parameters for technology optimization. In this work, a comprehensive study is done on a large set of FDSOI devices. The extraction of the gate stack parameters is carried out by fitting experimental CV characteristics to quantum simulation, based on self-consistent solution of one dimensional Poisson and Schrodinger equations. A reliable methodology for gate stack parameters is proposed and validated. This study identifies the process modules that impact directly the effective work function from those that only affect the device threshold voltage, due to the device architecture. Moreover, the relative impacts of various process modules on channel thickness and gate oxide thickness are evidenced.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic properties of orthorhombically distorted perovskite rare-earth chromites, such as HoCrO3, are being investigated extensively in recent years. In the present work, we report on the effect of Fe substitution on the magnetic properties of HoCrO3 thin films. Thin films of HoCrO3 and HoCr0.7Fe0.3O3 were fabricated via a solution route on platinized silicon substrates. Structural properties of the films were evaluated by X-ray diffraction and Raman spectroscopy techniques. The surface morphology and cross-sections of the films were examined using scanning electron microscopy. Optical band gaps of pure and Fe doped HoCrO3 films are found to be 3.45 eV and 3.39 eV, respectively. The magnetization measurements show that the Néel temperatures (where Cr3+ orders) for the HoCrO3 and HoCr0.7Fe0.3O3 films are 134 and 148 K, respectively. In a magnetic field of 2 T, the maximum entropy change and relative cooling power, two parameters to evaluate the magnetocaloric properties of a material, were 0.813 J/kg K at 11 K and 21.1 J/kg for HoCrO3 film, in comparison with 0.748 J/kg K at 15 K and 26.8 J/kg for HoCr0.7Fe0.3O3 film. To our knowledge, this is the first work exploring the band gap and magnetocaloric properties of rare-earth chromite thin films. These findings should inspire the development of rare-earth chromite thin films for temperature control of nanoscale electronic devices and sensors in the low temperature region (< 30 K).© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanocomposite magnets consist of soft and hard ferrite phases are known as an exchange spring magnet when they are sufficiently spin exchange coupled. Hard and soft ferrites offer high value of coercivity, Hc and saturation magnetization, Ms respectively. In order to obtain a better permanent magnet, both soft and hard ferrite phases need to be “exchange coupled”. The nanoparticles were prepared by a simple one-pot technique of 80% soft phase and 20% hard phase. This technique involves a single reaction mixture of metal nitrates and aqueous solution of varied amounts of polyvinylpyrrolidone (PVP). The heat treatment applied was at 800 °C for 3 h. The synthesized composites were characterized by Transmission Electron Microscope (TEM), Fourier Transform Infra-red (FT-IR), Energy Dispersive X-Ray (EDX), X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The coexistence of two phases, Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 and SrFe12O19 were observed by XRD patterns. It also verified by the EDX that no impurities detected. The magnetic properties of nanocomposite ferrites for 0.06 g/ml PVP gives a better properties of Hc 932 G and Ms 39.0 emu/g with average particle size obtained from FESEM was 49.2 nm. The concentration of PVP used gives effect on the magnetic properties of the samples.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.It can be expected that the thermal diffusivity of a magnetic fluid varies from time to time after applying a magnetic field because of the growth of the inner structure of a magnetic fluid such as chain-like clusters. In this study, time series variation of the thermal diffusivity of a magnetic fluid caused by applying a magnetic field was investigated experimentally. For the measurement of time series variation of thermal diffusivity, we attempted to apply the forced Rayleigh scattering method (FRSM), which has high temporal and high spatial resolution. We set up an optical system for the FRSM and measured the thermal diffusivity. A magnetic field was applied to a magnetic fluid in parallel and perpendicular to the heat flux direction, and the magnetic field intensity was 70 mT. The FRSM was successfully applied to measurement of the time series variation of the magnetic fluid from applying a magnetic field. The results show that a characteristic configuration in the time series variation of the thermal diffusivity of magnetic fluid was obtained in the case of applying a magnetic field parallel to the heat flux direction. In contrast, in the case of applying a magnetic field perpendicular to the heat flux, the thermal diffusivity of the magnetic fluid hardly changed during measurement.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of Fe/Mn multilayers grown by thermal evaporation technique were investigated by transmission electron microscopy, vibrating sample magnetometer and spin wave theory. Transmission electron microscopy shows that the Fe and Mn layers are continuous with a significant interfacial roughness. The magnetic properties of Fe/Mn multilayers were studied for various Fe thicknesses (tFe). The change of magnetization as a function of temperature is well depicted by a T3/2 law. The Fe spin-wave constant was extracted and found to be larger than that reported for bulk Fe, which we attribute to the fluctuation of magnetic moments at the interface, due to the interfacial roughness. The experimental M (T) data were satisfactory fitted for multilayers with different Fe thicknesses; and several exchange interactions were extracted.© 2016Back-gated InGaAs-on-insulator lateral N+NN+ MOSFETs are successfully fabricated by direct wafer bonding and selective epitaxial regrowth. These devices were characterized using a revisited pseudo-MOSFET configuration. Two different transport mechanisms are evidenced: volume conduction in the undepleted region of the film and surface conduction at the interface between InGaAs and buried insulator. We propose extraction techniques for the volume mobility and interface mobility. The impact of film thickness, channel width, and length is evaluated. Additional measurements reveal the variation of the transistor parameters at low temperature and under externally applied uniaxial tensile strain.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Emerging microfluidic-based cell assays favor label-free red blood cell (RBC) depletion. Magnetic separation of RBC is possible because of the paramagnetism of deoxygenated hemoglobin but the process is slow for open-gradient field configurations. In order to increase the throughput, periodic arrangements of the unit magnets were considered, consisting of commercially available Nd-Fe-B permanent magnets and soft steel flux return pieces. The magnet design is uniquely suitable for multiplexing by magnet tessellation, here meaning the tiling of the magnet assembly cross-sectional plane by periodic repetition of the magnet and the flow channel shapes. The periodic pattern of magnet magnetizations allows a reduction of the magnetic material per channel with minimal distortion of the field cylindrical symmetry inside the magnet apertures. A number of such magnet patterns are investigated for separator performance, size and economy with the goal of designing an open-gradient magnetic separator capable of reducing the RBC number concentration a hundred-fold in 1 mL whole blood per hour.© 2016The electronic structures and magnetic properties of quaternary Heusler alloys KCaCF and KCaCCl have been analyzed by means of first-principles calculations on the basis of density functional theory. We found that type-3 structure is the most stable configuration where C occupies (0, 0, 0) site, K (0.25, 0.25, 0.25), F/Cl (0.5, 0.5, 0.5), and Ca (0.75, 0.75, 0.75). Type-1 arrangement is the metastable structure in which K, Ca, C, and X occupy (0, 0, 0), (0.25, 0.25, 0.25), (0.5, 0.5, 0.5), and (0.75, 0.75, 0.75) sites, respectively. Both of them are half metals with equilibrium volume. The spin polarization is predominantly from C 2p states. With the variation of the lattice constant, spin-gapless semiconducting characteristic is achieved for type-1 KCaCCl as volume increases.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the frame of density functional theory, first-principles calculations based on generalized gradient approximation and quasi-harmonic Debye approximation model in which the phononic effects are taken into account have been carried out to investigate the structural, electronic, magnetic, and thermodynamic properties of full-Heusler alloy Mn2RuGe in CuHg2Ti-type structure in the pressure range of 0–50 GPa. Present calculations predict that Mn2RuGe is a ferrimagnet with an optimized lattice parameter of 5.854 Å. The calculated total magnetic moment of 2.01 μB per formula unit is very close to integer value and agree well with the Slater-Pauling rule, where the partial spin moments of Mn (A) and Mn (B) which mainly contribute to the total magnetic moment are 2.66 μB and −0.90 μB, respectively. In the study of the energy band structures and density of states, Mn2RuGe exhibits half-metallicity with an indirect gap of 0.235 eV in the spin-down channels, and the shifting of bands towards higher energies in spin-down channel under high pressure. Meanwhile, the high-pressure thermodynamic properties of Mn2RuGe, such as the pressure-volume-temperature relationship, bulk modulus, thermal expansivity, heat capacity, Debye temperature, and Grüneisen parameter are evaluated systematically in the temperature range of 0–900 K. This set of data is considered as the useful information to understand the high-pressure and high-temperature properties for the Mn2RuZ-type Heusler alloy family.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic magnetite (Fe3O4) nanoparticles with an average size of 6.5 nm and good monodispersion were synthesized and investigated by X-ray diffraction, Raman spectrometer, transmission electron microscopy and vibrating sample magnetometer. Corresponding low-field magnetoresistance (LFMR) was tested by physical property measurement system. A quite high LFMR has been observed at room temperature. For examples, at a field of 3000 Oe, the LFMR is −3.5%, and when the field increases to 6000 Oe, the LFMR is up to −5.1%. The electron spin polarization was estimated at 25%. This result is superior to the previous reports showing the LFMR of no more than 2% at room temperature. The conduction mechanism is proposed to be the tunneling of conduction electrons between adjacent grains considering that the monodisperse nanocrystals may supply more grain boundaries increasing the tunneling probability, and consequently enhancing the overall magnetoresistance.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline Fe-Pt alloys have been synthesized via chemical reduction route using various capping agents; such as: oleic acid/oleylamine (route-1) and oleic acid/CTAB (route-2). We could able to synthesize Fe50Pt and Fe54Pt alloys via route 1 and 2, respectively. As-prepared Fe-Pt alloys crystallize in disordered fcc phase with crystallite sizes of 2.3 nm and 6 nm for route-1 and route-2, respectively. Disordered Fe-Pt alloys were transformed to ordered fct phase after annealing at 600 °C. SEM studies confirm the spherical shape morphologies of annealed Fe-Pt nanoparticles with SEM particle sizes of 24.4 nm and 21.2 nm for route-1 and route-2, respectively. TEM study confirms the presence of 4.6 nm particles for annealed Fe50Pt alloys with several agglomerating clusters of bigger size and appropriately agrees well with the XRD study. Room temperature magnetization studies of as-prepared Fe-Pt alloys (fcc) show ferromagnetism with negligible coercivities. Average magnetic moments per particle for as-prepared Fe-Pt alloys were estimated to be 753 μB and 814 μB, for route 1 and 2, respectively. Ordered fct Fe-Pt alloys show high values of coercivities of 10,000 Oe and 10,792 Oe for route-1 and route-2, respectively. Observed magnetic properties of the fct Fe-Pt alloys nps were interpreted with the basis of order parameters, size, surface, and composition effects.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn the phase-change memory (PCM) crystallization occurs in the high-current filament which forms during switching to the conductive state. In the present paper we conduct a numerical modeling of the current filament formation dynamics in thin chalcogenide films using an electronic-thermal model based on negative-U centers tunnel ionization and Joule heating. The key role of inhomogeneities in the filament formation process is shown. Steady-state filament parameters were obtained from the analysis of the stationary heat conduction equation. The filament formation dynamics and the steady-state filament radius and temperature could be controlled by material parameters and contact resistance. Consequently it is possible to control the size of the region wherein crystallization occurs. A good agreement with numerous experimental data leads to the conclusion that thermal effects play a significant role in CGS conduction and high-current filament formation while switching.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Epitaxial La0.67Ca0.33MnO3/CaMnO3 (LCMO/CMO) bilayers and the reference single layers were deposited by pulsed laser deposition on (001)- and (110)-oriented SrTiO3 (STO) substrates, allowing us to perform a detailed study of the dependence of exchange coupling on crystal orientations. It is found that the exchange bias (coercive) field of the (110)-oriented LCMO/CMO bilayer are decreased (increased) compared to that of (001)-oriented bilayer, due to the enhanced (weakened) Mn3+-Mn4+ ferromagnetic double-exchange interaction of LCMO layer. It is clear that the spin flop coupling that leads to the enhanced coercivity and the spin glass state that results in the exchange bias effect can coexist and are determined by the competition between Mn3+-Mn4+ ferromagnetic double-exchange and Mn4+-Mn4+ antiferromagnetic super-exchange interactions at the interface. We propose that strong Mn3+-Mn4+ ferromagnetic double-exchange interaction facilitates the existence of spin flop coupling, not the formation of spin glass state at the LCMO/CMO interface.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The observation of unusual magnetic phenomena in a Ni -based magnetic memory device ([4] O. Ben-Dor et al., 2013) encouraged us to conduct a systematic research on Co based multi-layered structure which contains a α-helix L polyalanine (AHPA-L) organic compound. The constant Co thickness is 7 nm and AHPA-L was also replaced by non-chiral 1-Decanethiol organic molecules. Both organic compounds were chemisorbed on gold by a thiol group. The dc magnetic field (H) was applied parallel and perpendicular to the surface layers. The perpendicular direction is the easy magnetization axis and along this orientation only, the zero-field-cooled (ZFC) plots exhibit a pronounced peak around 55–58 K. This peak is suppressed in the second ZFC and field-cooled (FC) runs performed shortly after the virgin ZFC one. Thus, around the peak position ZFC>FC a phenomenon seldom observed. This peak reappears after measuring the same material six months later. This behavior appears in layers with the non-chiral 1-Decanethiol and it is very similar to that obtained in sulfur doped amorphous carbon. The peak origin and the peculiar ZFC>FC case are qualitatively explained.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThis work presents an analysis of the performance of silicon triple gate SOI nanowires aiming the investigation of analog parameters for both long and short channel n-type and p-MOSFETs. Several nanowires with fin width as narrow as 9.5 nm up to quasi-planar MOSFETs 10 μm-wide are analyzed. The fin width influence on the analog parameters is studied for n-type and p-MOSFETs with channel lengths of 10 μm and 40 nm, at room temperature. The temperature influence is analyzed on the analog performance down to 100 K for long channel n-MOSFETs by comparing the quasi-planar device to the nanowire with fin width of 14.5 nm. The intrinsic voltage gain, transconductance and output conductance are the most important figures of merit in this work. An explicit correlation between these figures of merit and the mobility behavior with temperature is demonstrated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.increasing the energy efficiency is one of the most important issues in modern power electronic systems. In aircraft applications, the energy efficiency must be associated with a maximum reduction of mass and volume, so a high components compactness. A consequence from this compactness is the increase of operating temperature. Thus, the magnetic materials used in these applications, have to work at high temperature. It raises the question of the thermal ageing problem. The reliability of these components operating at this condition becomes a real problem which deserves serious interest. Our work takes part in this context by studying the magnetic material thermal ageing. The nanocrystalline materials are getting more and more used in power electronic applications. Main advantages of nanocrystalline materials compared to ferrite are: high saturation flux density of almost 1.25 T and low dynamic losses for low and medium frequencies. The nanocrystalline Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si15.5B7 alloys have been chosen in our aging study. This study is based on monitoring the magnetic characteristics for several continuous thermal ageing (100, 150, 200 and 240 °C). An important experimental work of magnetic characterization is being done following a specific monitoring protocol. Elsewhere, X-Ray Diffraction and magnetostriction measurements were carried out to support the study of the anisotropy energies evolution with ageing. This latter is discussed in this paper to explain and give hypothesis about the ageing phenomena.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The microstructure and texture evolution along the processing was investigated with a particular focus on the secondary recrystallization behavior in a 0.23 mm-thick twin-roll cast grain-oriented electrical steel. A striking feature is that Goss orientation originated during twin-roll casting as a result of shear deformation and it was further enhanced during hot rolling and normalizing. After primary recrystallization annealing, a homogeneous microstructure associated with a sharp γ-fiber texture was produced. During secondary recrystallization annealing, the γ-fiber texture was first strengthened and weakened with increasing temperature prior to the onset of secondary recrystallization. Goss grains always exhibited more 20–45° misoriented boundaries than the matrix. The matrix was quite stable during secondary recrystallization with the aid of dense inhibitors. Finally, a complete secondary recrystallization microstructure consisting of large Goss grains was produced. The grain boundary characteristics distribution indicated that the high energy model was responsible for the abnormal growth of Goss grains under the present conditions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Fe50Co50 was subjected to incremental forming by rotary swaging with the aim of tailoring the coercivity by changing the microstructure. The challenging part of a deformation of Fe50Co50 is an ordering phase present at room temperature, leading to low formability. To increase the formability of the alloy the presence of the ordering phase was supressed by two different concepts. The first concept consists of a heat treatment above the phase transition followed by rapid cooling and deformation at room temperature. The second concept was rotary swaging at temperatures above the phase transition temperature. A comparison in terms of resulting microstructure and magnetic properties shows that both concepts have a potential for tailoring the coercivity of Fe50Co50.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this work, a benchmark for low-power digital applications of a III-V TFET technology platform against a conventional CMOS FinFET technology node is proposed. The analysis focuses on full-adder circuits, which are commonly identified as representative of the digital logic environment. 28T and 24T topologies, implemented in complementary-logic and transmission-gate logic, respectively, are investigated. Transient simulations are performed with a purpose-built test-bench on each single-bit full adder solution. The extracted delays and energy characteristics are post-processed and translated into figures-of-merit for multi-bit ripple-carry-adders. Trends related to the different full-adder implementations (for the same device technology platform) and to the different technology platforms (for the same full-adder topology) are presented and discussed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A theoretical study of classical spin waves propagating in axially magnetized, lossy ferromagnetic nanowires is considered, resulting in a model for a magnonic Bragg mirror based on an axially periodic arrangement of identical nanowire segments. While the system shows evidence of one-dimensional magnonic band gaps, with widths increasing as the inter-nanowire exchange coupling strength decreases, spin wave attenuation effects can be quite dramatic for magnetic damping constants within the range 0.001–0.1. In fact, calculated reflectance spectra for nanowire structures with a damping constant on the order of 0.01 exhibit relatively intense Bragg peaks only when the nanowire segment length is no more than an order of magnitude larger than the exchange length.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We propose and demonstrate a technique for magnetic microstructure imaging via their interaction with propagating spin waves. In this approach, the object of interest is placed on top of a magnetic testbed made of material with low spin wave damping. There are micro-antennas incorporated in the testbed. Two of these antennas are used for spin wave excitation while another one is used for the detecting of inductive voltage produced by the interfering spin waves. The measurements are repeated for different phase differences between the spin wave generating antennas which is equivalent to changing the angle of illumination. The collected data appear as a 3D plot – the holographic image of the object. We present experimental data showing magnonic holographic images of a low-coercivity Si/Co sample, a high-coercivity sample made of SrFe12O19 and a diamagnetic copper sample. We also present images of the three samples consisting of a different amount of SrFe12O19 powder. The imaging was accomplished on a Y3Fe2(FeO4)3 testbed at room temperature. The obtained data reveal the unique magnonic signatures of the objects. Experimental data is complemented by the results of numerical modeling, which qualitatively explain the characteristic features of the images. Potentially, magnonic holographic imaging may complement existing techniques and be utilized for non-destructive in-situ magnetic object characterization. The fundamental physical limits of this approach are also discussed.© 2016 Elsevier LtdWe propose a novel ESD protection device (GDNMOS: Gated Diode merged NMOS) fabricated with 28 nm UTBB FD-SOI high-k metal gate technology. By modifying the combination of the diode and transistor gate stacks, the robustness of the device is optimized, achieving a maximum breakdown voltage (VBR) of 4.9 V. In addition, modifications of the gate length modulate the trigger voltage (Vt1) with a minimum value of 3.5 V. Variable electrostatic doping (gate-induced) in diode and transistor body enables reconfigurable operation. A lower doping of the base enhances the bipolar gain, leading to thyristor behavior. This innovative architecture demonstrates excellent capability for high-voltage protection while maintaining a latch-up free behavior.© 2016 Elsevier LtdNovel AlGaN/GaN omega-shaped nanochannel FinFETs with fin width of 50 nm were successfully fabricated using TMAH lateral wet etching with ALD HfO2 sidewall spacer. This fin structure apparently exhibited the current spreading in the access region, which results in the suppression of the drain lag effect at high drain voltage and sharp switching performance with subthreshold swing of 57–65 mV/decade. Excellent on- and off-state state performances for the fabricated device prove that the omega-shaped gate structure not only exhibits excellent gate controllability, but also decouples the active nano-channel region from the underlying thick buffer. The proposed device is very promising candidate for high-performance device applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In our work, we developed a ferrofluid core differential transformer sensor, which can be used to measure tilt and acceleration. The proposed sensor consisted of three coils, from which the primary was excited with an alternating current. In the space surrounded by the coils was a cell half-filled with ferrofluid, therefore in the horizontal state of the sensor the fluid distributes equally in the three sections of the cell surrounded by the three coils. Nevertheless when the cell is being tilted or accelerated (in the direction of the axis of the coils), there is a different amount of ferrofluid in the three sections. The voltage induced in the secondary coils strongly depends on the amount of ferrofluid found in the core surrounded by them, so the tilt or the acceleration of the cell becomes measurable. We constructed the sensor in several layouts. The linearly coiled sensor had an excellent resolution. Another version with a toroidal cell had almost perfect linearity and a virtually infinite measuring range.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Iron clearance pathways after the injection of 57Fe3O4-based dextran-stabilized ferrofluid into the brain ventricles were studied by Mössbauer spectroscopy and histologically. The nanoparticles appeared in spleen tissues within 3 h after transcranial injection. We separated and independently estimated concentrations of iron encapsulated in nanoparticles and iron encapsulated in proteins in the all rat organs. It was found that the dextran coated initial nanoparticles of the ferrofluid disintegrated in the brain into separate superparamagnetic nanoparticles within a week after the injection.The nanoparticles completely exited from the brain in a few weeks. The exogenous iron appeared in the spleen in 3 h after the injection and remained in the spleen for more than month. The appearance of additional component in Mössbauer spectra of spleen samples revealed a fundamental difference in the mechanisms of processing of iron nanoparticles in this organ, which was also confirmed by histological examination.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We propose a theoretical model of magnetostriction hysteresis in soft magnetic gels filled by micronsized magnetizable particles. The hysteresis is explained by unification of the particles into linear chain-like aggregates while the field increasing and rupture of the chains when the field is decreased.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In-situ observations of particles deposition process on a ferromagnetic filter in high gradient magnetic separation were carried out under high magnetic fields to obtain information for the optimization of separation condition. The spike-like deposition structure was observed on the upper stream of the magnetic filter, different from the conventional deposition image obtained for paramagnetic particles. The length of the spike structure tends to be long with lower flow velocity and lower applied magnetic field. It was also observed that the chain structure or the bundle of such chaines were formed on the way to the filter under the condition of the low applied magnetic field and low flow rates. Results obtained here indicate that the effect of deposited particles on the spatial distribution of the magnetic field and the hydrodynamics, they are often ignored in the simulation so far, should be considered appropriately.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe effect of the p gate dose on the characteristics of the gate-source diode in SiC static induction transistors (SIT) was investigated. It was found that a dose of 1.5 × 1014 cm−2 yields a pn junction breakdown voltage higher than 60 V and good forward characteristics. A normally on SiC SIT was fabricated and demonstrated. A blocking voltage higher than 2.0 kV at a gate-source voltage of −50 V and on-resistance of 70 mΩ cm2 were obtained. Device simulations were performed to investigate the effect of the lateral spreading. By comparing the measured I-V curves with simulation results, the lateral spreading factor was estimated to be about 0.5. The lateral spreading detrimentally affected the electrical properties of the SIT made using implantations at energies higher than 1 MeV.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Mechanical punching of electrical steels causes a degradation of their magnetic characteristics which can extend several millimeters from the cut edge. So, in the field of industrial applications, particularly that of small electrical machines, the stator core made of rigid and thin teeth would be subject to more losses. Thus, this topic of the effect of punching has to be submitted to further deep characterization and development in order to give some insight into the different mechanisms. In this framework, this paper evaluates the combined effect of punching and frequency on the magnetization curve and iron losses in thin SiFe and CoFe soft magnetic sheets. These alloys are typically suitable for the manufacture of high-speed electrical machines used in on board applications (aircraft power generators, automotive, etc). Two SiFe alloys and a CoFe alloy have been investigated. First, different rectangular samples of variable width (15, 10, 5, 3 mm) have been industrially punched. Then, a dedicated magnetic characterization has been made, using basically a mini-Epstein frame. Measurements have been performed from 50 Hz to 1 kHz and from 0.3 T to near saturation. Both rolling and transverse directions have been considered. Finally, a first attempt to predict the degradation due to the punching is presented. A useful description of the magnetic permeability as a function of B and f is given and the degradation parameters are estimated based on the knowledge of the reference permeability.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We develop a perturbative formalism for computing magnetocrystalline anisotropy within density functional theory and the magnetic force theorem. Instead of computing eigenvalues of the spin–orbit Hamiltonian for selected spin polarizations, as in the conventional “force theorem” approach, we show that the effect can be cast into a redefined form of the spin–orbit operator. This allows to separate the large eigenvalue shift due to spin-orbit interaction common for both polarizations from the much smaller magnetic anisotropy splitting. As a consequence the anisotropy splitting may by considered as a perturbation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Earlier we proposed a new radiotherapy enhancement method that entails the administration of 57Fe iron-oxide nanoparticles into the cells [5]. Within this work we were prompt to investigate the capability of iron oxide nanoparticles with monolayer coating to penetrate into live cells. Magnetite particle samples were synthesized and stabilized with HCl or citric acid. The cells were incubated in the presence of nanoparticles for 1 h, washed and dried. To distinguish inside-cell particles from outside ones a set of experiments with low temperature incubation was carried out. Several cell samples were prepared in the presence of an external magnetic field in order to study the possibility of the nanoparticle uptake enhancement. To evaluate the amount of particles in each cell sample we used a SQUID-magnetometer. The nanoparticle suspension with HCl stabilization turned to be inadequate for intracellular introduction. Approximately 2·105 particles with citric acid covering conjugated with each cell after incubation at normal conditions. An application of an external magnetic field increased this amount up to 107 particles/cell. Most probably much of these particles penetrated into cells.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.High magnetic capture efficiency in the context of Biomagnetic Separation (BMS) using superparamagnetic particles (SMPs) requires efficient mixing and high relative velocities between cellular and other targets and SMPs. For this purpose, batch processes or microfluidic systems are commonly used. Here, we analyze the characteristics of an in-house developed batch process experimental setup, the Electromagnetic Sample Mixer (ESM) described earlier. This device uses three electromagnets to increase the relative velocity between SMPs and targets. We carry out simulations of the magnetic field in the ESM and in a simpler paradigmatic setup, and thus were able to calculate the force field acting on the SMPs and to simulate their relative velocities and fluid dynamics due to SMP movement. In this way we were able to show that alternate charging of the magnets induces a double circular stream of SMPs in the ESM, resulting in high relative velocities of SMPs to the targets. Consequently, due to the conservation of momentum, the fluid experiences an acceleration induced by the SMPs. We validated our simulations by microscopic observation of the SMPs in the magnetic field, using a homemade apparatus designed to accommodate a long working-distance lens. By comparing the results of modeling this paradigmatic setup with the experimental observations, we determined that the velocities of the SMPs corresponded to the results of our simulations.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Experimental results on the investigation of the influence of magnetic crystallographic anisotropy onto parameters of dynamic magnonic crystals arising at surface acoustic wave (SAW) propagation in yttrium iron garnet (YIG) films are presented. The main features of such an influence, as we have shown, are: 1) appearance of extra magnonic band gaps together with the normal magnonic band gap existing without anisotropy, 2) the absence of reflections of the incident surface magnetostatic wave at the frequency of these extra gaps, 3) the same depth for the extra gaps was achieved with a relatively small SAW power, almost by the order of magnitude less than in the case of normal magnonic gaps caused by SAW. A possible explanation of the features is given on the base of inelastic scattering of surface magnetostatic waves by SAW with the transformation of the reflected surface wave to the anisotropic direct volume magnetostatic wave existence of which is due to cubic crystallographic anisotropy in YIG. These results may be useful in designing new devices of information processing.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We use the coupled cluster method (CCM) to study the ground-state properties and lowest-lying triplet excited state of the spin-half XXZ antiferromagnet on the square lattice. The CCM is applied to it to high orders of approximation by using an efficient computer code that has been written by us and which has been implemented to run on massively parallelized computer platforms. We are able therefore to present precise data for the basic quantities of this model over a wide range of values for the anisotropy parameter Δ in the range −1≤Δ<∞ of interest, including both the easy-plane (−1<Δ<1) and easy-axis (Δ>1) regimes, where Δ→∞ represents the Ising limit. We present results for the ground-state energy, the sublattice magnetization, the zero-field transverse magnetic susceptibility, the spin stiffness, and the triplet spin gap. Our results provide a useful yardstick against which other approximate methods and/or experimental studies of relevant antiferromagnetic square-lattice compounds may now compare their own results. We also focus particular attention on the behaviour of these parameters for the easy-axis system in the vicinity of the isotropic Heisenberg point (Δ=1), where the model undergoes a phase transition from a gapped state (for Δ>1) to a gapless state (for Δ≤1), and compare our results there with those from spin-wave theory (SWT). Interestingly, the nature of the criticality at Δ=1 for the present model with spins of spin quantum number s=12 that is revealed by our CCM results seems to differ qualitatively from that predicted by SWT, which becomes exact only for its near-classical large-s counterpart.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Background Regarding strategies improving the efficacy of stem cell transplantation in adipose tissue engineering, cell tracking might be useful. Here we report the in vivo tracking of adipose tissue derived stem cells (ASC) by means of nanoparticle labeling and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Here we report the in vivo tracking of adipose tissue derived stromal cells (ASC) by means of nanoparticle labeling and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Materials and methods Human ASC were amplified and labeled with two types of magnetic nanoparticles (MNP), BNF starch and nanomag®-D-spio. Adipose tissue constructs were fabricated by seeding collagen scaffolds with labeled and unlabeled ASCs. Constructs were implanted subcutaneously in the back of severe combined immunodeficient (SCID) mice (n =69, group 1: control with cells w/o label, group 2: BNF starch labeled cells, group 3: nanomag®-D-spio labeled cells). MRI scans were performed at 24 hours, four, twelve and 28 days and four months in a 7.1 T animal device. Explanted constructs were analyzed histomorphometrically. Results MRI scans showed high contrast of the labeled cells in t2-tse-sequence compared to unlabeled controls. Loss of volume of the implants was observed over time due to partial loss for transplanted cells without significant difference (level of significance p<0.017). Compared to histomorphometry, there was found a positiv correlations in measurement of implant size with a significant at day four (correlation coefficient =0.643; p=0.024) and day twelve (correlation coefficient =0.687; p=0.010). Additional Prussian blue stain showed iron in all implants. Significant differences between the three groups (significance level p<0.017) were found after twelve days between control group and group 3 (p=0.008) and after 28 days between control group and group 2 and 3 (p=0.011). Conclusion Both MNPs might be suitable for tracking of ASC in vivo and show long term stability over 4 months.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This work reports the synthesis of MgxMn1−xFe2O4 (x=0–1) nanoparticles by both sol-gel and thermal decomposition methods. In order to determine the effect of synthesis conditions on the crystal structure and magnetic properties of the ferrites, the synthesis was carried out varying some parameters, including composition. By both methods it was possible to obtain ferrites having a single crystalline phase with cubic inverse spinel structure and a behavior near to that of superparamagnetic materials. Saturation magnetization values were higher for materials synthesized by sol-gel. Furthermore, in both cases particles have a spherical-like morphology and nanometric sizes (11–15 nm). Therefore, these materials can be used as thermoseeds for the treatment of cancer by magnetic hyperthermia.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Controlled magnetic granular materials with different concentrations of magnetite nanoparticles immersed in a non-conducting polymer matrix were synthesized and, their macroscopic magnetic observables analyzed in order to advance towards a better understanding of the magnetic dipolar interactions and its effects on the obtained magnetic parameters. First, by means of X-ray diffraction, transmission electron microscopy, small angle X-ray scattering and X-ray absorption fine structure an accurate study of the structural properties was carried out. Then, the magnetic properties were analyzed by means of different models, including those that consider the magnetic interactions through long-range dipolar forces as: the Interacting Superparamagnetic Model (ISP) and the Vogel-Fulcher law (V-F). In systems with larger nanoparticle concentrations, magnetic results clearly indicate that the role played by the dipolar interactions affects the magnetic properties, giving rise to obtaining magnetic and structural parameters without physical meaning. Magnetic parameters as the effective anisotropic constant, magnetic moment relaxation time and mean blocking temperature, extracted from the application of the ISP model and V-F Law, were used to simulate the zero-field-cooling (ZFC) and field-cooling curves (FC). A comparative analysis of the simulated, fitted and experimental ZFC/FC curves suggests that the current models depict indeed our dilute granular systems. Notwithstanding, for concentrated samples, the ISP model infers that clustered nanoparticles are being interpreted as single entities of larger magnetic moment and volume, effect that is apparently related to a collective and complex magnetic moment dynamics within the cluster.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.When high voltage direct current (HVDC) transmission adopting mono-polar ground return operation mode or unbalanced bipolar operation mode, the invasion of DC current into neutral point of alternating current (AC) transformer will cause core saturation, temperature increasing, and vibration acceleration. Based on the MPG-200D soft magnetic measurement system, the influence of DC bias on magnetic performance of 0.23 mm and 0.27 mm series (P1.7=0.70–1.05 W/kg, B8>1.89 T) grain-oriented (GO) silicon steels under condition of AC / DC hybrid excitation were systematically realized in this paper. For the high magnetic induction GO steels (core losses are the same), greater thickness can lead to stronger ability of resisting DC bias, and the reasons for it were analyzed. Finally, the magnetostriction and A-weighted magnetostriction velocity level of GO steel under DC biased magnetization were researched.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Crystal structure, magnetization, and specific heat were studied on single crystal of uranium intermetallic compound UOsAl. It is a hexagonal Laves phase of MgZn2 type, space group P63/mmc, with lattice parameters a=536.4 pm, c=845.3 pm. Shortest inter-uranium distance 313 pm (along the c-axis) is considerably smaller than the Hill limit (340 pm). The compound is a weakly temperature-dependent paramagnet with magnetic susceptibility of ≈1.5*10−8 m3 mol−1 (at T=2 K), which is slightly higher with magnetic field along the a-axis compared to the c-axis. The Sommerfeld coefficient of electronic specific heat has moderate value of γ=36 mJ mol−1 K−2.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The phase formation, crystal structure, crystallographic texture, microstructure and magnetic properties of Alnico-8 alloys with varying Co and Nb content have been investigated and presented. Alnico-8 alloys were fabricated by induction melting and casting techniques. Magnetic properties in the alloys were induced by optimized thermomagnetic treatment and subsequent aging. The 37.9Fe-32Co-14Ni-7.5Al-3.1Cu-5.5Ti alloy exhibits coercivity of 110 kA/m, remanence of 0.66 T and energy product of 31.2 kJ/m3. The addition of 35 wt% Co in conjunction with 1.5 wt% Nb to 37.9Fe-14Ni-7.5Al-3.1Cu-5.5Ti alloys led to increase the magnetic properties, especially coercivity. The enhancement of the coercivity is attributed to ideal shape anisotropy and optimum mass fraction of ferromagnetic Fe-Co rich particles, which are 25–30 nm in diameter and 300–350 nm in length. The 33.4Fe-35Co-14Ni-7.5Al-5.5Ti-3.1Cu-1.5 Nb alloy yields the optimum magnetic properties of coercivity of 141.4 kA/m, remanence of 0.83 T and energy product of 42.4 kJ/m3. The good magnetic properties in the studied alloys are attributed to the nanostructured microstructure comprising textured Fe-Co-Nb rich α1 phase and Al-Ni-Cu rich α2 phase.© 2016Thermoelectric power (Seebeck coefficient S) and dc conductivity of Li-Cu ferrite in chemical formula Li0.5-0.5xCuxFe2.5-.5xO4 (where x=0.0, 0.1, 0.3, 0.5, 0.7, 0.9 and1.0) were studied in a wide range of temperature from 300 up to 930 K. On the basis of the sign of Seebeck coefficient all the compositions of 0≤ x≤0.9 are n-type semiconductors except the sample of x=1.0 (CuFe2O4) is p-type at room temperature. It was noticed that the sample of x=1.0 converted to n-type at 350 K, but for the sample of x=0.9, it was expected to convert from n-type to p-type at 240 K. The Fermi energy at absolute zero EF (0) and the density of charge carriers (n) or (p) were determined. From the obtained results, the conduction mechanism of Li-Cu ferrite was discussed. Also, an energy band scheme was suggested.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ordered porous ZrO2 films with pore diameters in the 5–45 nm range have been prepared on porous anodic alumina substrates using DC-reactive magnetron sputtering of pure Zr targets. A saturation magnetization (MS) value as high as 119 emu/cm3 was obtained for the ZrO2 film with pores of 45 nm in diameter when the external field was perpendicular to the film surface. The significant out-of-plane saturation magnetization is associated with the porous structure of the film. Experimental and theoretical results showed that the origin of the room temperature ferromagnetism (RTFM) is closely related to the ordered porous structure and the single charged oxygen vacancies of the films. These findings suggest that porous ZrO2 films are promising to be applied to the spin electronic devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Permanent magnetic materials based on Ce(Fe, Co)12−xTix with the ThMn12 structure are promising candidates for replacing NdFeB magnets. Its intrinsic magnetic properties are not far below the values of Nd2Fe14B, and the high amount of Fe and the fact that Ce is much more abundant and less expensive than Nd encourages the reasonable interest in these compounds. Nanocrystalline magnetic material of the composition Ce1−xSmxFe11−yCoyTi (x=0−1 and y=0; 1.95) has been produced by both melt spinning and mechanical alloying. Alloys containing only Ce as rare earth element (x=0) show coercivities below 77 kA/m, while for x=1 Hc,J values up to 392 kA/m are reached. Coercivity shows rather an exponential than a linear dependence on the gradual substitution of Ce by Sm.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Fe powder was coated with NiZn ferrite by a co-precipitation method using chlorate as the raw material. Soft magnetic composites were manufactured via compaction and heat treatment of the coated powder. The coated powder and heat treated powder were analysed using scanning electron microscopy (SEM), energy dispersive spectroscopy (EDS), X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Raman spectroscopy. Their magnetic properties were determined using a Quantum Design-Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (QD-VSM). The composites were analysed with SEM and EDS. The permeability and magnetic loss of the composites were measured with a B-H curve analyzer. The results show that, using the co-precipitation method, the raw precipitate was successfully prepared and coated the pure Fe powder and turned into spinel NiZn ferrite treated at 600 ℃ for 1 h. After heat treatment at 500 ℃ under air, the insulation coating layer of soft magnetic composite (SMC) was not destroyed and containing Fe, Ni, Zn and oxygen. The permeabilities of the SMC are stable at edge of the 2–200 kHz frequency range and the total loss was lower.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Spinel ferrites with composition MgPryFe2−yO4 (y=0.0, 0.025, 0.05, 0.075, 0.10) were successfully synthesized using sol-gel auto-combustion technique. The structural prisoperties of a prepared sintered powder were characterized with the help of X-ray Diffraction (XRD) and then also by using Scanning electron microscopy (SEM). Electrical measurements demonstrate that resistivity and activation energy increases with the Praseodymium substitution while dc resistivity decreases with the rise of temperature showing the semiconductor nature of the synthesized ferrites. Remanence and the saturation magnetization (Ms) decrease while coercivity (Hc) also increases with the increase in praseodymium contents. Anisotropic constant is observed to exhibit similar behavior as HC. The above mentioned parameters suggest that the synthesized samples are favorable for microwave absorbing purposes.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report the structure and magnetic behavior of an amorphous Fe81Zr5Nb4B10 melt-spun alloy. The radial distribution function (RDF) afforded the resolution of the nearest-neighbor configuration on the basis of the atom-pair distance information, for which the positions of each peak indicated the atom-to-atom separation involved for short-range ordering. The first peaks of RDF were attributed to the distances of B-B, Fe-Fe and Zr-Nb atomic pairs, indicating a glassy structure equivalent to a distorted bcc-Fe cluster. From magnetic measurements, a magnetic moment of 0.65 Bohr magneton per Fe atom was established, together with a Curie temperature of 334 K and an initial ac permeability of 550 for frequencies as high as 250 kHz. In addition, the magnetocaloric effect, quantified from isothermal magnetization measurements through the magnetic entropy variation, reached a maximum of 2.0 J/kg K for a magnetic field change of 2.0 T.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.(Gadolinium) Gd-doped antiperovskite compounds Mn3Cu1−xGdxN were synthesized by the conventional solid-state reaction. With increasing Gd concentration, two magnetic transitions appeared at a high Curie temperature (TC1) corresponding to paramagnetic (PM)-ferromagnetic (FM) transition and a low temperature (TC2) ascribed to the FM-antiferromagnetic (AFM) transition. The magnetic relaxation results show the formation of a magnetic metastable state after the FM-AFM transition at low temperature (lower than TC2), forming a novel magnetic-step feature in the process from AFM to FM under a certain magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Process of magnetization and magnetoresistance have been studied in nanoisland bilayer systems of FeNi-Co. Hysteresis loops show characteristic features (steps) most clearly observed in certain orientations of the sample in a magnetic field. To explain these features the concept of flat magnetic exchange spring has been introduced for nanoisland bilayers. It has been proposed that additional magnetoresistance can be the result of spin-dependent scattering of electrons in the area of flat magnetic exchange spring. Magnetoresistance studies of bilayer systems has shown that additional magnetoresistance occurs at the same magnetic fields as steps on hysteresis loops.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The durability of the stored information in magnetic systems is one important feature in firmware applications such as security codes, magnetic keys and other similar products. In the present paper we discuss two different ways of preserving patterns in the set of magnetic wires trapped in the porous membranes used to produce them. One of the techniques is the inscription of an opposite magnetic band of about 1/3 the width of the stored pattern which minimizes the repulsive energy among the ferromagnetic cylinders still leaving a potent magnetic signal to be read. The other technique makes use of segmented nanowires which present a competition of repulsive energy of segments within the same layer while the interaction is attractive with the closer segments of the other layer; such a competition can lead to stabilization if the geometrical parameters are properly controlled. The first technique is cheaper and faster to implement, while the second technique needs a more complete fabrication process but can lead to more durable stored information.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic profile of the Si(100)/NiO(35 nm)/NiFe(10 nm)/Ta(1 nm) sample has been obtained by X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS) and the X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD). Two experimental procedures were used. In the procedure 1, the magnetic depth profile has been determines using samples deposited with different NiFe thicknesses, Si(100)/NiO(35 nm)/NiFe(t)/Ta(1 nm), t=1,3,5,7,10nm. In procedure 2, the sample (NiFe=10 nm), was thinned by several in situ sputtering cycles with Ar+ ions, followed by XAS and XMCD analysis. In both procedures, the calculated magnetic moments values tend to decrease close to interface with the NiO antiferromagnetic (AF) layer, however, this decreasement is more evidenced in the sputtered sample. There is no charge transfer between Ni and Fe in the inner part of the NiFe layer, a reduction of the morb/mspineff has been found at the NiFe/NiO interface. Procedure 1 emerged as the most indicated to analyse the interface region.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of little examined CoBr2•2H2O and new CoBr2•H2O and CoBr2•D2O are studied. Curie-Weiss fits, χM=C/(T-θ), yield θ of −9.9, 9.4 and 10.0 K, respectively, over a 30–80 K linear range for each. Higher temperature data are fit assuming two moderately separated low lying Kramers doublets, with exchange accounted for in a mean-field approximation. Susceptibility maxima appear at 9.5, 15.4 and 15.5 K, with χmax of 0.163, 0.375 and 0.435 emu/mol, respectively. Antiferromagnetic ordering is estimated to occur at 9.0, 13.7 and 13.8 K, in the same order. The ratio Tc/Tmax is 0.95, 0.89 and 0.89, respectively, suggesting little low dimensional magnetic character in singly hydrated systems. Data at lower temperatures for the dihydrate are fit with an antiferromagnetic 3D-Ising model. For singly hydrated systems the large size of χmax prevents this; weakened interchain antiferromagnetic interactions yield enhanced susceptibility maxima. Magnetization data exhibit field induced transitions near 13.5 kG for the dihydrate, and near 6.5 kG for singly hydrated systems with enhanced hysteresis. These transitions are interpreted as metamagnetic in nature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Iron oxides nanoparticles have been utilized in biological systems and biomedical applications for many years because they are relatively safe and stable comparing to other magnetic nanomaterials. In some applications, iron oxide nanoparticles were modified with silica in order to be more stable in biological systems and able to be functionalized with various functional groups. Moreover, poly(ethylene glycol) (PEG) was one on the most used polymer to graft onto the nanoparticles in order to increase their biocompatibility, dispersibility and stability in aqueous solutions. Therefore, the nanocomposites comprising iron oxide nanoparticles, silica, and PEG could become multifunctional carriers combining superparamagnetic character, multi-functionality and high stability in biological environments. Herein, we reported the preparation of the nanocomposites and effects of their sizes on cytotoxicity and inflammatory responses. The PEGylated silica-iron oxide nanocomposites were prepared by coating of poly(poly(ethylene glycol) monomethyl ether methacrylate) (PPEGMA) on magnetic nanoparticle-silica nanocomposites via Atom Transfer Radical Polymerization (ATRP). The iron oxide nanoparticles were synthesized using a thermal decomposition method. The silica shells were then coated on iron oxides nanoparticles using reverse microemulsion and sol-gel methods. The size series of the nanocomposites with the diameter of 24.86±4.38, 45.24±5.00, 98.10±8.88 and 202.22±6.70 nm as measured using TEM were obtained. Thermogravimetric analysis (TGA) was used for the determination of % weight of PPEGMA on the nanocomposites showing the weight loss of ranging from 65% for smallest particles to 30% for largest particles. The various sizes (20, 40, 100, 200 nm) and concentrations (10, 100, 1000 μg/mL) of the nanocomposites were tested for their cytotoxicity in fibroblast and macrophage cell lines using MTT assay. The different sizes did not affect cell viability of fibroblast, albeit incubation with the highest concentration of 1000 μg/mL. Although 1000 μg/mL of all sizes of the nanocomposites decreased macrophage viability, the cytotoxicity of the nanocomposites was notably less than silica. The inflammatory response of macrophage was also observed by ELISA, and we found that the size of 20 and 40 nm, but not 100 and 200 nm, obviously stimulated IL-6 production. From this study, the preparations of multifunctional superparamagnetic nanocomposites of different sizes along with the size-dependent effects on cellular toxicity and inflammatory response were demonstrated and could be applied for designing of new drug carriers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization measurements were performed on two sigma-phase samples of Fe100−xVx (x=35.5, 34.1) vs. temperature, T, and in DC magnetic field, of various amplitudes. Using three characteristic temperatures, magnetic phase diagrams in the H-T plane have been designed testifying to a re-entrant character of magnetism. The ground magnetic state, a spin glass (SG), was evidenced to be composed of two sub phases: one with a weak irreversibility and the other with a strong irreversibility. Two critical lines were reconstructed within the SG state. Both of them show a crossover from the Gabay-Toulouse behavior (low field) to a linear and/or quasi-Almeida-Touless behavior. A strong difference in the effect of the applied magnetic field on the SG phase in the two samples was revealed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties, texture and microstructure of cohenite grains from Morasko iron meteorite have been investigated using electron backscattered diffraction, Bitter pattern technique, magneto-optical imaging method and magnetic force microscopy. Cohenite shows much stronger magnetic contrast compared to kamacite because it is magnetically harder than the Fe-Ni alloy, and thus causes higher stray fields. A surprising result is the high stability and reversibility of the global stripe-like magnetic domain structure in cohenite when applying high magnetic fields up to 1.5 T, and exposing it to high temperatures above the Curie temperature of about 220 °C. Heating up to 700 °C under atmosphere conditions has shown that cohenite remains stable and that the global magnetic domain structures mainly recover to its preheating state. This observation suggests that magnetic domains are strongly controlled by the crystal anisotropy of cohenite. Branching magnetic domain structures at the grain boundary to kamacite can be annealed, which indicates that they are very sensitive to record deformation. EBSD observations clearly demonstrate that increasing deviation from the easy [010] crystallographic axis and stress localization are the main factors controlling the distortion of Bitter patterns, and suggest a high sensitivity of the cohenite magnetic domain structure to local microstructural heterogeneities. The results of this study substantiate the theory that cohenite can be a good recorder of magnetic fields in planetary core material.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic thermo-responsive hydrogels are a new class of materials that have recently attracted interest in biomedicine due to their ability to change phase upon magnetic stimulation. They have been used for drug release, magnetic hyperthermia treatment, and can potentially be engineered as stimuli-responsive substrates for cell mechanobiology. In this regard, we propose a series of magnetic thermo-responsive nanocomposite substrates that undergo cyclical swelling and de-swelling phases when actuated by an alternating magnetic field in aqueous environment. The synthetized substrates are obtained with a facile and reproducible method from poly-N-isopropylacrylamide and superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles. Their conformation and the temperature-related, magnetic, and biological behaviors were characterized via scanning electron microscopy, swelling ratio analysis, vibrating sample magnetometry, alternating magnetic field stimulation and indirect viability assays. The nanocomposites showed no cytotoxicity with fibroblast cells, and exhibited swelling/de-swelling behavior near physiological temperatures (around 34 °C). Therefore these magnetic thermo-responsive hydrogels are promising materials as stimuli-responsive substrates allowing the study of cell-behavior by changing the hydrogel properties in situ.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The DyxPr1−xNi4Fe (x=0.0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4) alloys were synthesized by arc-smelting and high energy ball milling method. The structure, morphology, particle size and electromagnetic parameters of the powder were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), laser diffraction-based particle size analyzer and vector network analyzer (VNA), respectively. The results reveal that the DyxPr1−xNi4Fe compounds are crystallized in PrNi4Fe structure. The minimum absorption peak frequency of DyxPr1−xNi4Fe shifts towards higher frequency region upon the Fe content. The minimum reflection loss of the DyxPr1−xNi4Fe alloys increases first and then decreases with increasing Dy substitution. The Dy0.3Pr0.7Ni4Fe alloy possess the best absorbing properties: the minimum reflection loss is −31.65 dB at 15.28 GHz with the best matching thickness d =1.0 mm and the reflection loss with the thickness ranging of 1.0–4.0 mm could reach −10 dB.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic particle imaging (MPI) is an emerging medical imaging modality based on the non-linear response of magnetic nanoparticles to an exciting magnetic field. MPI has been recognized as a fast imaging technique with high spatial resolution in the mm range. For some applications of MPI, especially in the field of functional imaging, the determination of the particle mobility (Brownian rotation) is of great interest, as it enables binding detection in MPI. It also enables quantitative imaging in the presence of Brownian-dominated particles, which is otherwise implausible. Discrimination of different particle responses in MPI is possible via the joint reconstruction approach. In this contribution, we propose a dual-frequency acquisition scheme to enhance sensitivity and contrast in the detection of different particle mobilities compared to a standard single-frequency MPI protocol. The method takes advantage of the fact, that the magnetization response of the tracer is strongly frequency-dependent, i.e. for low excitation frequencies a stronger Brownian contribution is observed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic-guided targeted drug delivery (TDD) systems can enhance the treatment of diverse diseases. Despite the potential and promising results of nanoparticles, aggregation prevents precise particle guidance in the vasculature. In this study, we developed a simulation platform to investigate aggregation during steering of nanoparticles using a magnetic field function. The magnetic field function (MFF) comprises a positive and negative pulsed magnetic field generated by electromagnetic coils, which prevents adherence of particles to the vessel wall during magnetic guidance. A commonly used Y-shaped vessel was simulated and the performance of the MFF analyzed; the experimental data were in agreement with the simulation results. Moreover, the effects of various parameters on magnetic guidance were evaluated and the most influential identified. The simulation results presented herein will facilitate more precise guidance of nanoparticles in vivo.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ferrite samples with general chemical formula Mn0.9Zn0.1Ni0.05Ti0.05GdtFe1.9−tO4; (0.0≤ t≤0.05; step 0.01) were prepared using solid state reaction technique and the effect of Gd3+ ions incorporation on its physical properties has been studied. From the obtained results, XRD analysis reveals that the samples have a cubic spinel single phase structure for 0.0≤ t≤0.02; while for t≥0.03 a small peak of secondary phase (Gd3Fe5O12) appears and becomes more noticeable with increasing Gd content. The lattice parameter (a) of the prepared samples was found to be initially increases and then decreases with increasing Gd content which may be attributed to the difference in the ionic radii of the cations involved and the solubility limit of Gd3+ ions. The crystallite size of the samples was estimated using Scherrer's equation and ranged from 96 nm to 107 nm. A vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) was used at room temperature in order to study the effect of Gd content on the magnetic hysteresis parameters of the prepared ferrites such as saturation magnetization and coercivity. DC molar magnetic susceptibility (χM) for the prepared samples was measured using Faraday's method as a function of temperature and the Curie temperature was calculated from the magnetic susceptibility measurements. Also the DC resistivity of the samples was measured at room temperature. The obtained results show that, the substitution by Gd3+ ions improves the electrical properties of the samples by increasing it DC electrical resistivity by 118% and consequently decreases it eddy current loss while the saturation magnetization slightly decreased by 14% only. The sample of t=0.01 shows a high dc magnetic susceptibility, high saturation magnetization (43.1 emu/g), high electric resistivity 12×103 Ω.m and high Curie temperature (496 K), which is useful in some technological applications such as transformer and inductor cores.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic force may greatly enhance uptake of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) by cultured cells; however, the effects of non-uniformity of magnetic field/ magnetic gradient on MNP internalization in culture has not been elucidated. Cellular uptake of polyacrylic acid coated-MNP by LN229 cells was measured with cylindrical NdFeB magnets arranged in a staggered pattern. The magnetic field generated by placing a magnet underneath (H-field) elicited a homogenous distribution of MNPs on the cells in culture; whereas the field without magnet underneath (L-field) resulted in MNP distribution along the edge of the wells. Cell-associated MNP (MNPcell) appeared to be magnetic field- and concentration-dependent. In H-field, MNPcell reached plateau within one hour of exposure to MNP with only one-min application of the magnetic force in the beginning of incubation; continuous presence of the magnet for 2 h did not further increase MNPcell, suggesting that magnetic force-induced uptake may be primarily contributed to enhanced MNP sedimentation. Although MNP distribution was much inhomogeneous in L-field, averaged MNPcell in the L-field may reach as high as 80% of that in H-field during 1–6 h incubation, suggesting high capacity of MNP internalization. In addition, no significant difference was observed in MNPcell analyzed by flow cytometry with the application of H-field of staggered plate vs. filled magnet plate. Therefore, biological variation may dominate MNP internalization even under relatively uniformed magnetic field; whereas non-uniformed magnetic field may serve as a model for tumor targeting with MNPs in vivo.© 2016A new spin-transfer torque (STT) magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) using an inverse magnetostriction (IMS) material for the free layer is proposed for low-voltage MRAMs. The MTJ is surrounded by a piezoelectric gate structure so that a pressure for introducing the IMS effect can efficiently be applied to the free layer without any high-yield-strength support structure. During STT-induced magnetization switching, the energy barrier height for the switching can be lowered by the IMS effect, and thus a critical current density (JC) for the magnetization switching can dramatically be reduced. Energy performance of a low-voltage STT-MRAM cell using the proposed MTJ and a FinFET is also demonstrated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Hollow magnetic nanospheres modified with Au nanoparticles were successfully synthesized. Au/SiO2 nanospheres fabricated by a radiochemical process were used as templates for ferrite templating. After the ferrite plating process, Au/SiO2 templates were fully coated with magnetite nanoparticles. Dissolution of the SiO2 core lead to the formation of hollow magnetic nanospheres with Au nanoparticles inside. The hollow magnetic nanospheres consisted of Fe3O4 grains, with an average diameter of 60 nm, connected to form the sphere wall, inside which Au grains with an average diameter of 7.2 nm were encapsulated. The Au nanoparticles immobilized on the SiO2 templates contributed to the adsorption of the Fe ion precursor and/or Fe3O4 seeds. These hollow magnetic nanospheres are proposed as a new type of nanocarrier, as the Au grains could specifically immobilize biomolecules inside the hollow sphere.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This study was aimed at development of biocompatible amino-functionalized magnetic nanoparticles as carriers of specific antibodies able to detect and/or target cancer cells. Poly-L-lysine (PLL)-modified magnetic nanoparticle samples with different PLL/Fe3O4content were prepared and tested to define the optimal PLL/Fe3O4weight ratio. The samples were characterized for particle size and morphology (SEM, TEM and DLS), and surface properties (zeta potential measurements). The optimal PLL/Fe3O4weight ratio of 1.0 based on both zeta potential and DLS measurements was in agreement with the UV/VIS measurements. Magnetic nanoparticles with the optimal PLL content were conjugated with antibody specific for the cancer biomarker carbonic anhydrase IX (CA IX), which is induced by hypoxia, a physiologic stress present in solid tumors and linked with aggressive tumor behavior. CA IX is localized on the cell surface with the antibody-binding epitope facing the extracellular space and is therefore suitable for antibody-based targeting of tumor cells. Here we showed that PLL/Fe3O4magnetic nanoparticles exhibit cytotoxic activities in a cell type-dependent manner and bind to cells expressing CA IX when conjugated with the CA IX-specific antibody. These data support further investigations of the CA IX antibody-conjugated, magnetic field-guided/activated nanoparticles as tools in anticancer strategies.© 2016Polycrystalline samples La0.8Ba0.1Ca0.1Mn1−xRuxO3 (x=0 and 0.075) were prepared by sol-gel-based Pechini method. The X ray diffraction study has shown that all the samples exhibit a single phase with rhombohedral structure (space group R3̅c, no. 167). The complex impedance has been investigated in the temperature range 160–320 K and in the frequency range 40 Hz–1 MHz. The imaginary part of the complex impedance (Z′′) frequency dependence revealed one relaxation peak. The Cole-Cole plots of the impedance values exhibited a semi –circular arc that can be described by an R1+(R2//ZCPE) electrical equivalent circuit. The conductance spectra have been investigated by the Jonscher universal power law: G(ω)=GDC+Aωn, where ω is the frequency of the ac field, and n is the exponent. The activation energy obtained both from the conductance and from time relaxation analyses are very similar, and hence the relaxation process may be attributed to the same type of charge carriers.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe introduction of strained channel is mandatory to achieve high performance in Ultra-Thin-Body and Buried-Oxide Fully-Depleted-Silicon-On-Insulator (UTBB FDSOI) technology. Especially, compressive SiGe channel has been demonstrated to enhance hole mobility and therefore pMOSFETs drive currents. At the same time, the performance gain induced by this mechanical stressor comes along with layouts effects. In this study, we characterize experimentally the impact of the active region dimensions and shape on the threshold voltage and linear drain current of SiGe channel pMOSFETs directly on insulator fabricated for the 14 nm technology node. The pMOS threshold voltage increases by 105 mV for a gate-to-STI distance of 80 nm compared to 980 nm while IODLIN decreases by 51%. An analytical model is proposed to reproduce the layout dependences. The model is based on the stress profile, taking into account both the stress from the SiGe channel and from SiGe source/drain. It reproduces the experimental data with a good accuracy in the cases of symmetric and asymmetric layouts, provided a typical relaxation length of 112 nm is used. Finally, a special attention is paid on multifinger transistors, since they are widely used in standard cells designs.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the effect of magnetic field and disorder on the electronic z-spin polarization at the ends of the one-dimensional wire with strong Rashba spin–orbit coupling deposited on an s-wave superconductor. It was shown that in the topologically nontrivial phase the polarization as well as the energy of the Majorana bound state oscillate as a function of the magnetic field. Despite being substantially nonzero in the low transversal and longitudinal fields the polarization at one of the wire's ends is significantly suppressed at a certain range of the magnitudes and angles of the canted magnetic field. Thus, in this case the polarization cannot be regarded as a local order parameter. However, the sum of the absolute values of the polarization at both ends remains significantly nonzero. It was demonstrated that Anderson disorder does not seriously affect observed properties but leads to the appearance of the additional areas with weak spin polarization at the high magnetic fields.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this article we analyze the electromagnetic properties of rare earth substituted Ni–Co and Ni–Co–Zn cubic ferrites in the microwave band, along with their performance as microwave absorbing materials. Ceramic samples with compositions Ni0.5Co0.5Fe2−xRxO4 and Ni0.25Co0.5Zn0.25Fe2−xRxO4 (R=Y and La, x=0, 0.02), fabricated with the solid state reaction method, were characterized with regard to the complex permeability μ*(f) and permittivity ε*(f) up to 20 GHz. The rare earth substitutions basically affect the microwave μ*(f) spectra and the dynamic magnetization mechanisms of domain wall motion and magnetization rotation. Key parameters for this effect are the reduced magnetocrystalline anisotropy and the created crystal inhomogeneities. Moreover, permittivity is increased with the Y and La content, due to the enhancement of the dielectric orientation polarization. Regarding the electromagnetic wave attenuation, the prepared ferrites exhibit narrowband return losses (RL) by virtue of the cancellation of multiple reflections, when their thickness equals an odd multiple of quarter-wavelength. Interestingly, the zero-reflection conditions are satisfied in the vicinity of the ferromagnetic resonance. As the rare earth doping shifts this mechanism to lower frequencies, loss peaks with RL>46 dB occur at 4.1 GHz and 5 GHz for Y and La-doped Ni–Co–Zn spinels, whereas peaks with RL>40 dB appear at 18 GHz and 19 GHz for Y and La-doped Ni–Co spinels, respectively. The presented experimental findings underline the potential of cubic ferrites with high Co concentration in the suppression of electromagnetic reflections well above the 1 GHz region.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThis work introduces a new protocol which aims to facilitate massive on-wafer characterization of Random Telegraph Noise (RTN) in MOS transistors. The methodology combines the noise spectral density scanning by gate bias assisted with a modified Weighted Time Lag Plot algorithm to identify unequivocally the single-trap RTN signals in optimum bias conditions for their electrical characterization. The strength of the method is demonstrated by its application for monitoring the distribution of traps over the transistors of a SOI wafer. The influence of the back-gate bias on the RTN characteristics of the SOI devices with coupled front- and back-interfaces has revealed unusual characteristics compatible with the carrier emission to the gate metal contact.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this work three different types of UNIBOND™ Silicon-on-Insulator (SOI) wafers including one standard HR-SOI and two types of trap-rich high resistivity HR-SOI substrates named enhanced signal integrity high resistivity silicon-on-insulator (eSI HR-SOI) provided by SOITEC are studied and compared. The DC and RF performances of these wafers are compared by means of passive and active devices such as coplanar waveguide (CPW) lines, crosstalk- and noise injection-structures as well as partially-depleted (PD) SOI MOSFETs. It is demonstrated that by employing enhanced signal integrity high resistivity silicon-on-insulator (eSI HR-SOI) compared to HR-SOI wafer, a reduction of 24 dB is measured on both generations of trap-rich HR-SOI for 2nd harmonics. Furthermore, it is shown that in eSI HR-SOI, digital substrate noise is effectively reduced compared with HR-SOI. Purely capacitive behavior of eSI HR-SOI is demonstrated by crosstalk structure. Reduction of self-heating effect in the trap-rich HR-SOI with thinner BOX is finally studied.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.It is noted that in most cases, mechanical impurities of technological liquides are ferroimpurities, possessing ferromagnetic properties; therefore for their control (as well as for the decision taking on the possible use of magnetophoresis devices for their removal) the preference should be given to magnetic methods. In the development of the existing options of magnetic control, used in metrology of ferroimpurities control (including ferrography), the main provisions of the relatively new, tested on a number of process liquids (including fuels and lubricants) poly-operational experimental calculation method is set out. Unlike already practiced experimental methods, it allows the implementation of more objective control. Operational data of magnetic control of ferroimpurities in motor oils, gasoline, diesel fuel and others are given. Based on the phenomenological approach (using the method of functional legalization of mass-operational charachteristics in semi-logarithmic coordinates) the expressions for calculating the operating masses (including the forecasted ones outside of the experiment), and, most importantly, for the calculation of the total mass for unlimited and limited number of operations are obtained. Along that expressions (with the relevant data) for determination of the error control during the limitation of the number of operations and inverse expression for the required number of operations subject to the margin of error are receieved. Based on the physical approach (assuming concepts of absorption screen of exponential type) the design formulas correlated with the phenomenological ones for calculating operating mass and the total mass of ferroimpurities (including the residual) in the analyzed sample probe are obtained. The physical meaning of the number of parameters, which were previously considered exclusively empirical, is figured out.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Investigations of structural and magnetic properties of polycrystalline hole doped double perovskite La1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6 has clearly revealed the existence of structural antisite-disorder (either, Co–O–Co or Mn–O–Mn) in the system. The ordering of Co2+ and Mn4+ gives rise to a ferromagnetic transition around 157 K. A spin-canted antiferromagnetic transition is found in this material at TCAFM ~9 K. The effect of antisite-disorder in the double perovskite structure is most likely the prime reason for antiferromagnetic interaction. The temperature dependent inverse susceptibility exhibits Curie-Weiss like behaviour and it yields an effective paramagnetic moment of 6.49 μB. At very low temperature (T<TCAFM), it shows a strong hysteresis loop shift with large exchange bias (EB) field of HEB ~5.5 kOe and can be tuned by the cooling field. The presence of zero-field cooled spontaneous EB effect (P-type and N-type) is confirmed to be not an experimental artefact - an inherent property of this double perovskite material. A phenomenological model has been proposed to explain the exchange coupling between the ferromagnetic and canted-antiferromagnetic interfaces of antisite-disordered La1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6 mainly on the basis of uncompensated interface spins.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) can be used as carriers for magnetic drug targeting and for stem cell tracking by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). For these applications, it is crucial to quantitatively determine the spatial distribution of the MNP concentration, which can be approached by MRI relaxometry. Theoretical considerations and experiments have shown that R2 relaxation rates are sensitive to the aggregation state of the particles, whereas R2* is independent of aggregation state and therefore suited for MNP quantification if the condition of static dephasing is met. We present a new experimental approach to characterize an MNP system with respect to quantitative MRI based on hydrodynamic fractionation. The first results qualitatively confirm the outer sphere relaxation theory for small MNPs and show that the two commercial MRI contrast agents Resovist® and Endorem® should not be used for quantitative MRI because they do not fulfill the condition for static dephasing. Our approach could facilitate the choice of MNPs for quantitative MRI and help clarifying the relationship between size, magnetism and relaxivity of MNPs in the future.© 2016 Elsevier LtdWe present a computationally efficient framework to compute the neutral flux in high aspect ratio structures during three-dimensional plasma etching simulations. The framework is based on a one-dimensional radiosity approach and is applicable to simulations of convex rotationally symmetric holes and convex symmetric trenches with a constant cross-section. The framework is intended to replace the full three-dimensional simulation step required to calculate the neutral flux during plasma etching simulations. Especially for high aspect ratio structures, the computational effort, required to perform the full three-dimensional simulation of the neutral flux at the desired spatial resolution, conflicts with practical simulation time constraints. Our results are in agreement with those obtained by three-dimensional Monte Carlo based ray tracing simulations for various aspect ratios and convex geometries. With this framework we present a comprehensive analysis of the influence of the geometrical properties of high aspect ratio structures as well as of the particle sticking probability on the neutral particle flux.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.SQUID-based magnetoencephalography device was used for the measurement of a magnetic noise generated by ferrofluid in the stationary standing vial. It was found that a free surface of the ferrofluid generates spontaneous magnetic field sufficient to detect the presence of nanoparticles in the experimental setup. The spatial distribution of elementary magnetic sources was reconstructed by the frequency-pattern analysis of multichannel time series. The localization of ferrofluids was performed based on the analysis of quasirandom time series in two cases of oscillation source. One of them was infrasound from outer noise, and another one was the human heartbeat. These results are prospective for 3D imaging of magnetic particles without pre-magnetization.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe most extensive research of scaled electronic devices involves the inclusion of quantum effects in the transport direction as transistor dimensions approach nanometer scales. Moreover, it is necessary to study how these mechanisms affect different transistor architectures to determine which one can be the best candidate to implement future nodes. This work implements Source-to-Drain Tunneling mechanism (S/D tunneling) in a Multi-Subband Ensemble Monte Carlo (MS-EMC) simulator showing the modification in the distribution of the electrons in the subbands, and, consequently, in the potential profile due to different confinement direction between DGSOIs and FinFETs.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Static shapes of a magnetic fluid axisymmetric volume on a horizontal plane in the magnetic field of a vertical line conductor are studied theoretically in case of non-wetting while the current is slowly changing in a quasi-static manner. The possibility of the fluid shape hysteresis for a cyclic increase and decrease of the current and of spasmodic changes at certain values of the current is investigated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Bubble deformation in magnetic fluids under magnetic field is investigated numerically by an interface capturing method. The numerical method consists of a coupled level-set and VOF (Volume of Fluid) method, combined with conservation CIP (Constrained Interpolation Profile) method with the self-correcting procedure. In the present study considering actual physical properties of magnetic fluid, bubble deformation under given uniform magnetic field is analyzed for internal magnetic field passing through a magnetic gaseous and liquid phase interface. The numerical results explain the mechanism of bubble deformation under presence of given magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier LtdSemiconductor on Insulator (SOI) technology offers an assortment of opportunities for chip manufacturers in the Power Management market. Recent advances in the automotive and industrial markets, along with emerging features, the increasing use of sensors, and the ever-expanding “Internet of Things” (IoT) are providing for continued growth in these markets while also driving more complex solutions. The potential benefits of SOI include the ability to place both high-voltage and low-voltage devices on a single chip, saving space and cost, simplifying designs and models, and improving performance, thereby cutting development costs and improving time to market. SOI also offers novel new approaches to long-standing technologies.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Targeted drug delivery using magnetic nanoparticles is an efficient technique as molecules can be directed toward specific tissues inside a human body. For the first time, we implemented a real-time imaging-based guidance system of nanoparticles using untethered electro-magnetic devices for simultaneous guiding and tracking. In this paper a low-amplitude-excitation-field magnetic particle imaging (MPI) is introduced. Based on this imaging technology, a hybrid system comprised of an electromagnetic actuator and MPI was used to navigate nanoparticles in a non-invasive way. The real-time low-amplitude-excitation-field MPI and electromagnetic actuator of this navigation system are achieved by applying a time-division multiplexing scheme to the coil topology. A one dimensional nanoparticle navigation system was built to demonstrate the feasibility of the proposed approach and it could achieve a 2 Hz navigation update rate with the field gradient of 3.5 T/m during the imaging mode and 8.75 T/m during the actuation mode. Particles with both 90 nm and 5 nm diameters could be successfully manipulated and monitored in a tube through the proposed system, which can significantly enhance targeting efficiency and allow precise analysis in a real drug delivery.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The effect of smaller and heavy rare-earth cation Gd3+(rGd3+=1.107 Å and SGd3+=7/2) on the magnetic and structural properties of Nd0.55Sr0.45MnO3 has been investigated. The orthorhombic structure (space group, Pnma) evolves from orbital distorted-O” type symmetry (c&gt;a) for x=0 to orbital ordered-O’ type (a>c) for x≥0.1. Diffraction data shows the crucial role of the shear strains involved in the structure. The magnetization measurement shows two magnetic transitions occurring in compounds x≥0.1. Spectacular feature was observed in the heavily Gd-doped sample (x=0.5) such as: the continuous increase of M with high magnetic field, the low value of saturation magnetization at low temperature, the metamagnetic transition, and the presence of exchange bias. These findings are interpreted as the fingerprints of the phase separation. Our result indicates that the martensitic accommodation strain, in addition to quenched disorders, may be an alternative approach to understand the physical phase separation. The interesting feature for x=0.5 sample is the negative magnetization observed at low field. Result is interpreted in terms of two interacting networks, with negative exchange interaction between the (Gd+Nd) and the ferromagnetic Mn lattices. The disappearance of the negative magnetization for magnetic field well below the coercive field (~0.047 T) suggest that the magnetic properties of x=0.5 behaves as an inhomogeneous ferrimagnet at low field.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this work, a comparison between 1T-1R RRAM arrays, manufactured either with amorphous or poly-crystalline Metal–Insulator–Metal cells, is reported in terms of performance, reliability, Set/Reset operations energy requirements, intra-cell and inter-cell variability during 10k endurance cycles and 100k read disturb cycles. The modeling of the 1T-1R RRAM array cells has been performed with two different approaches: (i) a physical model like the Quantum Point Contact (QPC) model was used to find the relationship between the reliability properties observed during the endurance and the read disturb tests with the conductive filament properties; (ii) a compact model to be exploited in circuit simulations tools which models the I–V characteristics of each memory cells technology.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Lead free magnetoelectric composites that comprise Co0.6Zn0.4Fe1.7Mn0.3O4 (CZFMO) and Bi1/2Na1/2TiO3 (BNT) were synthesized using sol-gel method and it's structural, dielectric, magnetic, ferroelectric and magnetoelectric (ME) properties were studied. The X-ray diffraction displayed the single phase formation of parent phases and the presence of two phases in the composites. The temperature dependent dielectric spectra of samples indicates two anomalies at ~220 °C and ~320 °C were ascribed to ferroelectric to antiferroelectric, and anti-ferroelectric to paraelectric phase transitions respectively. Room temperature (RT) magnetic measurements show that composites are soft magnetic. The composite with x=0.2, showed the large value of ME voltage coefficient (αE)~58 mV/cmOe. Moreover, these ME composites provide a great opportunity as potential lead free systems for multifunctional devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present effective conjugation of four small molecules (glutathione, cysteine, lysine, and Tris(hydroxymethyl)aminomethane) onto dopamine-coated iron oxide nanoparticles. Conjugation of these molecules could improve the surface functionality of nanoparticles for more neutral surface charge at physiological pH and potentially reduce non-specific adsorption of proteins to nanoparticles surfaces. The success of conjugation was evaluated with dynamic light scattering by measuring the surface charge changes and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy for surface chemistry analysis. The stability of dopamine-coated nanoparticles and the ability of conjugated nanoparticles to reduce the formation of protein corona were evaluated by measuring the size and charge of the nanoparticles in biological medium. This facile conjugation method opens up possibilities for attaching various surface functionalities onto iron oxide nanoparticle surfaces for biomedical applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanotechnology on magnetism and magnetic materials has been developed and studied extensively for the recent decades. Magnetic nanoparticles were applied in magnetic targeting, magnetic drug carriers, and diagnostic materials. In this work, the development of magnetic nanocomposites and their applications as drug carriers for dentistry were investigated. Well-defined ferromagnetic magnetite nanocubes (FMNCs) with the diameter of around 60 nm were synthesized using a thermal decomposition method at 290 °C with iron-oleate complexes as starting materials resulting in nanostructure with high saturation magnetization. The FMNCs were then coated with poly(2-(dimethyl amino)ethyl methacrylate) (PDMAEMA), a water-soluble, biodegradable, and pH-responsive polymer, in order to become good drug carriers with excellent dispersity in biological buffer, low cytotoxicity, and controllable drug release. The polymer coating was performed using atom transfer radical polymerization (ATRP). By using 3-(4,5-dimethylthiazol-2-yl)-2,5-diphenyltetrazolium bromide (MTT) assay, FMNCs/PDMAEMA showed the high compatibility in fibroblast and macrophage cell line with the cell viability of more than 80% after incubation with the highest nanocomposites concentration of 100 μg/mL for 24 h. Furthermore, the FMNCs/PDMAEMA subsequently demonstrated the anti-inflammatory effect on macrophages by suppression of pro-inflammatory cytokines, IL-6 and TNF-α production in a dose-dependent manner. The behavior of model drug alkaline hyperchlorite released from the FMNCs/PDMAEMA indicated that the drug release could be controlled by altering pH of the environment. As a result of successfully synthesized FMCNs/PDMAEMA, dentine infiltration of FMNCs/PDMAEMA was performed. It was observed that FMNCs/PDMAEMA could significantly infiltrate the dentine within 30 min under an external magnetic field. Our findings indicated the therapeutic potential of the FMNCs/PDMAEMA as transdentinal drug carriers with its high biocompatibility and anti-inflammatory property.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Sr1-xLaxFe12-xZnxO19 (x=0–0.3) hexaferrites with Bi2O3 additive were prepared by microwave sintering method at low sintering temperatures, and their crystal structure, microstructure, magnetic, electrical, and dielectric properties were studied. The results show that the pure M-type phase is obtained for the ferrites with x≤0.2. With x further increasing to 0.3, the multiphase structure is inevitably formed, where the LaFeO3 phase coexists with the M-type phase. In the single phase region, the varied magnetic, electrical, and dielectric properties with La3+-Zn2+ doping amount are well explained by the occupancy effects of La3+ and Zn2+ in magnetoplumbite structure. It is suggested that the Zn2+ ions replace the Fe3+ ions at 4f1 site with x≤0.15, but the substitution of Zn2+ for Fe3+ occurs at 2b site preferentially when the La3+-Zn2+ doping amount exceeds 0.15.© 2016 Elsevier Ltd3D Finite Element (FE) Monte Carlo (MC) simulation toolbox incorporating 2D Schrödinger equation quantum corrections is employed to simulate ID-VG characteristics of a 22 nm gate length gate-all-around (GAA) Si nanowire (NW) FET demonstrating an excellent agreement against experimental data at both low and high drain biases. We then scale the Si GAA NW according to the ITRS specifications to a gate length of 10 nm predicting that the NW FET will deliver the required on-current of above 1 mA/μm and a superior electrostatic integrity with a nearly ideal sub-threshold slope of 68 mV/dec and a DIBL of 39 mV/V. In addition, we use a calibrated 3D FE quantum corrected drift-diffusion (DD) toolbox to investigate the effects of NW line-edge roughness (LER) induced variability on the sub-threshold characteristics (threshold voltage (VT), OFF-current (IOFF), sub-threshold slope (SS) and drain-induced-barrier-lowering (DIBL)) for the 22 nm and 10 nm gate length GAA NW FETs at low and high drain biases. We simulate variability with two LER correlation lengths (CL = 20 nm and 10 nm) and three root mean square values (RMS = 0.6,0.7 and 0.85 nm).© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Structure characterization of magnetic fluids (MFs) synthesized by three different methods in aqueous solutions of agarose was done by means of small-angle neutron (SANS) and synchrotron X-ray scattering (SAXS). The differences in the complex aggregation observed in the studied magnetic fluids were related to different stabilizing procedures of the three kinds of MFs. The results of the analysis of the scattering (mean size of single polydisperse magnetic particles, fractal dimensions of the aggregates) are consistent with the data of transmission electron microscopy (TEM).© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic moment of magnetically labeled cells, microbubbles or microspheres is an important optimization parameter for many targeting, delivery or separation applications. The quantification of this property is often difficult, since it depends not only on the type of incorporated nanoparticle, but also on the intake capabilities, surface properties and internal distribution. We describe a method to determine the magnetic moment of those carriers using a microscopic set-up and an image processing algorithm. In contrast to other works, we measure the diversion of superparamagnetic nanoparticles in a static fluid. The set-up is optimized to achieve a homogeneous movement of the magnetic carriers inside the magnetic field. The evaluation is automated with a customized algorithm, utilizing a set of basic algorithms, including blob recognition, feature-based shape recognition and a graph algorithm. We present example measurements for the characteristic properties of different types of carriers in combination with different types of nanoparticles. Those properties include velocity in the magnetic field as well as the magnetic moment. The investigated carriers are adherent and suspension cells, while the used nanoparticles have different sizes and coatings to obtain varying behavior of the carriers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Recently, a new type of exchange bias (EB) after zero-field cooling has attracted considerable interest mainly in bulk magnetic competing systems. Here, we use a detailed magnetotransport investigation to probe the ground state and zero-field cooled EB (ZEB) in Mn50Ni41Sn9 ribbon. Both ZEB and field cooled EB were detected in magnetoresistance results consistent with magnetic measurement. A pure spin-glass ground state is proposed based on parabolic shape of low-field magnetoresistance combined with AC magnetization, memory effect. The appearance of ZEB is attributed to the field-induced nucleation and growth of ferromagnetic domains in the spin glass matrix forming unidirectional anisotropy at the interface.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The development of protein corona around nanoparticles upon administration to the human body is responsible in a large part for their biodistribution, cell-internalization and toxicity or biocompatibility. We studied the influence of the chemical composition of polyelectrolyte shells (citric acid (CA) and poly(acrylic-co-maleic acid) (PAM)) of core-shell magnetite nanoparticles (MNPs) on the evolution of protein corona in human plasma (HP). The aggregation state and zeta potential of the particles were measured in the range of HP concentration between 1 and 80 (v/v)% 3 min and 20 h after dispersing the particles in HP diluted with Tris buffered saline. Naked MNPs aggregated in HP solution, but the carboxylated MNPs became stabilized colloidally at higher plasma concentrations. Significant differences were observed at low plasma concentration. CA@MNPs aggregated instantly while the hydrodynamic diameter of PAM@MNP increased only slightly at 1–3 v/v % HP concentrations. The observed differences in protein corona formation can be explained by the differences in the steric effects of the polycarboxylate shells. It is interesting that relatively small but systematic changes in zeta potential alter the aggregation state significantly.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization curves of an YFe3 single crystal were measured along the basal plane and the c-axis within the temperature range of 2–600 K. Their analysis provided temperature dependencies of the parameter p=(Mep−Mha)/Mep characterizing saturation magnetization anisotropy and magnetocrystalline anisotropy constants K1 and K2. The latter was obtained using the modified Sucksmith-Thompson method and the numeric technique of approximation which takes into account slight misorientation between applied magnetic field and the hard magnetization axis allowing to describe magnetization curves accurately.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We use functionalized iron oxide magnetic multi-core particles of 100 nm in size (hydrodynamic particle diameter) and AC susceptometry (ACS) methods to measure the binding reactions between the magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) and bio-analyte products produced from DNA segments using the rolling circle amplification (RCA) method. We use sensitive induction detection techniques in order to measure the ACS response. The DNA is amplified via RCA to generate RCA coils with a specific size that is dependent on the amplification time. After about 75 min of amplification we obtain an average RCA coil diameter of about 1 µm. We determine a theoretical limit of detection (LOD) in the range of 11 attomole (corresponding to an analyte concentration of 55 fM for a sample volume of 200 µL) from the ACS dynamic response after the MNPs have bound to the RCA coils and the measured ACS readout noise. We also discuss further possible improvements of the LOD.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe transfer characteristic at room temperature of FinFETs processed for sub-10 nm technologies could always be explained by solving Poisson equation throughout the channel – dielectric interface. Various methods for the MOSFET parameters estimation are proposed in the literature. In this paper, the electrical parameters extraction technique based on the Y-function methodology is reminded. Low frequency noise is presented considering three major noise sources: 1/f noise associated to carrier trapping-detrapping in the gate oxide, channel carrier mobility fluctuations and generation-recombination noise related to traps located in the depletion zone of the device. Theory and methodology in order to identify the 1/f noise mechanism and to have information of the process induced traps in the silicon film using the noise spectroscopy technique are revisited.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The performance of an infinitely segmented magnetohydrodynamic generator is analyzed using the second law of thermodynamics entropy generation criterion. The exact analytical solution of the velocity and temperature fields are provided by applying the modified Hartmann flow model, taking into account the occurrence of the Hall effect in the considered generator. Contributions of heat transfer, fluid friction, and ohmic dissipation to the destruction of useful available work are found, and the nature of irreversibilities in the considered generator is determined. In addition, the electrical isotropic efficiency scheme is used to evaluate the generator performance. Finally, the implication of the Hall parameter, Hartmann number, and load factor for the entropy generation and the generator performance are studied and the optimal operating conditions are determined. The results show that the heat transfer has the smallest contribution to the entropy generation compared to that of the friction and ohmic dissipation. The application of the Hall effect on the system showed an appreciable augmentation of entropy generation rate which is along with what the logic implies. A parametric study is conducted and its results provide the generated entropy and also efficiency diagrams which show the influence of the Hall effect on the considered generator.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Recombinant tissue plasminogen activator (rtPA) was encapsulated in thermosensitive magnetic liposome (TML) prepared from 1,2-dipalmitoyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine, distearolyphosphatidyl ethanolamine-N-poly(ethylene glycol) 2000, cholesterol and Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles by solvent evaporation/sonication and freeze-thaw cycles method. Response surface methodology was proved to be a powerful tool to predict the drug encapsulation efficiency and temperature-sensitive drug release. Validation experiments verified the accuracy of the model that provides a simple and effective method for fabricating TML with controllable encapsulation efficiency and predictable temperature-sensitive drug release behavior. The prepared samples were characterized for physico-chemical properties by dynamic light scattering, transmission electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction and differential scanning calorimetry. Temperature-sensitive release of rtPA could be confirmed from in vitro thrombolysis experiments. A thrombolytic drug delivery system using TML could be proposed for magnetic targeted delivery of rtPA to the site of thrombus followed by temperature-triggered controlled drug release in an alternating magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Adsorption of nanoparticles from magnetic fluids (MFs) on solid surface (crystalline silicon) was studied by neutron reflectometry (NR) and related to the bulk structural organization of MFs concluded from small-angle neutron scattering (SANS). The initial aqueous MF with nanomagnetite (co-precipitation reaction) stabilized by sodium oleate and MF modified by a biocompatible polymer, poly(ethylene glycol) (PEG), were considered. Regarding the bulk structure it was confirmed in the SANS experiment that comparatively small and compact (size~30 nm) aggregates of nanoparticle in the initial sample transfer to large and developed (size>130 nm, fractal dimension 2.7) associates in the PEG modified MF. This reorganization in the aggregates correlates with the changes in the neutron reflectivity that showed that a single adsorption layer of individual nanoparticles on the oxidized silicon surface for the initial MF disappears after the PEG modification. It is concluded that all particles in the modified fluid are in the aggregates that are not adsorbed by silicon.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the Mg1−xZnxFe2O4 nanoparticles (x=0–0.9) were prepared by sol-gel method. These ferrites exhibit an inverse spinel structure and the lattice parameter increases as the substitution of Zn2+ ions is increased. At lower Zn content (0.1≤x≤0.5), saturation magnetization (Ms) increases, while it decreases at higher Zn content (x≥6). The remnant magnetization (0.17–2.0 emu/g) and coercive field (6.0–60 Oe) indicate a ferrimagnetic behavior. The average core diameter of selected ferrites is around 15 nm and the nanoparticles morphology is quasi spherical. The heating ability of some Mg0.9Zn0.1Fe2O4 and Mg0.7Zn0.3Fe2O4 aqueous suspensions indicates that the magnetic nanoparticles can increase the medium temperature up to 42 °C in a time less than 10 min© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The existence of more than two stable equilibrium shapes (multi-stability) of a thin body with magnetizable elastomer in some non-uniform magnetic fields is found theoretically. The method of the creation of such non-uniform magnetic fields (using electromagnetic coils) is proposed. The criterion of an unstable body equilibrium is obtained.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We compare different models for the description of the complex susceptibility of magnetic nanoparticles in an aqueous gelatin solution representing a model system for a Voigt-Kelvin scheme. The analysis of susceptibility spectra with the numerical model by Raikher et al. [7] is compared with the analysis applying a phenomenological, modified Debye model. The fit of the models to the measured data allows one to extract the viscoelastic parameter dynamic viscosity η and shear modulus G. The experimental data were recorded on single-core thermally blocked CoFe2O4 nanoparticles in an aqueous solution with 2.5 wt% gelatin. Whereas the dynamic viscosities obtained by fitting the model – extended by distributions of hydrodynamic diameters and viscosities – agree very well, the derived values for the shear modulus show the same temporal behavior during the gelation process, but vary approximately by a factor of two. To verify the values for viscosity and shear modulus obtained from nanorheology, macrorheological measurements are in progress.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The goal of this study was to assess the biosorption of Amido black 10B dye from aqueous solutions on magnetically modified sheaths of Leptothrix sp. in a batch system. The magnetic modification of the sheaths was performed using both microwave synthesized iron oxide nano- and microparticles and perchloric acid stabilized ferrofluid. The native and both magnetically modified sheaths were characterized by SEM. Various parameters significantly affecting the adsorption process, such as pH, contact time, temperature and initial concentration, were studied in detail using the adsorbent magnetized by both methods. The highest adsorption efficiency was achieved at pH 2. The maximum adsorption capacities of both types of magnetized material at room temperature were found to be 339.2 and 286.1 mg of dye per 1 g of ferrofluid modified and microwave synthesized particles modified adsorbent, respectively. Thermodynamic study of dye adsorption revealed a spontaneous and endothermic process in the temperature range between 279.15 and 313.15 K. The data were fitted to various equilibrium and kinetic models. Experimental data matched well with the pseudo-second-order kinetics and Freundlich isotherm model. The Leptothrix sheaths have excellent efficacy for dye adsorption. This material can be used as an effective, low-cost adsorbent.© 2016 Elsevier LtdConventional silicon MOSFETs are used for THz detectors in order to facilitate fabrication of cost-efficient circuits with high integration density. Resistive mixers based on NMOSFETs are investigated by drift-diffusion simulations, which include the time derivative of the current densities usually neglected in TCAD codes. Different time-integration schemes are investigated for transient simulations and the modified backward differentiation formula is found to be the most CPU-efficient method for the periodic steady-state. By comparison with the Boltzmann transport equation it is shown that the drift-diffusion model can capture the salient aspects of transport in the THz range. The features of the device simulator are demonstrated by investigation of the current and voltage responsivity together with the noise-equivalent-power for a resistive mixer based on a quarter-micron NMOSFET.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Protein transformation from its soluble state into amyloid aggregates is associated with amyloid-related diseases. Amyloid deposits of insulin fibrils have been found in the sites of subcutaneous insulin application in patients with prolonged diabetes. Using atomic force microscopy and ThT fluorescence assay we have investigated the interference of insulin amyloid aggregation with superparamagnetic Fe3O4-based nanoparticles (SPIONs) coated with dextran (DEX); molecular mass of dextran was equal to 15–20, 40 or 70 kDa. The obtained data indicate that all three types of dextran coated nanoparticles (NP-FeDEXs) are able to inhibit insulin fibrillization and to destroy amyloid fibrils. The extent of anti-amyloid activities depends on the properties of NP-FeDEXs, mainly on the size of nanoparticles which is determined by molecular mass of dextran molecules. The most effective inhibiting activity was observed for the smallest nanoparticles coated with 15–20 kDa dextran. Contrary, the highest destroying activity was observed for the largest NP-FeDEX (70 kDa dextran).© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A simple, one-pot process for the preparation of magnetically responsive yeast-based biocatalysts was developed. Saccharomyces cerevisiae, Candida utilis and Kluyveromyces lactis cells were successfully incorporated into chitosan gel magnetically modified with poly(methacrylic acid)-stabilized magnetic fluid (PMAA-FF) during its formation. Magnetic PMAA-FF/chitosan/yeast composites were efficiently employed for invert sugar production. The dependence of invertase activity on used yeast, amount of magnetic biocatalyst, agitation time and after reuse was studied in detail. The tested magnetic biocatalysts retained at least 69% of their initial activity after 8 reuse cycles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetism and microfluidics are two key elements for the development of inexpensive and reliable tools dedicated to high-throughput biological analysis and providing a large panel of applications in domains ranging from fundamental biology to medical diagnostics. In this work, we introduce a simple protocol, relying on injection molding and reversible bonding for fabrication of magnetic cell trapping and sorting devices using only standard soft-lithography equipment. Magnetic strips or grids made of Polydimethylsiloxane (PDMS) doped with hard (NdFeB) or soft (carbonyl iron) magnetic powders were integrated at the bottom of whole PDMS chips. Preliminary results show the effective deviation/trapping of magnetic beads or magnetically-labeled bacteria as the sample flows through the microchannel, proving the potential of this rapid prototyping approach for easy fabrication of magnetic cell sorters.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThis paper systematically studies GeSn n-FETs, from individual process modules to a complete device. High-k gate stacks and NiGeSn metallic contacts for source and drain are characterized in independent experiments. To study both direct and indirect bandgap semiconductors, a range of 0–14.5 at.% Sn-content GeSn alloys are investigated. Special emphasis is placed on capacitance-voltage (C-V) characteristics and Schottky-barrier optimization. GeSn n-FET devices are presented including temperature dependent I-V characteristics. Finally, as an important step towards implementing GeSn in tunnel-FETs, negative differential resistance in Ge0.87Sn0.13 tunnel-diodes is demonstrated at cryogenic temperatures. The present work provides a base for further optimization of GeSn FETs and novel tunnel FET devices.© 2016 Elsevier LtdMechanical stress is an established and important tool of the semiconductor industry to improve the performance of modern transistors. It is well understood for the enhancement of carrier mobility but rather unexplored for the control of the tunneling probability for injection dominated research devices based on tunneling phenomena, such as tunnel FETs, resonant tunnel FETs and reconfigurable Schottky FETs. In this work, the effect of stress on the tunneling probability and overall transistor characteristics is studied by three-dimensional device simulations in the example of reconfigurable silicon nanowire Schottky barrier transistors using two independently gated Schottky junctions. To this end, four different stress sources are investigated. The effects of mechanical stress on the average effective tunneling mass and on the multi-valley band structure applying the deformation potential theory are being considered. The transfer characteristics of strained transistors in n- and p-configuration and corresponding charge carrier tunneling are analyzed with respect to the current ratio between electron and hole conduction. For the implementation of these devices into complementary circuits, the mandatory current ratio of unity can be achieved by appropriate mechanical stress either by nanowire oxidation or the application of a stressed top layer.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We propose a magnetic particle imaging (MPI) method based on third harmonic signal detection using a small field gradient and multiple pickup coils. First, we developed a system using two pickup coils and performed three-dimensional detection of two magnetic nanoparticle (MNP) samples, which were spaced 15 mm apart. In the experiments, an excitation field strength of 1.6 mT was used at an operating frequency of 3 kHz. A DC gradient field with a typical value of 0.2 T/m was also used to produce the so-called field-free line. A third harmonic signal generated by the MNP samples was detected using the two pickup coils, and the samples were then mechanically scanned to obtain field maps. The field maps were subsequently analyzed using the nonnegative least squares method to obtain three-dimensional position information for the MNP samples. The results show that the positions of the two MNP samples were estimated with good accuracy, despite the small field gradient used. Further improvement in MPI performance will be achieved by increasing the number of pickup coils used.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the synthesis of MnxGa1−xFe2O4 (x=0–1) nanosized particles by thermal decomposition method, using tetraethylene glycol (TEG) as a reaction medium, has been performed. The crystalline structure of the inverse spinel obtained in all the cases was identified by X-ray diffraction (XRD). Vibration sample magnetometry (VSM) was used to evaluate the magnetic properties of ferrites and to demonstrate their superparamagnetic behavior and the increase of magnetization values due to the Mn2+ ions incorporation into the FeGa2O4 structure. Transmission electron microscopy, energy dispersive spectroscopy (TEM-EDS) and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) were used to characterize the obtained magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs). These MNPs showed a near spherical morphology, an average particle size of 5.6±1.5 nm and a TEG coating layer on their surface. In all the cases MNPs showed no response when submitted to an alternating magnetic field (AMF, 10.2 kA/m, 354 kHz) using magnetic induction tests. These results suggest that the synthesized nanoparticles can be potential candidates for their use in biomedical areas.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.As the biogenic magnetic nanomaterial, bacterial magnetic nanoparticles, namely magnetosomes, provide many advantages for potential biomedical applications. As such, interactions among magnetosomes and target cells should be elucidated to develop their bioapplications and evaluate their biocompatibilities. In this study, the interaction of magnetosomes and human liver cancer HepG2 cells was examined. Prussian blue staining revealed numerous stained particles in or on the cells. Intracellular iron concentrations, measured through inductively coupled plasma optical emission spectroscopy, increased with the increasing concentration of the magnetosomes. Transmission electron microscopy images showed that magnetosomes could be internalized in cells, mainly encapsulated in membrane vesicles, such as endosomes and lysosomes, and partly found as free particles in the cytosol. Some of the magnetosomes on cellular surfaces were encapsulated through cell membrane ruffling, which is the initiating process of endocytosis. Applying low temperature treatment and using specific endocytic inhibitors, we validated that macropinocytosis and clathrin-mediated endocytosis were involved in magnetosome uptake by HepG2 cells. Consequently, we revealed the interaction and intrinsic endocytic mechanisms of magnetosomes and HepG2 cells. This study provides a basis for the further research on bacterial magnetosome applications in liver diseases.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The synthesis of Zn(1−x)CaxFe2O4 nanoparticles, x=0, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75 and 1.0, was performed by sol-gel method followed by a heat treatment at 400 °C for 30 min. These ferrites showed nanometric sizes and nearly superparamagnetic behavior. The Zn0.50Ca0.50Fe2O4 and CaFe2O4 ferrites presented a size within the range of 12–14 nm and appropriate heating ability for hyperthermia applications. Hemolysis testing demonstrated that Zn0.50Ca0.50Fe2O4 ferrite was not cytotoxic when using 10 mg of ferrite/mL of solution. According to the results obtained, Zn0.50Ca0.50Fe2O4 is a potential material for cancer treatment by magnetic hyperthermia therapy.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Quantification of magnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (MNP) in biological systems like cells, tissue, or organs is of vital importance for development of novel biomedical applications, e.g. magnetofection, drug targeting or hyperthermia. Among others, the recently developed magnetic measurement technique magnetic particle spectroscopy (MPS) provides signals that are specific for MNP. MPS is based on the non–linear magnetic response of MNP exposed to a strong sinusoidal excitation field of up to 25 mT amplitude and 25 kHz frequency. So far, it has been proven a powerful tool for quantification of MNP in biological systems. In this study we investigated in detail the influence of typical biological media on the magnetic behavior of different MNP systems by MPS. The results reveal that amplitude and shape (ratio of harmonics) of the MPS spectra allow for perceptively monitoring changes in MNP magnetism caused by different physiological media. Additionally, the observed linear correlation between MPS amplitude and shape alterations can be used to reduce the quantification uncertainty for MNP suspended in a biological environment.© 2016 Elsevier LtdA band-modulation device with a free top surface, named Z3-FET (Zero front-gate, Zero swing slope and Zero impact ionization) and fabricated in the most advanced Fully Depleted Silicon-On-Insulator technology, is demonstrated experimentally. Since the device has no front gate, the operation mechanism is controlled by two adjacent heavily doped buried ground planes acting as back-gates. Characteristics such as sharp quasi-vertical switching, low leakage, and tunable trigger voltage are measured and discussed. We explore several variants (thin and thick silicon or SiGe body) and show promising results in terms of high current, switching performance and ESD capability with relatively low back-gate and drain bias operation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A series of ethanediamine (EDA) – modified magnetic poly-(glycidyl methacrylate) (m-PGMA-EDA)microspheres with different amine density were synthesized and their cadmium saturation adsorption capacities were examined. The results showed that the cadmium saturation adsorption capacity increased with the immobilized amine density. However, they did not show strong positive linear correlation in the whole range of amine density examined. The molar ratio of amine groups to the adsorbed cadmium decreased with the increase of amine density and eventually reached a minimum value about 4. It suggested that low immobilized amine density led to low coordination efficiency of the amine. It is hypothesized that the immobilized amine groups needed to be physically close enough to form stable amine-metal complex. When the amine density reached to a critical value 1.25 m mol m−2, stable amine-cadmium complex (4:1 N/Cd) was proposed to form. To illustrate the coordination mechanism (structure and number) of amine and Cd, FT-IR spectra of m-PGMA-EDA and m-PGMA-EDA-Cd, and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) of PGMA–EDA and PGMA-EDA-Cd were examined and analyzed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Hydrothermal synthesis of Mn1−xZnxFe2O4 nanoparticles followed by direct encapsulation of the as-grown material into silica is demonstrated as a fast and facile method for preparation of efficient negative contrast agents based on clusters of ferrite crystallites. At first, the hydrothermal procedure is optimized to achieve strictly single-phase magnetic nanoparticles of Mn-Zn ferrites in the compositional range of x≈0.2–0.6 and with the mean size of crystallites ≈10 nm. The products are characterized by powder X-ray diffraction, X-ray fluorescence spectroscopy, and SQUID magnetometry, and the composition close to x=0.4 is selected for the preparation of silica-coated clusters with the mean diameter of magnetic cores ≈25 nm. Their composite structure is studied by means of transmission electron microscopy combined with detailed image analysis and magnetic measurements in DC fields. The relaxometric studies, performed in the magnetic field of B0=0.5 T, reveal high transverse relaxivity (r2(20 °C)=450 s−1 mmol(Me3O4)−1 L) with a pronounced temperature dependence, which correlates with the observed temperature dependence of magnetization and is ascribed to a mechanism of transverse relaxation similar to the motional averaging regime.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Novel procedure for coating of oxide nanoparticles with titania, employing hydrolysis and polycondensation of titanium alkoxides under high-dilution conditions and cationic surfactants, is developed and applied to magnetic cores of perovskite manganite. Bare particles of the ferromagnetic La0.65Sr0.35MnO3 phase, possessing high magnetization, M10 kOe(4.5 K) = 63.5 emu g−1, and Curie temperature, TC = 355 K, are synthesized by sol-gel procedure and subsequently coated with titania. Further, a comparative silica-coated product is prepared. In order to analyse the morphology, colloidal stability, and surface properties of these two types of coated particles, a detailed study by means of transmission electron microscopy, dynamic light scattering, zeta-potential measurements, and IR spectroscopy is carried out. The experiments on the titania-coated sample reveal a continuous though porous character of the TiO2 shell, the nature of which is amorphous but can be transformed to anatase at higher temperatures. Finally, the relaxometric study at the magnetic field of 0.5 T, performed to quantity the transverse relaxivity and its temperature dependence, reveals important differences between the titania-coated and silica-coated nanoparticles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic fluid droplet immersed in oil in an applied harmonic electric field is studied experimentally and theoretically. It is shown that deformations of the droplet observed experimentally are not described by the well-known theory. New double-layer droplet model which describes experimental data well is proposed.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a novel SPAD architecture implemented in a Fully-Depleted Silicon-On-Insulator (SOI) CMOS technology is presented. Thanks to its intrinsic vertical 3D structure, the proposed solution is expected to allow further scaling of the pixel size while ensuring high fill factors. Moreover the pixel and the detector electronics can benefit of the well-known advantages brought by SOI technology with respect to bulk CMOS, such as higher speed and lower power consumption. TCAD simulations based on realistic process parameters and dedicated post-processing analysis are carried out in order to optimize and validate the avalanche diode architecture for an optimal electric field distribution in the device but also to extract the main parameters of the SPAD, such as the breakdown voltage, the avalanche triggering probability, the dark count rate and the photon detection probability. A comparison between the efficiency in back-side and front-side approaches is carried out with a particular focus on time-of-flight applications.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe Drain Induced Barrier Lowering (DIBL) behavior in Ultra-Thin Body and Buried oxide (UTBB) transistors is investigated in details in the temperature range up to 150 °C, for the first time to the best of our knowledge. The analysis is based on experimental data, physical device simulation, compact model (SPICE) simulation and previously published models. Contrary to MASTAR prediction, experiments reveal DIBL increase with temperature. Physical device simulations of different thin-film fully-depleted (FD) devices outline the generality of such behavior. SPICE simulations, with UTSOI DK2.4 model, only partially adhere to experimental trends. Several analytic models available in the literature are assessed for DIBL vs. temperature prediction. Although being the closest to experiments, Fasarakis’ model overestimates DIBL(T) dependence for shortest devices and underestimates it for upsized gate lengths frequently used in ultra-low-voltage (ULV) applications. This model is improved in our work, by introducing a temperature-dependent inversion charge at threshold. The improved model shows very good agreement with experimental data, with high gain in precision for the gate lengths under test.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A compound magnetic field generating system was built to kill Staphylococcus aureus (S. aureus) by magnetotactic bacteria (MTB) in a microfluidic chip in this paper. The system was consisted of coil pairs, a switch circuit, a control program and controllable electrical sources. It could produce a guiding magnetic field (gMF) of ±1 mT along arbitrary direction in the horizontal plane, a rotating magnetic field (rMF) and a swing magnetic field (sMF, 2 Hz, 10 mT) by controlling the currents. The gMF was used to guide MTB swimming to the S. aureus pool in the microfluidic chip, and then the rMF enhanced the mixture of S. aureus and MTB cells, therefore beneficial to the attachments of them. Finally, the sMF was used to induce the death of S. aureus via MTB. The results showed that MTB could be navigated by the gMF and that 47.1% of S. aureus were killed when exposed to the sMF. It provides a new solution for the targeted treatment of infected diseases and even cancers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The cubic spinel Co1+xTixFe2(1−x)O4 ferrites, 0.0≤x≤0.5, were prepared by the standard ceramic technique. The samples were examined using the techniques; XRD, FT-IR, SEM and VSM. The average lattice parameter showed dependence on x, whereas the crystallite and grain size and strain did not. The infrared spectra showed six absorption bands in the range of 200–1000 cm−1. They were assigned to the corresponding metallic ion–oxygen bonds among the A- and B-sites. The absorption bands ν1 and ν2 and their intensities and force constants F1 and F2 were increased against x. Using the transmitted and absorbed energy, the IR velocity and refractive index and jump rate of vacancies were determined and discussed as functions of x. The trend of sauration magnetization Ms was decreased with x, whereas that of coercivity and anisotropy constant was increased. The determined Debye temperature and stiffness constant of the samples were discussed as functions of x. The absorption bands ν1 and ν2 proved dependence on the distance between magnetic ions (hopping length) LA-A and LB-B at the A- and B-sites, respectively, whereas F1 and F2 proved dependence on Ms.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Biofilms are a common and persistent cause of numerous illnesses. Compared to planktonic microbes, biofilm residing cells often demonstrate significant resistance to antimicrobial agents. Thus, methods for dislodging cells from the biofilm may increase the antimicrobial susceptibility of such cells, and serve as a mechanical means of increasing antimicrobial efficacy. Using Aspergillus fumigatus as a model microbe, we magnetically rotate microrods in and around biofilm. We show that such rods can improve the efficacy of antimicrobial Amphotericin B treatments in vitro. This work represents a first step in using kinetic magnetic particle therapy for disrupting fungal biofilms.© 2016 Elsevier LtdWe investigate anisotropical and geometrical aspects of hexagonal structures of Silicon Carbide and propose a direction dependent interpolation method for oxidation growth rates. We compute three-dimensional oxidation rates and perform one-, two-, and three-dimensional simulations for 4H- and 6H-Silicon Carbide thermal oxidation. The rates of oxidation are computed according to the four known growth rate values for the Si- (0001), a- (112¯0), m- (11¯00), and C-face (0001¯). The simulations are based on the proposed interpolation method together with available thermal oxidation models. We additionally analyze the temperature dependence of Silicon Carbide oxidation rates for different crystal faces using Arrhenius plots. The proposed interpolation method is an essential step towards highly accurate three-dimensional oxide growth simulations which help to better understand the anisotropic nature and oxidation mechanism of Silicon Carbide.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThe impurity-limited resistance in quasi-one dimensional (quasi-1D) nanowires is studied under the framework of the Lippmann–Schwinger scattering theory. The resistance of cylindrical nanowires is calculated theoretically under various spatial configurations of localized impurities with a simplified short-range scattering potential. Then, the relationship between the phase interference and the variability in the impurity-limited resistances is clarified. We show that there are two different and independent mechanisms leading to the variability in impurity-limited resistances; incoherent and phase-coherent randomization processes. The latter is closely related to the so-called “self-average” and its physical origin under nanowire structures is clarified. We point out that the ensemble average also comes into play in the cases of long channel nanowires, which leads to the self-average resistance of multiple impurities.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A special experimental stand has been developed and made to test magnetic fluid. It represents a single-tooth magnetic fluid sealer. The type of dependence of the pressure differential on magnetic fluid sealer operation time is used as a criterion to determine magnetic fluid stability and magnetic fluid sealer service life under such conditions. The siloxane-based magnetic fluid was used as the test sample. The colloidal stability as well as stability of the synthesized magnetic fluid in magnetic fields in static mode were determined. It has been found that the obtained magnetic fluid is stable in static mode and, consequently, can be used to conduct necessary tests on stand. Short-term and life tests on stand have shown that MF remains stable and efficient for at least 360 days of continuous utilization.© 2016 Elsevier LtdLow frequency noise measurements are used as a non-destructive diagnostic tool in order to evaluate the quality of the gate oxide and the silicon film of sub-10 nm triple-gate Silicon-on-Insulator (SOI) FinFETs. It was found that the carrier number fluctuations explain the 1/f noise in moderate inversion for n- and p-FinFETs, which allows estimating the gate oxide trap densities. The noise spectroscopy with respect to temperature (study of the generation-recombination noise) led to the identification of the traps located in the transistors silicon film.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magneto-acoustic emission (MAE) in a grain-oriented electrical steel is measured in a wide range of the magnetizing frequencies fmag=0.5−100Hz at the controllable sinusoidal/triangular waveforms of the magnetic induction B(t). Magnetic field is measured directly by a Hall sensor positioned on the steel surface. Intensity of the MAE signal (rms value) follows a loss separation formula afmag+bfmag+c and reveals a linear relationship with the hysteresis loss. Number of the MAE individual pulses drops with the magnetizing frequency hyperbolically. Shape of the induction waveform at the fixed magnetizing amplitude and frequency has no visible impact on the above-mentioned behaviour. However, rms profiles of the MAE signal are driven by the field rate of change dH/dt. Integration of the MAE profiles allows to evaluate the hysteresis coercive field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.New types of colloidal multifunctional nanocomposites that combine superparamagnetic character and high photocatalytic activity were synthesized and investigated. The superparamagnetic nanocomposites composed of anatase titania, silica, and iron oxide nanoparticles (TSI) were synthesized using thermal decomposition method followed by microemulsion method, without calcination at high temperature. Different techniques including X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmission electron microscope (TEM) were used to characterize and confirm the structure of the nanocomposites. These nanocomposites showed high photocatalytic activity when used in the photodegradation of methylene blue under irradiation with a black light lamp. Moreover, the nanocomposites exhibited high antibacterial properties. From our study, the nanocomposites can be useful in various applications such as removal of pollutants with readily separation from the environment using an external magnetic field. These composites could effectively photo-degrade the dye at least three cycles without regeneration. The effects of silica shell thickness on the photocatalytic activity was investigated, and the thickness of 6 nm of the silica interlayer is enough for the inhibition of electron translocation between titania and iron oxide nanoparticles and maintaining the efficiency of photocatalytic activity of titania nanoparticles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Small angle neutron scattering method (SANS) is used to characterize the structure properties of the polymer matrix of magnetic elastomers (MEs) of the same material content but with different magnetic textures. For that, series of silicone-rubber elastomers mixed with a ferrofluid and polymerized with/without external magnetic field were studied. In the species of pure rubber and the ME samples synthesized without field, SANS reveals a substantial number of large polymer coils (blobs) which are vertically prolate. The case of MEs polymerized under the magnetic field that is also vertically directed, is different. SANS data indicates that there the blobs are preferably elongated in the direction normal to the field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Cauchy's stress tensor of a ferrofluid exposed to an external magnetic field is subject to additional magnetic terms. For a linearly magnetizable medium, the terms result in interfacial magnetic force acting on the ferrofluid boundaries. This force changes the characteristics of many free-surface ferrofluid phenomena. The aim of this work is to implement this force into the incompressible Navier-Stokes equations and propose a numerical method to solve them. The interface of ferrofluid is tracked with the use of the characteristic level-set method and additional reinitialization step assures conservation of its volume. Incompressible Navier-Stokes equations are formulated for a divergence-free velocity fields while discrete interfacial forces are treated with continuous surface force model. Velocity-pressure coupling is implemented via the projection method. To predict the magnetic force effect quantitatively, Maxwell's equations for magnetostatics are solved in each time step. Finite element method is utilized for the spatial discretization. At the end of the work, equilibrium droplet shape are compared to known experimental results.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we have introduced a method for modulation of metallic thin films by sputtering of metals on anodized aluminum templates. Using a high deposition rate during deposition of the non-magnetic metal on the Al pattern, we have separated the two metallic surfaces and, thus, imprinted a pattern of nanohills on a non-magnetic metallic film, such as Au, Ag or Cu. The morphology of the nanostructured metallic films was determined by scanning electron microscopy. Thus, we have confirmed that the ordering degree of the Al template remained after the replication process. Additionally, and as an example of use of these films, we have prepared Supermalloy thin films deposited by sputtering onto these nanostructured non-magnetic metals. The room temperature magnetic behavior of these thin films is also studied. Interestingly, we have found that when the external magnetic field is applied out of plane of the substrate, the coercivity increases linearly as we increase the radius of the nanohills. These soft magnetic films can open new opportunities for magnetic field sensor applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.FeSiAl particles with a layer of MgO surface coating have excellent soft magnetic and electromagnetic properties. In order to obtain the FeSiAl/MgO composites, Mg(OH)2 sol prepared by sol-gel process was well-mixed with FeSiAl flake particles, and then treated by calcination at 823 K in vacuum. The microstructural, morphological and electromagnetic parameters of FeSiAl/MgO particles were tested. Accordingly, the electromagnetic wave reflection loss in the frequency range of 0.5–18 GHz was calculated. The results show that the surface coating increases coercivity Hc and decreases complex permittivity, leading to a good impedance matching. When the coating amount was 7.5%, reflection loss of the composite particles can reach to −33 dB.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The paper deals with a tactile sensor inspired by biological hairs of mammals. The working principle is based on the effect of the magnetic force exerted on a paramagnetic body submerged into a ferrofluid volume under the influence of a nonuniform magnetic field. The deflection of the sensor's rod caused by external mechanical stimuli may be unambiguously identified by the distortion of the magnetic field, which occurs due to the motion of the attached body in the ferrofluid. The magnetic force acting on the body is evaluated experimentally and theoretically for the nonuniform magnetic field of a permanent magnet. The controlled oscillations of the rod are realised by applying a nonuniform magnetic field of periodically altering direction.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nickel ferrite (Ni-Fe2O4) nanorods were synthesized employing a simple chemical reduction method. Reducing agent (NaBH4) influence on structural, morphological and magnetic properties of NiFe2O4 nanorods was investigated. XRD results clearly revealed the presence of inverse cubic spinel nickel ferrite structure characteristic peaks and confirmed the site inversion of inverse spinel structure of Fe3+ tetrahedral A site and Ni2+ octahedral B site. The observed Raman characteristic peak at 488 and 683 cm−1 were corresponded to E1 g and A1 g mode whereas A and B site respectively corresponded to tetrahedral and octahedral site of NiFe2O4 inverse spinel structure. The obtained PL peaks at 530 and 542 nm were attributed to the emission spectra of Fe3+ ions in site A of inverse spinel structure and Ni2+ ions in site B of inverse spinel structure respectively. SEM result clearly revealed that increase in NaBH4 concentration had remarkable impact on nanorods formation, nano-octahedron structure, homogeneity and regularity of Ni-Ferrites. VSM studies clearly revealed the soft ferromagnetic nature of NiFe2O4 and increase in NaBH4 concentration further induced raise in metal cations concentration in A- and B- site which might impact the resultant magnetization of ferrites.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Using hydrothermal method, CoFe2O4 (hard ferrite) and MnFe2O4 (soft ferrite) nanoparticles of size up to 20 nm were synthesized and the viscosities were controlled using various concentrations of agar. The hydrodynamic diameter of these particles was measured and fitted to a lognormal distribution and the results showed their polydispersity is very narrow. From the calorimetric measurements of the particles stabilized in agar solutions, we have demonstrated that at a given frequency, the dependence of the specific loss power of magnetic fluids on the viscosity is in good agreement with the theoretical predictions made in the earlier studies.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Three-dimensional random calcium ferrite, CaFe2O4, nanofibers (NFs) were successfully prepared via the electrospinning method. The effect of calcination temperature on the characteristics of the as-spun NFs was investigated. X-ray diffraction analysis showed that CaFe2O4 phase crystallized as a main phase at 700 °C and as a sole phase at 1000 °C. Field emission scanning electron microscopy emphasized that CaFe2O4 NFs were fabricated with diameters in the range of 50–150 nm and each fiber was composed of 20–50 nm grains. Magnetic hysteresis loops revealed superparamagnetic behavior for the prepared NFs. These NFs produced active hydroxyl radicals under simulated solar light irradiation making them recommendable for photocatalysis applications in water purification. In the meantime, these NFs can be easily separated from the treated water by applying an external magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We discuss theoretically rather rear example of spin-flop transition which is accompanied with changing the type of magnetic ordering and which seemingly has not been addressed yet. We demonstrate that changing the type of magnetic ordering can manifest itself in antiferromagnetic (AF) resonance experiments as an apparent peculiar switching of the anisotropy at the transition from the easy-axis type to the easy-plane one. We argue that this kind of spin-flop transition is observed recently by Povarov et al. (2013) [12] in Cu(pz)2(ClO4)2 (where pz denotes pyrazine), one of the best realizations of spin-1 2 Heisenberg AFs on square lattice having a very small anisotropy. We show that the magnetic ordering changes at the spin-flop transition in this material in the direction perpendicular to AF square planes. We examine the microscopic mechanism of such behavior in Cu(pz)2(ClO4)2 and find that dipolar forces and extremely small exchange coupling between spins from neighboring planes are responsible for it.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.MnBi particles are obtained from bulk MnBi using mechanochemical processing. The structure and magnetic properties of the MnBi particles are investigated by means of X-ray diffraction analysis, scanning electron microscopy and magnetometry. Surfactant assisted high energy ball milling results to the samples’ degradation even after one hour of milling. In the case of surfactant assisted low energy ball milling the increase of ball milling duration decreases the average particle size while the particles seem to be more separated. The saturation magnetization (Ms) was found to decrease for large milling times beginning from 61 Am2/kg, while the coercivity (μ0Hc) increases with the increase of ball milling duration up to 35 min where it reaches 1.62 T and thereafter it decreases.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present a comprehensive theoretical and experimental study of voltage-controlled standing spin waves resonance (SSWR) in PMN-PT/NiFe multiferroic heterostructures patterned into microstrips. A spin-diode technique was used to observe ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) mode and SSWR in NiFe strip mechanically coupled with a piezoelectric substrate. Application of an electric field to a PMN-PT creates a strain in permalloy and thus shifts the FMR and SSWR fields due to the magnetostriction effect. The experimental results are compared with micromagnetic simulations and a good agreement between them is found for dynamics of FMR and SSWR with and without electric field. Moreover, micromagnetic simulations enable us to discuss the amplitude and phase spatial distributions of FMR and SSWR modes, which are not directly observable by means of spin diode detection technique.© 2016We report a systematic study on the anisotropy symmetry, magnetic domains and magnetic relaxation behavior in Co thin films deposited on MgO (001) substrate by varying (i) the pre-annealing condition and (ii) the speed of substrate rotation during deposition. Substrate annealing prior to deposition leads to the formation of textured thin films. On contrary Co films prepared without substrate pre-annealing exhibit polycrystalline nature. Surface topography imaged by atomic force microscopy (AFM) depicts a profound effect of growth condition on grain size and its distribution. Magnetic hysteresis measurement along with simultaneous domain imaging has been performed by magneto optic Kerr effect (MOKE) based microscope by varying the angle (ϕ) between the easy axis and the direction of applied magnetic field. We observed the existence of cubic and uniaxial anisotropy due to the presence of substrate annealing and oblique angular deposition, respectively. Along the easy axis, magnetization reversal is governed by 180° domain wall motion via branched domains. However, for easy axis<ϕ<hard axis ripple domains appear in addition to branched domains during the reversal process. We observed that the magnetic relaxation behavior under constant magnetic field strongly depends on the size and distribution of the grains.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.La1.5Ca0.5CoIrO6 is a re-entrant spin-glass double-perovskite that exhibits a non-negligible spontaneous exchange bias effect at low temperatures. When performing magnetization as a function of applied field [M(H)] measurements after cooling the sample in the presence of a magnetic field, the exchange bias is greatly enhanced. In this work we report a detailed investigation of the influence of the maximum applied field (Hm) on the exchange bias effect for M(H) curves measured with and without the presence of an applied field on cooling. In both cases the shift in the hysteresis loops decreases for increasing Hm. We have also investigated the influence of the cooling field on the exchange bias effect. By increasing the applied field on cooling there is an initial increase of the exchange bias, followed by a decrease of the effect for larger cooling fields. A detailed study of the magnetic evolution of the system with temperature showed that despite the enhancement of the coercive field observed at temperatures above the freezing of the spin-glass phase, there is no trace of exchange bias effect at these temperatures. We discuss our results in terms of the pinning of the spins at the magnetic interfaces.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The residual stress distribution of tungsten inert gas welded S235JRC+C plates was determined by means of neutron diffraction (ND). Large longitudinal residual stresses with maxima around 600 MPa were found. With these results as reference, the evaluation of residual stress with high spatial resolution GMR (giant magneto resistance) sensors was discussed. The experiments performed indicate a correlation between changes in residual stresses (ND) and the normal component of local residual magnetic stray fields (GMR). Spatial variations in the magnetic field strength perpendicular to the welds are in the order of the magnetic field of the earth.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Double perovskite R2NiMnO6 (R=Pr, Nd, Tb, Ho and Y) composites are prepared via solid state synthesis or nitrate route. Isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔSM(T,H)) and relative cooling power (RCP) for all systems are calculated and compared. All of them possess relatively high values of ΔSM(T,H) and RCP as compared to many perovskite and double perovskite systems reported previously. Ho2NiMnO6 has the highest value for |ΔSM(T,H)| and RCP as 8.4 JKg−1K−1 at 70 kOe and 59.18 J Kg−1 at 20 kOe respectively. This study highlights the potential of magnetocaloric refrigerant materials at low temperature.© 2016 Elsevier LtdReconfigurable FETs (RFETs) are optimized in planar Fully Depleted (FD) SOI. Their basics, electrostatics and performance are studied and compared with standard 28 nm FDSOI and other RFETs results in the literature. The main challenge for future broad adoption is analyzed and commented. Finally, some tips to improve the performance such as the asymmetric silicidation at source/drain are discussed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The large-grain Fe/Fe3O4 composite particles with average size of about 1.2 µm have been fabricated by a facile one-step solvothermal method. The formation of high-purity Fe3O4 as the shells (90.14 wt%) and α-Fe as the cores (9.86 wt%) in the Fe/Fe3O4 composites leads to their high saturation magnetization of 119.6 A m2 Kg-1. Very low coercivity of 30 Oe is obtained in the composites due to their uniform cubic-shaped morphologies. Compared with Fe-based nanosized particles, these micron-sized magnetic Fe/Fe3O4 composites exhibit high air stability and good compactibility with high compressed density of 5.9 g cm-3. The fully compacted sample shows good soft magnetic properties including high magnetic induction B1.2k (H=1200 A/m) of 540 mT and good frequency-dependent magnetic properties with operating frequency up to 50 MHz superior to those of the most traditional soft magnetic ferrites, which promotes their potential applications in high-frequency and high-power magnetic devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This study presents for the first time the antiferromagnetic structure of the eosphorite-childrenite series (Mn1-xFex)AlPO4(OH)2H2O (x=0.5), based on neutron single crystal diffraction at 3 K in combination with group theoretical representation analysis. The new magnetic structure is described in the magnetic space group PCmnb, maintaining the atomistic unit cell size (a×b×c) with a ~6.9 Å, b ~10.4 Å, c ~13.4 Å. Mn-rich and Fe-rich zones within solid solution crystals are expanded up to several hundred micrometers, as seen in electron microprobe and polarisation microscopy. Magnetic susceptibility and specific heat measurements on two different eosphorite-childrenite crystals show the magnetic transition temperature between 6.5 K and 6.8 K as the Mn2+/Fe2+ ratio varies over single compositional zones. Below the Néel temperature, a magnetic field between 1.5 T and 2 T parallel to the a-axis causes a 180° spin-flip, reaching the saturation (5.25 μB pfu) toward high magnetic fields.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of the Pr0.8Sr0.2MnO3 and Pr0.6Sr0.4MnO3 polycrystalline films have been studied using temperature and magnetic field dependences of the static magnetization and X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) spectroscopy. For the both compositions, the difference between the temperature dependences of magnetization obtained in the zero fields cooling (ZFC) and field cooling (FC) modes has been revealed. The ZFC curves demonstrate a pronounced maximum at temperature Tm. It is shown that the Tm value dependence on the magnetic field follows the Almeida-Thouless line typical for the classic spin glass, what allows us to assume the possible spin-glass behavior of the films. Effect of the disorder in a direction of the crystallites easy-axis on the difference between FC and ZFC curves has been discussed also. Magnetic field dependences of the sample magnetization are presented by the hysteresis loops with the shape changing upon temperature variation. This behavior has been attributed to the effect of crystallographic anisotropy and Pr ions. The spectra and magnetic field dependences of XMCD at the Pr L2- and Mn K-edges have been studied at 90 K. The magnetic field dependences of the XMCD at the Pr L2-edge had shown Van Vleck paramagnetism from Pr3+ ions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Structural and magnetic characterization of Fe-Cr-Co alloys during milling, annealing and consolidation processes was the goal of this study. In this regards, different powder mixtures of Fe80−xCrxCo20 (15≤x≤35) were mechanically milled in a planetary ball mill and then were consolidated by spark plasma sintering (SPS). The produced samples were characterized using X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). According to achieved results, the structure of as-milled samples in different compositions consists of single α phase solid solution with coercivity and saturation of magnetization in the range of 110–200 Oe and 150–220 emu/g, respectively. The magnetic properties of consolidated samples depend on the kinds of formed precipitates in microstructure and the maximum values of coercive force and saturation of magnetization obtained in Fe55Cr25Co20 magnetic (with single α phase) alloy were 107 Oe and Ms 172 emu/g, respectively. In fact, the formation of non-magnetic σ and γ phases has a destructive effect on magnetic properties of consolidated samples with higher Cr content. Since such magnet requires less cobalt, and contains similar magnetic feature with superior ductility compare to the AlNiCo 5, it could be considered as a promising candidate for employing instead of AlNiCo 5.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Sub-micrometric Co fibers were prepared via a modified polyol process at 90 °C under an external magnetic field of about 550 Oe, using ethelyne glycol as solvent and hydrazine as reducing agent. The structure, the size and the morphology of the as-elaborated products were highly controlled through properly monitoring the synthesis parameters (amount of NaOH added, the amount of the reducing agent, precursor’ concentration and precursors mixing protocol). The XRD characterization confirmed the formation of pure cobalt powders with either hexagonal compact (hcp) or face-centered-cubic (fcc) structure depending on the concentration of the metal precursor and sodium hydroxide. The scanning electron microscopy observations of the powders shows sub-micrometric fibers with about 0.4–0.6 µm in diameter and a length that could reach 15 µm. Fibers prepared at high reducing ratio were constituted of flower-like spheres that coalesce in the direction of the applied magnetic field. For their high contact surface, these fibers offer new opportunities for catalysis applications. The hysteresis loop measurements show an enhancement of the Hc of the as-obtained fibers compared to their bulk counterparts and permit to confirm the relationship between the structure and the magnetic properties of the materials.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Self-consistent ab initio calculations, based on Density Functional Theory (DFT) approach and using Full potential Linear Augmented Plane Wave (FLAPW) method, are performed to investigate both electronic and magnetic properties of the Mn2NiAl. Magnetic moment considered to lie along (001) axes are computed. Obtained data from ab initio calculations are used as input for Monte Carlo simulations to compute other magnetic parameters. Also, the magnetic properties of Mn2NiAl are studied using the Monte Carlo simulations. The variation of magnetization and magnetic susceptibility with the reduced temperature of Mn2NiAl are investigated. The transition temperature of this system is deduced for different values exchange interaction and crystal field. The thermal total magnetization has been obtained, and the magnetic hysteresis cycle is established. The total magnetic moment is superior to those obtained by the other method and is mainly determined by the antiparallel aligned MnI, MnII and Ni spin moments. The superparamagnetic phase is found at the neighborhood of transition temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.An increase in microwave permeability is a prerequisite for reducing the thickness of radar absorber coatings. The aim of this paper is to increase the magnetic loss of commercial carbonyl iron particles for fabricating wideband microwave absorbers with a multilayer structure. For this purpose, carbonyl iron particles were milled and their static and dynamic magnetic properties were studied before and after milling. A distinct morphological change from spherical to flake-like particles is measured with increased milling time, whereas no distinct changes in magnetic properties are measured with increased milling time. The imaginary part of the permeability (µ״) of the milled carbonyl iron particles increased from 1.23 to 1.88 and showed a very broad peak over the entire frequency range 1–18 GHz. The experimental results were modeled using the Rousselle effective medium theory (EMT) in the Neo formulation. The theoretical predictions showed good agreement with the experimental results. Two layer absorbers were designed according to the measured microwave parameters and the multilayer design. The results revealed that a thin multilayer with a thickness of 1.75 mm can effectively absorb microwaves in both the entire X and Ku frequency bands. The results suggest that microwave absorbers with excellent absorption properties could be mass-produced, using commercial carbonyl iron particles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The lightly doped BaFe12−xDxO19 (D=Al3+, In3+; x=0.1 and 0.3) polycrystalline hexaferrite samples have been investigated by powder neutron diffractometry as well as by vibration sample magnetometry in a wide temperature range from 4 K up to 740 K and in magnetic field up to 14 T to establish the nature of Fe3+(Al3+, In3+) – O2- - Fe3+(Al3+, In3+) indirect exchange interactions. The crystal structure features such as the ionic coordinates and lattice parameters have been defined and Rietveld refined. The Invar effect has been observed in low temperature range below 150 K. It was explained by the thermal oscillation anharmonicity of ions. It is established that the ferrimagnet-paramagnet phase transition is a standard second-order one. From the macroscopic magnetization measurement the Curie temperature and ordered magnetic moment per nominal iron ion are obtained. From the microscopic diffraction measurement the magnetic moments at all the nonequivalent ionic positions and total magnetic moment per iron ion have been obtained at different temperatures down to 4 K. The light diamagnetic doping mechanism and magnetic structure model are proposed. The effect of light diamagnetic doping on nature of Fe3+(Al3+, In3+) – O2- - Fe3+(Al3+, In3+) indirect exchange interactions with temperature increase is discussed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We investigate and quantify spin-orbit torque (SOT) strength by current induced effective in-plane magnetic fields and spin Hall angle (SHA) using AC harmonic Hall voltage measurements techniques on Ta/Pt/Co/Pt/Co/Ta thin film structures. The proposed Co/Pt thin film double stack gives property enhancement on thermal stability and perpendicular magnetization anisotropy strength over the single stack Pt/Co/Ta. In the proposed Co/Pt double stack we observed that increasing the Ta capping thickness to three times enhances the SHA in similar order, consistent with larger spin injection efficiency. Doubling the Pt spacer layer thickness reduces the SHA by nearly 1.4 times, due to partial cancellation of SOT by bottom layer Pt, negating the increase from the top Co/Pt interface. The in-plane current threshold for magnetization switching is lower with the increase of the SHA.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.M-type BaFe11.9Al0.1O19 hexaferrite was successfully synthesized by solid state reactions. Precision investigations of crystal and magnetic structures of BaFe11.9Al0.1O19 powder by neutron diffraction in the temperature range 4.2–730 K have been performed. Magnetic and electrical properties investigations were carried out in the wide temperature range. Neutron powder diffraction data were successfully refined in approximation for both space groups (SG): centrosymmetric #194 (standard non-polar phase) and non-centrosymmetric #186 (polar phase). It has been shown that at low temperatures (below room temperature) better fitting results (value χ2) were for the polar phase (SG: #186) or for the two phases coexistence (SG: #186 and SG: #194). At high temperatures (400–730 K) better fitting results were for SG: #194. It was established coexistence of the dual ferroic properties (specific magnetization and spontaneous polarization) at room temperature. Strong correlation between magnetic and electrical subsystems was demonstrated (magnetoelectrical effect). Temperature dependences of the spontaneous polarization, specific magnetization and magnetoelectrical effect were investigated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A proposed Nd2Fe14B-core/Nd2(Fe, Co)14B-shell microstructure was realized by diffusion-processing textured Nd14Fe77B9 single-layer film with Nd100−xCox (x=10, 20 and 40) alloys to improve the coercivity thermal stability. The ambient coercivity was increased from around 1 T in single-layer film to nearly 2 T in diffusion-processed films, which was due to the Nd-rich grain boundaries as seen from transmission electron microscopy (TEM) images. The coercivity thermal stability was improved by the core/shell microstructure because Nd-rich grain boundaries provided the high ambient coercivity and Co-rich shell provided the improved coercivity stability.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In Please validate if the designated corresponding author is correct. >the present work we study the self-diffusion behaviour in the three-dimensional monodisperse magnetic fluids using the Molecular Dynamics Simulation and Density Functional Theory. The peculiarity of computer simulation is to study two different systems: dipolar and soft sphere ones. In the theoretical method, it is important to choose the approximation for the main structures, which are chains. We compare the theoretical results and the computer simulation data for the self-diffusion coefficient as a function of the particle volume fraction and magnetic dipole-dipole interaction parameter and find the qualitative and quantitative agreement to be good.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Dual-Ion Beam Assisted Deposition is a suitable method for the preparation of giant magneto-impedance (GMI) materials. In this paper, Co73Si12B15 thin films with different thicknesses were prepared by Dual-Ion Beam Assisted Deposition, and the influences of film thickness on magnetic properties and GMI effect were investigated. It was found that the asymmetric magnetic hysteresis loop in the prepared Co73Si12B15 thin films occurs at ambient temperature, and the shift behavior of hysteresis loop associated with film thickness. With the film thickness increasing, the values of shift field and coercive field and other parameters such as remanence and shift ratio appeared complex variation. At a certain frequency, the large GMI effect is only observed in some films, which have good magnetic properties including low coercivity, low remanence ratio and high shift ratio. The results indicated that the thickness dependence of magnetic properties nonlinearly determined the GMI effect in Co73Si12B15 thin films.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Density functional theory (DFT) calculations of the energy of magnetic anisotropy for diluted magnetic semiconductor (Zn,Co)O were performed using OpenMX package with fully relativistic pseudopotentials. The analysis of the band spin-orbit interaction and the magnetic ion's surrounding on magnetic anisotropy have been provided. As a result, the calculations show that the magnetic anisotropy in (Zn,Co)O solid solution, mainly of the single ion anisotropy type has been caused by Co ions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A microscopic (or Hamiltonian-based) theory is employed for the spin-wave instability thresholds of nonlinear processes in ultrathin ferromagnetic stripes and films under perpendicular pumping with an intense microwave field. The spatially-quantized linear spin waves in these nanostructures may participate in parametric processes through the three-magnon interactions (the first-order Suhl process) and the four-magnon interactions (the second-order Suhl process) when pumped. By contrast with most previous studies of spin-wave instabilities made for larger samples, where macroscopic (or continuum) theories involving Maxwell's equations for magnetic dipolar effects are used, a discrete lattice of effective spins is employed. Then a dipole-exchange spin Hamiltonian is employed to investigate the behavior of the quantized spin waves under perpendicular pumping, when modifications due to the more extensive spatial confinement and edges effects in these nanostructures become pronounced. The instability thresholds versus applied magnetic field are calculated, with emphasis on the size effects and geometries of the nanostructures and on the different relative strengths of the magnetic dipole-dipole and exchange interactions in materials. Numerical results are presented using parameters for Permalloy, YIG, and EuS.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Selection of proper microwave absorbers in the X-band is vital to prevent the interference issues that often damage devices and cause signal degradation. In this spirit, we prepared three La3+ substituted barium-natural nanoferrites (BNFs) samples with chemical composition of BaO:(x)La2O3:(6-x)Fe2O3 (x=0, 0.1, 0.2 in mol) via solid-state reaction route. Synthesized samples were characterized via SEM, XRD, VSM, and VNA measurements to determine the La3+ ions concentration dependent variation in the structural, magnetic and microwave absorption properties. Transmission/reflection line (TRL) method was used to evaluate the samples reflection loss. La3+ free samples sintered at 1100 °C revealed hexagonal BaFe12O19 and rhombohedral Fe2O3 phases. SEM images displayed the growth of new particle with the average size of 0.2 – 0.8 µm as filler in BNFs. Furthermore, an incorporation of La3+ into the BNF system manifested the emergence of new BaLa2Fe2O7 tetragonal crystal phase. The average crystallite size of BNF was found to decrease with increasing La3+ ion concentrations. Conversely, substitution of La3+ in the BNF caused insignificant changes in the magnetic properties, the real part of the relative permittivity and the natural resonance frequency. Meanwhile, a reasonable shift in the microwave frequency absorption and enhancement in the reflection loss was evidenced due to the inclusion of La3+. BNF sample containing 0.2 mol La2O3 exhibited a saturation magnetization and magnetic field anisotropy of 19.02 and 0.36 T, respectively, where the maximum reflection loss is discerned to be −26.61 dB at 10.87 GHz with 1.25 GHz bandwidth. This new class of ferrites may be prospective for microwave absorber in the X-band.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Artificial media, such as those composed of periodically-spaced wires for negative permittivity and split ring resonators for negative permeability have been extensively investigated for negative refractive index (NRI) applications (Smith et al., 2004; Pendry et al., 1999) [1,2]. This paper presents an alternative method for producing negative permeability: granular (or particulate) composites incorporating magnetic fillers. Artificial media, such as split-ring resonators, are designed to produce a magnetic resonance feature, which results in negative permeability over a narrow frequency range about the resonance frequency. The position of the feature is dependent upon the size of the inclusion. The material in this case is anisotropic, such that the feature is only observable when the materials are orientated in a specific direction relative to the applied field. A similar resonance can be generated in magnetic granular (particulate) materials: ferromagnetic resonance from the natural spin resonance of particles. Although the theoretical resonance profiles in granular composites shows the permeability dipping to negative values, this is rarely observed experimentally due to resonance damping effects. Results are presented for iron in spherical form and in flake form, dispersed in insulating host matrices. The two particle shapes show different permeability performance, with the magnetic flakes producing a negative contribution. This is attributed to the stronger coupling with the magnetic field resulting from the high aspect ratio of the flakes. The accompanying ferromagnetic resonance is strong enough to overcome the effects of damping and produce negative permeability. The size of random particle composites is not dictated by the wavelength of the applied field, so the materials are potentially much thinner than other, more traditional artificial composites at microwave frequencies.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the present work we study via molecular dynamics simulations filaments of ring and linear shape. Filaments are made of magnetic nanoparticles, possessing a point dipole in their centres. Particles in filaments are crosslinked in a particular way, so that the deviation of the neighbouring dipoles from the head-to-tail orientation is penalised by the bond. We show how the conformation of a single chain and ring filament changes on cooling for different lengths. We also study filament pairs, by fixing filaments at a certain distance and analysing the impact of inter-filament interaction on the equilibrium configurations. Our study opens a perspective to investigate the dispersions of filaments, both theoretically and numerically, by using effective potentials.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic glass-ceramics and glass fibers were obtained by the melt-method from the glass system SiO2-CaO-Al2O3-B2O3-Fe2O3 without performing any nucleation and crystallization heat treatments. Glass-ceramics and glass fibers were characterized by x-ray diffraction, scanning and transmission electron microscopy, magnetic measurements, and thermal expansion instrument. The influence of alumina content on the spontaneous crystallization of magnetite, magnetism properties and thermal expansion performances in glass were investigated. We examined the crystallization behavior of the glasses and found that the spontaneous crystallization capacity of magnetite and magnetism properties in base glass increases with increasing the content of alumina. The ferromagnetic glass fibers containing magnetite nano-crystals are also obtained.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ferrofluids containing both micrometer-size spherical magnetic particles and nanometer-size needle-like nonmagnetic hematite particles were newly produced. Average length of long axis of the needle-like nonmagnetic particles was 194 nm and the aspect ratio was 8.3. Shear stress and viscosity were measured using the rheometer with the additional equipment for viscosity measurements in the presence of magnetic field. When the total volume fraction of particles in the fluid is constant (0.30), there is the specific mixing ratio of the particles to increase viscosity of the fluid drastically in the absence of magnetic field due to the percolation phenomenon. The fluid of the specific mixing ratio shows solid-like behavior even in the absence of magnetic field. Mixing the needle-like nonmagnetic particles causes strong yield stress and strong viscous force in the presence of magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we investigate the demagnetizing effect in ferrite/PZT/ferrite magnetoelectric (ME) trilayer composites consisting of commercial PZT discs bonded by epoxy layers to Ni-Co-Zn ferrite discs made by a reactive Spark Plasma Sintering (SPS) technique. ME voltage coefficients (transversal mode) were measured on ferrite/PZT/ferrite trilayer ME samples with different thicknesses or phase volume ratio in order to highlight the influence of the magnetic field penetration governed by these geometrical parameters. Experimental ME coefficients and voltages were compared to analytical calculations using a quasi-static model. Theoretical demagnetizing factors of two magnetic discs that interact together in parallel magnetic structures were derived from an analytical calculation based on a superposition method. These factors were introduced in ME voltage calculations which take account of the demagnetizing effect. To fit the experimental results, a mechanical coupling factor was also introduced in the theoretical formula. This reflects the differential strain that exists in the ferrite and PZT layers due to shear effects near the edge of the ME samples and within the bonding epoxy layers. From this study, an optimization in magnitude of the ME voltage is obtained. Lastly, an analytical calculation of demagnetizing effect was conducted for layered ME composites containing higher numbers of alternated layers (n≥5). The advantage of such a structure is then discussed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The algorithm for analytical calculation of a power characteristic of magnetorheological (MR) dampers taking into account the rheological properties of MR fluid is considered. The nonlinear magnetorheological characteristics are represented by piecewise linear approximation to MR fluid areas with different viscosities. The extended calculated power characteristics of a MR damper are received and they coincide with actual results. The finite element model of a MR damper is developed; it allows carrying out the analysis of a MR damper taking into account the mutual influence of electromagnetic, hydrodynamic and thermal fields. The results of finite element simulation coincide with analytical solutions that allows using them for design development of a MR damper.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Multiresponsive hydrogels are an interesting new class of materials. They offer the advantage, that they respond to different stimuli like temperature, pH and magnetic fields. By this they can change their properties which makes the hydrogels ideal candidates for many applications in the technical as well as medical field. Here we present the synthesis and characterization of hydrogels - micro- as well as macrogels - which consist of an iron oxide core, varying in phase and morphology, embedded in a thermoresponsive polymer, consisting of poly N-isopropylacrylamide. By using dynamic light scattering we investigated the thermoresponsive properties. In addition we were able to follow the formation of the macrogel by monitoring the shear viscosity.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The aim of this study was to develop a novel iron oxide nanoparticle synthesis method with in-situ surface coating. For this purpose multiple emulsions were used as microreactors for the first time and magnetic iron oxide particles synthesized in the core of cationic solid lipid nanoparticles. DLS, SEM, TEM, VSM, Raman Spectrometer, XRD, and XPS techniques were performed for characterization of the magnetic nanoparticles. Obtained magnetic nanoparticles are superparamagnetic and no additional process was needed for surface adjustments. They are positively charged as a result of cationic lipid coating and has appropriate particle size (<30 nm) for drug or nucleic acid delivery. Structure analysis showed that magnetic core material is in the form of magnetite. Saturation magnetization value was measured as 15–17 emu g−1 for lipid coated magnetic nanoparticles obtained by multiple emulsion method which is reasonably sufficient for magnetic targeting.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In some biomedical applications of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs), the particles are physically immobilized. In this study, we explore the effect of the alignment of the magnetic easy axes on the dynamic magnetization of immobilized MNPs under an AC excitation field. We prepared three immobilized MNP samples: (1) a sample in which easy axes are randomly oriented, (2) a parallel-aligned sample in which easy axes are parallel to the AC field, and (3) an orthogonally aligned sample in which easy axes are perpendicular to the AC field. First, we show that the parallel-aligned sample has the largest hysteresis in the magnetization curve and the largest harmonic magnetization spectra, followed by the randomly oriented and orthogonally aligned samples. For example, 1.6-fold increase was observed in the area of the hysteresis loop of the parallel-aligned sample compared to that of the randomly oriented sample. To quantitatively discuss the experimental results, we perform a numerical simulation based on a Fokker-Planck equation, in which probability distributions for the directions of the easy axes are taken into account in simulating the prepared MNP samples. We obtained quantitative agreement between experiment and simulation. These results indicate that the dynamic magnetization of immobilized MNPs is significantly affected by the alignment of the easy axes.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.SnO2 films exhibiting room temperature ferromagnetism (RTFM) have been prepared on Si (001) by pulsed laser deposition. The saturation magnetization (Ms) of the films experiences a decreasing trend followed by increasing with the growth temperature increased from RT to 400 ℃. The growth temperature affects both the concentration and the location of the oxygen vacancies as the origin of the RTFM. With lower growth temperatures (<300 ℃), more oxygen vacancies exist in the inner film for the samples with less crystallinity, resulting in enhanced magnetism. Higher deposition temperature leads to less oxygen vacancies in the inner film but more oxygen defects at the film surface, which is also beneficial to achieve greater magnetism. Various oxygen pressures during growth and post-annealing have also been used to confirm the role of oxygen vacancies. The study demonstrates that the surface oxygen defects and the positively charged monovalent O vacancies (VO+) in the inner film are the origin of the magnetism in SnO2 films.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Using computer simulations and a mean-field theoretical approach, we study how the growth in dipolar interparticle correlations manifests itself in the frequency-dependent initial magnetic susceptibility of a ferrofluid. Our recently developed theory gives the correct single-particle Debye-theory results in the low-concentration, non-interacting regime; and it yields the exact leading-order contributions from interparticle correlations. The susceptibility spectra are analysed in terms of the low-frequency behaviours of the real and imaginary parts, and the position of the peak in the imaginary part. By comparing the theoretical predictions to the results from Brownian dynamics simulations, it is possible to identify the conditions where correlations are important, but where self-assembly has not developed. We also provide a qualitative explanation for the behaviour of spectra beyond the mean-field limit.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.When designing new magnetic separators and/or classifiers or optimizing existing ones, it is usual to face several obstacles: the high cost of a proof of concept full laboratorial setup (including preliminary optimization procedures and/or feasibility demonstrations), time-consuming experiments, lack of flexibility of the assembled laboratorial apparatus, feed complexity, among others. In this work a method and corresponding methodology are proposed to apply in such cases, representing a low-cost, flexible and robust alternative to overcome the mentioned obstacles, from which working parameters of a laboratorial or even larger version of the device may be extrapolated. This represents a powerful tool when designing magnetic separators. In the proposed methodology by determining in one experiment the magnetic force required to separate/classify a particle in a certain point, it may be derived immediately the change in magnitude and shape of the magnetic force index (B∇B) that must exist to separate other particles (with the same or different magnetic susceptibility) in another point, and it is possible to estimate, for example, the optimum, maximum or minimum value of other variables affecting the competing forces (e.g. radius of the particles, fluid density, rotation velocity), and also determine the critical limits of separation by extrapolating and obtaining the magnetic force required in those limits. It represents an open field allowing determining freely the values of the main variables. This methodology and associated method also allow repeating quickly and easily the experiments with different sets of geometrical design and positions. A case study was analyzed and tested for both processes: magnetic separation and magnetic classification, with good results, that allowed to conclude about the feasibility of the system for both processes, and to determine the best configuration geometry. The main objective of the present study was to demonstrate a cheap method and corresponding methodology that may be applied when designing magnetic separators and/or classifiers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic targeted functionalized graphene oxide (GO) complex is constituted as a nanocarrier for targeted delivery and pH-responsive controlled release of chemotherapy drugs to cancer cells. Magnetic graphene oxide (mGO) was prepared by chemical co-precipitation of Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles on GO nano-platelets. The mGO was successively modified by chitosan and mPEG-NHS through covalent bindings to synthesize mGOC-PEG. The polyethylene glycol (PEG) moiety is expected to prolong the circulation time of mGO by reducing the reticuloendothelial system clearance. Irinotecan (CPT-11) or doxorubicin (DOX) was loaded to mGOC-PEG through π-π stacking interactions for magnetic targeted delivery of the cancer chemotherapy drug. The best values of loading efficiency and loading content of CPT-11 were 54% and 2.7% respectively; whereas for DOX, they were 65% and 393% The pH-dependent drug release profile was further experimented at different pHs, in which ~60% of DOX was released at pH 5.4 and ~10% was released at pH 7.4. In contrast, ~90% CPT-11 was released at pH 5.4 and ~70% at pH 7.4. Based on the drug loading and release characteristics, mGOC-PEG/DOX was further chosen for in vitro cytotoxicity tests against U87 human glioblastoma cell line. The IC50 value of mGOC-PEG/DOX was found to be similar to that of free DOX but was reduced dramatically when subject to magnetic targeting. It is concluded that with the high drug loading and pH-dependent drug release properties, mGOC-PEG will be a promising drug carrier for targeted delivery of chemotherapy drugs in cancer therapy.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A comparative study between experiment and the predictions of a theoretical model developed for the description of magnetically induced dichroism in ferrofluids with long range interacting bidisperse spherical nanoparticles is presented. Magnetically induced dichroism in dilution series of two ferrofluids with different surfactant thickness was measured. Both ferrofluids show a concave solid volume fraction dependence of the specific dichroism, whose characteristics are very well qualitatively explained by the theoretical model. The theory fails to satisfactorily explain the magnetic field dependence of the highly concentrated samples specific dichroism, due to inherent approximations in the virial expansion of the pair correlation function.© 2016 Elsevier LtdAn alternative method for an extraction of the MOSFET threshold voltage has been proposed. It is based on an analysis of the MOSFET source-bulk junction capacitance behavior as a function of the gate-source voltage. The effect of the channel current on the threshold voltage extraction is fully eliminated. For the threshold voltage and junction capacitance model parameters non-iterative methods have been used. The proposed method has been demonstrated using a series of MOS transistors manufactured using a standard CMOS technology.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We developed a blood-flow controlling system using magnetic therapy for some types of nervous diseases. In our research, we utilized overlapped extremely low frequency (ELF) fields for the most effective blood-flow for the system. Results showed the possibility that the inhomogeneous region obtained by overlapping the fields at 50 Hz, namely, a desirably twisted field revealed a significant difference in induced electromotive forces at the insertion points of electrodes. In addition, ELF exposures with a high inhomogeneity of the twisted field at 50 Hz out of phase were more effective in generating an induced electromotive difference by approximately 31%, as contrasted with the difference generated by the exposure in phase. We expect that the increase of the inhomogeneity of the twisted field around a blood vessel can produce the most effective electromotive difference in the blood, and also moderately affect the excitable cells relating to the autonomic nervous system for an outstanding blood-flow control in vivo.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we investigate the impact of the source - drain series resistance mismatch on the drain current variability in 28 nm bulk MOSFETs. For the first time, a mismatch model including the local fluctuations of the threshold voltage (Vt), the drain current gain factor (β) and the source – drain series resistance (RSD) in both linear and saturation regions is presented. Furthermore, it is demonstrated that the influence of the source – drain series resistance mismatch is attenuated in the saturation region, due to the weaker sensitivity of the drain current variability on the series resistance variation. The experimental results were further verified by numerical simulations of the drain current characteristics with sensitivity analysis of the MOSFET parameters Vt, β and RSD.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The dynamic magnetic response of ferrofluid in a static uniform external magnetic field to a weak, linear polarized, alternating magnetic field is investigated theoretically. The ferrofluid is modeled as a system of dipolar hard spheres, suspended in a long cylindrical tube whose long axis is parallel to the direction of the static and alternating magnetic fields. The theory is based on the Fokker-Planck-Brown equation formulated for the case when the both static and alternating magnetic fields are applied. The solution of the Fokker-Planck-Brown equation describing the orientational probability density of a randomly chosen dipolar particle is expressed as a series in terms of the spherical Legendre polynomials. The obtained analytical expression connecting three neighboring coefficients of the series makes possible to determine the probability density with any order of accuracy in terms of Legendre polynomials. The analytical formula for the probability density truncated at the first Legendre polynomial is evaluated and used for the calculation of the magnetization and dynamic susceptibility spectra. In the absence of the static magnetic field the presented theory gives the correct single-particle Debye-theory result, which is the exact solution of the Fokker-Planck-Brown equation for the case of applied weak alternating magnetic field. The influence of the static magnetic field on the dynamic susceptibility is analyzed in terms of the low-frequency behavior of the real part and the position of the peak in the imaginary part.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The development of sensor systems with a complex adaptive regulation of the operating sensitivity and behaviour is an actual scientific and technical challenge. Smart materials like magneto-sensitive elastomers (MSE) are seen as one potential solution for this problem, since their mechanical properties may be controlled by external magnetic fields. The present paper deals with the investigation of elastic and damping properties of MSE containing magnetically soft particles under the influence of a uniform magnetic field. Based on the measurement of the first eigenfrequency of free bending vibrations of a fixed beam, the effective Young's modulus is evaluated theoretically and also numerically using Finite Element Method. It is shown that this parameter, as well as the first eigenfrequency of the beam, increases monotonically with the magnitude of the applied magnetic field. The results are aimed to develop an acceleration sensor with adaptive magnetically controllable sensitivity range for the detection of external mechanical stimuli of the environment.© 2016First order antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic transition and path dependent magnetic states in La1−xNdxFe11.5Al1.5 for x∼0.1 are studied at low temperatures via powder x-ray diffraction, magnetization, and specific heat measurements. X-ray diffraction measurements suggest that around 8% of high temperature antiferromagnetic phase is converted to ferromagnetic phase at low temperatures in zero field cooling. A systematic study of temperature and magnetic field dependent magnetization measurements show a non-monotonic variation of upper critical field and re-entrant antiferromagnetic-ferromagnetic-antiferromagnetic transition while warming at an applied magnetic field under zero-field-cooled condition. This has been interpreted in the framework of kinetic arrest model for first order magnetic transition. It is also found that the antiferromagnetic phase is in the non-equilibrium state and behaves as a glass-like magnetic state at low temperatures. The specific heat in field-temperature space is studied and found to have a lower electronic contribution for the non-equilibrium antiferromagnetic state, compared to the equilibrium ferromagnetic state in this compound.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.It is well-known that the Low Density Lipoprotein (LDL) can accumulate and penetrate into the arterial wall. Here, we have investigated the diffusion rate of macromolecules across the porous layer of blood vessel under the effects of magnetic force. By using a finite volume technique, it was found that magnetic field makes alterations in diffusion rate of LDLs, also surface concentration of macromolecules on the walls. As well, the influence of different value of Re and Sc number in the presence of a magnetic field have shown as nondimensional concentration profiles. Magnetic field considered as a body force, porous layer simulated by using Darcy's law and the blood regarded as nano fluid which was examined as a single phase model.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The frequency dependences of dynamic susceptibility were measured for a series of magnetic fluid samples with the same dispersed composition at different temperatures. Coincidence of normalized dynamic susceptibility curves plotted for different concentrations was obtained only after introducing correction for the value of dynamic viscosity of the magnetic fluid. The value of the correction coefficient doesn't depend on temperature and is the universal function of the hydrodynamic concentration of particles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The characteristics of the static and dynamic components of the dipolar fields originating from a bulk polycrystalline yttrium iron garnet (YIG) substrate are probed by depositing a NiFe (Permalloy) layer on it, which acts as a detector. By measuring dc voltages generated via spin rectification effect (SRE) within the NiFe layer under microwave excitation, we characterize the influence of dipolar fields from bulk YIG on the NiFe layer. It is found that the dynamic YIG dipolar fields modify the self-SRE of NiFe, driving its own rectification voltages within the NiFe layer, an effect we term as non-local SRE. This non-local SRE only occurs near the simultaneous resonance of both YIG and NiFe. On the other hand, the static dipolar field from YIG manifests itself as a negative anisotropy in the NiFe layer which shifts the latter's ferromagnetic resonance frequency.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Sintered NdFeB magnets were coated with a layer of Dy metal using electron beam evaporation method and then annealed at various temperatures to investigate the temperature dependence of Dy diffusion process in NdFeB magnets. A Dy-rich phase was observed along the grain boundaries after the grain boundary diffusion process, the diffusion coefficients of various temperatures were obtained, the diffusion coefficients of Dy along the grain boundaries at 800 °C and 900 °C were determined to be 9.8×10−8 cm2 s−1 and 2.4×10−7 cm2 s−1, respectively. The diffusion length depended on the annealing temperature and the maximum diffusion length of approximately 1.8 mm and 3.0 mm can be obtained after annealing at 800 °C and 900 °C for 8 h. Higher diffusion temperature results in the diffusion not only along the grain boundaries but also into grains and then decrease in magnetic properties. The optimum annealing conditions can be determined as 900 °C for 8 h. The coercivity was improved from 1040 kA/m to 1450 kA/m and its magnetization has no significant reduction after the grain boundary diffusion process at the optimum annealing conditions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The effect of substrate on the magnetism of the Fe monolayer (ML) is investigated using the total energy DFT calculations with the local spin density approximation (LSDA). The results show an in plane ferromagnetic coupling (FM) and a magnetic moment of 1.78 µB for the relaxed Fe ML in the presence of the vanadium substrate. In comparison, the surface Fe(001) magnetic moment ranges between 2.97–3.01 µB. This difference in the Fe surface moment of more than 1 µB in the presence or absence of Vanadium allows tuning of the Fe magnetic moment and has great potential as a magnetic switch and in spintronic devices. The surface magnetic quenching of Fe with V is much more pronounced than with other transition metal substrates like Molybdenum or Tungsten. We have a reduction of 40.5% of the Fe (001) surface moment which is more than double the reduction obtained with the Fe/Mo(001) or the Fe/W(001) systems. The magnetic quenching is due to the strong hybridization between the Fe and V d bands. This is supported by the observed charge density redistribution and large inward relaxation of 18.37% for the Fe surface upon structural relaxation. The Fe ML is antiferromagnetically (AF) coupled with the V interfacial layer, which has an appreciable induced magnetic moment of 0.48 µB.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Sm7.5Y2.5Fe90−xSix (x=0.0, 2.5, 5.0, 7.5 and 10) alloys have been prepared by arc melting method and equilibrium disordered Th2Zn17-type phases, (Sm,Y)2−y(Fe,Si)17+2y, with relative lower rare-earth content than the ordered Th2Zn17-type phase, have been obtained. Compared to the ordered Th2Zn17-type structure, the X-ray diffraction (XRD) intensity of the superstructure lines of the (Sm,Y)2−y(Fe,Si)17+2y decreases with the increase of the Si content and becomes zero for x=10. According to the refinement with the disordered Th2Zn17-type structure, the occupation rates of the R atoms at (3a) and (6c) sites tend to reach the same value with the increase of the Si content, and the lattice parameter a decreases while the lattice parameter c increases, leading to an increase of c/a. It was found that the atomic ratio of Fe(Si)/Sm(Y) in the disordered Th2Zn17-type structure increases with the increase of Si content and reaches a maximum value of 9.07 with x=10. The XRD diagrams of the magnetic aligned samples indicate that the easy magnetization direction (EMD) of the (Sm,Y)2−y(Fe,Si)17+2y is in the a-b plane, and the change of the EMD in a-b plane has also been observed due to the Si preferred site occupation. The remanence ratios along the easy direction are higher than that along hard direction; however, all the remanence ratios are less than 0.5. The magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant K increases first and then decreases with increasing the Si content. The Curie temperature of Sm7.5Y2.5Fe90−xSix alloys increases by about 65 K per Si. The saturation magnetization increases first and then decreases with a maximum of 135.5 emu/g observed for x=2.5 at room temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Numerical simulations have been performed to study the magnetization reversal in Permalloy nano-ellipses, under combined in-plane magnetic fields along the longitudinal and the transverse directions. We have considered nano-ellipses with two different aspect ratios and five thicknesses: 220×80×t nm3 and 70×50×t nm3, where t ranging from 5 to 25 nm in steps of 5 nm. We found that the mechanism of magnetization reversal is not only dependent on the parameters of the magnetic field pulse but also related to the ellipse dimensions. It is known that the reversal time is related to the mechanism behind the magnetization reversal. In particular, ultrafast magnetization reversals occur by coherent rotation, when applying a field oriented mainly perpendicular to the initial magnetization. In order to evaluate the degree of coherence of the magnetization reversal we have introduced a quantity called “coherence index”. Besides complementing the previous studies by including the effect of the thickness on the magnetization reversal, our results indicate that it is possible to obtain magnetization reversals with high degree of coherence in small nano-ellipses by adjusting the geometric factors of the ellipse and the parameters of the magnetic field pulse simultaneously.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A semiclassical theoretical study on the property of the modulational instability of corresponding linear spin-waves and the presence of nonlinear localized excitations in a discrete quantum ferromagnetic spin chain with single-ion easy-axis anisotropy is reported. We consider the Glauber coherent-state representation combined with the Dyson-Maleev transformation for local spin operators as the basic representation of the system, and derive the equation of motion by means of the Ehrenfest theorem. Using a modulational instability analysis of plane waves, we predict the existence regions of bright envelope solitons and intrinsic localized spin-wave modes. Besides, with the help of a semidiscrete multi-scale method, we obtain analytical solutions for the bright envelope soliton and intrinsic localized spin-wave mode. Moreover, we analyze their existence conditions, which agree with the results of modulational instability analysis.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The electronic and magnetic properties of the Ti2RuSn Heusler compound are investigated by means of ab initio calculations with the full-potential linearized augmented plane wave (FLAPW) method. The generalized gradient approximation (GGA) method is used for the calculations. The CuHg2Ti-type structure is energetically more stable than the AlCu2Mn-type structure. The inverse-Heusler Ti2RuSn represents half-metallic behavior. The total spin moment of the compound is 2 μB which coincides with the Slater–Pauling rule of Mt=Zt−18 with the equilibrium lattice constant a0=6.44Å and the strained lattice constants as well. The majority bands have metallic properties, but the minority bands have semiconductor properties with a gap of 0.35 eV, and the spin-flip gap is 0.23 eV. Moreover, the sensitivity of half-metallicity is investigated under two types of structural distortion, namely uniform strain and tetragonal distortion.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The characterization of the size distribution of magnetic nanoparticles is an important step for the evaluation of their suitability for many different applications like magnetic hyperthermia, drug targeting or Magnetic Particle Imaging. We present a new method based on the iterative Kaczmarz algorithm that enables the reconstruction of the size distribution from magnetization measurements without a priori knowledge of the distribution form. We show in simulations that the method is capable of very exact reconstructions of a given size distribution and, in that, is highly robust to noise contamination. Moreover, we applied the method on the well characterized FeraSpin™ series and obtained results that were in accordance with literature and boundary conditions based on their synthesis via separation of the original suspension FeraSpin R. It is therefore concluded that this method is a powerful and intuitive tool for reconstructing particle size distributions from magnetization measurements.© 2016Iron oxide nanoparticles (IONPs) were synthesized through a simple low temperature hydrothermal approach to obtain with high saturation magnetization properties. Two series of iron precursors (sulfates and chlorides) were used in synthesis process by varying the reaction temperature at a constant pH. The X-ray diffraction pattern indicates the inverse spinel structure of the synthesized IONPs. The Field emission scanning electron microscopy and high resolution transmission electron microscopy studies revealed that the particles prepared using iron sulfate were consisting a mixer of spherical (16–40 nm) and rod (diameter ~20–25 nm, length <100 nm) morphologies that synthesized at 130 °C, while the IONPs synthesized by iron chlorides are found to be well distributed spherical shapes with size range 5–20 nm. On other hand, the IONPs synthesized at reaction temperature of 190 °C has spherical (16–46 nm) morphology in both series. The band gap values of IONPs were calculated from the obtained optical absorption spectra of the samples. The IONPs synthesized using iron sulfate at temperature of 130 °C exhibited high saturation magnetization (MS) of 103.017 emu/g and low remanant magnetization (Mr) of 0.22 emu/g with coercivity (Hc) of 70.9 Oe, which may be attributed to the smaller magnetic domains (dm) and dead magnetic layer thickness (t).© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic stripe patterns are of great importance for microwave applications owing to their highly tunable microwave permeability by adjusting the geometrical dimensions. In this work, stripe patterned FeCoN films with 160 nm thickness are fabricated by using standard UV photolithography. Their microwave permeability are investigated systematically via both experiment and micromagnetic simulation. The good agreement between experimental and simulation results suggests that stripe width is crucial for the microwave magnetic properties of the stripe pattern. It is demonstrated by simulation that with increasing stripe width from 1 to 80 µm the initial permeability shows a continuous growth from about 8–322, whiles the resonance frequency drops dramatically from 18.7 to 3.1 GHz at 4 µm gap size. Smaller gap size would result in slightly increased initial permeability due to larger magnetic volume ratio, accompanied by decreased resonance frequency because of stronger magnetostatic interaction. Moreover, the experimental investigation on stripe length effect indicates that the stripe length should be kept as long as possible to achieve uniform bulk resonance mode and high permeability value. Insufficient stripe length would result in low frequency edge mode and decayed bulk mode. This study could provide valuable guidelines on the selection of proper geometry dimensions of FeCoN stripe patterns for high frequency applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Microstructure and magnetic behavior of nanocrystalline 50Cu–40Co–10Si (at%) alloy prepared by mechanical alloying and subsequent isothermal annealing in the temperature range of 450–650 °C have been studied. Phase evolution during mechanical alloying and isothermal annealing is characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), differential thermal analyzer (DTA), high resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) and magnetic measurement. Addition of Si has been found to facilitate the metastable alloying of Co in Cu resulting into the formation of single phase solid solution having average grain size of 9 nm after ball milling for 50 h duration. Annealing of the ball milled alloy improves the magnetic properties significantly and best combination of magnetic properties has been obtained after annealing at 550 °C for 1 h duration.© 2016The amorphous Co40Fe40B20 (CoFeB) films (5–200 nm in thickness) were grown on ﬂexible polyethylene terephthalate (PET) substrates using the DC magnetron-sputtering method. The thickness dependence of structural and magnetic properties of flexible CoFeB thin films was investigated in detail. The in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy induced by strain as a function of thickness was obtained in flexible CoFeB thin films, and a critical thickness of ~150 nm for in-plane magnetic anisotropy was observed. Moreover, the domains and the uniaxial anisotropy as a function of angular direction of applied magnetic ﬁeld were characterized. The results show potential for designing CoFeB-based flexible spintronic devices in which the physical parameters could be tailored by controlling the thickness of the thin film.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Spin polarized structural, electronic, magnetic and bonding properties of ScFeCrT (T=Si, Ge) Heusler alloys are studied by employing density functional theory. The total energy calculation (for a static lattice) shows that both alloys are structurally stable in ferromagnetic phase with compressibility CScFeCrSi>CScFeCrGe. The electronic and band structure analysis show that the ScFeCrT alloys exhibit half-metallic ferromagnetic (HMF) behaviour for spin ↑ channel while semiconducting behaviour in spin ↓ channel. Both alloys exhibit total magnetic moment, MTotal=3.0 µB/cell obeying the Slater Pauling rule, MSPR=(Nv –18)μB. For ScFeCrSi and ScFeCrGe alloys, the charge density and interatomic bonding character show highly covalent and polar covalent character, respectively. For both alloys, 100% spin polarization (for spin ↑ state) is expected which is an indication of their suitability for applications in spintronic devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Single crystals of L-alanine cadmium chloride (LACC) and cobalt chloride (Co2+) doped LACC have been grown by the slow evaporation solution growth technique. The grown crystals were subjected to various characterizations such as powder XRD, SXRD, FTIR, UV–vis, EDAX, TG/DTA, VSM, Dielectric and Second Harmonic Generation (SHG) measurements. The lattice parameters of the grown crystals were determined by single crystal X-ray analysis. EDAX analysis confirms the presence of Co2+ ion in the host material. The functional group and optical behavior of the crystals were identified from FTIR and UV-vis spectrum analysis. Electrical parameters such as dielectric constant, dielectric loss have been studied. The thermal stability of the compound was found out using TGA/DTA analysis. Second Harmonic Generation of the samples was confirmed by Kurtz-Perry powder technique. Magnetic properties of the crystals studied by VSM were also reported. The encouraging results show that the cobalt chloride doped LACC crystals have greater potential applications in optical devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We study the magnetic coupling between different ferromagnetic metals (FMs) across a graphene (G) layer, and the role of graphene as a thin covalent spacer. Starting with G grown on a FM substrate (Ni or Co), we deposited on top at room temperature several FM metals (Fe, Ni, Co). By measuring the dichroic effect of 3p photoemission lines we detect the magnetization of the substrate and the sign of the exchange coupling in FM overlayer at room temperature. We show that the G layer magnetically decouples the FM metals.© 2016In order to achieve a broad bandwidth absorber at high frequency, the composites of M-type ferrite BaCo1.0Ti1.0Fe10O19 (BaM) with flaked carbonyl iron powders (CIP) and flaked Fe50Ni50 were prepared to optimize the surface impedance in broadband frequency, respectively. The diameter of the flaked carbonyl iron powders (CIP) and Fe50Ni50 is in the range of 5–10 µm and 10–20 µm and the thickness of the CIP and Fe50Ni50 is close to 200 nm and 400 nm, respectively. The complex permeability and permittivity show that the addition of BaM obviously reduces the values of real part of permittivity and imaginary part of the permeability which can enhance the matched-wave-impedance. The absorption bands less than −10 dB of CIP-BaM and FeNi-BaM absorber approach to 5.5 GHz (5.7–11.2 GHz) and 7 GHz (11–18 GHz) at 1.5 mm. However, the bands of CIP and FeNi are only 1.9 GHz (4.7–6.6 GHz) and 2.1 GHz (4.0–6.1 GHz). Hence, the electromagnetic match property is greatly improved by BaM ferrites, and this composite shows a broaden absorption band.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Amorphous SiO2 coatings were prepared on sintered NdFeB magnets by micro-arc oxidation (MAO) in silicate solution. The surface and cross-sectional morphologies, element and phase composition, corrosion resistance and magnetic properties of the coatings were investigated by scanning electron microscopy (SEM), energy dispersive X-ray spectrometer (EDS), X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS), potentiodynamic polarization test and physical properties measurements system (PPMS). The results showed that the surface morphologies of the coatings exhibited the “coral reef” like structure, different from the typical MAO porous structure. With increasing the voltages, the thickness of the coatings increased from 12.72 to 19.90 µm, the content of Si element increased, while the contents of Fe, Nd and P elements decreased. The coatings were mainly composed of amorphous SiO2 and a few amorphous Fe2O3 and Nd2O3. The amorphous SiO2 coatings presented excellent thermal shock resistance, while the thermal shock resistance decreased with increasing the voltages. The corrosion resistance of the coatings increased with increasing the voltages, and it could be enhanced by one order of magnitude compared to the uncoated NdFeB magnets. The MAO coatings slightly decreased the magnetic properties of the NdFeB samples in different degrees.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This paper deals with natural convection in an inclined porous cavity with a heat conducting solid body placed at its center under the influence of the applied magnetic field of different orientations. The left and right vertical walls of the cavity are maintained at different temperatures Th and Tc, respectively, while the horizontal walls are adiabatic. The governing coupled partial differential equations were solved using a finite volume method on a uniformly staggered grid system. The effects of the inclination angles of the magnetic field and cavity and the Hartmann number on the flow and thermal fields are investigated in detail. Numerical results are presented in terms of isotherms, streamlines and average Nusselt numbers. In general, the results indicate that the inclusion of the magnetic field reduces the convective heat transfer rate in the cavity. It is also found that an increase in the angle of the applied magnetic field produces a non-linear variation in the average Nusselt numbers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.For the investigation of the crystal structure, dielectric properties and magnetic properties of La and Nd co-doped BiFeO3 multiferroics; Bi0.8La0.2−xNdxFeO3 (x=0.075, 0.1, 0.125) samples were prepared through solid state reaction method. Rietveld refinement of the obtained XRD patterns shows that there is change in crystal structure in these samples. At higher concentration of La (at x=0.075), the crystal structure was found to have mixed symmetry with rhombohedral and triclinic phases, while with equal concentration of both the dopants (at x=0.1), the structure changes to mixed symmetry having rhombohedral and orthorhombic phases. At higher concentration of Nd (at x=0.125), again mixed symmetry was established having both phases of the previous composition but approximately in reverse fraction. In dielectric analysis, x=0.1 sample showed the highest values of dielectric constant (ε′) and dielectric loss (tan δ). For x=0.125 sample, it was observed that the dielectric constant and dielectric loss response are improved. The magnetic characterization (M–H loops) indicates the significant enhancement in magnetisation with increasing concentration of Nd. Nd doping leads to the destruction of spiral modulation, forming the antiferromagnets, and visualisation of improved magnetisation via canting of spins.© 2016In experiments and theoretical analyses, this study examines the capture efficiency (CE) of magnetic drug carrier particles (MDCPs) for implant-assisted magnetic drug targeting (IA-MDT) in microvessels. It also proposes a three-dimensional statistical transport model of MDCPs for IA-MDT in permeable microvessels, which describes blood flow by the two-fluid (Casson and Newtonian) model. The model accounts for the permeable effect of the microvessel wall and the coupling effect between the blood flow and tissue fluid flow. The MDCPs move randomly through the microvessel, and their transport state is described by the Boltzmann equation. The regulated changes and factors affecting the CE of the MDCPs in the assisted magnetic targeting were obtained by solving the theoretical model and by experimental testing. The CE was negatively correlated with the blood flow velocity, and positively correlated with the external magnetic field intensity and microvessel permeability. The predicted CEs of the MDCPs were consistent with the experimental results. Additionally, under the same external magnetic field, the predicted CE was 5–8% higher in the IA-MDT model than in the model ignoring the permeability effect of the microvessel wall.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A systematic study of magnetic, magneto-transport and micro-structural properties of Co-HfO2 granular films fabricated by sequential sputtering is presented. We demonstrate reduction in ferromagnetic-oxide formation by using HfO2 as the insulting matrix. Microstructure evaluation of the films showed that the film structure consisted of discrete hcp-Co grains embedded in HfO2 matrix. Films with varying compositions were prepared and their macroscopic properties were studied. We correlate the variation in these properties to the variation in film microstructure. Our study shows that Co-HfO2 films with reduced cobalt oxide and varying properties can be prepared using sequential sputtering technique.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of CoGdxFe2−xO4 with x=0.0, 0.03, 0.05, 0.07, 0.10 and 0.15 were synthesized by co-precipitation method. Gd3+ substitution effect on different properties of nanocrystalline CoFe2O4 has been studied. X-ray diffraction and Raman spectroscopy confirmed the formation of single phase cubic mixed spinel structure. Cation distribution has been proposed from Rietveld refined data. Mössbauer spectra at room temperature showed two ferrimagnetic Zeeman sextets with one superparamagnetic doublet. Mössbauer parameters suggested that Gd3+ ions occupy the octahedral site in CoFe2O4. Room temperature magnetic measurements exhibited that the saturation magnetization decreased from 91 emu/gm to 54 emu/gm for x=0.0 to 0.15 samples. The coercivity decreased from 1120 Oe to 340 Oe for x=0.0 to 0.07 samples and increased from 400 Oe to 590 Oe for x=0.10 and 0.15 samples, respectively. Raman analysis showed that the degree of inversion with Gd3+ substitution supporting the variation of coercivity. Electron spin resonance spectra revealed the dominancy of superexchange interactions in these samples. Optical band gap measurement suggested that all samples are indirect band gap materials and band gap has been decreased with Gd3+ substitution. Both dielectric constant and dielectric loss is found to decrease because of the decrease in hopping rate with the Gd3+ substitution for Fe3+ at the octahedral sites. Low dielectric loss suggested the applicability of Gd3+ doped CoFe2O4 nanoparticles for high frequency microwave device applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ten alloys and nitrogenated compounds of (R,Zr)(Fe,Co)11.0–11.5Ti1.0–0.5Ny (y=1.0–1.4 for R=Nd, y=0 for R=Sm) with a ThMn12-type structure were prepared. The average Fe–Fe interatomic distances, d(Fe–Fe), for Fe sites were calculated based on the reported atomic parameters. The hyperfine splittings (inner field (IF), in teslas) were measured by Mössbauer spectroscopy, and the IF increased with increasing d(Fe–Fe) for Fe sites, indicating a magneto-volume effect. The order of IF magnitude in Fe sites was Fe(8i)>Fe(8j)>Fe(8f) in all alloys. Co substitution for Fe sites, (Fe0.75Co0.25), increased the IF by 25% for the R=Nd alloy and 15% for the R=Sm alloy. Decreasing Ti content from −Ti1.0 to −Ti0.5, which increased the Fe and Co content, preserved the ThMn12 structure with Zr substitution for R(2a) sites, and caused a slight increase in the IF of 2% for the R=Nd alloy and 7% for the R=Sm alloy. Nitrogenation, where N was introduced into the 2b sites, also increased IF in R=Nd alloys, by 23% for the Co- and Zr-free alloys, NdFe11Ti1.0N1.5, and by 7% for the Co-containing, (Nd0.7Zr0.3) (Fe0.75Co0.25) 11.5Ti0.5N1.3 alloy. The IF values of the R=Nd alloys were slightly larger than those of the R=Sm alloys. In conclusion, the magneto-volume effect was clearly observed at the Fe sites, and Co substitution into Fe sites and nitrogenation (R=Nd alloys) compensated for the increased IF. Increasing the Fe and Co fractions also increased IF slightly.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic structure of ZnFe2O4 normal spinel is re-examined. Antiferromagnetic structure non-collinear model is established within Ca2 space group having four different crystallographic/magnetic sites for 32 Fe3+ spins within magnetic unit cell.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the paper a self-consistent theoretical description of the lattice and magnetic properties of a model system with magnetoelastic interaction is presented. The dependence of magnetic exchange integrals on the distance between interacting spins is assumed, which couples the magnetic and the lattice subsystem. The framework is based on summation of the Gibbs free energies for the lattice subsystem and magnetic subsystem. On the basis of minimization principle for the Gibbs energy, a set of equations of state for the system is derived. These equations of state combine the parameters describing the elastic properties (relative volume deformation) and the magnetic properties (magnetization changes). The formalism is extensively illustrated with the numerical calculations performed for a system of ferromagnetically coupled spins S=1/2 localized at the sites of simple cubic lattice. In particular, the significant influence of the magnetic subsystem on the elastic properties is demonstrated. It manifests itself in significant modification of such quantities as the relative volume deformation, thermal expansion coefficient or isothermal compressibility, in particular, in the vicinity of the magnetic phase transition. On the other hand, the influence of lattice subsystem on the magnetic one is also evident. It takes, for example, the form of dependence of the critical (Curie) temperature and magnetization itself on the external pressure, which is thoroughly investigated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We investigated stress-modulated magnetization precession frequency in Heusler-based spin transfer torque oscillator by combining micromagnetic simulations with phase field microelasticity theory, by encapsulating the magnetic tunnel junction into multilayers structures. We proposed a novel method of using an external stress to control the magnetization precession in spin torque oscillator instead of an external magnetic field. The stress-modulated magnetization precession frequency can be linearly modulated by externally applied uniaxial in-plane stress, with a tunable range 4.4–7.0 GHz under the stress of 10 MPa. By comparison, the out-of-plane stress imposes negligible influence on the precession frequency due to the large out-of-plane demagnetization field. The results offer new inspiration to the design of spin torque oscillator devices that simultaneously process high frequency, narrow output band, and tunable over a wide range of frequencies via external stress.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A change in color of the thin pellicle when light is reflected from the surface of the magnetic fluid at the interface with the transparent electrode in the electric field was observed. The formation of variable thickness near-electrode layer leads to a change in the spectrum of the reflected light depending on the applied voltage. Autowaves, that were observed in the layer are a unique object for the study of self-organization process.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the magnetic and multiferroic properties in the multiferroic material BiMnO3 are studied. A Heisenberg type Hamiltonian for BiMnO3 is proposed, in which the nearest and farther neighbors are considered. Thermodynamic quantities such as magnetization and magnetic susceptibility for different magnetic orderings under high pressure or magnetic field are calculated, and the simulation results fit the experimental results. Farther neighboring exchanges can result in the coexistence of the ferromagnetic ordering and certain antiferromagnetic ordering with no centrosymmetry. Our study demonstrates that the BiMnO3 should be the type-II multiferroic, and the ferromagnetic and ferroelectric orderings could coexist. The magnetic field control of ferroelectric polarization is also studied. The ferroelectric polarization is always suppressed by the external magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetism in nanoparticulate powders of Zn1-xCoxO with 0≤x≤0.09 synthesized by a combustion reaction technique is investigated in a broad range of temperatures (5≤T≤750K) for applied magnetic fields up to 85 kOe. The hysteresis loops indicated the presence of both ferromagnetic and paramagnetic ordering at room temperature. An additional antiferromagnetic phase was observed for temperatures below 260K. A particle model that can account for the results is that the some of doping Co2+ ions are not interagent among themselves, a small quantity form clusters, leading to the ferromagnetic ordering with some of the particles in the superparamagnetic state, and few others Co2+ ions form CoO at the grain boundary yielding the antiferromagnetic phase. It was also found that a modified Langevin function can be used for describing the H− dependence for magnetization data.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticle hyperthermia is a cancer treatment in which magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) are subjected to an alternating magnetic field to induce heat in the tumor. The generated heat of MNPs is characterized by the specific loss power (SLP) due to relaxation phenomena of the MNP. Up to now, several models have been proposed to predict the SLP, one of which is the Linear Response Theory. One parameter in this model is the relaxation time constant. In this contribution, we employ a macrospin model based on the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation to investigate the relation between the Gilbert damping parameter and the relaxation time constant. This relaxation time has a pre-factor τ0 which is often taken as a fixed value ranging between 10−8 and 10−12 s. However, in reality it has small size dependence. Here, the influence of this size dependence on the calculation of the SLP is demonstrated, consequently improving the accuracy of this estimate.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The aim of the present study is to propose a new reproducible method for preparing colloidal dispersions of electrostatically charged nanoparticles (NPs) in polar solvents with different kinds of counter-ions. Maghemite NPs are here dispersed in solvents of different dielectric constant, namely water, dimethylsulfoxide (DMSO) and an ionic liquid, ethylammonium nitrate (EAN). If the existence of a NP superficial charge happens to be necessary for the colloidal stability of the dispersions in these three solvents, the standard DLVO theory cannot be used any more to describe the colloidal stability in EAN. The structure of the dispersions and the strength of the interparticle repulsion are investigated by small angle X-ray scattering measurements, in association with Ludwig–Soret coefficient determinations. Specificities, associated to the nature of the counter-ions are identified in this work on the colloidal stability, on the interparticle repulsion and on the Ludwig–Soret coefficient.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Recent studies on heterostructures of ultrathin ferromagnets sandwiched between a heavy metal layer and an oxide have highlighted the importance of spin-orbit coupling (SOC) and broken inversion symmetry in domain wall (DW) motion. Specifically, chiral DWs are stabilized in these systems due to the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI). SOC can also lead to enhanced current induced DW motion, with the Spin Hall effect (SHE) suggested as the dominant mechanism for this observation. The efficiency of SHE driven DW motion depends on the internal magnetic structure of the DW, which could be controlled using externally applied longitudinal in-plane fields. In this work, micromagnetic simulations and collective coordinate models are used to study current-driven DW motion under longitudinal in-plane fields in perpendicularly magnetized samples with strong DMI. Several extended collective coordinate models are developed to reproduce the micromagnetic results. While these extended models show improvements over traditional models of this kind, there are still discrepancies between them and micromagnetic simulations which require further work.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This study sheds light on the dynamic magnetization process in iron/resin soft magnetic composites from the viewpoint of quantitative decomposition of their complex permeability spectra into the viscous domain wall motion and magnetization rotation. We present a comprehensive view on this phenomenon over the broad family of samples with different average particles dimension and dielectric matrix content. The results reveal the pure relaxation nature of magnetization processes without observation of spin resonance. The smaller particles and higher amount of insulating resin result in the prevalence of rotations over domain wall movement. The findings are elucidated in terms of demagnetizing effects rising from the heterogeneity of composite materials.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The effect of the nanoscale array geometry on the interaction between optically generated surface acoustic waves (SAWs) and nanomagnet dynamics is investigated using Time-Resolved Magneto-Optical Kerr Effect Microscopy (TR-MOKE). It is demonstrated that altering the nanomagnet geometry from a periodic to a randomized aperiodic pattern effectively removes the magneto-elastic effect of SAWs on the magnetization dynamics. The efficiency of this method depends on the extent of any residual spatial correlations and is quantified by spatial Fourier analysis of the two structures. Randomization allows observation and extraction of intrinsic magnetic parameters such as spin wave frequencies and damping to be resolvable using all-optical methods, enabling the conclusion that the fabrication process does not affect the damping.© 2016 Elsevier B.V. In this study, magnetic properties of exchange coupled nanocomposite multilayer thin films constructed alternately with magnetic hard Nd 2 Fe 14 B layers and soft α-Fe layers have been studied by micromagnetic finite element method (FEM). According to the results, effects of the thicknesses of layers and the magneto-crystalline anisotropy on the magnetic properties of the Nd 2 Fe 14 B/α-Fe multilayer systems have been estimated. On the other hand, the results have been analyzed by means of efficiency of interphase exchange coupling, which can be estimated by volume ratios of exchange coupled areas between magnetically hard Nd 2 Fe 14 B and soft α-Fe phase layers. The results show that the magnetic properties of exchange coupled Nd 2 Fe 14 B/α-Fe multilayer systems can be enhanced by efficient interphase exchange coupling between magnetically hard Nd 2 Fe 14 B layers and soft α-Fe layers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Al3Ni2@Al nanoparticles (NPs) were prepared from Ni45Al55 master alloy by hydrogen plasma-metal reaction method, and were subsequently dealloyed to produce porous Ni@NiO NPs of 36 nm. The pore size ranges from 0.7 to 1.6 nm, leading to large specific surface area of 69.5 m2/g and big pore volume of 0.507 cc/g. The saturation magnetization (MS) and coercivity (HC) of the microporous Ni@NiO NPs are 11.5 emu/g and 5.2 Oe. They exhibit high microwave absorption performance with a minimum reflection coefficient (RC) of −86.9 dB and an absorption bandwidth of 2.6 GHz (RC≤−10 dB) at thickness of 4.5 mm. The enhanced microwave absorption properties are attributed to the synergistic effect of the magnetic Ni core and dielectric NiO shell, and the micropore architecture. The NPs with micropore morphology and core/shell structure open a new way to modify the microwave absorption performance.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The topological (asymmetry) offset voltage of CMOS cross-like Hall cells is analyzed in this paper. In order to attain the stated objective, different approaches have been considered. Both circuit and three-dimensional models have been developed. Variation of the misalignment offset with the biasing current has been studied through physical and circuit models. The latter is a non-homogenous finite elements model, which relies on using parameterized resistances and current-controlled current sources, of CMOS Hall cells. The displacement offset for various asymmetries and the offset variation with the temperature were investigated through the circuit model developed. Various experimental results for the single and magnetic equivalent offset have also been provided.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The spinel ferrite Mg0.7Cr0.3Fe2O4, and Mg0.7Al0.3Fe2O4 were prepared by the citrate technique. All samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Field Emission Scanning Electron Microscopy (FESEM), High Resolution Transmission Electron Micrographs (HRTEM), Energy Dispersive X ray Spectroscopy (EDAX) and Atomic Force Microscope (AFM). XRD confirmed the formation of cubic spinel structure of the investigated samples. The average crystallite sizes were found to be between 24.7 and 27.5 nm for Al3+ and Mg2+ respectively. The substitution of Cr3+/Al3+ in place of Mg2+ ion initiates a crystalline anisotropy due to large size mismatch between Cr /Al and Mg2+, which creates strain inside the crystal volume. According to VSM results, by adding Al3+ or Cr3+ ions at the expense of Mg2+, the saturation magnetization increased. The narrow hysteresis loop of the samples indicates that the amount of dissipated energy is small, which is desirable for soft magnetic applications. Magnetic dynamics of the samples were studied by measuring magnetic susceptibility versus temperature at different magnetic fields. The band gap energy, which was calculated from near infrared (NIR) and visible (VIS) reflectance spectra using the Kubelka-Munk function, decreases with increasing the particle size. Furthermore, the band gaps were quite narrow (1.5–1.7 eV), hence the investigated samples could act as visible light driven photo catalysts. To sum up the addition of trivalent Al3+, and Cr3+ ions enhanced the optical, magnetic and structure properties of the samples. Mg0.7 Cr0.3Fe2O4 sample will be a better candidate for the optical applications and will also be a guaranteeing hopeful for technological applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The single-phase Bi1-xNdxFeO3 (x=0, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15, 0.20) were synthesized by the sol-gel method. Their crystal structure and microwave electromagnetic property in the frequency range of 2–18 GHz were investigated. The XRD patterns and Raman spectra showed that structural transition from rhombohedral (x=0, 0.05, 0.1) to triclinic (x=0.15) and tetragonal structure (x=0.20) appeared in the Bi1-xNdxFeO3. Electromagnetic measurement suggested that both microwave permeability μ′ and magnetic loss tanδm increased remarkably over 2–18 GHz by doping Nd. Strong dielectric loss peak was observed on the samples of Bi1-xNdxFeO3 (x=0.15) and Bi1-xNdxFeO3 (x=0.2). Results show that Nd substitution is an effective way to push BiFeO3 to become microwave absorbing materials with high performance.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Analytical and numerical calculation methods of the radial magnetic levitation force on the cylindrical magnets in cylindrical vessels filled with ferrofluid was reviewed. An experimental apparatus to measure this force was designed and tailored, which could measure the forces in a range of 0–2.0 N with an accuracy of 0.001 N. After calibrated, this apparatus was used to study the radial magnetic levitation force experimentally. The results showed that the numerical method overestimates this force, while the analytical ones underestimate it. The maximum deviation between the numerical results and the experimental ones was 18.5%, while that between the experimental results with the analytical ones attained 68.5%. The latter deviation narrowed with the lengthening of the magnets. With the aids of the experimental verification of the radial magnetic levitation force, the effect of eccentric distance of magnets on the viscous energy dissipation in ferrofluid dampers could be assessed. It was shown that ignorance of the eccentricity of magnets during the estimation could overestimate the viscous dissipation in ferrofluid dampers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nowadays, magnetic nanocomposite particles have attracted many interests because of their versatile applications. A new method for chemical modification of Fe3O4 nanoparticles with polymerizable groups is presented here. After synthesis of Fe3O4 nanoparticles by co-precipitation method, they were modified sequentially with 3-aminopropyl triethoxysilane (APTES), acryloyl chloride (AC) and benzoyl chloride (BC) and all were characterized by FTIR, XRD, SEM and TGA analyses. Then the modified magnetite nanoparticles with unsaturated acrylic groups were copolymerized with methyl methacrylate (MMA), butyl acrylate (BA) and acrylic acid (AA) through miniemulsion polymerization. Although several reports exist on preparation of magnetite-base polymer particles, but the efficiency of magnetite encapsulationwith reasonable content and obtaining final stable latexes with limited aggregation ofFe3O4 are still important issues. These were considered here by controlling reaction parameters. Hence, a seriesofmagneticnanocomposites latex particlescontaining different amounts of Fe3O4 nanoparticles (0–10 wt%) were prepared with core-shell morphology and diameter below 200 nm and were characterized by FT-IR, DSC and TGA analyses. Their morphology and size distribution were studied by SEM, TEM and DLS analyses too. Magnetic properties of all products were also measuredby VSM analysis and the results revealed almost superparamagnetic properties for the obtained nanocomposite particles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the lattice structure of bilayer graphene armchair nanoribbons atoms within the same layer are studied by Monte Carlo simulations. The ground state phase diagrams of mixed spin-3 and spin-7/2 Ising model on a of bilayer graphene armchair nanoribbons are studied using the Monte Carlo simulations. The reduced transition temperatures with the exchange interactions have been given. The total magnetization and magnetic susceptibility with the crystal field have been established for different plane exchange interactions. Finally, we have given the magnetic hysteresis cycle for different plane exchange interactions, different temperatures, and different crystal field in bilayer graphene armchair nanoribbons. The bilayer graphene armchair nanoribbons exhibit the superparamagnetic behavior at the reduced transition temperature and for a fixed of crystal field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we investigated the effect of strain on the microstructure and magnetic properties of bulk α-Fe/Nd2Fe14B nanocomposite magnets produced by a combination of severe plastic deformation at room temperature and subsequent thermal annealing. Experiment results indicate that severe plastic deformation can induce the formation of α-Fe and Nd2Fe14B nanocrystals in the amorphous matrix and then suppress the formation of metastable intermediate phases during thermal annealing. The volume fraction of α-Fe phase in the magnets increases as the strain increases，and the grain size of α-Fe and Nd2Fe14B phases significantly decreases. As a result, the bulk magnets made at ε=6.2 show enhanced magnetic properties, (BH)max=17.8 MGOe and Hc=7.2 kOe, compared with that of directly annealed partially amorphous (Nd-Pr)-Fe-Co-Nb-B, (BH)max=12.2 MGOe and Hc=6.2 kOe.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electronic and magnetic properties and Kondo behavior of Ce1−xLaxRuPO(x=0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75 and 1) alloys are investigated using density functional theory by utilizing Wien2k package. The exchange-correlation potential is treated with the generalized gradient approximation (GGA). Moreover, the GGA+U approach (where U is the Hubbard correlation term) is employed to treat the f-electrons properly. We also present a comparative study between the electronic structure and magnetic properties of these alloys within GGA and GGA+U approaches. The calculated lattice parameters and bulk moduli of these alloys as a function of x are in the best agreement with Vegard's linear rule. The total and partial electron density of states and linear coefficient of electronic specific heat of these alloy within GGA and GGA+U are investigated and compared. The effect of La substitution on the Kondo behavior of CeRuPO compound is investigated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Co67Ni33 microspheres and Ni0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 nanocrystals were synthesized by hydrothermal method. The complex permeability and complex permittivity of the as-prepared powders dispersing in wax (60 wt% powder) were measured using a vector network analyzer in 2–18 GHz frequency range. The calculated microwave absorption of single-layer and double-layer absorbers based on Co67Ni33 microspheres and Ni0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 nanocrystals were analyzed in 2–18 GHz frequency range. The results show that the Ni0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 nanocrystals with the relatively low permittivity and Co67Ni33 microspheres with the relatively high dielectric loss and magnetic loss can be used as proper matching layer and excellent absorption layer, respectively. The double-layer absorber with a coating thickness of 2.1 mm exhibits a maximum reflection loss of −43.8 dB as well as a bandwidth (reflection loss less than −10 dB) of 5 GHz. Moreover, their absorption peak and the absorption intensity can be adjusted easily through changing the stacking order and each layer thickness.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ni(Cr1-xAlx)2O4 (x=0–0.50) samples were prepared in single phase form by using sol-gel method and their structural and magnetic properties were studied. Al substitution transforms the crystal structure of NiCr2O4 from tetragonal cell with space group I41/amd to cubic cell of Fd3¯m space group. Magnetization measurements by varying the temperature and magnetic field were carried out to investigate the interesting magnetization reversal and exchange bias behaviors. Magnetization reversal is observed for x=0.10 sample with a magnetic compensation temperature of 40 K and it is explained by considering different temperature dependences of magnetic moments of the two sublattices. Shifting of magnetic hysteresis loops towards the negative magnetic field axis and hence the presence of negative exchange bias field is observed for x=0.15 sample. The x=0.10 sample exhibits the tunable positive and negative exchange bias field. Exchange bias in these samples is explained considering the anisotropic exchange interaction between the ferrimagnetic and the antiferromagnetic components of magnetic spins. However, the sign reversal of exchange bias field is due to the change in domination of one ferrimagnetic sublattice over the other with variation in temperature. Both normal and inverse magnetocaloric effects are observed for x=0.10 sample.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.M-type hexaferrite Ba(1−x)YxFe12O19 (x=0.00, 0.02, 0.05, 0.08, 0.10, 0.13) magnetic powder and magnets existed to ready according to the conventional ceramic reaction method. X-ray difractometer was used to study the phase compositions of the calcites powder samples. There was a single magnetoplumbite segment in the calcanei magnetic powder with the intensification of x=0.00, 0.02, 0.05, 0.08, 0.10, 0.13. The influence of yttrium aggregation on attractive possessions of the magnets was studied scientifically. The magnetic properties of the magnets were measured by a magnetic properties test instrument (VSM). The saturation magnetization (σs) and coercivity (Hcj) of the Ba(1−x)YxFe12O19 ( x=0.00, 0.02, 0.05, 0.08, 0.10, 0.13) magnetic powders with different Yttrium aggregation (x) were determined. The saturation magnetization (σs) was decreased whereas coercivity (Hcj) was increased. The magnetic properties of the magnet at x=0.13 reached the maximum values.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt ferrite nano particles were synthesized by Pechini sol-gel method and calcined at 700 °C in electrical and microwave furnace. The microwave calcined sample was coated with mesoporous silica by hydrothermal method. Characterization was performed by XRD, FESEM, TEM, VSM, BET and FTIR analysis. The cytotoxicity was evaluated by MTT assay with 3T3 fibroblast cells. The XRD and FTIR results confirmed spinal formation in both cases and verified the formation of silica coating on the nanoparticles. For microwave calcination, The XRD and SEM results demonstrated smaller and flat adhesion forms of nanoparticles with the average size of 15 nm. The VSM results demonstrated nearly superparamagnetic nanoparticles with significant saturation magnetization equal to 64 emu/g. By coating, saturation magnetization was decreased to 36 emu/g. Moreover, the BET results confirmed the formation of mesoporous coating with the average pore diameters of 2.8 nm and average pore volume of 0.82 cm3 g−1. Microwave calcined nanoparticles had the best structural and magnetic properties.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Non-oriented soft magnetic materials are commonly assumed to be magnetically isotropic. However, due to the rolling process a preferred direction exists along the rolling direction. This uniaxial magnetic anisotropy, and the related magnetostriction eﬀect, are critical to the accurate calculation of iron losses and magnetic forces in rotating electrical machines. This paper proposes an extension of an isotropic energy-based vector hysteresis model to account for these two eﬀects.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline copper ferrite CuFe2O4 is synthesized by co-precipitation method in ethylene glycol as chelating agent, using sodium Hydroxide as precipitator at pH 8. The as synthesized CuFe2O4 is annealed at temperatures of 350 °C, 700 °C, and 1050 °C for 2 h respectively. The thermal analysis of the synthesized sample is done by TG technique. It is shown that at 260 °C ethylene glycol has evaporated completely and after 715 °C, spinel ferrite is formed with a cubic structure. The calculated lattice parameters are in agreement with the reported values. FTIR spectra of CuFe2O4 nano particles are as synthesized and annealed at 1050 °C and recorded between 400 cm−1 and 4000 cm−1. It shows that when the temperature increases ethylene glycol gradually evaporates. Finally, nano crystalline single phase spinel ferrite is obtained. X-ray diffraction (XRD) and electron diffraction (EDS) studies show that the sample is indexed as the face centered cubic spinel structure. Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM) indicated that the particles are flaky and spherical with the crystallite size in the range of 25–34 nm. From the dielectric studies, the dielectric constant decreases as the frequency increases. Low value of dielectric loss at higher frequencies suggests that the material is suitable for high frequency applications. AC conductivity increases with frequency. The magnetic properties of the samples are measured using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) at room temperature, which shows that the sample exhibited a typical super paramagnetic behavior at low temperature. The saturation magnetization, remanant magnetism, and coercivity increases with applied field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this study, three grain-oriented silicon steels with different Nb contents were designed to investigate the effect of Nb on the behaviors of inhibitor solution and precipitation by Thermo-Calc software combined with TEM technology. The influence of Nb on precipitation rate of inhibitors in the silicon steels was also discussed. The results show that besides MnS and AlN, Nb(C,N) also exists in Nb-containing silicon steels, and with the increase of Nb content, the precipitation temperature and maximum mole fraction of Nb(C,N) increases significantly. Different Nb contents have no obvious effect on MnS. While the precipitation temperature of AlN decreases from 1190 °C to 1140 °C with Nb addition from 0.044wt% to 0.09 wt%, but the maximum mole fraction of AlN does not change. According to the PTT (Precipitation-Time-Temperature) curve, Nb addition accelerates the precipitation process of second phase particles and shortens the incubation period. Combining the theoretical calculations with TEM analyses, it is known that proper Nb addition in the silicon steel can reduce the slab reheating temperature. Whereas, with excessive Nb addition, the inhibitors can not dissolve into the matrix totally at 1250 °C, which will have a negative effect on the production of grain-oriented silicon steel.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This study presents the detailed explanation of the factors, contributing towards the absorption peaks in reflection loss spectrum of hexaferrites. Cobalt-Zirconium substituted strontium hexaferrites, synthesized using sucrose precursor sol-gel technique, were analyzed in 12.4–18 GHz frequency range. The concepts of impedance matching through quarter wavelength condition, complex thickness, dielectric phase angle and attenuation constant have been used to determine the location as well as intensity of absorption peaks. This study also demonstrates the potential application of three compositions of this series with doping content (x)==0.0, 0.6 and 0.8 as an effective microwave absorbers in Ku-frequency band.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Composites of polymer and micron-sized particles of carbonyl-iron were investigated in terms of their magnetization behavior. Thermoplastic elastomers with varying Young's modulus (EPolymer=0.14–14.6 MPa) were used as matrix material. Field dependent magnetization curves reveal that the hysteretic behavior of the composites strongly depends on both the particle fraction (7, 10, 14, 21, 31 vol%) and on the mechanical properties of the polymer. It is shown that hysteresis only appears above a certain fraction of magnetic particles which can be accounted to the magnetic exchange between the particles. However, hysteresis is suppressed in the composite with largest Young's modulus of the polymer matrix, even at largest particle fraction.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work finite element micromagnetic simulations were performed in order to study the reversal mechanisms of spherical ferromagnetic particles with uniaxial magnetocrystalline anisotropy, when they are magnetized along an oblique direction with respect to the anisotropy axis. Magnetization loops are taken in different directions of external magnetic field, at different anisotropy constants and particle sizes. In the simulation results, the three reversal mechanisms (coherent, curling and domains) are observed and new phenomena arise due to the action of oblique magnetic fields. Moreover, the dependence of the critical fields with respect to the angle of the external field is presented.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Single crystals of the new compound CeCu0.18Al0.24Si1.58 have been grown by high-temperature solution growth method using a eutectic Al-Si mixture as flux. This compound is derived from the binary CeSi2 (tetragonal α-ThSi2-type, Pearson symbol tI12, space group I41/amd) obtained by partial substitution of Si by Cu and Al atoms but showing full occupation of the Si crystal site (8e). While CeSi2 is a well-known valence-fluctuating paramagnetic compound, the CeCu0.18Al0.24Si1.58 phase orders ferromagnetically at TC=9.3 K. At low temperatures the easy-axis of magnetization is along the a-axis, which re-orients itself along the c-axis above 30 K. The presence of hysteresis in the magnetization curve, negative temperature coefficient of resistivity at high temperatures, reduced jump in the heat capacity and a relatively lower entropy released up to the ordering temperature, and enhanced Sommerfeld coefficient (≈100 mJ/mol K2) show that CeCu0.18Al0.24Si1.58 is a Kondo lattice ferromagnetic, moderate heavy fermion compound. Analysis of the high temperature heat capacity data in the paramagnetic region lets us infer that the crystal electric field split doublet levels are located at 178 and 357 K, respectively, and Kondo temperature (8.4 K) is of the order of TC in CeCu0.18Al0.24Si1.58.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.An in simulacra study was conducted to investigate the capture efficiency (CE) of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) in aneurysm model, under the effect of a bipolar permanent magnetic system positioned at the vicinity of the model vessel. The bipolar magnetic system with an active space of 9 cm was designed by FEMM software. The MNPs were magnetite nanoparticles synthesized by the hydrothermal method which were characterized by X-ray diffraction, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy, scanning electron microscope and magnetometer measurements. Ferrofluid velocity, magnetic field strength, and aneurysm volume all proved to be important parameters which affect the capturing of MNPs. Overall, the results of this in simulacra study confirmed the effectiveness of magnetic targeting for possible aneurysm embolization.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report on the observation of large refrigeration capacities near room temperature in Ni2Mn1−xCrxIn Heusler alloys. The alloys exhibit the L21 cubic crystal structure and undergo a second order ferromagnetic to paramagnetic phase transition. The respective Curie temperatures vary with Cr concentration from 315 K to 290 K. Net refrigerant capacities of up to 60 J/kg and 168 J/kg are observed in the alloys for applied magnetic fields of 20 kOe and 50 kOe, respectively. Due to the second order phase transition, the materials do not exhibit any hysteresis loss or other problems usually associated with materials exhibiting first order phase transitions. The observed refrigeration capacities in Ni2Mn1−xCrxIn are higher than those observed in many Heusler alloys with first order magnetic transitions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.It must be pointed out that maghemite (γ-Fe2O3) with a cubic spinel structure is a crucial material for various applications, including spin electronic devices, high-density magnetic recording, nano-medicines and biosensors. This paper has to do with a review study on the synthesis methods, magnetic properties and application of maghemite in the form of one-dimensional (1D) nanostructured materials, such as nanoparticles, nanotubes, nano-rods, and nanowires, as well as two-dimensional (2D) thin films. The results revealed that maghemite is widely used in the biomedical applications (hyperthermia, magnetic resonance imaging and drug delivery) and magnetic recording devices. The unmodified and Co/Mn modified maghemite thin films prepared by the dc-reactive magnetron sputtering show the excellent values of coercivity 2100 Oe and 3900 Oe, respectively, for the magnetic storage application. The super-paramagnetic particles with 7 nm size and the saturation magnetization of 80 emu/g prepared by the established thermolysis method are good candidates for bio-medical applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.An ultra-compact chiral metamaterial with thin thickness and small unit cells is proposed. Echelon meandered conjugated gammadions are introduced into the planar miniaturized design. In particular, the ratio between period (p) and resonant wavelength (λ) is as small as 1/10.8 in experiment. Negative refractive indexes for circularly polarized waves are demonstrated and the effective parameters are retrieved. The effects of the length of the swing arms, number of folded lines and dielectric layer thickness on the optical activity have also been investigated. This miniaturized structure has great potential application in electronic and photonic devices with small size and integration.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the present communication anomalies associated with the choice of space dependent applied magnetic field are pointed out in some recent studies. It is explicitly shown that the random choice results in the violation of the Maxwell's equations. A remedy is also proposed to avoid such inconsistencies in the future.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic materials of MM-Fe-B (MM=mischmetal) ribbons were prepared using melt spinning method by varying the content of MM. The ribbons contain minor phases besides the main phase of Re2Fe14B. X-ray techniques show that the diffraction peak intensities of the minor phase Fe3B vary with the content of constituent elements, indicating that the amount of minor phase could be tunable. The squareness of hysteresis loop is the best in MM13Fe80.5B6.5 ribbons, which should mainly ascribe to the less amount of minor phase. Henkel plots verify the more uniform magnetization reversals in MM13Fe80.5B6.5 ribbons, and the energy product achieves to the maximum of 12.74 MGOe with the coercivity of 6.50 kOe. With the increase of MM content the coercivity increases monotonically, and reaches to 9.13 kOe in MM15Fe77.5B7.5 ribbons, which should be related with the nature of the defects in the main phase. These investigations show that optimizing the content of constituent elements and phase constitution could improve magnetic properties in the resource-saving magnets of MM-Fe-B ribbons.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.NiFe2−xCexO4 (x = 0–0.03) nanoribbons have been successfully fabricated using electrospinning technique and followed by calcining in air at 500 °C. The crystalline, morphologies and compositions of NiFe2−xCexO4 nanoribbons are characterized by X-ray diffraction, selected area electron diffraction, transmission electron microscope, field emission scanning electron microscopy and energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDX). The results show that the components, mean crystallite sizes and morphologies change along with the content of Ce3+. A formation mechanism of NiFe2-xCexO4 nanoribbons is proposed. The magnetic hysteresis loops of NiFe2−xCexO4 nanoribbons reveals that the coercivity changes from 165 Oe to 64 Oe and saturation magnetizations change from 40.97 emu/g to 25.05 emu/g at room temperature. Morevover, the Mössbauer spectra of 57Fe in NiFe2−xCexO4 nanoribbons is discussed in detail. It is believed that this work will play important role in magnetic application with the advantage of excellent magnetic properties, efficient functionalization and relatively low cost.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Co3Pt alloy thin films were deposited on the glass substrate at room temperature (RT) and 300 °C, which showed high perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) and isotropy magnetic behaviors, respectively. Co3Pt HCP (0002) planes grew along the substrate plane for the films deposited at RT. The easy axis [0001] was consequently vertical to the substrate surface and obtained the predominant PMA. Large magnetic domains and sharp boundary also supported high PMA in RT-deposited samples. On the other hand, the PMA was significantly decreased with increasing the deposition temperature from RT to 300 °C. Hard HCP(0002) and soft A1(111) co-existed in the film and the magnetic exchanged coupling between these two phases induced isotropy magnetic behavior. In addition, the various thicknesses (t) of the RT-deposited Co3Pt films were deposited with different base pressures prior to sputtering. The Kerr rotation loops showed high PMA and out-of-plane squareness (S⊥) of ~0.9 were found in low base pressure chamber. Within high base pressure chamber, Co3Pt films just show magnetic isotropy behaviors. This study provides a fabrication method for the preparation of high PMA HCP-type Co3Pt films on the glass substrate without any underlayer at RT. The results could be the base for future development of RT-deposited magnetic alloy thin film with high PMA.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nano-sized manganese ferrite (MnFe2O4) particles were prepared using co-precipitation method in two different pH (9 and 11). The structural, morphological, optical and magnetic properties of as-synthesized nanoparticles were characterized by Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), UV–vis absorption and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The FTIR spectra revealed two strong peaks at about 600 and 400 cm−1 that can be attributed to the vibration mode of octahedral and tetrahedral sites of spinel structure of MnFe2O4, respectively. The XRD results showed that the nanocrystalline MnFe2O4 has pure cubic spinel crystal structure with average crystallite size of 11 nm. The cation distribution of these nanoparticles was estimated by X-ray analysis data. The blue shift was observed in the band gap when compared with bulk sample which is due to the quantum size effect. The absence of hysteresis for MnFe2O4 nanoparticles indicated the superparamagnetic behaviour, as expected for single domain nanoparticles. The obtained value for saturation magnetization being less than its value of bulk ones and larger pH is due to surface effects. The calculated magnetic particle size was smaller than crystallite size estimated from the XRD results; which indicate the presence of dead layer on particle surface.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, MnZn ferrites were used as coating agents to prepare MnZn/FeSiAl soft magnetic composites (SMCs) in order to improve the magnetic property, because of the higher permeability of magnetic MnZn ferrites than that of traditional coatings which are always nonmagnetic. The effects of molding pressure, annealing temperature, and content of insulation on the soft magnetic properties of MnZn/FeSiAl SMCs were studied. With increasing molding pressure, the effective permeability of the SMCs increased firstly and then decreased, while the core loss decreased firstly and then increased, and both have the best performance at 1.6 GPa. The permeability increased with increasing temperature, reached the maximum value at 660 °C and then decreased, while the core loss decreased with increasing temperature to 700 °C and then increased. The permeability increased with increasing MnZn content from 0.1 to 3% and then decreased, while the D-C bias property continuously increased.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic glass-like carbons that were heat-treated at different temperatures or were filled with different magnetic nanoparticle contents were prepared from furan resin alloyed with magnetic fluid (MF) or Fe3O4 powder in their liquid-phase states during mixing. Compared to the Fe3O4 powder-alloyed carbon, the MF-alloyed carbon has highly dispersed the nanoparticles, and has the excellent saturation magnetization and coercivity. It is implied that saturation magnetizations are related to changes in the types of phases for the nanoparticles and the relative intensities of X-ray diffraction peaks for iron and iron-containing compounds in the carbons. Additionally, the coercivities are possibly affected by the size and crystallinity of the nanoparticles, the relative amounts of iron, and the existence of amorphous compounds on the carbon surfaces.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Colloidal nickel nanoparticles (NPs) coated with polyvinylpyrrolidone (PVP) were synthesized. The nanoparticle dispersions were deposited on substrates and dried under mild heating to form conductive films. The films exhibited very small coercivity, nearly metallic conductivity, and a significant extraordinary Hall effect signal. This method could be useful for preparing simple, printed magnetic field sensors with the advantage of relatively high sensitivity around zero magnetic field, in contrast to magnetoresistive sensors, which have maximal field sensitivity away from zero magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.It is important to spintronics to achieve fully-spin-polarized magnetic materials that are stable and can be easily fabricated. Here, through systematical density-functional-theory investigations, we achieve high and even full spin polarization for carriers in the ground-state phase of CrTe by applying tensile biaxial stress. The resulting strain is tensile in the xy plane and compressive in the z axis. With the in-plane tensile strain increasing, the ferromagnetic order is stable against antiferromagnetic fluctuations, and a half-metallic ferromagnetism is achieved at an in-plane strain of 4.8%. With the spin-orbit coupling taken into account, the spin polarization is equivalent to 97% at the electronic transition point, and then becomes 100.0% at the in-plane strain of 6.0%. These make us believe that the full-spin-polarized ferromagnetism in this stable and easily-realizable hexagonal phase could be realized soon, and applied in spintronics.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this study, critical behavior of low dimensional magnetic systems as cyano-bridged Tb(III)-Cr(III) bimetallic assembly was investigated with the mixed spin 3- spin 3/2 Ising model. The mixed spin Ising model is simulated with Cellular Automaton cooling and heating algorithms on one-dimensional lattices in periodic boundary conditions. The Ising model Hamiltonian includes only antiferromagnetic nearest-neighbor interaction (J>0). The mixed spin system behaves like the isolated one-dimensional chain for zero magnetic field (h=H/J=0). In the presence of the magnetic field, the magnetization is calculated using zero-field cooling (ZFC ) and field cooling (FC) processes. The one-dimensional Ising model results are compatible with the cyano-bridged Tb(III)-Cr(III) bimetallic quasi-one dimensional assembly (([Tb(H2O)2(DMF)4 {Cr(CN)}6]· H2O (DMF=dimethylformamide)) results.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The effects of shape and finite size on the physical behavior of nanostructured antiferromagnetic particles are investigated. They were modeled as ellipsoidal systems which preserve the crystalline structure of the correspondent bulk material. In our analysis we consider nanoparticles composed by magnetic ions which are themselves insensitive to the presence of surfaces and/or interfaces. Results are shown for structures similar to MnF2 and NiO crystals. Special attention is given to these last once their singular magnetic arrangement, as well as, their use at different technological and/or biomedical applications, has motivated intense experimental studies at different laboratories. We use the parameters that describe the correspondent bulk material to discuss the magnetic behavior of these particles for different volumes and shapes.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We introduce a processing route of the first magnetocaloric composite with conductive polymer – wherein the magnetocaloric reinforcement is a compound Gd5.09Ge2.03Si1.88 and the ductile matrix is a conductive polymer polyaniline doped by camphorsulfonic acid (PAni-CSA). This new type of composite combines mechanical, electrical and magnetocaloric properties that can be applied in thermomagnetic machines.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We utilize our previously developed temporal coupled mode approach to investigate the performance of one-dimensional magneto-photonic crystals (MPCs). We analytically demonstrate that a double-defect MPC provides adequate degrees of freedom to design a structure for arbitrary transmittance and Faraday rotation. By using our developed analytic approach along with the numerical transfer matrix method, we present a procedure for synthesis of an MPC to generate any desired transmittance and Faraday rotation in possible ranges. However it is seen that only discrete values of transmittance and Faraday rotation are practically obtainable. To remedy this problem along with having short structures, we introduce a class of MPC heterostructures which are combinations of stacks with high and low optical contrast ratios.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We study the effect of magnetic anisotropy on the field-driven evolution of magnetic structure in a nanodisk with existence of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction by using micromagnetic simulations. We obtain the phase diagram of magnetic state in the magnetic field-magnetic anisotropy constant (Hz-K) plane. It is found that target skyrmion can stably exist at zero external magnetic field when the magnetic anisotropy constant changing in a large range. The evolution of magnetic state with the perpendicular magnetic field strongly depends on the magnetic anisotropy constant.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In order to study Kondo ferromagnetism of CePt, we have investigated the transport properties, resistivity and thermopower, of the CexY1-xPt alloy system from 2 K to 320 K. The extracted magnetic contribution to the total resistivity cannot be scaled to the concentration and is much higher than in the CexLa1-xPt alloy system. The maximum of the magnetic contribution of the resistivity moves to lower temperatures with decreasing the Ce content while the temperature of the minimum of the thermopower does not change with concentration. These two facts seem to be in contradiction. Usually one assumes that these extrema represent the Kondo temperature. To the contrary, we show that the Kondo temperature increases with decreasing Ce content. The most intriguing observation in this alloy system is the linear relationship between the Curie temperature and the concentration of the Ce ions and, moreover, that it is the same as in CexLa1-xPt. This fact is in contradiction with the conventional picture of small moment Kondo magnetism.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have built a portable Hall magnetometer probe, for measuring magnetic properties of iron oxide nanoparticles, that can be used for bulk materials and liquid samples as well. The magnetometer probe consists of four voltage-programmable commercial Hall sensors and a thin acrylic plate for positioning the sensors. In order to operate, it needs to be attached to a pole of an electromagnet and connected to an AD converter and a computer. It acquires a complete magnetization curve in a couple of minutes and has a magnetic moment sensitivity of 3.5×10−7 Am2. We tested its performance with magnetic nanoparticles containing an iron oxide core and having coating layers with different sizes. The magnetization results obtained were compared with measurements performed on commercial stand-alone magnetometers, and exhibited errors of about ±0.2 Am2/kg (i.e 0.4%) at saturation and below 0.5 Am2/kg (i.e. 10%) at remanence.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Well-defined Fe3O4 particles were successfully fabricated by a facile triethanolamine (TEA)-assisted method under mild hydrothermal conditions. Hydrated ferric salt was employed as the single iron precursor. TEA was used as the complexing agent and/or alkaline source. The crystalline phases of the as-obtained samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD). Furthermore, the morphology as well as the compositions of the samples were investigated by scanning electron microscopy (SEM) equipped with an energy dispersion spectroscopy (EDS). The results indicated that the products were Fe3O4 crystal phase, and the morphology and powder size of the particles were varied with adding different amount of NaOAc and keeping the content of TEA unchanged. On the basis of these results, the possible formation mechanism of Fe3O4 was discussed. It was observed that TEA and NaOAc affected the growth rate of crystal planes and nucleation. Besides, the magnetic property tested by a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) showed that the products exhibited a ferromagnetic behavior and possessed the excellent saturation magnetization (Ms) at room temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Fe3O4 sub-microspheres have been embedded uniformly into the reduced graphene oxide (rGO) to form a new-type Fe3O4/rGO composites through a one-pot solvothermal method. The dielectric properties for these magnetic Fe3O4/rGO composites can be greatly tuned by their different rGO additions. A good impedance matching from the balanced dielectric and magnetic loss is achieved in the Fe3O4/rGO composites with 4 wt% rGO addition, which dominates their excellent microwave absorbing performances including the minimum reflection loss (RL) value of −45 dB at a frequency of 8.96 GHz with a sample thickness of 3.5 mm and an effective absorption bandwidth of 3.2 GHz (below −10 dB) superior to those of the most magnetic materials and carbon-based composites. The controlled Fe3O4/rGO composite structure also exhibits high chemical stability and low density, which shows great potential application in high-performance electromagnetic microwave-absorbing materials.© 2016 Elsevier LtdOrganic thin-film transistors (OTFTs) with high crystallization copper phthalocyanine (CuPc) active layers were fabricated. The performance of CuPc OTFTs was studied without and with treatment by Solvent Vapor Annealing on CuPc film. The values of the threshold voltage without and with solvent-vapor annealing are −17 V and −10.5 V respectively. The field-effect mobility values in saturation region of CuPc thin-film transistors without and with Solvent Vapor Annealing are 0.00027 cm2/V s and 0.0025 cm2/V s respectively. Meanwhile, the high crystallization of the CuPc film with a larger grain size and less grain boundaries can be observed by investigating the morphology of the CuPc active layer through scanning electron microscopy and X-ray diffraction. The experimental results showed the decreased of the resistance of the conducting channel, that led to a performance improvement of the OTFTs.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we report the design of 2.5 GHz integrated power amplifier based on a graphene FET fabricated with thermal deposition on SiC. In this first large signal study of graphene radiofrequency power amplifiers, a power gain of 8.9 dB is achieved, the maximum reported output power and power added efficiency are 5.1 dBm and 2.2% respectively. Furthermore, graphene and Si CMOS amplifiers are compared; conclusions are drawn towards the technology enhancements to optimize the amplifiers figures of merit.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic domain structure of hot-extruded bulk τ-Mn53Al45C2 was studied by Kerr microscopy under application of a magnetic field in-situ. The microstructure consists of recrystallized, fine-grained regions and large non-recrystallized grains which contain a high density of twins. Within these large polytwinned grains, a clear pinning interaction of magnetic domain walls at twin boundaries was observed but with a rather small pinning force. The smaller, recrystallized grains show a higher resistance to magnetization reversal. The critical single domain particle size of this material was estimated at 773 nm and the fine, recrystallized grains are in the range of this size. Demagnetizing the sample following saturation using a 3 T field pulse revealed that individual fine grains reverse independently from their neighbours.© 2016 Elsevier LtdAn array of InGaN-based flexible light-emitting diodes (FLEDs) was fabricated on a Ni-embedded electrical conducting flexible fabric with a full-scale 2-in. size. The FLED chip operation under current injection was realized using a single current probe as the negative electrode on the n-GaN surface; the conducting substrate was used as the positive electrode. The stability of the output power in the FLEDs was improved dramatically on the Ni-embedded conducting flexible fabric compared to that on the conventional polyimide flexible substrate. The former showed linear operation up to an input current 950 mA with no wavelength shift, whereas the latter exhibited rolling-over behavior after an input current of 200 mA.© 2016 Elsevier LtdWe investigated the device characteristics of GaN-based blue vertical light-emitting diodes (VLEDs) with two different package structures (i.e., lead frame with metal/plastic body (MPLF package) and lead frame with metal body (MLF package)) under various measurement conditions. In comparison with the MPLF packaged VLEDs, the MLF packaged VLEDs exhibited relatively lower junction temperature and thermal resistance values due to the better heat dissipation capability, leading to further improved optical, spectral, and thermal device characteristics. Thermal simulations of the VLEDs with two different packages were performed using three-dimensional steady-state device models to theoretically calculate their thermal and mechanical behaviours. The maximum temperatures, internal temperature distributions, and thermomechanical stresses were analysed by a finite element method.© 2016The authors regret that in the published article the affiliation of some authors was wrong. T.L. Makarova and E. Lahderanta must be affiliated with Lappeenranta University of Technology. The authors would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A 0.1 mm-thick grain-oriented silicon steel sheet was successfully produced using strip casting and three-stage cold rolling method. The microstructure, texture and inhibitor evolution during the processing was briefly analyzed. It was found that Goss texture was absent in the hot rolled sheet because of the lack of shear deformation. After normalizing, a large number of dispersed MnS precipitates with the size range of 15–90 nm were produced. During first cold rolling, dense shear bands were generated in the deformed ferrite grains, resulting in the intense Goss texture after first intermediate annealing. The microstructure was further refined and homogenized during the subsequent cold rolling and annealing processes. After primary recrystallization annealing, a homogeneous microstructure consisting of fine and equiaxed grains was produced while the associated texture was characterized by a strong γ-fiber texture. Finally, a complete secondary recrystallization microstructure consisting of entirely large Goss grains was produced. The magnetic induction B8 and iron loss P10/400 was 1.79 T and 6.9 W/kg, respectively.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we demonstrate the operation of a Silicon Nanotube Tunneling FET on junctionless structure using 3D numerical simulations. P-I-N band structure thereby the tunneling operation is achieved by placing side gates and applying appropriate side gate biases. Single work function, with the same main and side gates workfunctions and multiple workfunction, with different main and side gates workfunctions are explored to achieve Tunneling FET. ON current, OFF current, Sub-threshold swing, Threshold voltage, trans-conductance and unity gain frequency are extracted for both single and multiple gate workfunctions based devices and compared with the conventional Silicon nanotube tunnel FET. For the same OFF current, the proposed devices show better performance with respect to ON current and sub-threshold swing compared to the conventional Silicon nano tube tunnel FET.© 2016 Elsevier LtdMemristors with steep off-on transitions and high “on” currents are excellent candidates for very low power and efficient electronics. Owing to their switching mechanism based on ion motion and oxidation/reduction process, memristors bridge the gap between MEMS and MOSFETs. They have better reliability similar to MOSFETS and at the same time have the more desirable off-to-on current ratios of MEMS. Here we show that by adding a gate electrode to memristors, the SET/RESET voltages in electrochemical memristors can be controlled enabling their applications in circuits with high input/output isolations. We discuss devices with 2 mV/dec sub-threshold slope and show that the gate field effect can be used to modify the SET/RESET voltages considerably. In addition to enabling very low power switches using memristors, the gate can also be used as a global RESET.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we have developed an electrostatic driven capacitive RF MEMS switch. The actuation voltage is applied to the actuation electrodes, and the DC voltage is isolated from the signal line and RF signals. Actuation area and capacitance area are separated. Thanks to this structure, both low actuation voltage and low up-state capacitance are achieved. The switch can be integrated in RF systems without additional circuits to isolate the DC voltage, so the system is simplified. The proposed switch is fabricated and tested. The insertion loss and isolation of the fabricated switch are 0.29 dB and 20.5 dB at 35 GHz, respectively. The actuation voltage is 18.3 V.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have made a quantitative study of the morphological and magnetic domain structures of 100 nm thick nanocrystalline cobalt films thermally evaporated on naturally oxidized Si(100) substrates. The morphological structure is composed of densely packed grains with the average grain size (35.6±0.8) nm. The grains exhibit no geometric alignment and no preferred elongation on the film surface. In the direction perpendicular to the film surface, the grains are aligned in columns. The films crystallize mainly in the hexagonal close-packed phase of cobalt and possess a crystallographic texture with the hexagonal axis perpendicular to the film surface. The magnetic domain structure consists of domains forming a maze stripe pattern with the average domain size (102±6) nm. The domains have their magnetizations oriented almost perpendicularly to the film surface. The domain wall energy, the domain wall thickness and the critical diameter for single-domain particle were determined.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Duplex stainless steels are high strength and corrosion resistant alloys extensively used in chemical and petrochemical industries. However, exposition to temperatures in the range 300–1000 °C leads to precipitation of different phases having a detrimental effect on the mechanical properties and on the corrosion resistance of the alloy. In this work, the microstructural evolution during aging of a UNS S32304 lean duplex stainless steel was investigated by scanning electron microscopy, transmission electron microscopy and magnetic force microscopy. Formation of secondary austenite as well as Cr2N and Cr23C6 precipitation and, consequently, a decrease of ferrite volume fraction were observed. EDX analysis indicated that secondary austenite is depleted in chromium which is detrimental to the corrosion resistance of the alloy. A variation of magnetic properties and Eddy current measurement parameters during aging was simultaneously detected and can be explained by the decrease of ferrite volume content. Therefore, Eddy current non-destructive testing can be successfully applied to detect the formation of deleterious phases during aging.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Super-paramagnetic core-shell microspheres were synthesized by ultrasonic assisted routine under low ultrasonic irradiation powers. Compared with conventional routine, ultrasonic effect could not only improve the uniformity of the core-shell structure of Fe3O4@SiO2, but shorten the synthesis time in large scale. Owing to their hydrophilicity and high surface charge, the Fe3O4@SiO2 microspheres could be dispersed well in distilled water to form homogeneous colloidal suspension. The suspensions have favorable magneto-chromatic ability that they sensitively exhibit brilliant colorful ribbons by magnetic attraction. The colorful ribbons, which distributed along the magnetic lines, make morphology of the magnetic fields become “visible” to naked eyed. Those colorful ribbons originate from strong magnetic interaction between the microspheres and magnetic fields. Furthermore, the magneto-chromatic performance is reversible as the colorful ribbons vanished rapidly with the removing of magnetic fields. The silica layer effectively enhanced the acid resistance and surface-oxidation resistance of theFe3O4@SiO2 microspheres, so they could exhibit stable magnetic nature and robust magneto-chromatic property in acid environment.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetized hydrophobic polymeric particles were prepared by suspension polymerization of styrene and divinylbenzene with the addition of magnetite (Fe3O4) functionalized with oleic acid (OA). The magnetic poly(STY-co-DVB) particles were characterized by Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), X-ray diffraction (XRD) and scanning electron microscopy (SEM). The results showed that the magnetic polymer particles fulfill the requirements for being used as matrix in the immobilization of microbial lipase from Candida rugosa by physical adsorption. The resulted immobilized derivative presented high catalytic activity in both aqueous and non-aqueous media. A comparative study between free and immobilized lipases showed a similar biochemical behavior, but with better hydrolytic activity at a pH range of 8.0–8.5. The patterns of heat stability indicated that the immobilization process also stabilizes the enzyme by a 50-fold improvement of thermal stability parameters (thermal deactivation and half-life time). Data on olive oil hydrolytic activities indicated that the Michaelis–Menten equation can be used to adjust data so as to calculate Kmand Vmax, which attained values of 1766 mM and 5870 µM g−1 min−1, respectively. Such values indicated that the immobilized system was subjected to mass transfer limitations. High operational stability (t½=1014 h) was achieved under repetitive batch runs in ester synthesis. The results indicated that the magnetized support particles can be very promising carriers for immobilizing enzymes in biotransformation reactions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Lithium substituted copper ferrite (LixCu(1−x)Fe2O4) nanoparticles have been successfully synthesized by chemical co-precipitation method. XRD analysis confirms the formation of Li substituted Cu ferrite with crystallite size in the range of 17–41 nm. The SEM and TEM microstructure of nanoparticle is well characterized and fine nature improves while increasing of Li concentration and also FTIR analysis exhibit the usual behaviour of ferrite materials. The dielectric properties of the material are increased with increase of concentration. The hysteresis loop is increased which is evident from the increase of saturation magnetization which implies that soft magnetic material has altered into hard magnetic material© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the hyperthermia response, (i.e., heating induced by an externally applied alternating magnetic field) and the simultaneous release of an anti-cancer drug (doxorubicin) by polymer-coated magnetite nanoparticles have been investigated. After describing the setup for hyperthermia measurements in suspensions of magnetic nanoparticles, the hyperthermia (represented by the rate of suspension heating and, ultimately, by the specific absorption rate or SAR) of magnetite nanoparticles (both bare and polymer-coated as drug nanocarriers) is discussed. The effect of the applied ac magnetic field on doxorubicin release is also studied, and it is concluded that the field does not interfere with the release process, demonstrating the double functionality of the investigated particles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This study is devoted to investigation of energy dissipation processes which happen in a magnetic fluid drop with compound magnet during its motion in cylindrical non magnetic container. The possibility of energy dissipation control by means of electromagnetic field is examined. It's found that a change of magnetic field of compound magnet can lead to both increase and decrease of oscillation decay time and relative damping factor can be varied in a range of ±35%.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Developing high efficiency rare earth alloy magnets at low cost is an economically hopeful way to expand their application area. In this study, magnetic properties of nanocomposite isotropic exchange coupled systems with the structure of Nd2Fe14B crystalline grains embedded in α-Fe matrices have been simulated by micromagnetic finite element method (FEM). The results have been analyzed by means of the effect of volume fraction of nanosized exchange coupling area between the magnetically hard Nd2Fe14B and soft α-Fe phase on magnetic properties of the exchange coupled Nd2Fe14B/α-Fe magnetic systems. The results show that the magnetic systems with the structure of Nd2Fe14B grains embedded in α-Fe matrices can have comparatively advanced magnetic properties with small amount of Nd2Fe14B components, because of efficient inter-phase exchange coupling between magnetically hard Nd2Fe14B grains and soft α-Fe matrix.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The dynamical responses of Blume-Capel (S=1) ferromagnet to the plane propagating (with fixed frequency and wavelength) and standing magnetic field waves are studied separately in two dimensions by extensive Monte Carlo simulation. Depending on the values of temperature, amplitude of the propagating magnetic field and the strength of anisotropy, two different dynamical phases are observed. For a fixed value of anisotropy and the amplitude of the propagating magnetic field, the system undergoes a dynamical phase transition from a driven spin wave propagating phase to a pinned or spin frozen state as the system is cooled down. The time averaged magnetisation over a full cycle of the propagating magnetic field plays the role of the dynamic order parameter. A comprehensive phase diagram is plotted in the plane formed by the amplitude of the propagating wave and the temperature of the system. It is found that the phase boundary shrinks inward as the anisotropy increases. The phase boundary, in the plane described by the strength of the anisotropy and temperature, is also drawn. This phase boundary was observed to shrink inward as the field amplitude increases.© 2016We estimate the efficiency and power of a thermal energy harvesting thermodynamic cycle using a magnetocaloric material as active substance. The thermodynamic cycle is computed using an equation of state, either extrapolated from experimental data or deduced using a phenomenological Landau model. The magnetic work is then compared to the maximum work. Afterwards power is estimated using a simple thermal exchange model. Simulations of different cycles for different working points illustrate the tradeoff between power and efficiency.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.For the development of energy efficient lightweight parts novel function integrating materials are needed. Concerning this field of application magnetorheological (MR) fluids, MR elastomers and MR composites are promising materials allowing the adjustment of mechanical properties by an external magnetic field. A key issue for operating such structures in praxis is the magneto-mechanical description. Most rheological properties are gathered at laboratory conditions for high magnetic flux densities and a single field direction, which does not correspond to real praxis conditions. Although anisotropic formation of superstructures can be observed in MR suspensions (Fig. 1) or experimenters intentionally polymerize MR elastomers with anisotropic superstructures these MR materials are usually described in an external magnetic field as uniform, isotropic materials. This is due to missing possibilities for experimentally measuring field angle dependent properties and ways of distinguishing between material properties and frictional effects. Just a few scientific works experimentally investigated the influence of different field angles (Ambacher et al., 1992; Grants et al., 1990; Kuzhir et al., 2003) [1–3] or the influence of surface roughness on the shear behaviour of magnetic fluids (Tang and Conrad, 1996) [4]. The aim of this work is the introduction of a novel field angle cell allowing the determination of anisotropic mechanical properties for various MR materials depending on the applied magnetic field angle.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The doping of liquid crystals with magnetic nanoparticles increases the magnetic susceptibility and the sensitivity to small magnetic fields. This offers interesting possibilities for controlling optical properties via external magnetic fields. The stabilization of magnetic nanoparticles in the liquid crystalline host, however, is challenging, since magnetic dipolar interactions and LC-mediated forces may result in their aggregation and even phase separation. So far, only few groups have investigated the long-term stability of these systems. In the present study, a set of magnetic iron oxide nanoparticles with different particle size, shape and surface properties was synthesized by thermal decomposition or co-precipitation. The magnetic nanoparticles were further integrated in a model liquid crystalline host (i.e., the lyotropic system potassium laurate/1-decanol/water) to investigate the effect of the different particle parameters on the stability of the resulting ferrolyotrope.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic Mn3+ ions in La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 are partially replaced by nonmagnetic Zn2+ ions to form La0.7Ca0.3Mn1−xZnxO3 compounds (x=0.0, 0.06, 0.08, and 0.1), and their magnetic and magnetocaloric properties are investigated. The Curie temperature decreases drastically from 245 to 70 K as x increases from 0 to 0.1. An analysis using the Banerjee's criterion of the experimental results for magnetization as a function of temperature and magnetic field indicates that the first-to-second order magnetic phase transformation occurs at a threshold composition of x=0.06, which is further supported by the universal curves of the normalized entropy change versus reduced temperature. The maximum magnetic entropy change measured at a magnetic field span of 50 kOe, which occurs near the Curie temperature, decreases from 10.30 to 2.15 J/kg K with the increase of x from 0.0 to 0.1. However, the relative cooling power, an important parameter for practical applications, shows a maximum value of 404 J/kg at x=0.08, which is 1.5 times greater than that observed for the undoped sample.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.On the base of molecular-statistical approach we study the phase transition between the ordered (ferromagnetic) and disordered (paramagnetic) phases in liquid-crystalline suspensions of magnetic nanoparticles in an external magnetic field. The free energy and equations of magnetic and orientational equilibrium are obtained in the framework of spherical approximation.© 2016The work is devoted to the theoretical investigation of the thermodynamic and magnetic properties of ferrofluids in applied magnetic field. Analytical expressions for the second and the third virial coefficients of dipolar hard spheres model were obtained by using the least-squares approximation to the simulation data (Elfimova et al., 2013 [4]). The expressions for the virial coefficients are presented as functions of the dipolar coupling constant λ and the Langevin parameter α. The analytical formulas for the virial coefficients were incorporated in to so-called logarithmic free energy theory (Elfimova et al., 2012 [8]). This theory yields the Helmholtz free energy and the magnetization. The comparison between theory and computer simulation shows good agreement for λ⩽2.The analytical expression of the Helmholtz free energy was also used to obtain a sedimentation equilibrium concentration profile of ferroparticles subjected to uniform magnetic and gravitational fields.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ultrasonic wave propagation in the aqueous magnetic fluid is investigated for different particle concentrations. The sound velocity decreases while acoustic impedance increases with increasing concentrations. The velocity anisotropy is observed upon application of magnetic field. The velocity anisotropy fits with Tarapov's theory suggests the presence of aggregates in the system. We report that these aggregates are thermodynamically unstable and the length of aggregate changes continuously with increasing concentration and, or magnetic field and resulted in a decrease in effective magnetic moment. The Taketomi's theory fits well with the experimental data suggesting that the particle clusters are aligned in the direction of the magnetic field. The radius of cluster found to increase with increasing concentration, and then decreases whereas the elastic force constant increases and then becomes constant. The increase in cluster radius indicates elongation of aggregate length due to tip-to-tip interaction of aggregates whereas for higher concentration, the lateral alignment is more favorable than tip-to-tip alignment of aggregates which reduces the cluster radius making elastic force constant to raise. Optical images show that the chains are fluctuating and confirming the lateral alignment of chains at higher fields.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This paper describes the characteristics of water flow induced by the bridge oscillation of magnetic fluid between two permanent magnets subject to an external alternating magnetic field. The magnetic fluid bridge is formed in the space between a pair of identical coaxial cylindrical permanent magnets submerged in water. The direction of alternating magnetic field is parallel /antiparallel to the magnetic field produced by two permanent magnets. The magnetic fluid bridge responds to the external alternating magnetic field with harmonic oscillation. The oscillation of magnetic fluid bridge generates water flow around the bridge. Water flow is visualized using a thin milk film at the container bottom. Water flows are observed with a high-speed video camera analysis system. The experimental results show that the flow pattern induced by the bridge oscillation depends on the Keulegan–Carpenter number.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This study was carried out to develop a miniature magnetic fluid (MF) seal working in a liquid environment. The miniature MF seal is intended for use in a catheter blood pump. The requirements for the MF seal included a size of less than Ø4×4.5 mm, shaft diameter of 1 mm, sealing pressure of 200 mmHg, shaft speed of up to 40000 rpm, and life of one month. The miniature MF seal was composed of an NdFeB magnet (Ø4×Ø2×1) sandwiched between two pole pieces (Ø4×Ø1.1×0.5). A shield (Ø4×Ø1.2×1.5) was placed on the pole piece facing the liquid to minimize the influence of pump flow on the MF. The seal was installed on a Ø1 shaft. A seal was formed by injecting MF (Ms: 47.8 kA/m and η: 0.5 Pa·sec) into the gap between the pole pieces and the shaft. Total volume of the MF seal was 44 μL. A sealing pressure of 370 mmHg was obtained at motor speeds of 0-40,000 rpm. The seal remained perfect for 10 days in saline under the condition of a pump flow of 1.5 L/min (The test was terminated in accordance with plans). The seal remained intact after ethylene oxide sterilization during which the seal was exposed to high pressures. In conclusion, the newly developed MF seal will be useful for a catheter pump.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.It is shown experimentally that, depending on the relative orientation of the gravity and the thermal gradient and on the pre-history of experiment, the application of a uniform external vertical magnetic field to a spherical cavity filled with magnetic ferrofluid can either enhance or suppress a convective heat transfer.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Numerical analyses of magnetic fluid especially for fast phenomena such as the transition among interface profiles require rigorous as well as efficient method under arbitrary interface profiles and applied magnetic field distributions. Preceded by the magnetic analysis for this purpose, the present research has attempted to investigate interface dynamic phenomena. As an example of these phenomena, this paper shows the wavenumber spectrum of the interface profile and the sum of interface stresses changing in time, since the change of the balance among the interface stresses causing the transition can be observed conveniently. As time advances, wavenumber components increase due to the nonlinear interaction of waves. It is further argued that such analyses should be validated by the law of conservation of energy, the relation between the interface energy density and the interface stress, and the magnetic laws.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This work is devoted to the structural study of complex solutions of magnetic nanoparticles with lysozyme amyloid fibrils due to possible ordering of such system by applying the external magnetic field. The interaction of magnetic nanoparticles with amyloid fibrils has been followed by atomic force microscopy and small-angle X-ray scattering. It has been observed that magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) adsorb to lysozyme amyloid fibrils. It was found that MNPs alter amyloids structures, namely the diameter of lysozyme amyloid fibrils is increased whereas the length of fibrils is decreased. In the same time MNPs do not change the helical pitch significantly.© 2016 Elsevier LtdA study of the polycrystalline silicon depletion effect generated from the subsequent thermal process is undertaken. Although phosphorus out-diffusion, which causes the polycrystalline silicon depletion effect, is increased with an increase in the thermal process temperature, the polysilicon depletion effect is stronger when inducing rapid thermal annealing in lower temperatures of 600–800 °C than in 900 °C. This indicates that the major reason for the polysilicon depletion effect is not the out-diffusion of phosphorus but the electrical deactivation of phosphorus, which is segregated at the grain boundary. Therefore, by increasing the size of polycrystalline silicon grain, we can efficiently reduce the polysilicon depletion effect and enhance the tolerance to deactivation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We study magnetic suspensions with different concentrations of ferromagnetic nanoparticles in a spherical container under the action of a rotating magnetic field. Experimental data on the concentration dependence of the rotational effect, viz. the torque exerted by the magnetic field, are presented. We explain the observed torque characteristics using a model that takes into account field-driven aggregation of the magnetic nanoparticles in stationary or slowly rotating fields. At sufficiently high rotation rates, the rotating magnetic field obviously destroys these aggregates, which results in a decreasing torque with increasing rotation frequency of the field.© 2016Two series of copper ferrites are prepared using the chemical compositional formula Cu 1.0−3y Fe 2.0−2x Mo x+y O4.0. The resistivity is found to decrease for lower values of Mo while it increases for higher values of Mo. Variation of resistivity as a function of temperature exhibited four regions with three values of transition temperature indicating contribution of different conduction mechanism to each of the region. Significantly in the region –I conduction is reflected its non-dependence of temperature. Further evaluated activation energy values of C series and tetragonal structured materials are higher than other ferrites. These results are explained with different possible mechanisms.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.New biocompatible composites with adjustable melting point in the range of 30–140 °C, consisting of magnetite nanoparticles embedded into a matrix of meltable dextran fatty acid ester are presented which can be softened under an induced alternating magnetic field (AMF). The chosen thermoplastic magnetic composites have a melting range close to human body temperature and can be easily shaped into disk or coating film under melting. The composite disks were loaded with green fluorescent protein (GFP) as a model protein. Controlled release of the protein was realized with high frequent alternating magnetic field of 20 kA/m at 400 kHz. These results showed that under an AMF the release of GFP from magnetic composite was accelerated compared to the control sample without exposure to AMF. Furthermore a texturing of particles in the polymer matrix by a static magnetic field was investigated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We review the results of the study of magnetite, maghemite and nickel ferrite nanoparticles (NPs), applying for magnetic fluids, using Mössbauer spectroscopy with a high velocity resolution and magnetization measurements. The Mössbauer spectra of these NPs were fitted using a large number of magnetic sextets reflecting NPs complicity. The presence of polar molecules at the magnetite surface in magnetic fluid increases the NPs magnetic moment and the median hyperfine magnetic field. However, surface coating of maghemite NPs with dimeracptosuccinic acid decreases the median hyperfine magnetic field. An example of nickel ferrite NPs demonstrated a new physical model based on distribution of Ni2+ in the local microenvironment of Fe3+ which can explain a large number of magnetic sextets in the Mössbauer spectra measured with a high velocity resolution.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In our previous study (see Ref. Attaran et al. (in press) [1]) we formulated a continuum model for ferrogels considering them as multicomponent materials. In the present work a reduced model for ferrogels is presented consisting only of a polymer network (P) and fixed magnetic particles (f). The reduced model is solved using the finite element method where the only degrees of freedom are mechanical displacement and magnetic potential. Elongation and contraction of a ferrogel are observed parallel and perpendicular to the applied magnetic field direction, respectively. These results are in a good qualitative agreement with experimental results. With our modeling approach, we were able to investigate (i) the influence of the magnetic field on the polymer gel containing magnetic particles and (ii) the resulting mechanical deformation of a ferrogel.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic fluid emulsions with low interfacial tension have been studied experimentally. The shape deformation of the dispersed phase microdrops under the action of comparatively weak magnetic field has been observed. The effect of microdrops deformation on the macroscopic properties of the emulsion has been investigated. The anisotropic character of emulsion properties in the presence of external magnetic field has been demonstrated. The emulsion dielectric permeability has been measured as a function of the magnetic field strength, the emulsion concentration, and the angle between electrical and magnetic fields. The influence of the droplets deformation under the magnetic field on the rheological behavior of the emulsion has been observed. The obtained results have been analyzed and discussed.© 2016 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents three methods to experimentally extract the thermal resistance of bipolar transistors taking into account the Early effect. The approaches are improved variants of recently-proposed techniques relying on common-base DC measurements. The accuracy is numerically verified by making use of a compact model calibrated on I–V characteristics of state-of-the-art SOG BJTs and SiGe:C HBTs.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We propose the results of research on the magnetic properties of magnetoactive elastomers containing particles of a hard magnetic filler. According to our understanding, the mechanism of re-magnetizing of the composite is based on two competing processes, being the re-magnetizing of the magnetic filler and mechanical rotation of particles inside of the polymer matrix.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We introduce a binary colloidal system with an exceptionally strong magneto-optical response. Its induced optical birefringence at even low magnetic fields (in the mT range) reaches a value with the same order of magnitude as that of nematic liquid crystals. This system is based on a binary mixture of plate-like, non-magnetic pigment nanoparticles and a small volume fraction (<1v%) of spherical magnetic nanoparticles. In the field-free state, the suspension is isotropic. Birefringence is caused by an alignment of the pigment platelets, commanded by shape-anisotropic agglomerates of the magnetic nanoparticles in an external magnetic field. We give a semiquantitative discussion about this.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present arguments for a mass term in the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation based on the notion of mass as an inertial quantity. From trajectories of skyrmions in a confining potential and a 1-D potential we see evidence for a mass-inertia connection. We derive an expression for the effective mass for skyrmions, 1.6ε×10−23kg, where ε accounts for the mismatch between the local magnetic moment induced on the conduction electrons and its corresponding effect on the current-driven skyrmion and varies from 10−2 to 1.© 2016Temperature sensitive magnetic fluid has a great potential with high performance heat transport ability as well as long distance energy (heat) transporting. In the present study experimental set-up was newly designed and constructed in order to measure basic heat transport characteristics under various magnetic field conditions. Angular dependence for the device (heat transfer section) was also taken into consideration for a sake of practical applications. The energy transfer characteristic (heat transport capability) in the magnetically-driven heat transport (cooling) device using the binary TSMF was fully investigated with the set-up. The obtained results indicate that boiling of the organic mixture (before the magnetic fluid itself reaching boiling point) effectively enhances the heat transfer as well as boosting the flow to circulate in the closed loop by itself. A long-distance heat transport of 5 m is experimentally confirmed, transferring the thermal energy of 35.8 W, even when the device (circulation loop) is horizontally placed. The highlighted results reveal that the proposed cooling device is innovative in a sense of transporting substantial amount of thermal energy (heat) as well as a long distance heat transport. The development of the magnetically-driven heat transport device has a great potential to be replaced for the conventional heat pipe in application of thermal engineering.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present systematic experimental investigation and micromagnetic simulation of ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) in planar rectangular permalloy microstripes. The experimental microwave absorption was studied for different sample orientations in an external magnetic field. To analyze the FMR modes we developed the algorithm for the simulation of spectrum and spatial distribution of magnetization oscillations in dependence on swept external magnetic field based on numerical solution of Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation. It was shown good agreement between experimental and model FMR spectra that enables the reliable visualization for spatial distributions of oscillating magnetization in modes of spin-wave resonances for different excitation conditions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ferrogels (FG) based on poly(acrylamide) (PAAm) with embedded multidomain iron magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) were synthesized by radical polymerization in water. Iron MNPs prepared by the electrical explosion of wire were spherical in shape and have an average diameter around 100 nm. MNPs were modified by a surfactant – oleic acid to improve their dispersion in water. DLVO theoretical consideration was done to understand the stability of dispersions. By microcalorimetry it was shown that the oleic layer on the surface of MNPs prevents their interaction with PAAm network of FG. Mechanical testing of the compression modulus and the deformation of FGs in magnetic field show up their prospectiveness as a material for magnetically sensitive MEMS and actuators.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we briefly review magnetic separation of ferrofluids composed of large magnetic particles (60 nm of the average size) possessing an induced dipole moment. Such ferrofluids exhibit field-induced phase separation at relatively low particle concentrations (∼0.8 vol%) and magnetic fields (∼10 kA/m). Particle aggregates appearing during the phase separation are extracted from the suspending fluid by magnetic field gradients much easier than individual nanoparticles in the absence of phase separation. Nanoparticle capture by a single magnetized microbead and by multi-collector systems (packed bed of spheres and micro-pillar array) has been studied both experimentally and theoretically. Under flow and magnetic fields, the particle capture efficiency Λ decreases with an increasing Mason number for all considered geometries. This decrease may become stronger for aggregated magnetic particles (Λ∝Ma−1.7) than for individual ones (Λ∝Ma−1) if the shear fields are strong enough to provoke aggregate rupture. These results can be useful for development of new magneto-microfluidic immunoassays based on magnetic nanoparticles offering a much better sensitivity as compared to presently used magnetic microbeads.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, we studied the effect of minor Si addition on the magneto-caloric effect (MCE) of the Gd50Co50 metallic glass. The Gd50Co50−xSix (x=2, 5) as-spun ribbons show typical amorphous characteristics in structure and magneto-caloric behaviors. The peak values for the magnetic entropy change (−ΔSmpeak) of the Gd50Co50−xSix (x=0, 2, 5) metallic glasses increase significantly with the addition of Si. The mechanism for the enhanced MCE by minor addition of Si was investigated by revealing the relationship between −ΔSmpeak and the Curie temperature in the Gd-Co-based amorphous ribbons.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Thermal and hysteretic magnetic properties of La2/3Ca1/3MnO3 nanoparticles were studied using Monte Carlo simulations, with emphasis on the influence of anisotropy. In this work, several nanoparticle sizes ranging from 2.32 to 11.58 nm were analyzed and their properties were compared to those of the bulk material. The magnetic behavior of the material was modeled using the three dimensional Heisenberg model with nearest neighbor interactions. Furthermore, both uniaxial and Néel anisotropies were considered for core and surface magnetic sites respectively. Deviations in the critical temperature and coercive field were observed for nanoparticles when compared with those of the bulk material. In addition to these properties, the special spin configurations that arise from the competition between the exchange, anisotropy and external magnetic field were also studied. All these effects are interpreted in terms of the surface properties such as the Néel anisotropy and the decrease in the coordination number.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Structural and magnetic properties of finite sized NiO nanoparticles are investigated with synchrotron X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electron microscopy, magnetometer and ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectroscopy. A minor Ni phase is detected with synchrotron XRD, attributed to the oxygen defects in the NiO core. A considerable exchange bias of ~100 Oe is observed at 50 K and it drops abruptly and vanishes above 150 K, in association with the reduction of frozen spins. FMR data indicate a strong interaction between ferromagnetic (FM) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) phases below 150 K, consistent with the picture of isolated FM clusters in AFM matrix.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the magnetic behavior of the cylindrical nanowire, consisting of a ferromagnetic core of spin-1 atoms surrounded by a ferromagnetic shell of spin-1 atoms is studied in the presence of a random crystal field interaction. Based on Metropolis algorithm, the Monte Carlo simulation has been used to investigate the effects of the concentration of the random crystal field p, the crystal field D and the shell exchange interaction Js on the phase diagrams and the hysteresis behavior of the system. Some characteristic behaviors have been found, such as the first and second-order phase transitions joined by tricritical point for appropriate values of the system parameters, triple and isolated critical points can be also found. Depending on the Hamiltonian parameters, single, double and para hysteresis regions are explicitly determined.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Hollow microspheres of Ce3+ doped NiCo-ferrites were synthesized by template-based-deposition and surface reaction method with carbon sphere as the template. The phase structure, morphology, magnetic properties and wave absorbing properties of the sample were characterized by X-ray powder diffraction(XRD), Scanning electronic microscopy(SEM), Vibration sample magnetometer (VSM) and a network vector analyzer (NVA), respectively. The results indicated that the particle size of the carbon sphere sample prepared by hydrothermal method was about 0.5 µm and the particle size of the Ni0.5Co0.5Fe2O4 sample prepared by template-based method was about 300 nm. The influence of the amount of rare earth element on the magnetic and absorbing properties of sample was studied. The saturation magnetization and coercivity decreased gradually with the increase of the content of Ce. When the content of Ce was 0.02, the maximal saturation magnetization value and coercivity was 75.72 emu•g−1 and 789.88 Oe, respectively. The associated ferrite hollow spheres have good absorbing performance, and the return loss value was −18.8 dB at 5500 MHz.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The validity of the Steinmetz law, describing the total energy losses as a function of maximum induction from 0.1 to 1.2 T has been verified in the frequency range from 100 Hz to 1.2 kHz for iron-based soft magnetic composites (SMCs), with the aim to determine the coefficients in Steinmetz law. The Bertotti's statistical model was used to modify the Steinmetz law, for the hysteresis energy loss Wdc of SMCs magnetized in dc magnetic field, to the model for total energy losses Wt when an ac magnetic field is applied. In this case the total energy losses Wt consist of hysteresis losses to which the dynamic energy losses Wd, consisting of interparticle eddy current losses Wcinter, intraparticle eddy current losses Wcintraand excess losses We, were added. The validity of this model was experimentally proven for the investigated Fe-based SMCs at maximum inductions Bm ranging from 0.1 to 1.2 T.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A growing interest of automotive industry in the use of high performance steels is observed. These materials are obtained thanks to complex manufacturing processes whose parameters fluctuations lead to strong variations of microstructure and mechanical properties. The on-line magnetic non-destructive monitoring is a relevant response to this problem but it requires fast models sensitive to different parameters of the forming process. The plastic deformation is one of these important parameters. Indeed, ferromagnetic materials are known to be sensitive to stress application and especially to plastic strains. In this paper, a macroscopic approach using the kinematic hardening is proposed to model this behavior, considering a plastic strained material as a two phase system. Relationship between kinematic hardening and residual stress is defined in this framework. Since stress fields are multiaxial, an uniaxial equivalent stress is calculated and introduced inside the so-called magneto-mechanical multidomain modeling to represent the effect of plastic strain. The modeling approach is complemented by many experiments involving magnetic and magnetostrictive measurements. They are carried out with or without applied stress, using a dual-phase steel deformed at different levels. The main interest of this material is that the mechanically hard phase, soft phase and the kinematic hardening can be clearly identified thanks to simple experiments. It is shown how this model can be extended to single phase materials.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of La0.6Pr0.4Mn2Si2 compound were measured in wide range of temperature, magnetic field and hydrostatic pressure. The structural study up to 10 GPa confirmed the existence of critical Mn-Mn distance 0.2883 nm for the ferromagnetic to antiferromagnetic transition at room temperature. The results demonstrated the crucial role of the volume in the suppression of the ferromagnetic phase above the transition temperature T1=168 K under pressure. The huge pressure shift of the transition temperature T1, dT1/dp=230 K/GPa, was observed. Based on our magnetization measurement the low temperature transition at T2=30 K is connected with reorientation of Mn moment and the rare-earth sublattice is not ordered in this case. The direct magnetocaloric measurement showed moderate values of the adiabatic temperature change connected with the magnetic transition at Tc and T1 and confirmed the first order character of the transition at T1 and second order character of the transition at Tc.© 2016Highly ordered Fe3Pt nanowires (NWs) and nanotubes (NTs) embedded in anodic aluminum oxide (AAO) template have been fabricated by dc electrodeposition method. Response of heat treatment on structural and magnetic properties of the samples has been studied with and without the presence of magnetic field (1 T). X-Ray Diffraction analysis shows chemically ordered L12 face centered cubic (FCC) as the dominant phase for Fe3Pt NWs and heat treatment improves crystallinity with retained its phase. Whereas, Fe3Pt NTs show amorphous behavior with and without magnetic field annealing. Furthermore, magnetic properties of the samples have been investigated by vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). Magnetic parameters of Fe3Pt including magnetic coercivity, saturation magnetization, squareness and shape of MH-loops have been investigated as a result of simple and MF annealing.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Micromagnetic simulation of a current-driven vortex domain wall motion in a film with in-plane anisotropy was carried out. The current density values j>jc were considered corresponding to the nonstationary motion, with the domain wall structure dynamic transformation occurred. A nonlinear dependence of the jc value on the film thickness was obtained. The nonstationary motion regime existence restricted the possibility to increase the domain wall velocity by increasing j and decreasing the damping parameter.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the present paper we studied the structural, magnetotransport and thermopower properties of a series of polycrystalline La0.7−xSmxBa0.3MnO3 (0≤x≤0.2) compounds which were synthesized by conventional solid state reaction techniques. The Rietveld refinement of the X-ray diffraction pattern predicts the formation of single-phase compositions and doping of La3+ by Sm3+ ion converted the chemical structure form rhombohedral (R-3C) to orthorhombic (Imma) The scanning electron microscopy show clean smooth and densified structure images be a sign of good crystalline nature of the samples. The temperature dependent electrical resistivity is measured by standard four-probe method between 5 and 300 K exhibits Metal–Insulator Transition MIT which shows the decreasing trend with increasing Sm doping content and metallic state (T<Tp2) that signifies importance of electron-electron, electron–phonon and electron-spin fluctuation scattering process. The metal–insulator transition temperature (Tp2) is observed which decreases with the increase in doping content when magnetic field is applied. The resistivity data in high temperature region (T>Tp2) are explained within the framework of variable range hopping (VRH) and small polaron hopping (SPH) models. The application of magnetic field suppresses the resistivity in entire temperature range and with increasing the Sm3+ content the samples showed very high magnetoresistance. The thermoelectric power (S) of the reported samples exhibit a crossover from positive to negative value and it increases in doped samples. The analysis of thermoelectric power data confirms the applicability of the small polaron hopping model in high temperature region and in low temperature fitted to an equation containing diffusion, magnon drag, phonon drag and electron-spin fluctuation term. An appropriate justification for the observed behavior is specified.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This contribution reports for the 1st time on the magnetic behavior of CO3O4 nanoparticles synthesized by a “green” process using an Aspalathus linearis’ leaves natural extract. More accurately magnetic behavior of CO3O4 nanoparticles successfully biosynthesized was investigated using vibrating sample magnetometer. The magnetization behavior for the samples manifests a combination of size dependent antiferromagnetic and paramagnetic behaviors, respectively, for the core and shell of the nanoparticles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanohybrids of CoFe2O4/MWCNTs with increasing MWCNTs loading from 0.0%, 0.5%, 1%, 1.5%, 2% and 5% by weight were prepared by a novel method of dispersion using ortho-xylene as a dispersive medium for the first time. In our current research, nanoparticles of cobalt ferrite were synthesized via wet chemical co-precipitation route. Non-magnetic MWCNTs matrix was dispersed uniformly in the synthesized ferrite nanoparticles using ortho-xylene as a polar solvent. and Impedance Analyzer were utilized to effectively investigate the synthesized nanohybrid. The obtained X-Ray Powder Diffraction (XRD) images confirm the pure Face Centered Cubic (FCC) single phase of CoFe2O4/MWCNTs nanohybrid. The average crystallite size remains within the range of 26±6 nm. Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM) results showed aggregation of ferrite nanoparticles on MWCNTs. Fourier Transform Infrared Spectroscopy (FTIR) was utilized to study the band positions. The dielectric properties were found to be massively enhanced with increased loadings of MWCNTs. The dielectric constant (ε/) was massively enhanced from 45 for pure cobalt ferrites to 4.32×1012 for 5% MWCNTs loading at 100 Hz. The dielectric and tangent losses also increased from 21 and 0.47 for pure cobalt ferrites to 2.33×1017 and 5.39×104 at 100 Hz for 5% MWCNTs loading respectively indicating that this area of research should further be exploited in the realm of super capacitors applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.First principles generalized gradient full potential density-functional calculations were performed to predict the optical and magneto-optical (MO) properties of the chalcopyrite compounds ZnTMO2, TM=Cr, Mn, Fe, Co and Ni. Detailed investigation of the electronic band structure and density of states is reported. The optical properties in the 0–8 eV energy range are analyzed in terms of band structure transitions. As for the magneto–optical properties, our results show that the studied compounds have peaks in the Kerr rotation ranging from infrared to ultraviolet radiation, with ZnFeO2 having the highest Kerr rotation angle of 10° and −8.46° at 0.35 eV and 4.59 eV, respectively. The peaks in the Kerr spectra were assigned to the optical and magneto–optic contributions. Our calculated function of merit for these compounds indicates that these compounds might be useful for technological application in high density storage.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.An unconventional cold rolling scheme (inclined rolling at 0°, 30°, 45°, 90° during second-stage cold rolling process) was adopted to process grain-oriented silicon steel based on strip casting process. The influences of inclination angles on microstructure, texture, inhibitor and magnetic properties were studied by a combination of EBSD, XRD and TEM. It was found that the α-fiber texture was weakened and γ-fiber was strengthened in cold rolled sheet with increase in inclination angle. The primary recrystallization sheet exhibited more homogeneous microstructure with relatively strong γ-fiber, medium α-fiber texture, weak λ-fiber texture and Goss component at high inclination angles. Fine and homogeneous inhibitors were obtained after primary annealing with increase in inclination angle from 0° to 90° because of more uniform deformation after inclined rolling. The grain-oriented silicon steel experienced completely secondary recrystallization at various inclination angles after final annealing process, with superior magnetic properties at 0° and 90°. Furthermore, Goss nuclei capable of final secondary recrystallization in strip casting process newly formed both in-grain shear bands and grain boundaries region during second-stage cold rolling and subsequent annealing process, which is different from the well-accepted results that Goss texture originated from the subsurface layer of the hot rolled sheet or during intermediate annealing process. In addition, the Goss texture that nucleated in-grain shear bands was weaker but more accurate as compared to that in grain boundaries region.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Owing to the easy magnetic separation from water for reuse, magnetic nanoparticles have drawn great interest as adsorbents. Herein hydrous zirconia-coated magnetite nanoparticles (Fe3O4@ZrO2) were created by a facile method and a bench–scale study was undertaken to evaluate its effectiveness and mechanism to remove phosphate at low concentrations. Results indicated that phosphate removal by Fe3O4@ZrO2 was fast (95% of phosphate removal within 10 min) and nearly complete removal could be achieved at the adsorbent dosage >0.6 g/L. In tap water or wastewater where competitive anions coexist, regulation of pH was found to be quite effective to augment the performance of phosphate removal. In pH–lowered adsorption systems, phosphate removal followed a good pattern similarly to pure water, i.e., a continuous high efficiency removal followed by a rapid saturation. Adsorption–desorption–regeneration studies showed that Fe3O4@ZrO2 could be repeatedly used for phosphate removal and adsorbed phosphate could be stripped for recovery. The fractionation of adsorbed phosphorus suggested that NaOH-P fraction was dominant. We also found that the adsorption reaction of phosphate with Fe3O4@ZrO2 shifted the isoelectric point of Fe3O4@ZrO2 from ~9.0 to ~3.0. FTIR measurements further showed the direct coordination of phosphate onto zirconium by replacement of hydroxyl groups. The formation of the monodentate (ZrO)PO2(OH) complex was proposed.© 2016We have been developed facile and ecofriendly method for the synthesis of Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) using an aqueous extract of Pisum sativum peels (PS) is used as reducing and capping agent. The as synthesized PS-Fe3O4 MNPs are characterized by diverse techniques such as FTIR, powder XRD, TEM, BET and Raman spectroscopy measurements. The results show that the obtained Fe3O4 nanoparticles exhibits high specific surface area (∼17.6 m2/g) and agglomerated spherical in shape with the size range of 20–30 nm. The magnetic properties of PS-Fe3O4 MNPs sample clearly exhibits ferromagnetic nature with a saturation magnetization of 64.2 emu/g. Further, the catalytic properties of PS-Fe3O4 MNPs for degradation of Methyl orange (MO) dye in aqueous solution have been investigated by UV–visible spectroscopy. The results show that PS-Fe3O4 MNPs is an efficient catalyst for degradation of Methyl orange dye than previously reported ones.© 2016Nanoparticles of GdMnO3 (GMO) are prepared by sol-gel method. To enhance the magnetic property and also to obtain the magnetic ordering at room temperature (RT), nanoparticles of GMO are incorporated in the matrix of CoFe2O4 (CFO). Desired crystallographic phases of CFO, GMO and GMO-CFO are confirmed by analyzing X-ray diffractrograms (XRD) using Rietveld method. The average size of nanoparticles and their distribution, crystallographic phase, nanocrystallinity etc. are studied by high-resolution transmission electron microscope (HRTEM). Magnetic hysteresis loops (M-H) of GMO-CFO under zero field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) conditions are observed at different temperatures down to 5 K. Magnetization vs. temperature (M-T) under ZFC and FC conditions are also recorded. Interestingly, exchange bias (EB) is found at low temperature which suggests the encapsulation of the ferromagnetic (FM) nanoparticles of GMO by the ferrimagnetic nanoparticles of CFO below ~100 K. Enhanced magnetization, EB effect and RT magnetic ordering of GMO-CFO would be interesting for both theoretical and experimental investigations.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present an ab initio study of structural and magnetic properties of coherent Co and Ni thin films on Cu(111) and Au(111) substrates with thicknesses of up to 6 monolayers. All studied films on Cu(111) substrates prefer structures close their ground state (hcp for Co and fcc for Ni), whereas only the hcp stacking sequence has been found for both films on Au(111) substrates. All studied films exhibit instability of the first monolayer with respect to decomposition into 2-monolayer- or 3-monolayer-high islands, which is in agreement with experimental findings. All studied films are also ferromagnetic, nevertheless the Ni/Cu(111) films reduce their magnetic moments in the layer adjacent to the substrate due to a stronger Cu–Ni interaction at the interface. The magnetic anisotropy of a Co film does not depend on the film thickness: all the studied Co/Au(111) films exhibit a perpendicular magnetic anisotropy, whereas all the Co/Cu(111) films prefer in-plane magnetization. On the other hand, both Ni films change their preference for in-plane orientation of their easy axis to out-of-plane orientation at a critical thickness of 2 monolayers, however, the magnetic anisotropy energies for films thicker than 1 monolayer are smaller than 1 meV/Ni atom. These behaviors of magnetic anisotropy do not depend on the structure of the studied films.© 2016 Elsevier LtdIn the study, Al-doped ZnO nanoparticles (Al-ZnO NPs) were prepared by the decomposition of zinc acetate solid solution. The X-ray diffraction results showed that Al3+ was successfully doped without the formation of Al and Al2O3 impurity phases. The less Al-doping did not change the hexagonal wurtzite crystal structure of ZnO. The ratio of Al to Al + Zn (9.05%) measured by the energy dispersive X-ray also confirmed the formation of Al-ZnO. The Al-ZnO NPs were used as the photoanode material to prepare CdS/CdSe-sensitized solar cell. Compared with the cell based on commercial ZnO NPs (C-ZnO), the short-circuit current density and the fill factor of the cell were increased from 5.8 mA/cm2 and 34.1% (C-ZnO) to 7.78 mA/cm2 and 48.7% (Al-ZnO), respectively. The cell efficiency was increased from 1.01% (C-ZnO) to (1.9%) (Al-ZnO) and the increase percentage reached 88.1%. The results of electrochemical impedance spectroscopy and open-circuit voltage-decay suggested the lower carrier transport resistance and the longer electron lifetime of Al-ZnO-based cell.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Copper ferrite of spinel crystal structure was synthesized in the form of nano-particles using citrate-gel auto-combustion method. The sample morphology and composition were identified using scanning electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction, and X-ray spectroscopy. The latter technique reveals an inverse spinel structure with Jahn-Teller tetragonal distortion. The static magnetization was measured using vibrating sample magnetometer. Magnetic force microscopy was used in combination with the magnetization data to demonstrate the finite size effect of the magnetic spins and their casting behavior due to the introduction of copper ions in the tetrahedral magnetic sub-lattices, which results in tetragonal distorting the spinel structure of the copper ferrite. The magnetic properties of materials are a result of the collective behavior of the magnetic spins, and magnetic force microscopy can probe the collective behavior of the magnetic spins in copper ferrite, yet providing a sufficient resolution to map the effects below the micrometer size scale, such as the magnetic spin canting. A theoretical study was done to clarify the finite size effect of Jahn-Teller distortion on the magnetic properties of the material. When the particles are in the nano-scale, below the single domain size, their magnetic properties are very sensitive to their size change.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The low temperature magnetic properties of nanopowders of CoFe2O4 and of CoFe2O4/FeCo-FeO with average particle size of about 6 nm were investigated for temperatures down to 5 K and for applied magnetic fields up to 350 kOe. Highly enhanced coercive fields were obtained for the CoFe2O4 nanoparticles. The values of the saturation magnetization MS and of the anisotropy constant K1 were also found to be enhanced for the nanocomposite powder sample. The overall results are discussed in terms of a particle model which takes into account a thin amorphous layer present in the CoFe2O4 particles and due to a FeCo-FeO layer grown during an annealing procedure. Moreover, the temperature dependence of K1 was found to be in good agreement with a model proposed by Tachiki.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.First-principles calculations based on density functional theory and quasi-harmonic Debye model are used to investigate the high-pressure and high-temperature physical properties, including the lattice constant, magnetic moment, density of states, pressure-volume-temperature relationship, bulk modulus, thermal expansivity, heat capacity, and Grüneisen parameter for the new Mn-based full-Heusler alloy Mn2RuSi in CuHg2Ti-type structure. The optimized equilibrium lattice constant is consistent with experimental and other theoretical results. The calculated total spin magnetic moment remains an integral value of 2.0 μB in the lattice constant range of 5.454–5.758 Å, and then decreases very slowly with the decrease of lattice constant to 5.333 Å. By the spin resolved density of states calculations, we have shown that Mn2RuSi compound presents half-metallic ferrimagnetic properties under the equilibrium lattice constant. The effects of temperature and pressure on bulk modulus, thermal expansivity, heat capacity, and Grüneisen parameter are opposite, which are consistent with a compression rate of volume. Furthermore, the results show that the effect of temperature is larger than pressure for heat capacity and the effect of high temperature and pressure on thermal expansion coefficient is small. All the properties of Mn2RuSi alloy are summarized in the pressure range of 0–100 GPa and the temperature up to 1200 K.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The structures and magnetic properties of YMn1−xCrxO3 (x=0-0.1) were investigated in this study. Powder x-ray diffraction shows that YMn1−xCrxO3 (x=0-0.1) maintains a hexagonal structure with P63cm space group, as observed for YMnO3. The temperature dependence of magnetization indicates that the magnetization of YMn1−xCrxO3 increases as Cr doping concentration increases at low temperatures, and the spin-glass state appeared in the Cr doped samples. The antiferromagnetic transition temperature increases in the Cr-doped YMnO3, which is originated from the magnetic coupling between the Mn3+ ions in the inter-plane. The spin glass phase providing a pinning force from some frozen spins to the rotatable spins gives the key to explain the exchange bias effects.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The influences of the crystallographic orientation and morphological alignment upon the magnetic anisotropic behavior of polycrystalline materials were investigated. Microstructures obtained in eutectic Mn-Sb alloys via directional solidification simultaneously displayed crystallographic orientation and morphological alignment. Both the crystallographic orientation and the morphological alignment were able to induce magnetic anisotropy in the alloys, wherein the influence of the crystallographic orientation and the morphological alignment upon the magnetic anisotropic behavior of the alloys strongly depended upon their directions and exhibited either mutual promotion or competition. These findings may provide useful guidance for the fabrication design of functional magnetic materials.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic shaping problem is studied for the situation where a cylindrical column of a perfectly conducting fluid is deformed by the magnetic field of a system of linear current-carrying conductors. Equilibrium is achieved due to the balance of capillary and magnetic pressures. Two two-parametric families of exact solutions of the problem are obtained with the help of conformal mapping technique. In accordance with them, the column essentially deforms in the cross section up to its disintegration.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Possible equilibrium shapes of the free surface of a conducting fluid layer subjected to oscillating tangential magnetic field are studied. Exact solution corresponding to the formation of rupture in a fluid layer is derived using the conformal mapping method. The width of the rupture has been defined; it depends on the problem parameters, viz. the value of the external magnetic field and the surface tension coefficient.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) nanoparticles were synthesized at the different pH values of starting solution, adjusted by NH4OH, using solution combustion method. Theoretical calculations and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy analysis were carried out for determination and controlling the chelated species in solution. The phase evolution, surface area, morphology and magnetic properties of the combusted CoFe2O4 powders have been investigated by thermal analysis, X-ray diffractometry, electron microscopy, adsorption–desorption and vibrating sample magnetometer. The combustion rate mainly depends on pH which affects the phase and crystallite size. Furthermore, the specific surface area of the porous CoFe2O4 powders decreases from 66.25 to 27.09 m2/g by the increase of pH from 2 to 10. The combusted CoFe2O4 powders exhibit ferromagnetic properties which the highest saturation magnetization of ~63.7 emu/g was achieved at pH of 2. Furthermore, the coercivity increases from 1112 to 1225 Oe by the increase of pH due to the decreasing of crystallite size.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanostructured magnets benefiting from efficient exchange-coupling between hard and soft grains represent an appealing approach for integrated miniaturized magnetic power sources. Using a bottom-up approach, nanostructured materials were prepared from binary assemblies of bcc FeCo and fcc FePt nanoparticles and compared with pure L10-FePt materials. The use of a bifunctional mercapto benzoic acid yields homogeneous assemblies of the two types of particles while reducing the organic matter amount. The 650 °C thermal annealing, mandatory to allow the L10-FePt phase transition, led to an important interdiffusion and thus decreased drastically the amount of soft phase present in the final composites. The analysis of recoil curves however evidenced the presence of an efficient interphase exchange coupling, which allows obtaining better magnetic performances than pure L10 FePt materials, energy product above 100 kJ m−3 being estimated for a Pt content of only 33%. These results clearly evidenced the interest of chemically grown nanoparticles for the preparation of performant spring-magnets, opening promising perspective for integrated subcentimetric magnets with optimized properties.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The improper ferroelectricity of CaMn7O12 is studied by examining the influence of the orientation angle of Mn3 spins on the basis of first-principles density functional theory. We analyze the helicoidal magnetic order induced forces, ionic displacements, and polarization contributions from both atomic and mode- decomposition viewpoints. Our work unambiguously reveals the critical role of the orientation angle of Mn3 spins in determining the improper ferroelectricity of CaMn7O12. The ferroelectric polarization can be reversed by changing the orientation angle of Mn3 spins without switching spin chirality of the helicoidal magnetic order. We demonstrate that the particular helicoidal magnetic order induces remarkable mismatch of the Born effective charges with the lattice symmetry, which leads to the dominant contribution to ferroelectric polarization from purely Raman-type ionic displacements. However, this significant polarization contribution from the purely Raman-type distortion cannot survive in the absence of IR-active ionic displacements.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Switching of soliton in a ferromagnetic medium offers the possibility of developing a new innovative approach for information storage technologies. The nonlinear spin dynamics of a site-dependent Heisenberg ferromagnetic spin chain with Gilbert damping under the influence of external magnetic field is expressed in the form of the Landau–Lifshitz–Gilbert equation in the classical continuum limit. The corresponding evolution equation is developed through stereographic projection technique by projecting the unit sphere of spin onto a complex plane. The exact soliton solutions are constructed by solving the associated evolution equation through the modified extended tanh-function method. The impact of damping and external magnetic field on the magnetic soliton under the invariant inhomogeneity is investigated and finally, the magnetization switching in the form of shape changing solitons are demonstrated.© 2016Anomalous x-ray synchrotron diffraction was used to determine the crystallographic parameters of PrFeCoB-based magnetic alloys. The effect of cobalt concentration on the crystallographic parameters of the magnetically hard Pr2Fe14−xCoxB phase was studied. The results indicate that addition of cobalt has a marked effect on crystal structure. Variation of the c parameter decreased twice as much as the a parameter with increase in Co content. The positions of inequivalent atoms of the magnetically hard matrix phase ϕ in the Pr-based alloys were determined using Rietveld refinement. This permitted determination of the relative distance of each inequivalent atom from its nearest neighbors. Cobalt occupied the 16k2 site and Fe had a tendency to occupy the 8j2 sites located between the Kagomé layers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Highly sensitive atomic magnetometers use optically detected magnetic resonance of atomic spins to measure extremely weak magnetic field changes. The magnetometer sensitivity is directly proportional to the ratio of intensity to line-shape of the resonance signal. To obtain narrower resonance signal, we implemented harmonic detection of magnetic resonance method in Mx configuration. The nonlinear spin polarization dynamics in detection of the higher harmonics were employed in phenomenological Bloch equations. The measured and simulated harmonic components of the resonance signals in frequency domain yielded significantly narrower line-width accompanying much improved sensitivity. Our results confirm the sensitivity improvement by a factor of two in optical atomic magnetometer via second harmonic signal which can open a new insight in the weak magnetic field measurement system design.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Y1−xTbxMn6Sn6 compounds (x=0, 0.175, 0.2, 0.225, 0.25) were studied by small angle neutron scattering (SANS) and paramagnetic neutron spin echo. The YMn6Sn6 compound is found to be a helimagnet in the whole temperature range below TN=310 K. Close to TN an additional peak of a Lorenz shape was observed at Q=0. The peak is thought to have originated from the ferromagnetic fluctuations of the magnetic Mn moment in the ab-plane of the hexagonal crystal structure. Compounds, in which Y is replaced by Tb, change their magnetic order with the increase of temperature: from easy cone ferromagnetic phase at low T through the helicoidal phase to the ferromagnetic fluctuation close to TN. Temperature-concentration phase diagram of Y1−xTbxMn6Sn6 is built on the basis of the obtained data.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Si-poor Fe74Nb3Cu1Si8B14−xPx, (x=0, 3) nanocrystalline ribbon-form alloys often form surfaces, which exert in-plane force on underlying ribbon interior when nanocrystallized in even modest presence of oxygen. Mostly unwanted hard-ribbon-axis magnetic anisotropy is standard result. Essential sources of the surface-caused stress have been sought and influence of P instead of B substitution on this effect was studied too. Preferred surface crystallization (PSC) was found to be the major reason. However P substitution suppresses PSC and promotes Fe-oxide formation, which eases the stress, softens the surfaces and provides different annealing evolution of surface properties.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Li-Ni-Zn ferrite nano-powders with nominal compositions of Li0.35−0.5xNi0.3ZnxFe2.35−0.5xO4 (x=0.00–0.40 in steps of 0.10) were synthesized by the chemical sol-gel auto combustion technique. Disk- and toroid-shaped samples prepared from each composition have been sintered at various temperatures (1373–1573 K) for 5 h. The internal structure was characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), which has confirmed the formation of single phase spinel structure. The crystallite size of the as grown powder varied from 23 to 37 nm as measured using Scherrer formula. The lattice constant and theoretical density are found to increase with increasing Zn content. The Zn substitution acts as an accelerator of grain growth and uniform grain distribution in these compositions. The real part of initial permeability, relative quality factor and saturation magnetization increase with increasing Zn content for a fixed sintering temperature. As sintering temperatures increases porosity decreases, and initial permeability increases for the sample sintered up to1523 K then decrease for further increasing temperature. The maximum value of(=254) is observed for Li0.15Ni0.3Zn0.4Fe2.15O4 sintered at 1523 K which is more than 6 times compared to that of parent composition. The loss factor for this composition is also reduced 6 times. As a result high relative quality factor is observed in these compositions. The weakening of exchange interaction may be confirmed by increasing the lattice parameter and decreasing Néel temperature (938–663 K) as the increase of Zn content. Substitution of Zn influences the magnetic properties due to modification of cation distribution.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Detectable variations in structural, elastic and magnetic properties have been reported depending on the mass of the cobalt nanoferrite sample prepared by citrate autocombustion method. Heat released during the autocombustion process and its duration are directly proportional to the mass to be prepared, and is thus expected to affect both the crystallite size and the cation distribution giving rise to the reported variations in microstrain, magnetization, and coercivity. Formation of a pure spinel phase has been validated using X-ray diffraction patterns (XRD) and Fourier-transform infrared (FTIR) spectra. Crystallite sizes obtained from Williamson-Hall (W-H) method range from 28–87 nm, being further supported by images of high-resolution transmission electron microscope (HRTEM). Saturation magnetization and coercivity deduced from M-H hysteresis loops show a clear correlation with the cation distribution, which was proposed on the basis of experimentally obtained data of XRD, VSM, and IR. Elastic parameters have been estimated using the cation distribution and FTIR data, with a resulting trend quite opposite to that of the lattice parameter.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have synthesized piezomagnetic–piezoelectric composites thin films MnFe2O4/(Pb1−xSrx)TiO3, where x=0.1, 0.2, and 0.3, using the metalorganic deposition (MOD) reaction method. The structural and microstructural analysis using the X-ray diffraction (XRD), AFM, and SEM reveals the presence of homogenous growth of both pervoskite and spinel phases in the composite films. Our results show that all the composites films exhibit good multiferroic as well as considerable magnetoelectric coupling. The impedance (Z′ and Z″) and electrical modulus (M′ and M″) Nyquist plots show distinct electrical responses with the magnetic field. Our analyses suggest that this electrical response arises due to the coexistence of the high resistive phase and the comparatively conductive phase in the MFO/PST composite films. The maximum magnetoelectric coefficient (α) is found to be 4.29 V Oe−1 cm−1 and 2.82 V Oe−1 cm−1 for compositions x=0.1 and 0.2. These values are substantially larger than those reported for bilayer composites thin films in literature and make them interesting for room temperature device applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Sc3+ doped Mn0.5Zn0.5ScyFe2−yO4 (y=0.00, 0.01, 0.03 and 0.05) nanoparticles were synthesized by solution combustion method using mixture of fuels were reported for the first time. The mixture of fuels plays an important role in obtaining nano crystalline, single phase present without any heat treatment. X-ray diffraction (XRD) results confirm the formation of the single-phase ferrites which crystallize in cubic spinel structure. The Fourier transform infrared spectra (FTIR) exhibit two prominent bands around 360 cm−1 and 540 cm−1 which are characteristic feature of spinel ferrite. The transmission electron microscope (TEM) micrographs revealed the nanoparticles to be nearly spherical in shape and of fairly uniform size. The room temperature impedance spectra (IS) and vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM) measurements were carried out in order to study the effect of doping (Sc3+) on the characteristic properties of Mn-Zn ferrites. Further, the frequency dependent dielectric constant and dielectric loss were found to decrease with increasing multiple Sc3+ concentration. Nyquist plot in the complex impedance spectra suggest the existence of multiple electrical responses. Magnetic measurements reveals that saturation magnetization (Ms), remnant magnetization (Mr), magnetic moment (ηB) and magnetic particle size (Dm) increase with Sc3+ ion concentration up to x=0.03 and then decrease. The values of spin canting angle (αY-K) and the magnetic particle size (Dm) are found to be in the range of 68–75° and 10–19 nm respectively with Sc3+ concentration. The room temperature Mössbauer spectra were fitted with two sextets corresponding to ions at tetrahedral (A-) and octahedral (B-) sites confirms the spinel lattice. The ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectra's has shown that high concentration of scandium doping leads to an increase in dipolar interaction and decrease in super exchange interaction.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic ordering of Hf3Ni2Si3-type {Sm, Tb, Er}3Co2Ge3 and {Tb, Ho}3Ni2Ge3 compounds (space group Cmcm, oC32) was investigated via magnetization measurements and neutron diffraction study in a zero-applied field. {Sm, Tb, Er}3Co2Ge3 and Ho3Ni2Ge3 exhibit field sensitive complex antiferromagnetic orderings with TN=51 K, Tm=10 K for Sm3Co2Ge3, TN=34 K, Tm=13 K for Tb3Co2Ge3, TN=7 K for Er3Co2Ge3 and TN=11 K for Ho3Ni2Ge3. At 2 K and above the critical field of ~5 kOe, 20 kOe, 4 kOe and 7 kOe for Sm3Co2Ge3, Tb3Co2Ge3, Er3Co2Ge3 and Ho3Ni2Ge3, respectively, saturation magnetizations per rare-earth atom are 6.5 μB for Tb3Co2Ge3, 7.0 μB for Er3Co2Ge3 and 8.0 μB for Ho3Ni2Ge3 in the field of 140 kOe, whereas magnetization of Sm3Co2Ge3 has an antiferromagnetic behaviour. The isothermal magnetic entropy change, ΔSm, indicates a field-induced ferromagnetic ordering in Sm3Co2Ge3, Tb3Co2Ge3, Er3Co2Ge3 and Ho3Ni2Ge3 with a maximal ΔSm value of −10.9 J/kg K for Ho3Ni2Ge3 at 11 K for a field change of 50 kOe. In a zero-applied magnetic field, below TN=33 K and down to TmND=15 K Tb3Ni2Ge3 shows an ac-antiferromagnetic ordering with the C2′/c magnetic space group, a K0=[0, 0, 0] propagation vector and a aTb3Ni2Ge3×bTb3Ni2Ge3×cTb3Ni2Ge3 magnetic unit cell. Below TmND=15 K, its magnetic structure is a sum of the ac-antiferromagnetic component with the C2′/c magnetic space group of the K0 vector and a sine-modulated a-antiferromagnetic component of the K1=[0, 0, ±1/3] propagation vector (the magnetic unit cell is aTb3Ni2Ge3×bTb3Ni2Ge3×3cTb3Ni2Ge3). The magnetic structure is made from the ‘Tb2 - 2Tb1′ clusters of the Tb1 8f and Tb2 4c sublattices with a dominant role of the Tb2 sublattices in the magnetic ordering of Tb3Ni2Ge3.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we study the transport properties of Dirac fermions through the ferromagnetic silicene which is sandwiched between the Graphene leads (G/FS/G). Spin/valley conductance, spin/valley polarization, and also Fano factor are theoretically calculated using the Landauer-Buttiker formula. We find that the fully valley and spin polarized currents through the G/FS/G junction can be obtained by increasing the electric field strength and the length of ferromagnetic silicene region. Moreover, the valley polarization can be tuned from negative to positive values by changing the electric field. We find that the Fano factor also changes with the spin and valley polarization. Our findings of high controllability of the spin and valley transport in such a G/FS/G junction the potential of this junction for spin-valleytronics applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In ultrasonic hyperthermia, ultrasound-induced heating is achieved by the absorption of wave energy and its conversion into heat. The effectiveness of ultrasounds can be improved by using sonosensitisers that greatly attenuate ultrasonic waves and then dissipate the acquired energy in the form of heat. One possible candidate for such a sonosensitiser are superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles. Here, we used magnetic nanoparticles embedded in a tissue-mimicking agar-gel matrix. Such tissue-mimicking phantoms possess acoustic properties similar to those of real tissues, and are used as a tool for performance testing and optimisation of medical ultrasound systems. In this work, we studied the effect of magnetic nanoparticles on the acoustic properties of agar-gel phantoms, including the attenuation of ultrasonic waves.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Various structural changes of ferrofluids have been intensively studied under external magnetic fields. In this work we present an experimental evidence of similar changes induced by an electric field. In the context of the electric field effect on ferrofluids structure, we studied a simple ferrofluid consisting of iron oxide nanoparticles coated with oleic acid and dispersed in transformer oil. The structural changes have been observed both on macroscopic and microscopic scale. We also demonstrate a remarkable impact of the electric field on the ferrofluid viscosity in relation to the reported structural changes. It was found that the electric field induced viscosity changes are analogous to the magnetoviscous effect. These changes and the electroviscous effect are believed to stem from the dielectric permittivity contrast between the iron oxide nanoparticles and transformer oil, giving rise to the effective electric polarization of the nanoparticles. It is highlighted that this electrorheological effect should be considered in studies of ferrofluids for high voltage engineering applications, as it can have impact on the thermomagnetic convection or the dielectric breakdown performance.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Three ZnFe2O4 colloidal nanocrystal assemblies (CNAs), namely CNA1, CNA2 and CNA3, have been synthesized solvothermally with the size of 560 nm, 460 nm and 330 nm and are formed by the self-assembly of primary nanocrystals with the crystallite sizes of 19.2 nm, 15.5 nm and 21.8 nm, respectively. It was found that CNA2 performed superparamagnetic behavior with a saturation magnetization value of 36.9 emu g−1 while either CNA1 or CNA3 exhibited weak ferromagnetic with a small hysteresis loop and large saturation magnetization. Electrochemical sensing measurements toward the reduction of hydrogen peroxide showed that the peak currents of the CNAs in cyclic voltammograms showed a linear relationship with the concentration of hydrogen peroxide in the experimental conditions and the peak potentials were increased with the order of CNA3, CNA2 and CNA1. The formation mechanism of ZnFe2O4 CNAs had been discussed based on the experimental data. The magnetism and electrocatalysis of the ZnFe2O4 CNAs were supposed to be dependent on the size of primary nanoparticles and the structure of the CNAs.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Investigation of magnetooptical characteristics of ferrofluids is an important task aimed at the development of novel optoelectronic systems. This article reports on the results obtained in the experimental studies of the factors that affect the intensity and spatial distribution of the laser radiation scattered by magnetic particles and their agglomerates in a magnetic field. Laser correlation spectroscopy and direct measurements of laser radiation scattering for studies of the interactions and magnetooptical properties of magnetic particles in solutions were employed. The objects were samples of nanodispersed magnetite (Fe3O4) suspended in kerosene and in water. Our studies revealed some new behavior of magnetic particles in external magnetic and light fields, which make ferrofluids promising candidates for optical devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In current work, Nd2Fe14B nanoparticles was synthesized by sol-gel method. Dysprosium powders were added into Nd2Fe14B nanoparticles by mechanical alloying process in order to enhancement of coercivity. The phase analysis, structure, and magnetic properties of annealed (Nd1−xDyx)2Fe14B nanoparticles with different Dy-content (x=0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, 0.5, 0.6) were investigated by employing X-ray diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, energy dispersive spectroscopy, field emission scanning electron microscope, transmission electron microscope and vibrating sample magnetometer techniques. The results showed that with an increase in Dy amounts, the coercivity of particles increased from 2.9 kOe to 13.4 kOe and then decreased to 5.6 kOe. By adding an optimum amount of Dy (x=0.4), the coercivity was significantly increased from 2.9 kOe to 13.4 kOe. The average particle size of annealed (Nd1−xDyx)2Fe14B nanoparticles was below 10 nm. Magnetization reversal studies indicate that the coercivity of milled and annealed (Nd1−xDyx)2Fe14B nanoparticles is controlled by the nucleation of reversed magnetic domains. The experimental results in the angular dependence of coercivity for (Nd1−xDyx)2Fe14B permanent magnets showed that the normalized coercivity of the permanent magnets Hc(θ)/Hc(0) increases from 1 to about 1.2–1.5 with increasing θ from 0 to about π/3, for x=0.4–0.6.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticle ferrite with chemical formula Mg(1−x)ZnxFe2O4 (where x=0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8 and 1) were prepared by sol-gel technique. Single phase structure of these ferrites was confirmed using X-ray diffraction (XRD). Transmission Electron Microscope (TEM) showed that the particle size of the samples in the range of (5.7–10.6 nm). The hysteresis studies showed superparamagnetic behaviour at room temperature. The magnetization behaviour with Zn-content is expressed in the light of Yafet-Kittel angles. The dead layer thickness (t) was calculated and its effect on the magnetization and magnetic losses was debated. The Specific Absorption Rate (SAR) in an alternating magnetic field with frequency 198 kHz for these ferrites has been studied. It is found that, the thickness of magnetic dead layer of the surface of the materials has greatly affected the SAR value of the samples.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A numerical investigation of unsteady flow of blood and heat transfer has been performed with an aim to provide better understanding of blood flow through arteries under stenotic condition. The blood is treated as Newtonian fluid and the arterial wall is considered to be rigid having deposition of plaque in its lumen. The heat transfer characteristic has been analyzed by taking into consideration of the dissipation of energy due to applied magnetic field and the viscosity of blood. The vorticity-stream function formulation has been adopted to solve the problem using implicit finite difference method by developing well known Peaceman–Rachford Alternating Direction Implicit (ADI) scheme. The quantitative profile analysis of velocity, temperature and wall shear stress as well as Nusselt number is carried out over the entire arterial segment. The streamline and temperature contours have been plotted to understand the flow pattern in the diseased artery, which alters significantly in the downstream of the stenosis in the presence of magnetic field. Both the wall shear stress and Nusselt number increases with increasing magnetic field strength. However, wall shear stress decreases and Nusselt number enhances with Reynolds number. The results show that with an increase in the magnetic field strength upto 8 T, does not causes any damage to the arterial wall, but the study is significant for assessing temperature rise during hyperthermic treatment.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Measurements of temperature dependent magnetization of Pd(100) ultrathin films on SrTiO3(100) substrates which shows quantum-well induced ferromagnetism were performed. We observed the jump in magnetization of Pd(100) due to the structural phase transition of SrTiO3, and then, the disappearance of ferromagnetism after temperature-cycle repetition. X-ray reflectivity measurement revealed that the density of a few layers in the Pd film decreased near the Pd/SrTiO3 interface after temperature cycles. This suggests that the structural change affects the quantum-well induced ferromagnetism, and lowering of the crystallinity of Pd at the interface has a negative effect on quantum-well induced ferromagnetism of Pd(100) ultrathin films.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetostrictive Cu0.1Co0.9RExFe2-xO4 (RE=Ho, Gd or Sm) was fabricated by a sol-gel auto-combustion technique using spent lithium-ion batteries as raw materials. X-ray diffraction analysis confirmed the spinel structure of the RE-incorporated samples with limited RE solubility. Field-emission scanning electron microscopy and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy revealed a layered structure composed of particles and the cation distribution. Magnetic hysteresis loops and magnetostriction strain curves showed that the saturation magnetization, magnetostriction coefficient and strain derivative were significantly modified due to the substitution of larger ionic radius RE3+ ions for Fe3+ ions, influencing the interaction between the tetrahedral and octahedral sites.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The influence of Cr substitution for In on the martensitic phase transformation and magnetocaloric effect (MCE) has been investigated in Ni-Mn-Cr-In ferromagnetic shape memory alloy (FSMA) thin films fabricated by magnetron sputtering. Temperature dependent magnetization (M-T) measurements demonstrated that the martensitic transformation temperatures (TM) monotonously increase with the increase of Cr content due to change in valence electron concentration (e/a) and cell volume. From the study of isothermal magnetization curves (M-H), magnetocaloric effect around the martensitic transformation has been investigated in these FSMA thin films. The magnetic entropy change ∆SM of 7.0 mJ/cm3-K was observed in Ni51.1Mn34.9In9.5Cr4.5 film at 302 K in an applied field of 2 T. Further, the refrigerant capacity (RC) was also calculated for all the films in an applied field of 2 T. These findings indicate that the Cr doped Ni-Mn-In FSMA thin films are potential candidates for room temperature micro-length-scale magnetic refrigeration applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.First-principle calculations based on the density functional theory for new quaternary Heusler compounds CoRuTiZ (Z=Si, Ge, and Sn) were performed. It was found that all three compounds were stable at YI structure in ferromagnetic state. The CoRuTiSi, CoRuTiGe, and CoRuTiSn were half-metal with integer magnetic moments of 1.00 μB per formula unit and half-metallic gaps of 0.13, 0.10, and 0.01 eV at their equilibrium volume, respectively. The density of states (DOSs) and band structures of these compounds were studied and the origin of half-metallicity was discussed. The CoRuTiSi, CoRuTiGe, and CoRuTiSn compounds showed half-metallic characteristics at lattice constants ranges of 5.77–6.36 Å, 5.66–6.16 Å, and 5.83–6.23 Å, indicating the lattice distortion did not affect the half-metallic properties of these compounds which makes them interesting materials in the spintronic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this research, the microwave properties of Lanthanum-Sodium doped Cobalt-Zirconium barium hexaferrites, intended as microwave absorbers, are analyzed on Vector Network Analyzer in K-band. The results indicate that the doping has resulted in lowering of real permittivity and enhancement of dielectric losses. Real permeability has shown increase while magnetic losses have shown decrease in value with doping. All these four properties have shown very small variation with frequency in the scanned frequency range which indicates the relaxation type of behavior. Microwave absorption characteristics of these compositions are analyzed with change in sample thickness. The results demonstrate that the matching frequency of the microwave absorber shifts towards lower side of frequency band with increase in thickness. The complete analysis of the prepared microwave absorbers shows a striking achievement with very low reflection loss and wide absorption bandwidth for all the six compositions in 18–26.5 GHz frequency band.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The article describes the active vibration isolation platform on base of magnetorheological (MR) elastomers. An active damper based on the MR elastomers can be used as an actuator of micro- or nanopositioning for a vibroinsulated object. The MR elastomers give such advantages for active control of vibration as large range of displacements (up to 1 mm), more efficient absorption of the vibration energy, possibility of active control of amplitude-frequency characteristics and positioning with millisecond response speed and nanometer running accuracy. The article presents the results of experimental studies of the most important active damper parameters. Those are starting current, transient time for stepping, transmission coefficient of the vibration displacement amplitude.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates numerically the problem of unsteady natural convection inside a square cavity partitioned by a flexible impermeable membrane. The finite element method with the arbitrary Lagrangian-Eulerian (ALE) technique has been used to model the interaction of the fluid and the membrane. The horizontal walls of the cavity are kept adiabatic while the vertical walls are kept isothermal at different temperatures. A uniform magnetic field is applied onto the cavity with different orientations. The cavity has been provided by two eyelets to compensate volume changes due the movement of the flexible membrane. A parametric study is carried out for the pertinent parameters, which are the Rayleigh number (105–108), Hartmann number (0–200) and the orientation of the magnetic field (0–180°). The change in the Hartmann number affects the shape of the membrane and the heat transfer in the cavity. The angle of the magnetic field orientation also significantly affects the shape of the membrane and the heat transfer in the cavity.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Absence of a single smoking-gun experiment to identify a quantum spin liquid, has kept their characterisation difficult till date. Featureless dc magnetic susceptibility and large antiferromagnetic frustration are always considered as the essential pointers to these systems. However, we show that the amount of frustration estimated by using generalised Curie-Weiss law on these susceptibility data are prone to errors and thus should be dealt with caution. We measure and analyse susceptibility data of Ba3ZnIr2O9, a spin orbital liquid candidate and Gd2O3, a 1.5 K antiferromagnet and show the distinguishing features between them. A continuous and significant change in Curie and Weiss constants is seen to take place in Ba3ZnIr2O9 and other reported spin liquids with the change in the range of fitting temperatures showing the need of a temperature ‘range-of-fit’ analysis before commenting on the Weiss constants of spin liquids. The variation observed is similar to fluctuations among topological sectors persisting over a range of temperature in spin-ice candidates. On the other hand, even though we find correlations to exist at even 100 times the ordering temperature in Gd2O3, no such fluctuation is observed which may be used as an additional distinguishing signature of spin liquids over similarly featureless correlated paramagnets.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.ZnXCo1-XFe2O4 nanoparticles were synthesized by sol-gel method and were annealed at two different temperatures; 500 °C and 900 °C in air for 2 h. Structural studies were carried out by X-ray diffraction and Fourier transformed infrared spectroscopy. The crystallite size didn't show any variation with the increase in Zn2+ concentration and was increased after annealing. The magnetization value at 300 K for the as-prepared samples increased from 53 emu/g to 60 emu/g when Zn2+ concentration increased from x=0 to 0.2 and then it decreased to 11 emu/g for x=1. Similar magnetic behavior was also observed for the annealed samples with a peak at x=0.2. A very high magnetization value of 116 emu/g at 60 K was observed for the 900 °C annealed sample with x=0.4. The coercivity decreased monotonically with the increase in the Zn2+ concentration for both the as- prepared and the annealed samples. The magnetization and coercivity values were observed to be enhanced with the decrease in measurement temperature. The nonsaturation behavior of the magnetic hysteresis loops of these nanoparticle samples observed for all compositions and temperatures was studied by the method of approach to saturation by fitting M(H)=M(∞) [1−(H*/H)1/2] to the high field data of the initial curve from 20 kOe to 30 kOe. It was observed that H* value which is the measure of the nonsaturation increased with the increase in the Zn2+ concentration. The observed magnetic properties in these nanoparticle samples can be ascribed to the changed cation distribution in the spinel structure and to the decrease of Co2+ concentration.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Sn-substituted Ni-Zn ferrites, (0.0≤x≤0.30), have been synthesized by the standard double sintering technique from the oxide nanopowders of Ni, Zn, Fe and Sn. The structural and electrical properties have been investigated by the X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), DC resistivity and dielectric measurements. From XRD data, the single cubic spinel phase has been confirmed for x≤0.1, whereas for x>0.1 an extra intermediate phase has been detected along with the cubic spinel phase of Ni-Zn ferrite. The grain size is increased due to Sn substitution in Ni-Zn ferrites. DC resistivity as a function of temperature has been measured by two probe method. The semiconducting nature has been found operative in the samples. The DC resistivity was found to decrease whilst the dielectric constant increased with increasing Sn content in Ni-Zn ferrites. The unusual behavior of the dielectric loss factor of the ferrites was explained by the Rezlescu model. The electrical relaxation of the ferrites has been studied in terms of electric modulus formalism and the time for dielectric relaxation was calculated. The contribution of grain resistance has been studied from the Cole-Cole plot. The suitability to use the as prepared samples in the miniaturized memory devices based capacitive components or energy storage principles are confirmed from the values of dielectric constant.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Fe/MgO/Fe trilayers with a subnanometer MgO tunnel barrier were grown by molecular beam epitaxy. Longitudinal magnetooptic Kerr effect measurements confirmed the existence of the antiferromagnetic interlayer exchange coupling (IEC) between the Fe layers for 2 Å<dMgO<6 Å. The coupling was enhanced for the trilayer grown on a homoepitaxial MgO buffer layer, and its IEC constant was estimated to be −3.3 erg/cm2 at a MgO thickness of 2.7 Å. After magnetic characterization, the sample was patterned into circular-shaped pillars with diameters ranging from 200 nm to 520 nm. We showed that the dipolar coupling that appeared after the nanofabrication process modified the effective coupling between layers, and we determined dependence of the dipolar coupling on the pillar diameter. Finally, magnetoresistance (MR) was measured as a function of MgO thickness (dMgO), and a non-zero MR was found for the MgO as thin as 3.4 Å. Extrapolation of the MR (dMgO) dependence to MR=0 allowed us to determine the length of the pinholes in our sample, which was estimated to be (3.2±0.5) Å.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A consistent theory of ferromagnetic resonance in a dilute suspension of superparamagnetic particles with uniaxial anisotropy of arbitrary strength is presented. The developed approach is used for studying the high-frequency response of a magnetic fluid at different temperatures. It is shown that in a certain temperature interval the absorption line splits into two components. The width of this interval is essentially dependent on the magnitude of the particle anisotropy.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have imaged the excitation of small-amplitude spin-wave eigenmodes, localized within ∼100 nm of the vertices of nanoscale Ni81Fe19 ellipses, using time-resolved scanning transmission x-ray microscopy (STXM) at 2 GHz and resolution of 70 nm. Taking advantage of the buried-layer sensitivity of STXM, we find that the magnetization precession at the two vertices changes from predominantly in-phase to out-of-phase in samples with and without a conductive layer deposited over the ellipses. As a plausible interpretation for the reversal in phase, we propose that unexpectedly strong Oersted fields are generated in the discontinuous overlayer, although effects of edge roughness cannot be fully excluded. The results demonstrate the capabilities of STXM to image small-amplitude, GHz magnetization dynamics with the potential to map rf magnetic fields on the nanoscale.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A series of amorphous perpendicular TbFeCo films are sputtered using a composite target. The magnetic properties of the TbFeCo films are found to strongly be influenced by sputtering power. The above-RT magnetic compensation point in the films sputtered at high powers is revealed by thermomagnetic measurements. With increasing the power the compensation point shifts considerably towards higher temperature, while only a slight reduction in the Curie temperature occurs. The coercivity is found to initially increase with the power and then falls, which is in accordance with film composition moving from FeCo-rich to Tb-rich side. This can be well explained by the sputtering yield of Tb, which increases faster than FeCo atoms with the power during the sputtering. Our results show a convenient way to adjust the coercivity of the films by modifying the Tb-to-FeCo ratio using the sputtering power.© 2016A perfluoropolyether based ferrofluid was prepared using co-precipitation method and the rheological properties of the ferrofluid were studied by a rotational rheometer. A series of experiments were designed to study the influence of magnetic field, shear rate and temperature on the magnetoviscous effect of the perfluoropolyether based ferrofluid. Consecutive measurements of the megnetoviscous parameter with the temperature-increasing process were made and totally different tendency of the curves was observed under a range of shear rates. The magnetic field strength influence on the observed temperature dependencies was also studied experimentally. A discussion on the different mechanisms of the influence of temperature on magnetoviscous effect is presented based on the chain model of magnetic particles and the viscosity-temperature characteristics of the base carrier liquid.© 2016Synthesis of magnetite nanoparticles has attracted increasing interest due to their importance in biomedical and technological applications. Tunable magnetic properties of magnetite nanoparticles to meet specific requirements will greatly expand the spectrum of applications. Tremendous efforts have been devoted to studying and controlling the size, shape and magnetic properties of magnetite nanoparticles. Here we investigate gadolinium (Gd) doping to influence the growth process as well as magnetic properties of magnetite nanocrystals via a simple co-precipitation method under mild conditions in aqueous media. Gd doping was found to affect the growth process leading to synthesis of controllable particle sizes under the conditions tested (0–10 at% Gd3+). Typically, undoped and 5 at% Gd-doped magnetite nanoparticles were found to have crystal sizes of about 18 and 44 nm, respectively, supported by X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopy. Our results showed that Gd-doped nanoparticles retained the magnetite crystal structure, with Gd3+ randomly incorporated in the crystal lattice, probably in the octahedral sites. The composition of 5 at% Gd-doped magnetite was Fe(3−x)GdxO4 (x=0.085±0.002), as determined by inductively coupled plasma mass spectrometry. 5 at% Gd-doped nanoparticles exhibited ferrimagnetic properties with small coercivity (~65 Oe) and slightly decreased magnetization at 260 K in contrast to the undoped, superparamagnetic magnetite nanoparticles. Templation by the bacterial biomineralization protein Mms6 did not appear to affect the growth of the Gd-doped magnetite particles synthesized by this method.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of the finally fabricated nonoriented FeSi steels critically depend on the microstructure and on the occurring crystallographic texture. The fabrication route comprises hot rolling, coiling and cooling, hot band annealing before cold rolling (optional), cold rolling and the final thermal treatment. As well known there is an interplay between the microstructure and texture during the various processing steps. For that reason, it is of interest to know more on the evolution of the microstructure at hot band annealing of hot band prepared in different ways. In this paper we will summarize our recent results on the evolution of microstructure during thermal annealing of hot band: thermal treatment following immediately the last pass of hot rolling or a hot band annealing as a separate processing step before cold rolling.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.MgH2: TM (TM: V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co, Ni) based dilute magnetic semiconductors (DMS) are investigated using first principle calculations. Our results show that the ferromagnetic state is stable when TM introduces magnetic moments as well as intrinsic carriers in TM: Co, V, Cr, Ti; Mg0.95TM0.05H2. Some of the DMS Ferro magnets under study exhibit a half-metallic behavior, which make them suitable for spintronic applications. The double exchange is shown to be the underlying mechanism responsible for the magnetism of such materials. The exchange interactions obtained from first principle calculations and used in a classical Ising model by a Monte Carlo approach resulted in ferromagnetic states with Curie temperatures within the ambient conditions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This paper provides a new and simple way to obtain thinner ribbon magnets with hard magnetic properties. Fe-26Cr-12Co-1Si ribbons were fabricated by melt-spinning at a speed of 40 m/s and followed by multi-step ageing at 647–540 °C. Phase composition, microstructure, domain structure and magnetic properties of the ribbons were studied. It has been found that the phase transformation of γ+α→α1+α2+ Fe(Si,M)2+σ and element diffusion are dominant respectively during the first stage ageing and later multi-step ageing. Consequently, a spinodal structure containing a majority of α1 and small amount of α2 is formed. Model for microstructure and magnetic structure evolution of the ribbons in the ageing process is established. Hc as high as 1026.6 Oe and Br of 7274.8 Gs can be achieved in the seven-step aged ribbons. Such outstanding magnetic performances may be attributed to five main microstructural and magnetic structural factors.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The soft-magnetic properties of planar-anisotropy Ce2Fe17N3-δ powders were reported, and reflection loss (RL) of the powders/Silicone composites with various volume concentrations have been studied in 0.1–18 GHz frequency range. It was found that the optimal RL of this composite absorber with a thickness of 1.72 mm is −60.5 dB at 9.97 GHz and the RL is less than −10 dB in the whole X-band (8–12 GHz). The bandwidth with RL exceeding −10 dB and −20 dB are 5.24 GHz and 1.32 GHz, respectively. Furthermore, all the optimal RL value of the composite with the thickness less than 2.13 mm can reach −20 dB in the range of 8–17 GHz, which indicates that the Ce2Fe17N3-δ/Silicone composite absorber will be a promising candidate in higher gigahertz frequency especially in X-band.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Using first-principles calculations based on density functional theory, we probe the electronic and magnetic properties of X2PtGa (X being Cr, Mn, Fe, Co) Heusler alloys. Our calculations predict that all these systems possess inverse Heusler alloy structure in the respective ground states. Application of tetragonal distortion leads to lowering of energy with respect to their cubic phase. The equilibrium volumes of both the phases are nearly the same. These indicate that the materials studied here are prone to undergo martensite transition, as has been recently shown theoretically for Mn2PtGa in the literature. Ground state with a tetragonal symmetry is corroborated by the observation of soft tetragonal shear constants in the cubic phase. By comparing the energies of various types of magnetic configurations we predict that Cr2PtGa and Mn2PtGa possess ferrimagnetic configuration whereas Fe2PtGa and Co2PtGa possess ferromagnetic configuration in their respective ground states.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ni0.4Zn0.2Mn0.4Fe2O4 nanopowders were prepared by sol-gel auto-combustion method, densified at different temperatures 400–700 °C/4 h using conventional sintering method. The grain sizes of all the samples vary between 18 nm and 30 nm. The hysteresis loops show high saturation magnetization and low coercivity, indicating magnetically soft behaviour of the material. The real and imaginary parts of permittivity is almost constant upto 1 GHz and increases with further increase of frequency. The permeability is ruled by Snoek's law, the values of μ′ increases with increase of temperature and the resonance frequency increases with an increase of temperature. The reflection coefficient is however increasing with sintering temperature and the maximum loss is observed in the range of 100 MHz–1 GHz. Sample sintered at 700 °C has shown maximum reflection loss and this loss occurs due to absorption, destructive interference and multiple internal reflections in the sample. Quality factor is constant upto 380 MHz and increases with frequency for all the samples sintered at different temperatures. The TC for all the samples is above ~230 °C. The room temperature EPR spectra confirm the oxidation state of Fe3+. The g-factor is in the range of ~2.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this study, steady state laminar ferroconvection through circular horizontal tube partially filled with porous media under constant heat flux is experimentally investigated. Transverse magnetic fields were applied on ferrofluid flow by two fixed parallel magnet bar positioned on a certain distance from beginning of the test section. The results show promising notable enhancement in heat transfer as a consequence of partially filled porous media and magnetic field, up to 2.2 and 1.4 fold enhancement were observed in heat transfer coefficient respectively. It was found that presence of both porous media and magnetic field simultaneously can highly improve heat transfer up to 2.4 fold. Porous media of course plays a major role in this configuration. Virtually, application of Magnetic field and porous media also insert higher pressure loss along the pipe which again porous media contribution is higher that magnetic field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Among various amorphous magnetic materials, even though Fe-based materials do not have high magnetocaloric effect (MCE), their advantages of tunable Curie temperature (TC) and low cost have attracted considerable attention in regard to room temperature magnetic refrigeration applications. With the aim of enhancing the MCE, the influence of boron addition on Fe-based amorphous materials was investigated in this study. Fe94−xZr6Bx (x=5, 6, 8 and 10), Fe91−yZr9By (y=3, 4, 5, 6, 8 and 10) and Fe89−zZr11Bz (z=3, 4, 5, 6, 8 and 10) specimens were made in ribbon form and their magnetocaloric effect was investigated. The Curie temperature (TC) of all three series of ribbons underwent an almost linear increase, and the peak magnetic entropy change, |ΔSMpeak| (obtained in a magnetic field of 1.5 T), generally increases with increasing boron content. The results further show that the Fe86Zr9B5 ribbon exhibits a relatively large |ΔSMpeak| value of 1.13 J/kgK at 330 K and a large refrigerant capacity value of 135.6 J/kg under 1.5 T. On the basis of these results, although there is still much scope for improvement before totally replacing the conventional cooling method, the Fe-based amorphous ribbon can be seen as a promising magnetocaloric material for room temperature magnetic refrigeration applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Néel-Brown model is the most widely accepted model for the description of magnetization reversal by thermal excitation. This model predicts a decreasing average switching field and an increasing width ΔH of switching field distribution as the temperature is increased, and has been found to hold good on several occasions. However, for a few classes of systems, the temperature dependence of ΔH shows the opposite trend, and so far no satisfactory explanation exists. We present here an experimental study of switching field statistics of permalloy (Ni80Fe20) thin films on Si(100) grown by pulsed laser ablation. It was seen that the sample deviates from the Neel-Brown behavior in the manner described above. We performed calculations based on a natural extension of the Néel-Brown model, which incorporated multiple reversal pathways characterized by a Gaussian distribution of coercive fields. Calculations based on this model for different values of the width parameter σHSW show two distinct kinds of behavior. At low values of σHSW, the total width ΔH is limited by thermal broadening according to the traditional Neel-Brown expression. This regime is characterized by an increasing ΔH with temperature. For high σHSW, the broadening is dominated by σHSW, which masks thermal broadening. In this regime, ΔH decreases with increasing temperature. Whereas the experimentally observed temperature dependence of the average switching field was found to be in good agreement with this model, qualitative agreement with regard to the temperature dependence of ΔH could be observed only for relaxation times lower than ~10−40 s, which is much smaller than Néel-Brown relaxation times (10−9–10−19 s) usually encountered in the literature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Three 4.5 wt% Si steel thin sheets with different thicknesses were efficiently fabricated by twin-roll strip casting, warm rolling and cold rolling followed by final annealing. A comprehensive investigation from the workability of the as-cast strip to the magnetic property of the produces was performed to illustrate the superiority of the new materials. The results show that the as-cast strip, which has a much lower Vickers hardness than that of the 6.5 wt% Si steel, is suitable for rolling processing. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM) studies confirm that no ordering phase exists in the as-cast strip. The cold-rolled thin sheets exhibit good surface quality without edge cracks. Furthermore, all the three 4.5 wt% Si steel thin sheets possess relative strong <100>//ND texture and present high magnetic inductions and low iron losses after finial annealing.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This work deals with magnetic structures that attain integer and half-integer skyrmion numbers. We model and solve the problem analytically, and show how the solutions appear in materials that engender distinct, very specific physical properties, and use them to describe their topological features. In particular, we found a way to model skyrmion with a large transition region correlated with the presence of a two-peak skyrmion number density. Moreover, we run into the issue concerning the topological strength of a vortex-like structure and suggest an experimental realization, important to decide how to modify and measure the topological strength of the magnetic structure.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nano-crystalline NiFe2O4 was synthesized by citrate and sol–gel methods at different annealing temperatures and the results were compared with a bulk sample prepared by ceramic method. The effect of methods of preparation and different annealing temperatures on the crystallize size, strain, bond lengths, bond angles, cations distribution and degree of inversions were investigated by X-ray powder diffraction, high resolution transmission electron microscope, Mössbauer effect spectrometer and vibrating sample magnetometer. The cations distributions were determined at both octahedral and tetrahedral sites using both Mössbauer effect spectroscopy and a modified Bertaut method using Rietveld method. The Mössbauer effect spectra showed a regular decrease in the hyperfine field with decreasing particle size. Saturation magnetization and coercivity are found to be affected by the particle size and the cations distribution.© 2016A paper devotes to theoretical and experimental studying the magnetoelectric interaction in layered structures of amorphous ferromagnetic alloy and single- crystal gallium arsenide. The authors investigated the magnetoelectric effect in the (100) plane of gallium arsenide in the electromechanical resonance range of 200–240 kHz and obtained maximal ME voltage coefficient of 120 V/A at bias field equaled 3.6 kA/m for the direction parallel to the [011] axis. Also the magnetoelectric effect in the (110) and (111) planes is discussed. The results can be used for design of new electronic devices based on the magnetostrictive-semiconductor materials.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The dynamics of Dzyaloshinskii domain walls (DDW) in ultrathin ferromagnetic strips with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy, for different values of both perpendicular field and longitudinal current excitation associated to the Spin-Hall effect, has been studied, taking into account different values of the interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI). This study has been carried out with the help of the q-Φ one-dimensional model and micromagnetic simulations. We have found that Walker breakdown may be avoided by applying a certain threshold current, even though the inverse effect is also possible. We have also found that, for particular values of field and current, the magnetization within the DDW experiences an abrupt change of orientation, which provokes a change on the contribution of current to the terminal DDW velocity. This effect disappears for sufficiently strong DMI, as it is expected from the model.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The folic acid functionalized magnetic graphene oxide (FA-mGO) as a new adsorbent has been synthesized in this work for the elimination of Cu(II) from waste water. The as-prepared FA-mGO was tested by SEM, TEM, particle size analyzer, FTIR, XRD, Roman spectrum, TGA and magnetic properties analyzer. Some factors, such as adsorbent dose, pH, contact time, initial concentration of adsorbate and temperature were explored. The results showed that the FA-mGO had the better adsorption performance than mGO. After 40 min, the adsorption equilibrium could be reached. Furthermore, the adsorption property obeyed the pseudo-second order kinetic model and the Temkin isotherms well. The maximum adsorption capacity was 283.29 mg/g for Cu(II) from Pseudo-second-order model at pH=5 and 318 K. The chelation action between FA and Cu(II) along with electrostatic incorporation between GO and Cu(II) determined the favourable adsorption property. Besides, thermodynamic studies results ∆G0<0, ∆H0>0, ∆S0>0 suggested that the adsorption mechanism was an endothermic and spontaneous process essentially. Finally, desorption and reusability studies imply FA-mGO has an excellent reproducibility and is benefit to environmental protection and resource conservation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The elastic, magnetic, and structural properties of PrX2 (X=Fe, Mn, Co) alloys, of the cubic Laves structure (MgCu2), have been evaluated by first-principles density functional theory using both local spin density (LSDA) and generalized gradient (GGA) approximations. The lattice constant, magnetic moment, density of states, band structure, bulk modulus and its first pressure derivative are calculated. At zero pressure, the total magnetic moments of PrFe2, PrCo2, and PrMn2 using GGA are 4.515, 1.05, and 4.79 µB respectively. The bulk moduli using LSDA are higher than those using GGA approximation. The evaluated Bulk moduli of PrFe2, PrMn2 and PrCo2 using GGA approximation are 48.1, 42.98, and 72.23 GPa respectively. The lattice constant and magnetic moment of PrFe2 using GGA approximation are 7.2 Ǻ and 4.51 µB respectively in good agreement with experimental results.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the ternary intermetallic compound DyMn2Si2 are studied by X-ray diffraction and magnetization measurements. It is found that DyMn2Si2 crystalizes with tetragonal ThCr2S2-type structure and exhibits four successive magnetic transitions at low temperature, around 20 K, 31 K, 38 K and 82 K, named respectively as T1, T2, T3 and T4 transitions. Large values of magnetic field (>35 kOe) favor antiferromagnetic clusters and give rise to exchange bias effect. The different responses of T2 and T3 to field change, induces two non-identical isothermal entropy change (-ΔSM) peaks. The maximum values of -ΔSM occur in temperatures around T3 and reaches 8.2 J/kgK, for a magnetic field change of 50 kOe. Also, the presence of transitions T2 and T3 close to each other induces a table-like magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in a wide temperature range. Thus, the peculiar magnetic properties observed for DyMn2Si2 compound are interesting for low temperature magnetic refrigeration.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Monovalent perovskite manganites La0.90Li0.10−xNaxMnO3 were synthesized by using the solid-state reaction method. The crystal structure analysis presented that the samples are a single-phase rhombohedral (R3¯c) structure with no detectable impurity phases. Magnetic measurement showed a cusp at a certain temperature TC/F that gradually disappeared with adding the Na content. The samples undergo ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition, accompanying the metal-semiconductor transition at Tms. There is irreversible on low field M (T)ZFC and M (T)FC curves which gradual decrease with increasing the Na doping. The resistivity values decreased and the Tms increased as doping of sodium increased. In addition, two-transition temperature Tms appeared just by adding the sodium. In short, the influence of partial substitution of lithium by sodium at A-site cation of lanthanum manganite on its physical properties was studied.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Thermal decomposition of Bakal siderite ore (that consists of magnesium siderite and ankerite traces) was investigated by thermomagnetic analysis. Thermomagnetic analysis was carried-out using laboratory-built facility that allows automatic registration of sample magnetization with the temperature (heating/cooling rate was 65°/min, maximum temperature 650 °C) at low- and high-oxygen content. Curie temperature gradually decreases with each next cycles of heating/cooling at low-oxygen content. Curie temperature decrease after 2nd cycle of heating/cooling at high-oxygen content and do not change with next cycles. Final Curie temperature for both modes was ~320 °C. Saturation magnetization of obtained samples increases up to 20 Am2/kg. The final product of phase transformation at both modes was magnesioferrite. It was shown that intermediate phase of thermal decomposition of Bakal siderite ore was magnesiowustite.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Fe and Ni sublattice magnetizations of ultrathin iron-nickel alloy nanonjunctions [Fe1−cNic] between Fe and Co leads are inspected. For c≤0.4, the alloy has a bcc structure and becomes fcc otherwise. A combined EFT and MFT treatment is used to obtain the sublattice magnetizations of Fe and Ni in the individual layers as a function of temperature and concentration. This is achieved by calculating single site spin correlations within EFT and making use of reliable experimental data such as lattice parameters a, stiffness spin constants D, and Curie temperatures Tc leading to reasonable values of the exchange parameters J. According to our model, the alloys forming the bcc nanojunctions we examine (c=0.0841,0.204,0.268) are ferrimagnetic with the absence of a compensation temperature while those for the fcc structures (c=0.5,0.81) are ferromagnetic. These EFT results feed the MFT calculations for the nanojunction from the interface inwards. The effect of adding several alloy layers to both bcc and fcc types is also considered. The sublattice magnetizations are necessary elements for certain spin dynamic computations, such as ballistic magnon transport across embedded nanojunctions in magnonics.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Crystalline and amorphous Fe-Sm thin films have been fabricated by using molecular beam vapor deposition method. Then, the effects of both variation of Sm content and application of high magnetic field during film growth on the structure and magnetic properties of the Fe-Sm films have been explored. The results show that bcc structure of the Fe-Sm films with 5.8% Sm transforms to amorphization with 33.0% Sm. Meanwhile, nanocrystallite is formed in the amorphous Fe-Sm films. However, no Fe-Sm compound exists with the change of Sm content and with the application of high magnetic field. Nevertheless, high magnetic field decreases interplanar spacing. The structural evolution has a significant effect on magnetic properties. Saturation magnetization decreases 290% from 1456 emu/cm3 to 373 emu/cm3 with the increase of Sm content from 5.8% to 33.0%. The coercivity increases 1225% from 20 Oe to 265 Oe. Meanwhile, both the saturation magnetization and coercivity of the films decrease with the application of high magnetic field. The reason has been discussed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Lateral flow assay is one of the simplest and most extended techniques in medical diagnosis for point-of-care testing. Although it has been traditionally a positive/negative test, some work has been lately done to add quantitative abilities to lateral flow assay. One of the most successful strategies involves magnetic beads and magnetic sensors. Recently, a new technique of superparamagnetic nanoparticle detection has been reported, based on the increase of the impedance induced by the nanoparticles on a RF-current carrying copper conductor. This method requires no external magnetic field, which reduces the system complexity. In this work, nitrocellulose membranes have been installed on the sensor, and impedance measurements have been carried out during the sample diffusion by capillarity along the membrane. The impedance of the sensor changes because of the presence of magnetic nanoparticles. The results prove the potentiality of the method for point-of-care testing of biochemical substances and nanoparticle capillarity flow studies.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The effects of magnetohydrodynamics on the blood flow when blood is represented as a Casson fluid, along with magnetic particles in a horizontal cylinder is studied. The flow is due to an oscillating pressure gradient. The Laplace and finite Hankel transforms are used to obtain the closed form solutions of the fractional partial differential equations. Effects of various parameters on the flow of both blood and magnetic particles are shown graphically. The analysis shows that, the model with fractional order derivatives bring a remarkable changes as compared to the ordinary model. The study highlights that applied magnetic field reduces the velocities of both the blood and magnetic particles.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have successfully grown nanoscale Fe2CrAl thin films on polished Si/SiO2 substrates using an ultra-high vacuum deposition with a base pressure of 9×10−10 Torr. The thickness of thin films ranges from 30 to 100 nm. These films exhibit cubic crystal structure with lattice disorder and display ferromagnetic behavior. The Curie temperature is greater than 400 K, which is much higher than that reported for bulk Fe2CrAl. The magnetic moments of the films varies from 2.5 to 2.8 µB per formula unit, which is larger than the reported bulk values. Thus, the disordered nanoscale Fe2CrAl films exhibit strong Fe-Fe exchange interactions through Fe-Cr-Fe and Fe-Al-Fe layers, resulting in both a large magnetization and a high Curie temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effect of the Gd-based compound GdZn2 have been investigated. GdZn2 shows a ferromagnetic transition at TC=85K and spin-reorientation transition at TSR = 58 K. The maximum entropy change and relative cooling power (RCP) are estimated to be 11.5 J/K kg and 690 J/kg, respectively, for a magnetic field change of 7 T. The large value of RCP is suggested that GdZn2 is an attractive candidate for a low-temperature magnetic refrigerant.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Recently, spin-gapless semiconductors (SGSs) and half-metallic materials (HMMs) have received considerable interest in the fields of materials sciences and solid-state physics because they can provide a high degree of spin polarization in electron transport. The results on band structure calculations reveal that the metallic fully-compensated ferrimagnet (M-FCF) Mn2ZnMg becomes half-metallic fully-compensated ferrimagnet (HM-FCF), fully-compensated ferrimagnetic semiconductor (FCF-S) and fully-compensated ferrimagnetic spin-gapless semiconductor (FCF-SGS) if the uniform strain applied. However, the metallic fully-compensated ferrimagnetism property of the Mn2ZnMg is robust to the tetragonalization. The structure stability based on the calculations of the cohesion energy and the formation energy of this compound has been tested. Furthermore, a magnetic state transition from antiferromagentic (AFM) state to non-magnetic (NM) state can be observed at the lattice constant of 5.20 Å.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Half-metallicity and magnetism of Ti2Ni1−x CoxAl1−y Siy, which are obtained by Co/Si substitutions for Ni/Al of inverse Heusler alloy Ti2NiAl, are investigated by first-principle calculations based on density functional theory (DFT). The optimized lattice constants of the doped systems all conform to the Vegard law as the increase of the impurity concentration, and the magnetic moments obey the Slater-Pauling rule when the half-metallicity is retained. The defect formation energies of the codoped systems are lower than those of the monodoped systems due to the charge compensation effects, thus the Co+Si codoping is more favorable in energy than the Co/Si monodoping. Furthermore, for the Co and Si monodoped systems, the Co monodoping retains the minority-spin bandgap unchanged although the Fermi level moves towards high energy region, and the Si monodoping leads to the minority-spin bandgap narrowing and even the loss of half-metallicity at the high concentration, while for the Co+Si codoped systems, the majority of the codoped compounds obviously show more stable half-metallicity and the minority-spin gap get widened. In particular, the minority-spin band gap of the codoped compounds Ti2Ni0.5Co0.5Al0.5Si0.5, Ti2Ni0.25Co0.75Al0.5Si0.5, and Ti2NiCo Al0.25Si0.75 are widened distinctly and their Fermi level are adjusted to the middle of the minority-spin gap, indicating that they possess robust half-metallicity and thus they are promising candidates for spintronics applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates the feasibility of a cost effective high gradient magnetic separation based device for the detection and identification of malaria parasites in a blood sample. The design utilizes magnetic properties of hemozoin present in malaria-infected red blood cells (mRBCs) in order to separate and concentrate them inside a microfluidic channel slide for easier examination under the microscope. The design consists of a rectangular microfluidic channel with multiple magnetic wires positioned on top of and underneath it along the length of the channel at a small angle with respect to the channel axis. Strong magnetic field gradients, produced by the wires, exert sufficient magnetic forces on the mRBCs in order to separate and concentrate them in a specific region small enough to fit within the microscope field of view at magnifications typically required to identify the malaria parasite type. The feasibility of the device is studied using a model where the trajectories of the mRBCs inside the channel are determined using first-order ordinary differential equations (ODEs) solved numerically using a multistep ODE solver available within MATLAB. The mRBCs trajectories reveal that it is possible to separate and concentrate the mRBCs in less than 5 min, even in cases of very low parasitemia (1–10 parasites/µL of blood) using blood sample volumes of around 3 µL employed today.© 2016The present work deals with the development of nanocrystalline 60Co–26Fe–14Al (wt%) soft magnetic materials via mechanical milling of elemental powders. The evolution of solid solution during milling proceeded with continuous decrease in atomic order and the crystallite size, and an introduction of internal strain and dislocations. The milling-induced lattice defects, crystallite size reduction, and atomic disorder exhibited a decrease in saturation magnetization, remanence magnetization, squareness ratio, and blocking temperature with increasing milling time. It has been demonstrated that, at subzero temperatures, the magnetization decreases with increasing temperature due to the development of an effective anisotropy caused by an evolution of canted spin structure owing to the introduction of lattice defects during milling.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, high-crystalline and well-defined Fe3O4 nanostructures with tunable morphologies were fabricated through a facile one-pot solvothermal approach. The morphology, crystal structure and chemical compositions of the products were characterized at the nanoscale. X-ray diffraction and selected area electron diffraction patterns indicate that the products have a pure spinel phase without the presence of any other impurity. Based on the transmission electron microscope technology, shape evolution of the products were investigated. Several morphologies including irregular particles, clusters, hollow sphere and octahedrons can be obtained by only adjusting the amount of NaOH without using any surfactant. Magnetism investigations show that all the products perform ferromagnetic behavior with high saturation magnetization at room temperature, which mainly originates from their high crystalline nature and template-free fabrication process.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Manganese ferrites (MnFe2O4) have been of great interest for their remarkable and soft-magnetic properties (low coercivity, moderate saturation magnetization) accompanied by good chemical stability and mechanical hardness. X-ray diffraction analysis confirmed the presence of single phase cubic spinel ferrite with space group Fm3m for all prepared samples. Structural parameters such as lattice constant, crystallite size were calculated from the studies of X-ray diffraction. The morphological analysis of all the compounds is studied using scanning electron microscope. The magnetic properties were measured using electron spin resonance (ESR) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The results obtained showed the formation of manganese ferrites with an average particle size are in good agreement with previous results and displayed good magnetic properties. The dielectric and impedance properties are studied over a frequency range 20 Hz–1 MHz at room temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have performed a detailed investigation of the morphological and magnetic domain structures of nanocrystalline thin cobalt films with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. The films were thermally evaporated at an incidence angle of 0° in a vacuum of about 10−5 mbar and possessed thicknesses in the range from 60 nm to 100 nm. The films were studied by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS), electron diffraction of transmission electron microscopy (TEM), atomic force microscopy (AFM), magnetic force microscopy (MFM) and the Fresnel mode of TEM. The films are polycrystalline and consist of very densely packed grains with sizes at the nanometer range. The grains are roundish in shape and generally exhibit no geometric alignment. The films are mainly composed of the hexagonal close-packed (HCP) phase of cobalt and possess preferential orientation of the cobalt grains with the hexagonal axis perpendicular to the film surface. 70 nm thick films and thicker have fully perpendicular magnetization, while 60 nm thick films possess clearly dominating perpendicular magnetization component. The magnetic domain structure is in the form of stripe domains forming a maze pattern. When the film thickness increases from 60 nm to 100 nm, the average grain size increases from 28.9 nm to 31.5 nm and the average domain width increases from 79.4 nm to 98.7 nm.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.By using the effective field theory (EFT), the mixed spin-1/2 and spin-3/2 Ising ferrimagnetic model adapted to a double perovskite structure has been studied. The EFT calculations have been carried out from Ising Hamiltonian by taking into account first and second nearest-neighbors interactions and the crystal and external magnetic fields. Both first- and second-order phase transitions have been found in phase diagrams of interest. Depending on crystal-field values, the thermodynamic behavior of total magnetization indicated the compensation phenomenon existence. The hysteresis behaviors are studied by investigating the reduced magnetic field dependence of total magnetization and a series of hysteresis loops are shown for different reduced temperatures around the critical one.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The d0 ferromagnetism in wurtzite GaN is investigated by the first-principle calculations. It is found that spontaneous magnetization occurs if sufficient holes are injected in GaN. Both Ga vacancy and Na doping can introduce holes into GaN. However, Ga vacancy has a high formation energy, and is thus unlikely to occur in a significant concentration. In contrast, Na doping has relatively low formation energy. Under N-rich growth condition, Na doping with a sufficient concentration can be achieved, which can induce half-metallic ferromagnetism in GaN. Moreover, the estimated Curie temperature of Na-doped GaN is well above the room temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present here our experimental results for the preparation and characterization of nanowires of nickel and the analysis of the angular dependence of coercivity and remanence using experimental data and micromagnetic simulation. The fabrication was made by using aluminum oxide membranes as templates and deposited nickel by an electrochemical route. The magnetic measurements showed that coercivity and remanence are dependent of the angle of application of the external magnetic field. Our results are different than that expected for the coherent, vortex and transversal modes of the reversion for the magnetic moments. According to the transmission electron microscopy analysis we can see that our nanowires have not a perfect cylindrical format. That is why we have used the ellipsoids chain model for better understanding the real structure of wires and its relation with the magnetic behavior. In order to generate theoretical results for this configuration we have made micromagnetic simulation using Nmag code. Our numerical results for the realistic distances are in correspondence with the magnetic measurements and we can see that there are contradictions if we assume the transverse reversal mode. Then, we can conclude that structure of nanowires should be taken into account to understand the discrepancies reported in the literature for the reversion mechanism in arrays of nickel nanowires.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Alloys of Fe82Ga18−xAlx (x=0, 4.5, 6, 9, 12, 13.5) were prepared by directional solidification technique and exhibited a <001> preferred orientation along the axis of alloy rods. The saturation magnetostriction value of the Fe82Ga13.5Al4.5 alloy was 247 ppm under no pre-stress. The tensile properties of alloys of Fe82Ga18−xAlx at room temperature were investigated. The results showed that tensile ductility of binary Fe-Ga alloy was significantly improved with Al addition. The fracture elongation of the Fe82Ga18 alloy was only 1.3%, while that of the Fe82Ga9Al9 alloy increased up to 16.5%. Addition of Al increased the strength of grain boundary and cleavage, resulting in the enhancement of tensile ductility of the Fe-Ga-Al alloys. Analysis of deformation microstructure showed that a great number of deformation twins formed in the Fe-Ga-Al alloys, which were thought to be the source of serrated yielding in the stress-strain curves. The effect of Al content in the Fe-Ga-Al alloys on tensile ductility was also studied by the analysis of deformation twins. It indicated that the joint effect of slip and twinning was beneficial to obtain the best ductility in the Fe82Ga9Al9 alloy.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In many transformer applications, it is necessary to have a core magnetization model that takes into account both magnetic and electrical effects. This becomes particularly important in three-phase transformers, where the zero-sequence impedance is generally high, and therefore affects the magnetization very strongly. In this paper, we demonstrate a time-step topological simulation method that uses a lumped-element approach to accurately model both the electrical and magnetic circuits. The simulation method is independent of the used hysteresis model. In this paper, a hysteresis model based on the first-order reversal-curve has been used.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Sn substituted Cu ferrite nanoparticles were synthesized (x=0.04, 0.06) by chemical co-precipitation method. The prepared samples were sintered at 300 °C, 600 °C, 900 °C. From XRD analyses the particle size increased due to sintering temperature. The lattice parameter decreased while increasing the concentration of Sn elements and sintering temperature. From SAED pattern of TEM results, the superimposition of bright spots confirms the polycrystalline nature. FT-IR results show the octahedral and tetrahedral stretching sites respectively. The remarkable change of dielectric constant and loss was found to be in the range of 100 KHZ- 700 MHZ.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this article, a reconfigurable subwavelength plasmonic nano-antenna with Fano resonance effect is presented based on the dual ring structure. In order to achieve reconfigurable characteristics, the interaction of gold with graphene is studied. SiN substrate with refractive index of 1.98 and gold with Palik optical characteristic modified for metal layer are utilized in the design of the proposed nano-antenna. Simulations are performed by using CST Microwave Studio. The biasing effect on extinction cross section is studied for 0 to 0.8 eV. It is shown that the gap method is useful for exciting the Fano resonance in the dual ring nano-antenna and there is only a plasmonic resonance in the simple dual ring antenna. The proposed nano-antenna is useful for THz medical spectroscopy due to its simple design and the ability to control the second resonance frequency by changing the bias of the graphene.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.An efficient, green and environmentally procedure for the synthesis of spirooxindole derivatives has been developed by a one-pot three-component reaction of isatin derivatives, activated methylene, and 1,3-dicarbonyl compounds in the presence of Fe3O4@SiO2-imid-PMAn magnetic nanocatalyst under conventional heating conditions in water or microwave irradiation under solvent-free conditions. The reactions under conventional heating conditions were compared with the microwave-assisted reactions. The suggested method offers several advantages such as excellent yields, short reaction times, operational simplicity, a cleaner reaction, absence of any tedious workup or purification and ease of recovery and reusability of the catalyst by a magnetic field. In addition, the excellent catalytic performance in a water medium and the easy preparation, thermal stability and separation of the catalyst make it a good heterogeneous system and a useful alternative to other heterogeneous catalysts. The catalyst can be easily recovered by a magnetic field and reused for six consecutive reaction cycles without significant loss of activity. Also, the morphology of Fe3O4@SiO2-imid-PMAn, particle size distribution and leaching of nano H3PMo12O40 (PMAn) after reaction cycles were investigated by scanning electron microscopy (SEM), dynamic light scattering (DLS), and inductively coupled plasma (ICP) analyzer.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Through arc smelting and high energy ball milling method to synthesized the powders of LaxNd2-xFe17 (x=0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6). By x-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and laser particle analyzer (LPS) to study the structural, morphology, particle size distribution of the powders, respectively. The electromagnetic parameters and saturation magnetization of the powers were measured by a vector network analyzer (VNA) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), respectively. The saturation magnetization decreases with the La increasing. The minimum absorption peak frequency shifts towards a lower frequency region with an increase of La concentration. The microwave absorbing properties of the composite with different ratios of La0.2Nd1.8Fe17/Ni were studied. The microwave absorbing peaks of the composite shift to higher frequencies, and the microwave absorbing properties improved with the Ni content increase to 20%. The minimum reflection loss is −32.5 dB at 9.8 GHz and the bandwidth less than −10 dB (Microwave absorption rate 90%) reaches 3 GHz with a thickness of 1.8 mm.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The La-Zn substituted nanocrystalline Sr2−xLaxNi2Fe12−xZnxO22 (with x=0.0, 0.4, 0.5, 0.6, 0.7, 0.8 and 0.9) hexaferrites were prepared using sol-gel auto-combustion method to investigate the microstructure and magnetic properties. Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR) spectra showed two main absorption bands at 429 and 594 cm−1 corresponding to the stretching and vibration of tetrahedral and octahedral groups in S blocks. The X-ray diffraction pattern confirmed the phase formation of Y-type hexaferrite with R-3 m space group which also provided the lattice constants and crystallite sizes of each product. Furthermore, the crystallite size (D) was found to be in the range of 31.4–43.1 nm. Field emission electron microscopy (FESEM) images confirmed that the grain size was reduced from 600 to 150 nm due to the increase of dopant cations and, subsequently, caused soft magnetic properties to improve. By performing a thorough investigation on the M–H hysteresis loops, it was found that the magnetization first increased up to x=0.7 and then decreased, while coercivity monotonously decreased from 1313 to 569 Oe. This behavior can be attributed to the migration of Fe3+ ions from spin-down to spin-up, local strains, deviation of spin arrangement and strength of superexchange interactions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 nano ferrite particles have been prepared by mechanical alloying via high energy ball milling and sintered at different temperatures from 700 °C to 1000 °C. Spinel structure is confirmed from the analysis of XRD data. Rietveld refinement method is employed to refine the XRD powder data and the structural parameters are calculated from the refinement. Small amount of hematite phase is found in all samples. The SEM, EDAX and XRF analysis reveals respectively the morphology, stoichiometric composition and purity of the powder samples. Using Maximum Entropy Method (MEM) the values of the bond strength between various sites interactions in ferrites are evaluated and compared with theoretical predictions of strengthening/weakening of various sites interactions from the values of interionic distances and interionic bond angles. Ferromagnetic nature of the samples is confirmed from the vibrating sample magnetometer study. The obtained low saturation magnetization values are attributed to presence of second phase. The optical band gap energy of the samples was determined by using UV–VIS techniques.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The mean field approximation results are obtained in a five-site cluster on the diamond lattice from the Bogoliubov inequality. Spin correlation identities for the Blume-Capel model on diamond lattice are derived from a five-site cluster and used to obtain an effective field approximation. The free-energy, magnetization, critical frontiers and tricritical points are obtained from the mean field approximation and the effective field approximation and are compared to those obtained by other methods. From the mean-field approximation, we also studied the unstable and metastable states besides the stable states present in the model.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this study, poly(o-phenylenediamine) (PoPD)/NiCoFe2O4 nanocomposites were synthesized by in-situ oxidative chemical polymerization method with different amount of NiCoFe2O4 nanoparticles. The NiCoFe2O4 nanoparticles were prepared by auto-combustion method. The structural, morphological, thermal properties of the synthesized PoPD/NiCoFe2O4 nanocomposites were characterized by fourier transform infrared spectrum (FTIR), X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and thermogravimetric analysis (TGA). Magnetic properties of NiCoFe2O4 nanoparticles and PoPD/NiCoFe2O4 nanocomposites were studied by vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The FTIR and XRD techniques were used to confirm the formation of PoPD/NiCoFe2O4 nanocomposites. The average crystalline size of NiCoFe2O4 nanoparticles and PoPD/NiCoFe2O4 nanocomposites were calculated from XRD. From the SEM analysis, spherical morphology of the PoPD was confirmed. The TGA results showed that the NiCoFe2O4 nanoparticles have improved the thermal stability of PoPD. Dielectric properties of PoPD/NiCoFe2O4 nanocomposites at different temperatures have been carried in the frequency range 50 Hz to 5 MHz.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The effect of field annealing (in direct (DC) or alternating current (AC) field) on the structure, magnetic properties and giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) of CuBe/ Fe19Co17Ni64 electroplated tubes was studied. The field and frequency dependences of total impedance and its real part were comparatively analyzed together with magnetization processes features. The GMI sensitivity with respect to an applied field was the subject of special attention in view of possible applications of these materials in small magnetic field sensors. The maximum GMI ratio depends strongly on the heat treatments. The DC field annealing leads to the highest total impedance GMI ratio (ΔZ/Z=250%) and real part of the total impedance GMI ratio (ΔR/R=640%), compared to as-cast and AC field annealed samples. The external field response of DC annealed samples presented a single peak GMI response as a consequence of a strong contribution of the longitudinal effective anisotropy. At the same time, the maximum obtained sensitivity of 13.5%/Oe for DC case is much lower compared to the highest sensitivity values obtained for as-prepared (28.6%/Oe) and DC field annealed (22.0%/Oe) tubes for the low frequency of 2.5 MHz. The weak dependence of ΔZ/Z ratio in the case of AC field annealed samples in the high frequency range is an important advantage for particular sensor applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The primary goal of this research is to investigate the effect of loading speed on the stress-induced magnetic behavior of a ferromagnetic steel. Uniaxial tension tests on Q235 steel were carried out with various stress levels under different loading speeds. The variation of the magnetic signals surrounding the tested specimen was detected by a fluxgate magnetometer. The results indicated that the magnetic signal variations depended not only on the tensile load level but on the loading speed during the test. The magnetic field amplitude seemed to decrease gradually with the increase in loading speed at the same tensile load level. Furthermore, the evolution of the magnetic reversals is also related to the loading speed. Accordingly, the loading speed should be considered as one of the influencing variables in the Jies-Atherton model theory of the magnetomechanical effect.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we present the results of X-band EPR spectra of Co2+ ion doped rutile (TiO2) which is one of the most promising memristor material. We obtained the angular variation of spectra in three mutually perpendicular planes at liquid helium (7–13 K) temperatures. Since the impurity ions have ½ effective spin and 7/2 nuclear spin, a relatively simple spin Hamiltonian containing only electronic Zeeman and hyperfine terms was utilized. Two different methods were used in theoretical analysis. Firstly, a linear regression analysis of spectra based on perturbation theory was studied. However, this approach is not sufficient for analyzing Co+2 spectra and leads to complex eigenvectors for G and A tensors due to large anisotropy of eigenvalues. Therefore, all spectra were analyzed again with exact diagonalization of spin Hamiltonian and the high accuracy eigenvalues and eigenvectors of G and A tensors were obtained by taking into account the effect of small sample misalignment from the exact crystallographic planes due to experimental conditions. Our results show that eigen-axes of g and A tensors are parallel to crystallographic directions. Hence, our EPR experiments proves that Co2+ ions substitute for Ti4+ ions in lattice. The obtained principal values of g tensor are gx=2.110(6), gy=5.890(2), gz=3.725(7) and principal values of hyperfine tensor are Ax=42.4, Ay=152.7, Az=26 (in 10−4/cm).© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Soft magnetic composites (SMCs) comprised of ferrite-coated ferrous powder permit isotropic magnetic flux capabilities, lower core losses, and complex designs through the use of traditional powder metallurgy techniques. Current coating materials and methods are vastly limited by the nonmagnetic properties of organic and some inorganic coatings and their inability to withstand high heat treatments for proper stress relief of core powder after compaction. Ferrite-based coatings are ferrimagnetic, highly resistive, and possess high melting temperatures, thus providing adequate electrical barriers between metallic particles. In this work, iron powder was coated with Fe3O4 particles via mechanical milling, then compacted and cured in an inert gas environment. We find density and coercivity to improve with increasing temperatures; however, core loss greatly increases, which is attributed to the formation of a more conductive iron-oxide phase and less resistive Fe volume. Our work begins to exemplify the unique qualities and potential for ferrite-based coatings using traditional powder metallurgy techniques and higher curing temperatures for electromagnetic devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Substituted strontium ferrite (sub-SF) nanoparticles are prepared by a sol-gel method and added to functionalized multiwalled carbon nanotubes (MWCNTs). The ternary nanocomposite of MWCNTs/sub-SF/polyaniline (PANI) is prepared by in-situ polymerization of aniline on MWCNTs/sub-SF reaction mixture. The morphology, structure and magnetic properties of the nanocomposites are investigated by SEM, XRD, FTIR and VSM, respectively. The microwave characteristics are measured using a vector network analyzer. The XRD patterns exhibit representative diffraction peaks corresponding to hexagonal structure, and the structure of the MWCNTs is not distorted. SEM micrographs show that sub-SF nanoparticles and PANI chains are uniformly dispersed on the surface of MWCNTs. The MWCNTs/sub-SF/PANI exhibit a minimum reflection loss of −26 dB at 10 GHz with 3 GHz bandwidth and a matching thickness of 5 mm. This excellent microwave characteristic indicates the synergistic effect of the three components to enhance the impedance matching and improve the microwave absorption properties of the composite.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the low-frequency spin wave dynamics involved in the magnetization reversal of a Penrose P2 tiling using the dynamical matrix method. This system consists of a two-dimensional, connected wire network of elongated thin-film segments, whose complete reversal occurs as a cascade of successive local segment reversals. Using soft mode theory, we interpret the reversal of an individual segment as a first order magnetic transition, in which magnetization curve of the system suffers a small discontinuity. Near this discontinuity a specific mode of the spin wave spectrum goes soft (i.e., its frequency goes to zero), triggering a local instability of the magnetization. We show that this mode is localized, and is at the origin of the local reversal. We discuss the correlation of the mode spatial profile with the “reversal mechanism”, which is the passage of a domain wall through the segment. This process differs from reversal in periodic square or honeycomb artificial spin ices, where a cascade of reversing segments (e.g., “Dirac string”) follows an extended (though irregular) path across the sample; here the spatial distribution of successive segment reversals is discontinuous, but strictly associated with the area where a soft mode is localized. The migration of the localization area across the P2 tiling (during reversal in decreasing applied fields) depends on changes in the internal effective field map. We discuss these results in the context of spin wave localization due to the unique topology of the P2 tiling.© 2016The magnetic properties, electrical transport properties, and low temperature specific heat of polycrystalline perovskite manganese oxide Pr0.65Ca0.35MnO3 have been investigated experimentally. It is found that there exists cluster glass state in the sample at low temperature besides the antiferromagnetic insulating state. With the increase of magnetic field, antiferromagnetic insulating state converts to ferromagnetic metal state and the Debye temperature decreases gradually. In addition, the low temperature electron specific heat in zero magnetic field is obviously larger than that of ordinary rare-earth manganites oxide and this phenomenon is related to the itinerant electrons in ferromagnetic cluster state and the disorder in Pr0.65Ca0.35MnO3.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the modified optical and magnetic properties of europium (Eu3+) ions doped and Manganese nanoparticles (NPs) embedded Magnesium Borotellurite glass synthesized via melt quenching method. The influence of varying Mn NPs concentrations on the magnetic, absorption and emission properties of such glass samples are determined. Stables, transparent and amorphous glasses are obtained. The observed modification of the electronic polarizability is interpreted in terms of the generation of non-bridging oxygen (NBO) and bridging oxygen (BO) in the amorphous network. TEM images manifested the growth of Mn NPs with average diameter 11±1 nm. High-resolution TEM reveals that the lattice spacing of manganese nanoparticles is 0.308 nm at (112) plane. The emission spectra revealed four prominent peaks centered at 587 nm, 610 nm, 651 nm and 700 nm assigned to the transition from 5D0 →7FJ (J=1, 2, 3, 4) states of Eu3+ ion. A significant drop in the luminescence intensity due to the incorporation of Mn NPs is ascribed to the enhanced energy transfer from the Eu3+ ion to NPs. Prepared glass systems exhibited paramagnetic behavior.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We study the Kondo Lattice Model (KLM) on a square lattice through a Hartree–Fock approximation in which the local spins are treated semi-classically, in the sense that their average values are modulated by a magnetic wavevector Q while they couple with the conduction electrons through fermion operators. In this way, we obtain a ground state phase diagram in which spiral magnetic phases (in which the wavevector depends on the coupling constants and on the density) interpolate between the low-density ferromagnetic phase and the antiferromagnetic phase at half filling; within small regions of the phase diagram commensurate magnetic phases can coexist with Kondo screening. We have also obtained ‘Doniach-like’ diagrams, showing the effect of temperature on the ground state phases, and established that for some ranges of the model parameters (the exchange coupling and conduction electron density) the magnetic wavevector changes with temperature, either continuously or abruptly (e.g., from spiral to ferromagnetic).© 2016Unpolarized instrumentation has long been studied and designed using McStas simulation tool. But, only recently new models were developed for McStas to simulate polarized neutron scattering instruments. In the present contribution, we used McStas software to design a polarized neutron beam line, taking advantage of the available spectrometers reflectometer and diffractometer in Algeria. Both thermal and cold neutron was considered. The polarization was made by two types of supermirrors polarizers FeSi and CoCu provided by the HZB institute. For sake of performance and comparison, the polarizers were characterized and their characteristics reproduced. The simulated instruments are reported. Flipper and electromagnets for guide field are developed. Further developments including analyzers and upgrading of the existing spectrometers are underway.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A novel multiple functional bulge apparatus was designed to study the mechanical-electronic-magnetic characteristics of electromagnetic materials. The elastic modulus difference effect of Ni thin film was observed and it was about 22.16% in the demagnetized and magnetization saturated states. The mechanical-magnetic behaviors of Ni and lead-titanate zirconate (PZT)/Ni films were in-situ measured by using the new bulge systems, respectively. The evolutions of three key material properties in hysteresis loop including saturation magnetization, remanent magnetization and coercive field were discussed in detail, respectively. The mechanisms of mechanical-magnetic coupled behaviors of Ni and PZT/Ni films were analyzed with the aid of the competitive relationship of stress and magnetization. Similarly, the electronic-magnetic characteristics of PZT/Ni films were in-situ measured by using this experimental system. The evolution of saturated magnetization, remanent magnetization and coercive field Kerr signals were discussed with the magneto-elastic anisotropy energy point. In this paper, a suitable mechanical-electronic-magnetic bulge measurement system was established, which would provide a good choice for further understanding the multi field coupling characteristics of electromagnetic film materials.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Complex susceptibility measurements provide a unique and efficient means for the investigation and determination of the dynamic properties of magnetic fluids. In particular, measurement of the frequency, f(Hz), and field, H(kA/m), dependent, complex susceptibility, χ(ω, Η)= χ′(ω, Η)−iχ″(ω, Η), of magnetic fluids has proven to be a valuable and reliable technique for investigating such properties. The experimental data presented here was obtained from measurements of a transformer oil based ferrofluid, with measurements being performed over the frequency range 0.1–20 GHz and polarising fields 0–168 kA/m. In the case of transformer oil magnetic fluids, the normal measurement emphasis has been on the investigation of their dielectric properties, including the effects which lightning may have on these properties. Little has been reported on the measurement of the corresponding magnetic susceptibility, χ(ω), of such fluids and in this paper we address this fact. Thus we consider it worthwhile, in the case of a transformer with magnetic fluid transformer oil, being affected as a result of a lightening occurrence, to have knowledge of the fluids dynamic properties, at the microwave frequencies. In the process of determining the sample susceptibility profiles, it was found that the peak value of the χ″(ω) component, was approximately constant over the frequency range 2.4–6.3 GHz. From this it was determined that the fluid was effectively operating as a wideband absorber over a bandwidth of 3.9 GHz.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report a new type of racetrack memory based on current-controlled movement of magnetic vortices in magnetic nanowires with rectangular cross-section and weak perpendicular anisotropy. Data are stored through the core polarity of vortices and each vortex carries a data bit. Besides high density, non-volatility, fast data access, and low power as offered by domain wall racetrack memory, magnetic vortex racetrack memory has additional advantages of no need for constrictions to define data bits, changeable information density, adjustable current magnitude for data propagation, and versatile means of ultrafast vortex core switching. By using micromagnetic simulations, current-controlled motion of magnetic vortices in cobalt nanowire is demonstrated for racetrack memory applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we investigate the responsivities and output voltage noise power spectral densities of magnetoelectric (ME) laminate sensors, consisting of length magnetized Terfenol-D alloys and transverse/width poled Pb(Mg1/3Nb2/3)O3-PbTiO3 (PMNT) crystals (i.e. L-T mode and L-W mode respectively), which are directly integrated with custom-build low noise charge amplifier circuits. Both the theoretical analyses and experimental results prove that the L-W mode sensor with the optimized polarized direction of the PMNT plate possesses lower magnetic detection limit at the interested high frequency range of 10 kHz≤f≤50 kHz. The equivalent magnetic noise (EMN) of the L-W mode sensor is 0.78 pT/Hz1/2 at 30 kHz, which is about 1.7 times lower than the 1.35 pT/Hz1/2 for conventional L-T mode sensor. Furthermore, an effective method of using operational amplifiers with low equivalent input noise voltage and employing ME laminate composites with high voltage coefficient to reduce the EMNs of the ME laminate sensors at high frequency range has been established.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The effect of spherical magnetic particles (Fe3O4) on liquid crystals (6CHBT) behavior and structural changes in electric and weak magnetic fields was studied by means of the attenuation of surface acoustic wave (SAW) of frequency 30 MHz propagating along ferronematic liquid crystals. Three low volume concentrations (Φ=1×10−5, 1×10−4 and 1×10−3) of spherical magnetic particles were added to liquid crystal during its isotropic phase. In contrast to undoped 6CHTB the distinctive SAW attenuation responses induced by both electric and magnetic fields in studied ferronematic liquid crystals below Fréedericksz transition have been observed suggesting both structural changes and the orientational coupling between magnetic moments of magnetic particles and the director of the liquid crystal. The geometrical re-ranking of magnetic particles was registered only for some orientations of magnetic field. Observed results confirmed the significant influence of the presence of magnetic particles on the structural properties and following behavior of 6CHTB.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We use the SU(2) Schwinger boson formalism to study the spin transport in the two-dimensional S=1/2 frustrated Heisenberg antiferromagnet in a square lattice, considering the second-neighbors interactions in the diagonal. We have obtained a spin superfluid behavior for the spin transport to this system similar to obtained recently to the triangular lattice. We consider an antiferromagnetic inter-chain coupling on the diagonal, J2>0, and the nearest-neighbor coupling antiferromagnetic J1>0. We also have in the critical temperature T0, where the correlation length ξ→0, that the system suffers a transition from an ordered ground state to a disordered ground state.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report the growth, structural characterization, and electronic structure evolution of epitaxially grown bcc FexMn1−x on MgO(001). It is observed that the 20 nm thick FexMn1−x alloy films remained bcc from 0.65≤x≤1, much beyond the bulk stability range of 0.88≤x≤1. X-ray absorption spectroscopy and X-ray magnetic circular dichroism show that both the Fe and Mn L3 binding energies slightly increase with Mn incorporation and that the elemental moment of Fe in the 20 nm crystalline bcc alloy film remain nearly constant, then shows a dramatic collapse near x~0.84. The Mn MCD intensity is found to be small at all compositions that exhibit ferromagnetism© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have theoretically studied the spin structure factors of spin chain in the presence of longitudinal field and transverse anisotropy. The possible effects of easy axis magnetization are investigated in terms of anisotropy in the Heisenberg interactions. This anisotropy is considered for exchange coupling constants perpendicular to magnetic field direction. The original spin model hamiltonian is mapped to a bosonic model via a hard core bosonic transformation where an infinite hard core repulsion is imposed to constrain one boson occupation per site. Using Green's function approach, the energy spectrum of quasiparticle excitation has been obtained. The spectrum of the bosonic gas has been implemented in order to obtain two particle propagator which corresponds to spin structure factor of original Heisenberg chain model Hamiltonian. The results show the position of peak in the longitudinal structure factor at fixed value for anisotropy moves to higher frequency with magnetic field. Also the intensity of dynamical structure factor decreases with magnetic field. A small dependence of longitudinal dynamical spin structure factor on the anisotropy is observed for fixed value of magnetic field. Our results show longitudinal static structure factor is found to be monotonically increasing with magnetic field due to increase of spins aligning along magnetic field. Furthermore the dispersion behaviors of static longitudinal and transverse structure factors for different magnetic fields and anisotropy parameters are addressed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Monodispersed Fe3O4 nanoclusters were synthesized in a one-pot solvothermal route with 5-sulfosalicylic acid (SSA) as the functional ligand in a mixed-solvent system of diethylene glycol/ethylene glycol (DEG/EG). Nucleation and aggregation growth model was responsible for the formation of secondary structure of the clusters. In the process, the size of the clusters can be effectively controlled by varying the amounts of SSA and the volume ratio of DEG/EG. The nanoclusters exhibited superparamagnetic properties with high saturation magnetization value of about 68.7 emu g−1 at room temperature. The water-soluble small-molecule SSA grafted on the surface of Fe3O4 nanocrystals rendered the superparamagnetic clusters dispersible in water, which is crucial for potential applications in biomedical fields.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Mixed ferrites with nominal chemical compositions LixNi0.2Mn0.8−2xFe2+xO4 ranging from x=0 to 0.4 in the steps of 0.1 have been prepared by the auto combustion technique. The X-ray diffraction patterns consist of major cubic spinel LixNi0.2Mn0.8−2xFe2+xO4 phase with minor impurity phases (Fe2O3 and MnO) and with Li substitution phase purity has increased, such that for x=0.4 pure phase spinel structure has been obtained. The lattice parameter has decreased with the increase in Li content obeying Vegard's law. Both the bulk density and theoretical density have decreased with Li content and with sintering temperature (Ts) up to 1300 °C ρB has increased and beyond that it has decreased. Morphological studies have performed by a high resolution optical microscope and observed that average grain size noticeably dependent on Li substitution. The initial permeability (μi′′) has found to decrease with Li substitution. The Curie temperature (TC) has determined from the temperature dependent μi′′ and found to increases with Li content. From the room temperature magnetization measurement, it has observed that all samples are in ferrimagnetic state at room temperature. The number of Bohr magneton has been obtained from the observed saturation magnetization. Dielectric constant, dielectric loss tangent, ac conductivity and complex impedance are studied in the frequency range 20 Hz–10 MHz. Frequency dependence of dielectric constant in lower frequencies indicates a usual dielectric dispersion due to the Maxwell-Wagner type interfacial polarization. Dielectric loss tangent shows similar behavior like dielectric constant. The complex impedance analysis has been used to study the effect of grain and grain boundary on the electrical properties and with Li content both grain and grain boundary resistance show an increasing trend. The ac conductivity shows frequency independent behavior at the low frequency side and with increasing frequency the conductivity increases.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The present study focuses on the synthesis, microstructural and magnetic properties of ternary FeNiCo nanoparticles. Nanocrystalline ternary FeNiCo particles were synthesized via hydrogen reduction assisted ultrasonic spray pyrolysis method in single step. The effect of precursor concentration on the morphology and the size of particles was investigated. The syntheses were performed at 800 °C. Structure, morphology and magnetic properties of the as-prepared products were characterized through X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) studies. Scherer calculation revealed that crystallite size of the ternary particles ranged between 36 and 60 nm. SEM and TEM investigations showed that the particle size was strongly influenced by the precursor concentration and Fe, Ni, Co elemental composition of individual particles was homogeneous. Finally, the soft magnetic properties of the particles were observed to be a function of their size.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The analytical expression for the initial magnetization curve for Fe-phenolphormaldehyde resin composite material was derived based on the already proposed ideas of the magnetization vector deviation function and the domain wall annihilation function, characterizing the reversible magnetization processes through the extent of deviation of magnetization vectors from magnetic field direction and the irreversible processes through the effective numbers of movable domain walls, respectively. As for composite materials the specific dependences of these functions were observed, the ideas were extended meeting the composites special features, which are principally the much higher inner demagnetizing fields produced by magnetic poles on ferromagnetic particle surfaces. The proposed analytical expression enables us to find the relative extent of each type of magnetization processes when magnetizing a specimen along the initial curve.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We address the abnormal anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) reversal feature of half-metallic polycrystalline Fe3O4 films occurring at a specific temperature. Experimental results revealed a positive to negative MR transition in the Fe3O4 films at 264 K, which reflect the influence of additional domain wall scattering. These features was described by a correlation between domain wall resistance and inversion behavior of AMR with additional domain wall scattering factors. We further describe a possible model based on systematic structural and electrical measurements that employs a temperature-dependent domain wall width and spin diffusion length of the conducting electrons. This model allows for spin-flipping scattering of spin polarized electrons inside a proper domain width.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Single phase magneto-electric multiferroics require a large magnetic or electric field for producing magneto-electric (ME) and magnetodielectric (MD) effects. For utilizing these effects in devices investigations on the room temperature and low field MD studies are necessary. Recently, efforts have been largely devoted to the investigation of rare earth iron garnets. In the physical method, the preparation of rare earth iron garnet requires high sintering temperature and processing time. To solve these problems, ball milling assisted microwave sintering technique is used to prepare nanocrystalline holmium iron garnets (Ho3Fe5O12). Magnetic and dielectric properties of the prepared sample are investigated. These properties get enhanced in nanocrystalline form when compared to the bulk. The MD coupling of the prepared sample is evident from the anomaly in the temperature dependent dielectric constant plot and the ME coupling susceptibility is derived from the room temperature MD measurements.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this article we explore the electronic and magnetic properties of RAu intermetallics (R=Ce, Pr, Nd, Sm, Gd, Tb, Dy, Ho, Er, Tm, Yb and Lu) for the first time. These properties are calculated by using GGA, GGA+U and hybrid density functional theory (HF) approaches. Our calculations show that HF provides superior results, consistent to the experimentally reported data. The chemical bonding between rare-earth and gold atoms within these compounds are explained on the basis of spin dependent electronic clouds in different planes, which shows predominantly ionic and metallic nature between Au and R atoms. The Cohesive energies of RAu compounds show direct relation with the melting points. Spin-dependent electronic band structure demonstrates that all these compounds are metallic in nature. The magnetic studies show that HoAu and LuAu are stable in non-magnetic structure, PrAu is stable in ferromagnetic phase and CeAu, NdAu, SmAu, GdAu, TbAu, DyAu, ErAu, TmAu, YbAu are anti-ferromagnetic materials.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Paper addresses the inverse problem in determining the area, where the external constant magnetic field captures the biological cells modified by the magnetic nanoparticles. Zero velocity isolines, in area where the modified cells are captured by the magnetic field were determined by numerical method for two locations of the magnet. The problem was solved taking into account the gravitational field, magnetic induction, density of medium, concentration and size of cells, and size and magnetization of nanoparticles attached to the cell. Increase in the number of the nanoparticles attached to the cell and decrease in the cell’ size, enlarges the area, where the modified cells are captured and concentrated by the magnet. Solution is confirmed by the visible pattern formation of the modified cells Saccharomyces cerevisiae.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and microstructure of FePt films grown on MoC layer and MoC/(Mg–X)O (X=Cu, Ni, Co) combined intermediate layers were studied. The (Mg–X)O (X=Cu, Ni, Co) layer with thickness of 5 nm was deposited on CrRu seed layer at 395 °C. The CrRu (200) texture was enhanced which may due to well grains growth in specific orientation and small lattice mismatch with (Mg–X)O (X=Cu, Ni, Co). Finally, the FePt/MoC layers were deposited on (Mg–X)O layer at 425 °C. Using MoC/MgCuO combined intermediate layers, the rocking width of FePt (001) and CrRu (200) diffraction peak were changed from 7.1° to 6.1°, and 5.7° to 3.8°, respectively. For MoC/MgCoO dual intermediate layers, the rocking width of FePt (001) and CrRu (200) diffraction peak were 6.7° and 4.1°. The FePt/MoC/MgCoO film illustrates perpendicular magnetic anisotropy with out-of plane coercivity of 9.3 kOe which is higher than FePt film deposited on MoC layer (8.5 kOe) and the in-plane loops is linear. From microstructure, the FePt grains were more separated on MoC/(Mg–X)O (X=Cu, Ni, Co) combined intermediate layers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The characterization of the magnetic switching behavior of heat assisted magnetic recording (HAMR) media at near Curie temperature (Tc) is important for high density recording. In this study, we measured the magnetic property of FePt granular media (with room temperature coercivity ~25 kOe) at near Tc with a home built HAMR testing instrument. The local area of HAMR media is heated to near Tc by a flat-top optical heating beam. The magnetic property in the heated area was in-situ measured by a magneto-optic Kerr effect (MOKE) testing beam. The switching field distribution (SFD) and coercive field (Hc) of the FePt granular media and their dependence on the optical heating power at near Tc were studied. We measured the DC demagnetization (DCD) signal with pulsed laser heating at different optical powers. We also measured the Tc distribution of the media by measuring the AC magnetic signal as a function of optical heating power. In a summary, we studied the SFD, Hc of the HAMR media at near Tc in a static manner. The present methodology will facilitate the HAMR media testing.© 2016Thermoelectric properties of materials are intimately related to their electronic band structure. Combining first- and second-principles calculations, we have obtained the transport properties for the spin-up and spin-down electrons of the laves phase TbFe2 and TbCo2 compounds. The unique band structure feature and the density of states at Fermi level (EF) promote the EF to a point where carriers are in energetic proximity to these features. The non-zero density of states at EF for the spin-up (↑) and spin-down (↓) electrons leads to unusual transport properties because both the (↑) and (↓) densities contributes to the states at EF. The parabolic bands in the vicinity of EF enhance the carriers mobility and hence the transport properties of TbFe2 and TbCo2. Calculations show that the spin-up/down transport coefficients are temperature-dependent. It has been found that TbCo2 possess larger Seebeck coefficient than that of TbFe2 and hence the power factor. The calculated Seebeck coefficient of TbCo2 agree well with the available experimental data.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic nanosized rare earth iron garnets (R3Fe5O12, where R=Sm, Eu, Gd, Tb, Dy, Ho, Er, Tm, Yb, Lu) were prepared by an aqueous sol–gel method. Herein we present, that all these garnets can be obtained by this effective synthesis method simply by changing the temperature of the final annealing. It was also demonstrated, that a different annealing temperature leads to a different particle size distribution of the final product. The SEM analysis results revealed that the smallest particles were formed in the range of 75–130 nm. The phase purity and structure of the rare earth iron garnets were estimated using XRD analysis and Mössbauer spectroscopy. Magnetic properties were determined by magnetization measurements. The relation between the particle size, composition and magnetic properties of the sol-gel derived garnets were also discussed in this study.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Peculiarities of the magnetization reversal process in cylindrical Ni-Cu soft magnetic nanowires with dominant shape anisotropy are analyzed via both static and time dependent micromagnetic simulations. A reversible process involving a coherent-like spin rotation is always observed for magnetic fields applied perpendicularly to the easy axis whereas nucleation of domain walls is introduced for fields applied along the easy axis. Simple criteria for making distinction between a Stoner-Wohlfarth type rotation and a nucleation mechanism in systems with uniaxial magnetic anisotropy are discussed. Superposed reversal mechanisms can be in action for magnetic fields applied at arbitrary angles with respect to the easy axis within the condition of an enough strong axial component required by the nucleation. The dynamics of the domain wall, involving two different stages (nucleation and propagation), is discussed with respect to initial computing conditions and orientations of the magnetic field. A nucleation time of about 3 ns and corkscrew domain walls propagating with a constant velocity of about 150 m/s are obtained in case of Ni-Cu alloy (Ni rich side) NWs with diameters of 40 nm and high aspect ratio.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate microfluidic switching valves using magnetic nanoparticles blended within the working fluid as an alternative microfluidic flow control in microchannels. Y-shaped microchannels have been fabricated by using a CO2 laser cutter to pattern microchannels on transparent poly(methyl methacrylate) (PMMA) sheets covered with thermally bonded transparent polyvinyl chloride (PVC) sheets. To examine the performance of the microfluidic magnetic switching valves, an aqueous magnetic nanoparticle suspension was injected into the microchannels by a syringe pump. Neodymium magnets were then employed to attract magnetic nanoparticles and form an aggregate that blocked the microchannels at a required position. We have found that the maximum volumetric flow rate of the syringe pump that the magnetic nanoparticle aggregate can withstand scales with the square of the external magnetic flux density. The viscosity of the fluid exhibits dependent on the aggregate length and the size of the magnetic nanoparticles. This microfluidic switching valve based on aggregates of magnetic nanoparticles has strong potentials as an on-demand flow control, which may help simplifying microfluidic channel designs.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The implementation of magnetic domain wall (DW) based memory and logic devices critically depend on the control over DW assisted magnetization reversal processes. Here we investigate the magnetization reversal by DW injection, pinning and depinning at a geometrical constriction in permalloy nanowire (NW) driven by external in-plane magnetic field, using local electrical probes. The observations of two distinct depinning field values are identified with the help of micromagnetic simulations, as being due to vortex DWs of different chiralities. Statistical analysis gave an estimate of chirality dependent pinning probability of DWs at this constriction. The stochastic nature of the DW based reversal driven by magnetic field is revealed here. The asymmetry in the depinning field of the DWs to move to either side of constriction indicates the asymmetric nature of the barrier potential seen by the DWs. The results demonstrate the difficulties in achieving deterministic switching behavior of DW assisted reversal, and provide a platform to understand the main bottlenecks in the technological implementation of DWs.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, effects of sintering atmosphere and temperature on structural and magnetic properties of Ni0.3Cu0.2Zn0.5Fe2O4 nanoparticles prepared by citrate precursor method have been studied. The structural characterization of the samples by X-ray powder diffraction and FT-IR spectroscopy is evidence for formation of a cubic structure with no presence of impurity phase. Calculated values of crystallite size and unit cell parameter show an increase with sintering temperature under different atmospheres. Variation of saturation magnetization with sintering temperature and atmosphere can be attributed to change of three factors: magnetic core size, inversion parameter and the change of Fe3+-ion concentration due to the presence of Fe4+ and Fe2+ ions. The saturation magnetization gradually grows with sintering temperature due to increase of magnetic core size and a maximum 63 emu/g was achieved at 600 °C under carbon monoxide-ambient atmosphere.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We use the Self Consistent Harmonic Approximation together with the Kubo formalism of the Linear Response Theory to study the spin transport in the two-dimensional frustrated Heisenberg antiferromagnet in a square lattice with easy-plane ion single anisotropy. The regular part of the spin conductivity σreg(ω) is determined for several values of the critical ion single parameter Dc, that separates the low D region from the large D quantum paramagnetic phase. We have obtained an abrupt change in the spin conductivity in the discontinuity points of the graphic Dc vs. η, where the system presents a quantum phase transition.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We examine magnetic glass-coated microwires used for magnetic sensors. Images of domain structures and magnetization reversal were obtained with magneto-optical Kerr microscopy. Of particular importance were temperature-induced transformations of surface magnetic structures. Different surface magnetic domains coexist, characterized by various domain periods, magnetization directions, and nobilities of domain walls.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic, magnetocaloric and electrical properties in distorted orthorhombic system Pr0.7Ca0.3Mn0.98Co0.02O3 has been studied. Complex impedance analysis confirms the contribution of grain boundary on the conduction process. The latter is dominated by thermally activated hopping mechanism. The sample exhibits two relaxations phenomena. Only one process persists at higher temperatures. Conductivity analysis indicates that the investigated compound exhibits a semiconductor behavior. The material reveals a dielectric transition and the experimental results are well fitted by Curie-Weiss law. The magnetic measurements show a clear paramagnetic–ferromagnetic transition with a large magnetic entropy change over a wide range of temperature. Furthermore, Banerjee's criteria and Landau theory of phase transitions are also studied to access magnetic ordering in the sample. A maximum magnetic entropy change increases from 0.5 to 2.18 J kg−1 K−1 when magnetic field rises from 1 T to 5 T. For the higher applied magnetic field, the material exhibits a high relative cooling power RCP=268.14 J/kg with a large temperature full-width at half maximum δTFWHM=123 K.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report on an experimental investigation of magnetic properties and domain structure of single nanostrips and their magnetostatically coupled arrays possessing the shape anisotropy and anisotropy induced by oblique deposition, which are oriented at different angles to each other. The orientation of the effective anisotropy and the value of coercive force of nanostrip arrays depends on the angle between directions of the induced anisotropies. Micromagnetic simulations, performed to determine possible spin configurations especially within domain walls, support the experimentally observed magnetic domain structure. An influence of dipole-dipole interaction between magnetostatically coupled nanostrips on the domain structure and coercive force of arrays are discussed. We demonstrate the experimental validation of an early-proposed theoretical model for determination of the effective magnetic anisotropy through the combination of induced anisotropies.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report results of a first-principles density-functional study of alloys of the 4d-element Mo with group IV elements Si, Ge and Sn in zinc blende (ZB) and rock salt (RS) structures. The study was motivated by a similar study of ours based on the 4d-element Tc, which showed the presence of half-metallic states with integer magnetic moment (1μB) per formula unit in TcX (X=C, Si, Ge) alloys. The calculated Curie temperatures for the ferromagnetic (FM) phases were low, around or less than 300 K. Searching for the possibility of 4d-based alloys with higher Curie temperatures we have carried out the study involving the elements Mo, Ru and Rh. Among these the most promising case appears to be that involving the element Mo. Among the MoX (X=Si, Ge, Sn) alloys in ZB and RS structures, both MoGe and MoSn in ZB structures are found to possess an integer magnetic moment of 2μB per formula unit. ZB MoSn can be classified as a marginal/weak half-metal or a spin gapless semiconductor, while ZB MoGe would be best described as a gapless magnetic semiconductor. The calculated Curie temperatures are in the range 300–700 K. Considering the theoretical uncertainty in the band gaps due not only to the treatment of exchange and correlation effects, but density functional theory itself, these classifications may change somewhat, but both merit investigation from the viewpoint of potential spintronic application. Based on their higher Curie temperatures, Mo-based alloys would serve such purpose better than the previously reported Tc-based ones.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The effect of high external magnetic field (up to 7 T) on soft magnetic properties in nanocrystalline Fe74.1Si15.7Nb3.1B6.1Cu1 Nanophy® cores has been investigated. The as-quenched amorphous ribbons were nanocrystallized by annealing between 540 and 620 °C in transverse magnetic field. By varying annealing field from 0 to 7 T, induced anisotropy ranging from as low as 4 J/m3 to as high as 41 J/m3 is obtained. It is responsible for an increase in the cut-off frequency up to 300 kHz when the material is submitted to dynamic magnetic excitations. A minimum coercivity of 0.74 A/m is observed in the core annealed in 1 T associated to low losses. The relative permeability decreases on increasing the annealing field intensity with a minimum value of 13,654 at 7 T. Such permeability level opens the way to new applications of the Nanophy® alloys.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.CoFe2O4 (CFO) thin films with high coercivity HC are desirable in applications. The difficulty in achieving large-area CFO thin films with high coercivity by sol-gel has hindered the development of CFO thin films. Herein, polycrystalline CFO thin films with the room temperature out-of-plane and in-plane coercivity HC respectively reached ~5.9 and 3.6 kOe has been achieved on the silicon substrate by sol-gel. The room-temperature maximum magnetic energy product (BH)max and remanence ratio Mr/Ms are of 1.66 MG Oe and 0.58 respectively, which are also the largest values amongst the CFO thin films prepared by solution methods. At the same time, annealing temperature and thickness effects on the HC, (BH)max and Mr/Ms of the derived CFO thin films have been investigated. It is observed that grain size and residual tensile strain in the derived films play an important role in the variations of HC and Mr/Ms. These results will provide an effective route for fabricating larger-area high-coercivity CFO thin films with low-cost by sol-gel on silicon wafers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work, ternary Cu doped FePt nanoparticles were prepared in hexadecylamine at 320 °C by choosing FeCl2 as the Fe source. The experimental results showed that without Cu doping the as-prepared FePt nanoparticles possessed fcc structure and gradually exhibited typical fct diffraction peaks after increasing the Cu doping concentration. TEM images showed that the FePt nanoparticles had larger size and wider size distribution after introducing Cu additive. Magnetic property measurement showed that a coercivity of 4800 Oe was obtained when the composition of the ternary nanoparticles reached Fe35Pt45Cu20, in which the content of Fe+Cu was higher than Pt. The research indicates that Cu doping promotes the phase transition of FePt nanoparticles at temperature as low as 320 °C.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nowadays, nanoparticles (NPs) are used in a variety of biomedical applications including brain disease diagnostics and subsequent treatments. Among the various types of NPs, magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) have been implemented by many research groups for an array of life science applications. In this paper, we studied MNPs controlled delivery into the endothelial cells using a magnetic field. Dynamics equations of MNPs were defined in the continuous domain using control theory methods and were applied to crossing the cell membrane. This study, dedicated to clinical and biomedical research applications, offers a guideline for the generation of a magnetic field required for the delivery of MNPs.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic multilayer of substrate/Pt-15 nm/Co-0.8 nm/Pt-wedge 0–7 nm/Co-0.6 nm/Pt-2 nm structure is characterized by a perpendicular anisotropy of the Co layers and by graded interlayer coupling between them. Using magnetooptical Kerr microscopy we observed a distinct influence of magnetic domains in one Co layer on the nucleation field and positions of nucleation sites of reversed domains in the second Co layer. For sufficiently strong interlayer coupling a replication of magnetic domains from the magnetically harder layer to the magnetically softer layer is observed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the current work, we investigated effects of the velocity slip for the flow and heat transfer of four nanofluids over a non-linear stretching sheet taking into account the thermal radiation and magnetic field in presence of the effective electrical conductivity. The governing partial differential equations were transformed into a set of nonlinear ordinary differential equation using similarity transformations before being solved numerically by the Chebyshev pseudospectral differentiation matrix (ChPDM). It was found that the investigated parameters affect remarkably on the nanofluid stream function for the whole investigated nanoparticles. In addition, velocity and skin friction profiles of the four investigated nanofluids decreases and increases, respectively, with the increase of the magnetic parameter, first-order and second-order velocity slips. Further, the flow velocity, surface shear stress and temperature are strongly influenced on applying the velocity slip model, where lower values of the second-order imply higher surface heat flux and thereby making the fluid warmer.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A low-temperature thin film phase diagram of the iron nitride system is established for the case of thin films grown by molecular beam epitaxy and nitrided by a nitrogen radical source. A fine-tuning of the nitridation conditions allows for growth of α′-Fe8Nx with increasing c/a-ratio and magnetic anisotropy with increasing x until almost phase pure α′-Fe8N1 thin films are obtained. A further increase of nitrogen content below the phase decomposition temperature of α′-Fe8N (180 °C) leads to a mixture of several phases that is also affected by the choice of substrate material and symmetry. At higher temperatures (350 °C), phase pure γ′-Fe4N is the most stable phase.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the effects of the random single-ion anisotropy and random magnetic field in the phase diagram and in the thermodynamic properties of the spin-3/2 Blume–Capel model via Curie–Weiss mean-field approximation. The phase diagrams were built in the planes temperature versus single-ion anisotropy, temperature versus magnetic field, temperature versus random parameters and the dependencies of magnetization were plotted versus temperature and single-ion anisotropy. These diagrams show that, in the space (D/J−T/J), the type (first- or second-order) of the phase transition between the ferromagnetic and paramagnetic phases is dependent on the random parameters. Therefore, within these conditions the model presents tricritical behavior. For large values, and a certain critical value of the random parameters, the phase transition is only of second-order, but it is of first-order within the ordered phase, between the phase with m=1/2 and m=3/2, which ends in a terminal critical point.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The crystalline and magnetic properties of micron thick magnetron sputtered Co1−xCrx and Co1−xNix alloy films are analyzed in the view of their implementation as semi-hard magnets. All of the tested films crystallize in an hcp lattice, at least up to 35 at% of alloying elements (Cr or Ni). The structural study shows that the ratio of hcp phase with [0001] axis orientated perpendicular to the film as compared with in-plane orientation increases (resp. decreases), when Ni (resp. Cr) concentration increases independently of the post-annealing temperature. The orientation of the magnetization results from the competition between the demagnetization field which tends to align the magnetization in plane and the crystalline anisotropy which tends to maintain the magnetization along the [0001] axis. Interestingly, we find that, although Co and Ni are very similar atoms, Co1−xNix alloys crystalline anisotropy can be strongly increased and reach up to twice the anisotropy of the best Co1−xCrx alloy, while maintaining a magnetization at saturation above 1200 kA/m. The thermal stability of the structural and magnetic properties of both alloys is demonstrated for an annealing temperature up to 300 °C.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report the discovery of a positive exchange bias between Ni80Fe20 (Py) and twined (101¯0)-Cr2O3 film near its blocking temperature (TB) when it is cooled in an in-plane magnetic field applied along 45 degrees from the two spin configurations of the Cr atoms. This is an abnormal behavior compared to the negative exchange bias at all temperatures below TB when the cooling and measuring magnetic fields are applied along one of the two spin configurations of the Cr atoms. We speculate these results could be related to the exchange interactions between the twined structure of the (101̅0)-Cr2O3 film epitaxially grown on the rutile (001)-TiO2 substrate.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Temperature (0.5–300 K) and magnetic field (H up to 90 kOe) dependences of the magnetization (M) of a powder sample of vanadyl phthalocyanine (VOPc) having the Phase II-triclinic structure are measured and analyzed. The data of χ = M/H vs. T measured in H = 1 kOe fit the modified Curie-Weiss (CW) law, χ = χo+C/(T−θ), with C = 6.266×10−4 emuK/gOe, θ = −0.1 K and χo = −9.3×10−7 emu/gOe. The Curie constant C yields magnetic moment μ = 1.704 μB, S = 1/2, and g = 1.967 characteristic of VO2+. The magnitude of θ = −0.1 K signifying very weak inter-ion antiferromagnetic exchange coupling is supported by the analysis of the variable frequency (9.8–336 GHz) electron paramagnetic resonance data. The isothermal data of M vs. H at ten temperatures between 0.5 K and 300 K when plotted as M vs. H/(T+0.1) collapses on to a single curve given by M = Mo tanh {gμBH/[2kB(T+0.1)]} with Mo = NgμBS = 9.48 emu/g expected for S = 1/2 system, thus signifying near perfect paramagnetism in VOPc.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Fe50Ni50 alloy powders were successfully synthesized with the liquid phase reduction method and then treated with the transverse magnetic field of 200 kA/m. The influences of transverse magnetic field treatment on microstructures and radar absorbing properties of the powders were mainly investigated. Whether the powders were treated with the transverse magnetic field or not, the main phases of Fe50Ni50 alloy powders were FeNi3 and a small amount of Fe2O3. Results showed that the real part of complex permeability μʹ; of the Fe50Ni50 alloy powders in 1–5 GHz increased significantly, especially at the frequency of 1 GHz, the μʹ; increased from 2.2 to 2.8 after transverse magnetic field treatment. The magnetic loss tanδm of the Fe50Ni50 alloy powders after transverse magnetic field treatment was ≥0.3 in the frequency range of 1–13 GHz and 0.7–1.05 in the frequency range of 3.5–9.0 GHz. Compared with those of the untreated powders, the wave-absorbing properties of the powders after transverse magnetic field treatment were significantly improved. The Fe50Ni50 alloy powders coatings with thickness of 1.5 mm exhibited excellent wave-absorbing properties after transverse magnetic field treatment, and the qualified absorption band width reached nearly 3 GHz when the reflectivity |R| was ≥10 dB.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Numerical simulations are used to investigate static and dynamic properties of spin distributions within domain walls confined by rectangular cross section Permalloy nanowire conduits having widths up to 1000 nm and thickness up to 50 nm. Phase boundaries and critical regions associated with domain-wall spin distributions of various topologies [transverse (or asymmetric transverse), vortex, double-vortex, triple-vortex and cross-tie] are accurately determined using high-performance computing resources. Mobility curves are calculated that characterize domain-wall propagation for an interesting region of the spin texture phase diagram: 20 nm thick nanowires with widths of 60–700 nm at axial drive fields extending to 150 Oe. The simulations (and corresponding experiments, which are discussed), reveal new propagating fixed configuration domain-wall topologies with enhanced velocity. Effects of temperature on the spin distributions and dynamics are explored, by conducting simulations that include separately varying temperature-dependent parameters (saturation magnetization and exchange constant) and simulating effects of temperature-dependent fluctuations using the Langevin dynamics feature of the simulation code. Related temperature-dependent experiments are discussed. The simulation studies demonstrate a close connection between static and (field-driven) dynamic spin configurations in nanowire-confined domain walls and demonstrate the importance of exploring model-system parameter space at high numerical precision.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.TbxDy1−xFe2/Pt/Pb(Zrx, Ti1−x)O3 thin films were grown on Pt/TiO2/SiO2/Si substrate by multi-target sputtering. The magnetoelectric voltage coefficient αΗΜΕ was determined at room temperature using a lock-in amplifier. By adding, in series in the circuit, a capacitor of the same value as that of the device under test, we were able to demonstrate that the magnetoelectric device behaves as a voltage source. Furthermore, a simple way to subtract the stray voltage arising from the flow of eddy currents in the measurement set-up, is proposed. This allows the easy and accurate determination of the true magnetoelectric voltage coefficient. A large αΗΜΕ of 8.3 V/cm. Oe was thus obtained for a Terfenol-D/Pt/PZT thin film device, without DC magnetic field nor mechanical resonance.© 2016Electronic structure, magnetic and optical properties of ZnO doped with single and double impurities Zn1−xCrxO, Zn1−xFexO, and Zn1−2xCrxFexO (x=0.03 and 0.06) are investigated using first-principles calculations. Based on the Korringa–Kohn–Rostoker method combined with the coherent potential approximation, we investigated the half-metallic ferromagnetic behavior of doubles impurities (Cr, Fe) doped ZnO. To support our results, we apply the self-interaction-corrected local density approximation (SIC-LDA) to study the electronic structure, optical and magnetic properties of Co-doped ZnO with doubles impurities (Cr, Fe) showing that the half-metallic ferromagnetic state still persists. The stability of the ferromagnetic state compared with the spin-glass state is investigated by comparing their total energies. The exchange interactions obtained from first principle calculations and used in a classical Ising model by a Monte Carlo approach resulted in ferromagnetic states with high Neel temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Spinel ferrites with chemical formula CuPryFe2-yO4(y=0.0,0.02,0.04,0.06,0.08,0.10) were synthesized using sol-gel technique. The sintered powder characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). X-ray Diffraction analysis showed that the samples with concentration (y=0.0–0.06) have single spinel phase and the samples with concentration at y=0.08–0.10 have secondary phase (ortho ferrite phase) along spinel phase. The Lattice constant a increased with the substitution of Praseodymium (Pr) ions. The crystallite size calculated from Scherre's formula is found in the range of 53–37 nm. It is observed that DC resistivity and activation energy enhances with the substitution of Pr. The dc resistivity decreased with the increase in temperature. The conduction below Curie temperature (Tc) is due to hopping of electrons and holes, whereas, above Curie temperature it is due to polaron hopping. The decrease in Tc with increasing Pr constant may be due to the fact that Pr–Fe interactions on the B sites are weaker than Fe–Fe interaction. The saturation magnetization (Ms) and remanence (Mr) decreased where as coercivity (Hc) has been increased with the increase of Pr content. The measured parameters suggest that these materials are potential candidates for high frequency applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The induced magnetic moments in the V 3d electronic states of interface atomic layers in a Fe(6ML)/V(7ML) superlattice was investigated by x-ray resonant magnetic scattering. The first V atomic layer next to Fe was found to be strongly antiferromagnetically polarized relatively to Fe and the magnetic moments of the next few atomic layers in the interior V region decay exponentially with increasing distance from the interface, while the magnetic moments of the Fe atomic layers largely remain bulk-like. The induced V moments decay more rapidly as observed by x-ray magnetic scattering than in standard x-ray magnetic circular dichroism. The theoretical description of the induced magnetic atomic layer profile in V was found to strongly rely on the interface roughness within the superlattice period. These results provide new insight into interface magnetism by taking advantage of the enhanced depth sensitivity to the magnetic profile over a certain resonant energy bandwidth in the vicinity of the Bragg angles.© 2016The objective of this work is to predict the structural, electronic, magnetic and elastic properties of Mg1−xTMxS (TM=Mn, Fe, Co and Ni) compound in the zinc blende Ferromagnetic phase using first principal approach. The structural and elastic properties are performed using the generalized gradient approximation proposed by Wu and Cohen(WC-GGA). However, the electronic and magnetic properties have been performed using modified Becke-Johnson potential combined with the LDA correlation (mBJLDA). The results show that all compounds Mg1−xMnxS, Mg1−xFexS and Mg1−xNixS exhibit a half-metallic ferromagnetic character with 100% spin-polarization at the Fermi level, except Mg1−xCoxS is a metal. For each compounds study here, the total magnetic momentum is an integer equal to magnetic moments of TM atom in their free space charge value. Due to the p–d hybridization, there is a small local magnetic moment on the Mg and S sites; whereas, the local magnetic moments of TM atom reduce from their free space charge value. In addition, we investigate the mechanical behavior of MgS and Mg1−xTMxS; all compounds studied here are mechanically stable and exhibit a strong anisotropic behavior.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The structure and magnetocaloric effect of Mn5−xFexGeSi2 compounds were studied. Analysis of X-ray powder diffraction and energy dispersive X-Ray spectroscopy revealed that Mn5−xFexGeSi2 alloys with x<1 crystallize in the Mn5Si3-type structure (space group P63/mcm), maintaining the structure of Mn5Ge3; and alloys with x=1.5 and 2 consist of the major Mn5Si3-type phase and the minor Ni2In-type phase (space group P63/mmc). The results of Rietveld refinement showed that the cell parameters for the Mn5Si3-type phase decrease with increasing Fe content. The positive slopes in Arrott plots indicate that a second-order ferromagnetic to paramagnetic transition occurs. The Curie temperature increases with increasing Fe content from 182 K for x=0.6 to 224 K for x=2. The maximum magnetic entropy change of 3.7 J/(kg K) for x=0.8 was found under a magnetic field change of 0–20 kOe.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Strontium hexaferrites, doped with varying Co-Zr content (x) have been synthesized by sol-gel auto-combustion route using tartaric acid as fuel at 800 °C. X-ray diffraction and Fourier transform Infra-red have been carried out to confirm the phase formation, particle size (average 21.9–36.8 nm) and the bond formation respectively. Magnetic properties are scrutinized using vibrating sample magnetometer. Techniques like scanning electron microscopy, transmission electron microscopy and energy dispersive scattering have been employed to explore the surface morphology, particle size and composition of the nano-powders. Electromagnetic characterization of the prepared ferrites has been done using Vector Network Anlyzer in 12.4–18 GHz frequency range. The effect of calcination temperature (500–1000 °C) on the structure, morphology and magnetic properties has also been studied for x=0.2 and 800 °C has been found to be the most suitable temperature with the best magnetic properties. Increase in doping has resulted in resonance peaks in dielectric and magnetic loss spectra, leading to microwave absorption peaks. Ferrites with x=0.2, 0.8 and 1.0 have appropriate reflection loss less than −10 dB and bandwidth in Ku-band, hence can be used as effective absorbers in suppression of electromagnetic interference (EMI). The governance of impedance matching in deciding the absorption properties has been proved by using input impedance calculations.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic polyacrylic acid sodium polymer (MPAAS) was prepared by chemical transformation method. Key parameters were investigated in the synthesis process of the magnetic polymer and an optimum preparation condition was gained. The structure of the magnetic polymer was characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectrosocopy (FTIR) and scanning electron microscope (SEM). Magnetic property of the magnetic polymer was measured by the magnet and superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID). Both the swelling ratio and kinetics and the water retention ratio and kinetics were investigated. Based on the results, it can be gained that both swelling rate and equilibrium swelling rate were lowered after magnetization while the water retention ability of the magnetic polymer is stronger than that of the polymer.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A novel three-dimensional Cu0.73Ni0.27(HSeO3)2 compound was prepared from an aqueous solution. This compound crystallizes in the monoclinic system with P21/n space group and with the following cell parameters: a=6.4379(3) Å; b=7.3555(3) Å; c=5.7522(3) Å; β=93.4341(1)°; V=271.90(2) Å3 and Z=2. The reported material has been structurally characterized by X-ray powder diffraction and confirmed by scanning electron microscope and energy dispersive spectroscopy (MEB/EDS) analysis. The copper/nickel atom is surrounded by an octahedron coordination of oxygen atoms from sex hydrogenoselenites anions. The presence of (HSeO3)− has been further confirmed by IR spectroscopy and this compound exhibits a phase transition at 356 K, this transition has been detected by differential scanning calorimetry and TG-DTA measurement. The magnetic property of this material was determined. The ferromagnetic ordering is further confirmed by the magnetic field dependence of the magnetization (Hysteresis loop) at 10 K. The substitution of Cu by Ni induces a ferro-paramagnetic transition at T=31 K. Field cooled (FC) and Zero field cooled (ZFC) magnetization measurements under an applied field of 100 Oe in the temperature range of 10–300 K were performed. These measurements have been resulted the blocking temperature (TB) at around 25 K.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.It is possible to utilize the new class of materials for emerging two-dimensional (2D) spintronic applications. Here, the role of defects in the graphene interlayer and its influence on the spin valve signal is reported. The emergence of D peak in Raman spectrum reveals defects in the graphene layer. The linear I-V curve for defective and non-defective graphene samples indicate the ohmic nature of NiFe and graphene contact. A non-uniform magnetoresistive effect with a bump is persistently observed for defective graphene device at various temperatures, while a smooth and symmetric signal is detected for non-defective graphene spin valve. Parallel and antiparallel alignments of magnetization of magnetic materials shows low and high resistance states, respectively. The magnetoresistance (MR) ratio for defective graphene NiFe/graphene/NiFe spin valve is measured to be ~0.16% at 300 K which progresses to ~0.39% for non-defective graphene device at the same temperature. Similarly at 4.2 K the MR ratios are reported to be ~0.41% and ~0.78% for defective and non-defective graphene devices, respectively. Our investigation provides an evidence for relatively better response of the spin valve signal with high quality graphene interlayer.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The spin wave modes of elongated magnetic islands arranged in Kagome artificial spin-ice arrays are micromagnetically simulated in the frequency regime between 3 and 16 GHz. The edge modes are more suitable in order to detect the signatures of various types of local order of the spin-ice lattice as they are much more sensitive to the magnetic configurations of neighboring elements. The spectra of arrays consisting up to 30 elements can be decomposed to those originating from local magnetic states of their vertices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Cobaltites show intriguing magnetic and transport properties, when compared with manganites for instance, as they exhibit an additional degree of freedom: the spin state of the Co ions. For Nd0.5Sr0.5CoO3 this spin configuration is not well-established, as well as the magnetic ordering below the Curie temperature. Thus, in the present effort, magnetization measurements and a mean-field theoretical model were developed in order to understand in detail these aspects of the half-doped Nd0.5Sr0.5CoO3 cobaltite. These results show that the Co and Nd magnetic sub-lattices couple antiferromagnetically below Curie temperature Tc=215 K down to very low temperature. These findings clarify the presence of the plateau observed at 80 K on M(T) curve, which is erroneously attributed, in the literature, to the onset of an antiferromagnetic ordering. Magnetization data also clearly shows that Co3+ and Co4+ are in an intermediate spin state. In addition, experimental and theoretical magnetic entropy changes were determined and a comparative analysis among these two leads to ratify the results above claimed. Finally, from all those results, a magnetic phase diagram for Nd0.5Sr0.5CoO3. could be drawn.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Crystal structure, magnetization and magnetic susceptibility have been studied for the La1−xTbxMn2Si2 (0≤x≤1) polycrystalline and quasi-single crystalline samples. It has been shown that, at low temperature T =4.2 K, substitution of the terbium for lanthanum leads to recurred change of the type of interlayer Mn-Mn magnetic ordering. For the compounds with x<0.2 ≈ xc1 the manganese magnetic moments of adjacent layers are ordered ferromagnetically, in the concentration range 0.2<x<xc2 (the critical concentration xc2 is between 0.4 and 0.6) the antiferromagnetic order is realized, while for x>xc2 the Mn sublattice is again ferromagnetically ordered and, due to the negative Tb–Mn interaction, ferrimagnetic structure is formed. Using the magnetization data, the concentration magnetic phase diagram has been suggested. The observed variation of the type of magnetic ordering has been explained in terms of the change of interatomic Mn-Mn distances and a competition of the Tb–Mn, Mn–Mn and Tb–Tb interlayer exchange interactions.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The irreversible magnetization occurs mainly in hard grains in nanocomposite magnets, and the domain wall involves a little part of defect region in irreversible magnetization due to the self-interaction. The investigation on thermal activation shows that the defect region involved in domain wall becomes narrower due to the TiNb addition in Pr2Fe14B/α-Fe magnets. The defect region augments the energy density in the negative direction of domain wall to overcome the energy barrier of perfect hard region. The soft phase, exchange-coupled with defect region at hard grain outer-layer, promotes magnetization reversal in defect region by exchange coupling. While the defect region plays a role as a ladder to overcome the energy barrier, resulting in the decrease of coecivity more or less depending upon the width and anisotropy of defect region.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Replacing materials based on rare-earth elements in current permanent magnets is a real scientific, economic and environmental challenge. Ferromagnetic 3d transition metals seem an apt direction to go in this field, due to their high residual magnetization and thermal stability. In order to improve their coercive behavior, nanostructured magnets based on the assembly of high-aspect-ratio nanoparticles (i.e. cobalt based nanorods and nanowires) have recently been proposed. In these, the nanoparticle morphology itself drives the magnetization reversal mechanism. This purely geometrical effect seems to obscure the effects of structural defects, although it is clear that high magnetocrystalline energy is required to maintain a stable orientation of the magnetic moment inside the nanoparticles. We present here an experimental study whose aim is to distinguish the role of the stacking faults from the effects of shape and morphology on the magnetization reversal mechanism in cobalt-based nanowires. Coercive field results have been obtained on Co80Ni20 nanowires synthesized by a polyol process. Through accurate control of shape and morphology, it was possible to discard the effects of shape and thus to highlight the influence of crystal defects on the magnetism of Co80Ni20 nanowires. A micromagnetic study, consistent with the experimental analyses, is also presented. The results discussed in this work clearly show that even if the morphological characteristics are conducive to a high coercive field, the presence of numerous stacking faults has the opposite effect and leads to materials with a significantly lower coercive field than expected, which is not suitable for permanent magnet applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.For glass-coated amorphous ferromagnetic Fe-based microwires both joint and separate effect of metallic nucleus diameter, d, and the ratio of metallic nucleus diameter to the total diameter of microwire in glass shell, d/D, on magnetic properties is investigated. Thereby the contribution of both shell-induced stresses, associated with the ratio of diameters, and internal nucleus stresses (residual, quenching), associated with the diameter of the nucleus are estimated. A strong and non-monotonic effect of the metallic nucleus diameter and metallic nucleus diameter/total microwire diameter ratio on magnetostatic and magnetostrictive properties was established. For analysis, we considered magnetically bi-stable microwires of “classic” Fe77.5Si7.5B15 alloy with positive magnetostriction coefficient.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Pressless Process (PLP) was adopted to manufacture NdFeB sintered magnets, where the investigations on carbon and oxygen residues from heptane milling liquid media and graphite crucibles used for sintering were quantified to evaluate the influence on the magnetic characteristics. The carbon and oxygen content in the magnets produced from wet ball milling of strip cast flakes was found to be of the order 104 ppm and 4·104 ppm respectively, which resulted in soft magnetic behavior. However using jet milling the carbon and oxygen concentration were decreased by an order of magnitude resulting in coercivity of up to 829 kA/m. Thus the influence of the carbon from the graphite crucibles is small.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Using density function theory, we study the spin state control of transition metal doped MoS2 through H/F chemical decoration. The results indicate that the ground spin state of single TM (Mn, Fe, and Co) doped MoS2 is sensitive to its chemical environment. H/F chemical decoration on TM can effectively modulate their magnetic moment up to 1 μB, especially for the Mn doped system, the F decoration will produce the system show “spin ON” to “spin OFF” transition. Interestingly, the H decoration will increase the magnetic moment of TM doped MoS2 with 1 μB, however, the F decoration will reduce the magnetic moment of TM doped MoS2 with 1 μB. Such modulation derives from the anti-bonding and bonding nature between TM and H/F atom, respectively. Our results may open a new route to apply TM doped MoS2 to multistate memory.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Bi3+ ions doped M-type hexaferrites, Sr0.4Ba0.3La0.3Fe12−xBixO19 (0≤x≤0.7), were prepared by the ceramic process. The phase components of the magnetic powders were investigated by X-ray diffraction. The results show that a single magnetoplumbite phase is obtained for the magnetic powders with x from 0 to 0.2, and BiFeO3 as a second phase appears when Bi content (x)≥0.3. The micrographs of the sintered magnets were observed by a field emission scanning electron microscopy. The sintered magnets are formed of hexagonal-shaped crystals. The magnetic properties of the sintered magnets were measured at room temperature by a permanent magnetic measuring system. The remanence (Br) first increases with x from 0 to 0.2, and then decreases when Bi content (x)≥0.2. The intrinsic coercivity (Hcj) and magnetic induction coercivity (Hcb) firstly decrease quickly with x from 0 to 0.1, and then increase linearly when Bi content (x)≥0.1. The maximum energy product [(BH)max] increases with x from 0 to 0.3, and then decreases when Bi content (x)≥0.3. The ratio Hk/Hcj ratio first increases with Bi content (x) from 0 to 0.4. And the Hk/Hcj ratio decreases when x≥0.4.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Emerging structure and magnetic properties of Al3+-modified SrFe12O19 M-type hexaferrite system (SrAlxFe12−xO19) had been studied in detail via doping engineering. With Al3+ ion nominal content ranging from 0 to 4 (0≤x≤4), the lattice parameters decrease due to the substitution of Fe3+ ions by smaller Al3+ ions, and the magnetization shows a continuous reduction with the increasing of Al content. For the coercivity, its value initially increases, reaching a maximum value of 16,876.9 Oe at x=3, and then reduces with the Al content further increase. When all the Fe3+ ions (x=4) are replaced by Al3+ ions, the net magnetic moment will be closed to zero, that will weaken the exchange interaction between Fe3+ ions, resulting in decrease of coercivity sharply and transformation ferrimagnetism into antiferromagnetism. The mechanism of the improvement of the magnetic properties induced by Al doping is discussed in the present work.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Rotating magnetic field (RMF) was applied on a micromixer to break the laminar flow and induce chaotic flow to enhance mass transfer between two-immiscible organic and aqueous phases. The results of RMF were compared to those of static magnetic field (SMF). For this purpose, experiments were carried out in a T-micromixer at equal volumetric flow rates of organic and aqueous phases. Fe3O4 nanoparticles were synthesized by co-precipitation technique and they were dissolved in organic phase. Results obtained from RMF and SMF were compared in terms of overall volumetric mass transfer coefficient (KLa) and extraction efficiency (E) at various Reynolds numbers. Generally, RMF showed higher effect in mass transfer characteristics enhancement compared with SMF. The influence of rotational speeds of magnets (ω) in RMF was investigated, and measurable enhancements of KLa and E were observed. In RMF, the effect of magnetic field induction (B) was investigated. The results reveal that at constant concentration of nanoparticles, by increasing of B, mass transfer characteristics will be enhanced. The effect of various nanoparticles concentrations (ϕ) within 0.002–0.01 (w/v) on KLa and E at maximum induction of RMF (B=76 mT) was evaluated. Maximum values of KLa (2.1±0.001) and E (0.884±0.001) were achieved for the layout of RMF (B=76 mT), ω=16 rad/s and MNPs concentration of 0.008–0.01 (w/v).© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The detailed magnetic study of complex 3d-electron based Fe3Ga4 is reported. It undergoes paramagnetic to antiferromagnetic (TN) and antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic (TC) transitions respectively around 380 and 70 K. The thermal hysteresis of field-cooled cooling (FCC) and field-cooled warming (FCW) hints at first order phase transition below Curie temperature. A weak phase coexistence of ferro and antiferromagnetic phases is suggested by exploring the arrest-like first-order phenomenon. In the intermediate temperature range, field-driven metamagnetic transition from antiferro to ferromagnetic phase is confirmed. Further bringing the system very near to TN, field-induced transitions disappear and above TN predominant paramagnetic contribution is evident. The magnetic H–T phase diagram distinguishing different magnetic phases of Fe3Ga4 is obtained.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We study antidot shape dependence of the switching magnetization for various permalloy samples with square and triangular arrays of nanometer scale antidots. The remnant magnetization, squareness ratio, and coercive fields of the samples are extracted from the hysteresis loops which are obtained by solving the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) equation numerically. We find several different magnetic spin configurations which reveal the existence of superdomain wall structures. Our results are discussed in terms of the local shape anisotropy, array geometry, and symmetry properties in order to explain the formation of inhomogeneous domain structures.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Fresnel equations are solved to analyze the reflection and propagation properties of the ordinary and extraordinary light of the optically anisotropic magnetic film. Using the boundary and propagation matrix, the longitudinal magneto-optical Kerr rotation expression is derived. After that, simulations are performed on optically anisotropic and isotropic Co/SiO2 film. Results show that for Co material in the thin-film limit, the anisotropic Co can provide larger max rotations than the isotropic Co in the visible region. This is because that the refractive index discrepancy of optically anisotropic Co film reduces the Fresnel reflective coefficient rpp, which improves the Kerr rotation. This makes the optically anisotropic Co film more effective in magneto optical sensor design and device fabrication.© 2016Considerations for achieving high degree of alignment in polymer bonded permanent magnets are presented via the results of a study on in situ magnetic alignment of anisotropic Nd-Fe-B magnet powders. Contributions from effect of the alignment temperature, alignment magnetic field and the properties of the polymer on the hard magnetic properties of the bonded magnet were considered. The thermo-rheological properties of the polymer and the response of the magnet powders to the applied magnetic field indicate that hard magnetic properties were optimized at an alignment temperature just above the melting temperature of the EVA co-polymer. This agrees with an observed correlation between the change in magnetization due to improved magnetic alignment of the anisotropic powders and the change in viscosity of the binder. Manufacturing cost can be minimized by identifying optimum alignment temperatures and magnetic field strengths.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have synthesized polycrystalline thin film composed of a single phase of metastable bismuth iron garnet, Bi3Fe5O12, on a fused silica substrate, one of the most widely utilized substrates in the solid-state electronics, by using mist chemical vapor deposition (mist CVD) method. The phase purity and stoichiometry are confirmed by X-ray diffraction and Rutherford backscattering spectrometry. The resultant thin film shows a small surface roughness of 3.251 nm. The saturation magnetization at room temperature is 1200 G, and the Faraday rotation angle at 633 nm reaches −5.2 deg/μm. Both the magnetization and the Faraday rotation angles are somewhat higher than those of polycrystalline BIG thin films prepared by other methods.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.For more than a decade, researchers have been searching for means to improve the Curie temperature of ferromagnetic GaMnAs samples, among which post-growth annealing in furnace has been treated as the most important one. In this work, we demonstrate that the Curie temperature can be improved by electron irradiation for the first time. Different doses of electron irradiation (1×1014, 1×1015 and1×1016 electrons/cm2) at 1.7 MeV were applied, the enhancement of magnetic and electrical properties of ferromagnetic GaMnAs films was experimentally confirmed by HR-XRD, SQUID and Magneto-transport measurements. Further SIMS characterizations and analyses reveal that electron irradiation causes bi-directional out-diffusion and redistribution of compensating Mn interstitials towards both the upper surface and the lower interface, a newly found uniform effect clearly different from that of conventional post-growth annealing. The technique of electron irradiation annealing may provide an alternative way to improve the properties of electronic and magnetic compounds such as GaMnAs films.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A series of Mg0.8Zn0.2CrxFe2−xO4 (0≤x≤0.025) nanoferrites were prepared by citrate–nitrate auto-combustion method. X-ray diffraction assured the formation of the ferrites in nanoscale and in single phase spinel structure. The magnetic and mechanical properties were investigated. All the elastic moduli values increase slowly and steadily with increasing Cr3+ content reaching the critical composition x=0.02. The magnetic parameters increased up to x=0.02 and then decreased with further Cr doping. Versatile applications were recommended owing to the porous nature of the nanoferrites.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The unsteady MHD free convective heat and mass transfer flow of an electrically conducting, viscous and incompressible fluid over an accelerated moving vertical plate in the presence of heat absorption and chemical reaction with ramped temperature and ramped surface concentration through a porous medium in a rotating system is studied, taking Hall effects into account. The governing equations are solved analytically with the help of Laplace transform technique. The unified closed-form expressions are obtained for fluid velocity, fluid temperature, species concentration, skin friction, Nusselt number and Sherwood numbers. The effects of various parameters on fluid velocity, fluid temperature and species concentration are discussed by graphs whereas numerical values of skin friction, Nusselt and Sherwood numbers are presented in tabular form for different values of pertinent flow parameters. The numerical results are also compared with free convective flow near ramped temperature plate with ramped surface concentration with the corresponding flow near isothermal plate with uniform surface concentration.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The nature of insulating phase in 5d based Sr2IrO4 is quite debated as the theoretical as well as experimental investigations have put forward evidences in favor of both magnetically driven Slater-type and interaction driven Mott-type insulator. To understand this insulating behavior, we have investigated the nature of magnetic state in Sr2IrO4 through studying critical exponents, low temperature thermal demagnetization and magnetocaloric effect. The estimated critical exponents do not exactly match with any universality class, however, the values obey the scaling behavior. The exponent values suggest that spin interaction in present material is close to mean-field model. The analysis of low temperature thermal demagnetization data, however, shows dual presence of localized- and itinerant-type of magnetic interaction. Moreover, field dependent change in magnetic entropy indicates magnetic interaction is close to mean-field type. While this material shows an insulating behavior across the magnetic transition, yet a distinct change in slope in resistivity is observed around Tc. We infer that though the insulating phase in Sr2IrO4 is more close to be Slater-type but the simultaneous presence of both Slater- and Mott-type is the likely scenario for this material.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report a theoretical model formed by two coupled magnetic sublattices of localized spins in the presence of an applied magnetic field to investigate the magnetic characteristics and magnetocaloric properties of amorphous yttrium iron garnet. The magnetic state equation is based on Handrich–Kobe´s theory, where the amorphization is taken into account by introducing fluctuations in the exchange parameters. Experimental results report that Y3Fe5O12 presents a structural phase transition from crystalline to amorphous caused by a variation of external pressure. This phase transition on Y3Fe5O12 leads to interesting results in the magnetic properties and magnetocaloric quantities.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Single-phase(Fe0.7Co0.3)100−xSix nanostructured powders (x=0,5, 10, 15 and 20) have been elaborated by mechanical alloying in order to investigate the effect of silicon on the microstructure and magnetic properties of these alloys. A disordered Fe(Co, Si) solid solution with body centred cubic (bcc) crystal structure is formed after 72 h of milling for all the compositions. The addition of Si gives rise to a progressive decrease of the lattice parameter, from about 2.865 Å for the binary Fe70Co30 compound down to 2.841 Å for the powder with x=20. The sample with the uppermost Si content exhibits the lowest value for the mean grain size (≈10 nm) as well as the largest microstrain (above 1.1%). All the samples are ferromagnetic at room temperature, although the saturation magnetization value reduces almost linearly by adding Si to the composition. A similar trend is observed for the hyperfine magnetic field obtained from the analysis of the room temperature Mössbauer spectra. The hyperfine field distributions show a broad double-peak shape for x>0, which can be ascribed to multiple local environments for the Fe atoms inside a disordered solid solution.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Fe3O4 nanoparticles (FNPs) were synthesized by conventional heating (CH), co-precipitation (CP) and microwave heating (MH) methods in presence of pectin crosslinked by β-isopropylglutaric acid (-CP) to stabilize nanoparticles. The role of the cross-linked pectin and kinds of synthesis methods was appeared to increase the effective total surface of FNPs both simultaneously as the synergistic effects and separately. The effective role of the microwave irradiation to decrease FNPs mean size was seen, so that its size in FMH was smaller 21.5% and 38.2% than that of FCP and FCH, and in FMH-CP was smaller 27.2% and 58.9% than that of FCP-CP and FCH-CP, respectively. The various experiments were done on the structures, functional groups, and connection quantities of -CP to FNPs synthesized by CH, CP and MH methods. The different physical properties of the obtained composites containing magnetization, zeta potential and thermal analyses were determined. To study the adsorption of methylene blue (MB) from the aqueous and alkali solution, the role Fe–O− groups of FNPs was evaluated more effective than the role of –COO− and –O− of -CP in the stabilized nanoparticles. Fe3O4 NPs stabilized by -CP using microwave heating showed the highest capacity of MB adsorption due to having the most suitable thermodynamic and kinetic parameters.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Electrooxidation method was used to remove copper and nickel from water by iron sacrificial sheets in an electrolytic cell. The effect of various voltages, electrooxidation time, and the initial pH of water has been studied on removal efficiency. The concentration of heavy metals before and after treatment was determined by an AAS instrument. The sludge obtained after treatment has been characterized using XRD, FESEM, and VSM. Our results show that the operational parameters play an important role on removal process. AAS results confirmed that the concentration of heavy metal pollutants in the water effectively decreases by increasing the applied voltage, electrochemical reaction time, or the initial pH of water. Based on these results it is possible to highly decrease the concentration of Ni or Cu from water at pH ∼4.5 by applying ∼28 V for 60 min. The FESEM images showed the nano-size of synthesized particles during water treatment. The element maps confirmed the presence of iron, oxygen, and heavy metal pollutants in precipitate after water treatment. The XRD patterns of powder sample obtained after removal of Ni or Cu show the reflections of Fe3O4 and some small peaks which are correspond to different compound of metal pollutants. VSM results showed that the sludge samples are magnetically soft and their specific magnetization depends on removal conditions. The magnetic property of the sludge samples helps to separate them easily from water using magnetic field.© 2016 The AuthorsMagnetic doping of topological insulators (TIs) is crucial for unlocking novel quantum phenomena, paving the way for spintronics applications. Recently, we have shown that doping with rare earth ions introduces large magnetic moments and allows for high doping concentrations without the loss of crystal quality, however no long range magnetic order was observed. In Dy-doped Bi2Te3 we found a band gap opening above a critical doping concentration, despite the paramagnetic bulk behavior. Here, we present a surface-sensitive x-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) study of an in situ cleaved film in the cleanest possible environment. The Dy M4,5 absorption spectra measured with circularly polarized x-rays are fitted using multiplet calculations to obtain the effective magnetic moment. Arrott–Noakes plots, measured by the Dy M5 XMCD as a function of field at low temperatures, give a negative transition temperature. The evaporation of a ferromagnetic Co thin film did not introduce ferromagnetic ordering of the Dy dopants either; instead a lowering of the transition temperature was observed, pointing towards an antiferromagnetic ordering scenario. This result shows that there is a competition between the magnetic exchange interaction and the Zeeman interaction. The latter favors the Co and Dy magnetic moments to be both aligned along the direction of the applied magnetic field, while the exchange interaction is minimized if the Dy and Co atoms are antiferromagnetically coupled, as in zero applied field.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This article is concerned with the problem of magnetohydrodynamic (MHD) mixed convection flow of Cobalt-kerosene ferrofluid adjacent a non-isothermal wedge under the influence of thermal radiation and partial slip. Such type of problems are posed by electric generators and biomedical enforcement. The governing equations are solved using the Thomas algorithm with finite-difference type and solutions for a wide range of magnet parameter are presented. It is found that local Nusselt number manifests a considerable diminishing for magnetic parameter and magnifies intensively in case of slip factor, thermal radiation and surface temperature parameters. Further, the skin friction coefficient visualizes a sufficient enhancement for the parameters thermal radiation, surface temperature and magnetic field, but a huge reduction is recorded by promoting the slip factor.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Solid solutions of CaBaCo4−xFexO7 (x=0, 0.05, 0.2, 1, 2) were synthesized by glycine-nitrate combustion process. Their structural and magnetic properties were characterized by means of x-ray diffraction and magnetization measurements. In the examined range of the solid solutions, their crystal lattice symmetry changes from orthorhombic with space group Pbn21 (0<x<0.5) to hexagonal with space group P63mc (x>0.5). The magnetic measurements revealed that even small doping (x=0.05) of the transition metal sublattice noticeably suppresses ferrimagnetism of the parent compound and induces an AF transition at 88 K. An increase in the doping concentration lowers the frustration parameter |θCW|/TC from 17.2 (for x=0.05) to 13.7 (for x=2) and strengthens the antiferromagnetic interactions, which manifests itself in the Curie–Weiss temperature (θCW) growth. The samples with x=0.05 and x=0.2 also show an additional magnetic transition at temperatures Tg (55 and 70 K respectively). The temperature irreversibility between the ZFC and FC magnetization curves may suggest the formation of a spin-glass state below that temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work we report the results of ab-initio studies of structural, mechanical, electronic and magnetic properties of Co based Co2MnSi Heusler compound in stoichiometric composition. All of which are accurately calculated by the full-potential (FP-LMTO) program combined with the spin polarized generalized gradient approximation in the density functional formalism (DFT). The total energy calculations clearly favor the ferromagnetic ground state. The lattice parameter, elastic constants and their related parameters were also evaluated and compared to experimental and theoretical values whenever possible. In this paper, the electronic properties are treated with GGA+U approach. The magnetic exchange constants temperature has been calculated using a mean field-approximation (MFA). The half-metal to metal transition was observed around 40 GPa. Increasing pressure has no impact on the total magnetic moment or the overall shape of the band structure that indicates the robustness of the electronic structure of this system.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Due to its potential applications in high-density magnetic storage and spin electronic devices, the ferromagnetic resonance absorption phenomenon has recently drawn much attention. By studying the influence of different materials with various shapes on this phenomenon, the new understandings gained could lead to other applications in the future. In this paper, dynamic magnetic susceptibilities of the vortex state in permalloy nanodot arrays have been investigated using a three-dimensional object oriented micromagnetic framework (OOMMF) code with a two-dimensional periodic boundary condition (2D-PBC) extension and compared with those of a single dot carefully. The resonance mode is excited in the vortex state of nanodot arrays by the microwave magnetic field perpendicular to the dot plane. In this case only radially symmetric spin wave modes can be excited. The influence of the geometric parameters on the resonance frequency has been studied systemically, including the dot radius, the number of repeating elements, and the dot distance. One can see that the resonance peak of the dot array is higher than that of a single dot because of the induced stronger magnetostatic coupling. A critical dot distance exists at which the dot array may be treated as a single dot. There is only one resonance peak for both the dot array and the single dot, as the radius changes.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Inthe present work the temperature dependence of lattice parameters and magnetic properties of the LaFe11.14−xCo0.66NixSi1.2 (where x=0.1,0.2,0.3) alloys were investigated. X-ray diffraction studies of all specimens revealed coexistence of two crystalline phases: the dominant La(Fe, Si)13-type phase and minor fraction of bcc α-Fe. Furthermore changes in negative lattice expansion with the increase of Ni content in the alloy composition were also shown. The increase of Ni content caused rise of the Curie temperature and decrease of the amplitude of magnetic entropy changes.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A series of Dy3+ doped Co–Ni–Zn ferrites with the formula Co0.5Ni0.25Zn0.25DyxFe2−xO4 0≤x≤0.24) have been successfully synthesized using the solvothermal method. X-ray diffraction and scanning electron microscope examinations indicate that a highly-crystallized cubic Co0.5Ni0.25Zn0.25DyxFe2−xO4 with rod-like morphology is obtained when the precursor is calcined at 1000 °C in air for 3 h. Single phase Co0.5Ni0.25Zn0.25Fe2O4 is obtained at 650 °C, but all samples consist of the main spinel phase in combination of a small amount of a foreign Dy2O3 phase after doping Dy. When the precursor is calcined at 1000 °C, the lattice parameter of the ferrites initially increase after doping Dy, but then become smaller with increasing Dy content. The addition of Dy content results in a reduction of crystallite size, attributed that the binding energy of Dy3+–O2− is larger than that of Fe3+–O2−. Dy3+ substitution can decrease the remanence (Mr) and coercivity (Hc) of Co0.5Ni0.25Zn0.25DyxFe2−xO4 samples, which are very desirable characteristics for high density data storage devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline antiferromagnetic Mn35Ge35Te30 diluted magnetic semiconductors powder syntheses by the conventional direct reaction of pure metals. Nanocrystalline nature of the prepared sample confirmed using various techniques, where x-Ray diffraction (XRD) and atomic force microscope (AFM) measurements shows ~96 nm particle size, while transmission electron microscope (TEM) shows 92 nm particle size. XRD analysis show orthorhombic symmetry with lattice parameters a=7.386611±(0.0066) Å, b=8.962502±(0.0090) Å and c=7.027349±(0.0040) Å. Electron Spin resonance (ESR) show a broad asymmetric line whereas the remnant Mn2+ six-hyperfine lines are broadened within |+1/2>→|−1/2> line according to high anisotropy; calculated Landé g-factor is 2.047. Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) analysis, field-moment characteristics revealed a hysteresis loop with small coercive field indicating that Mn35Ge35Te30 is a soft magnetic material. Moreover, hysteresis measurements at different temperatures show increasing magnetization with increasing temperature up to 150 K followed by decreased with increasing temperature up to 300 K. This behavior indicated to the antiferromagnetic nature of the prepared nanocrystalline materials. Magnetic moment – temperature measurements show Néel temperature TN=172.6 K. Magnetic force microscope revealed magnetic domains as a result of interaction between magnetic dipole moments of magnetic cantilever and pressed powder.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of an unexpected superconducting bilayer consisting of non-superconducting Bi and ferromagnetic Ni have been investigated. A large magnetization signal is observed when the sample is cooled below the superconducting transition temperature in zero magnetic field, which has the same direction with the magnetization of the adjacent Ni layer. Interestingly, this Bi/Ni bilayer shows opposite responses to external magnetic field in zero field cooling (ZFC) process and field cooling (FC) process. It behaves diamagnetically in ZFC while paramagnetically in FC. Besides, magnetic hysteresis loops below the superconducting transition temperature show flux pinning and flux jumping effects.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.First-principles method is used to characterize segregation and magnetic properties of alloyed Ti/TiO2interface. We calculate the segregation energy of the doped Ti/TiO2 interface to investigate alloying atom's distribution. The oxidation resistance of Ti/TiO2 interface is enhanced by elements Fe and Ni but reduced by element Co. Magnetism could be produced by alloying elements such as Co, Fe and Ni in the bulk of titanium and the surface of Ti at Ti/TiO2 interface. The presence of these alloying elements could transform the non-magnetic titanium alloys into magnetic systems. We have also calculated the temperature dependence of magnetic permeability for the doped and pure Ti/TiO2 interfaces. Alloying effects on the Curie temperature of the Ti/TiO2 interface have been elaborated.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Alloy synthesis consisting of mechanical activation followed by annealing was explored as a method of manufacturing medium-grade permanent magnet materials with a reduced content of the critical rare earth elements. Four RxFe10Si2 alloys with R=Sm, Sm0.7Zr0.3, Sm0.3Ce0.3Zr0.4 and Ce0.6Zr0.4 (nominal compositions) were prepared from mixtures of Sm2O3, CeO2, ZrO2, Fe2O3 and Si powders in the presence of a reducing agent Ca and a CaO dispersant. The collected alloy particles typically consisted of few joined submicron crystals. For R=Sm, X-ray diffraction analysis reveals a significant amount of the unwanted Th2Zn17-type compound forming alongside the desired ThMn12-type 1:12 compound. A more pure 1:12 phase could be obtained for R=Ce0.6Zr0.4, but it exhibited a room-temperature coercivity of less than 1 kOe. The most pure 1:12 phase and the highest values of the coercivity (10.8 kOe) and calculated maximum energy product (13.8 MGOe) were obtained for R=Sm0.7Zr0.3 processed at 1150 °C. The calculated maximum energy products of the Sm0.3Ce0.3Zr0.4Fe10Si2 particles, with half of their rare earths constituents represented by the relatively abundant Ce, was 10.1 MGOe.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Heusler compounds CoFeTiGa1−xSbx have been studied. X-ray diffraction patterns show that CoFeTiGa1−xSbx (x=0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1) crystallize into LiMgPdSn-type structure. First-principles calculations indicate that CoFeTiGa1−xSbx (x=0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1) are half-metal with considerable minority band gaps. The substitution of Sb for Ga gives rise to the spin moments of the compounds, and makes them to be half-metallic ferrimagnets.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The aim of this paper is to present a novel mathematical model of frequency-dependent magnetic hysteresis. The major hysteresis loop in this model is represented by the ascending and descending curve over an arctangent function. The parameters of the hysteresis model have been calculated from a measured hysteresis loop of the FeBSiC amorphous alloy sample. A number of measurements have been performed with this sample at different frequencies of the sinusoidal excitation magnetic field. A variation of the coercive magnetic field with the frequency has been observed and used in the modelling of frequency-dependent hysteresis with the proposed model. A comparison between measured and modelled hysteresis loops has been presented. Additionally, the areas of the obtained hysteresis loops, representing the energy loss per unit volume, have been calculated and the dependence of the energy loss on the frequency is shown. Furthermore, two models of the frequency dependence of the coercivity and two models of the energy loss separation have been used for fitting the experimental and simulation results. The relations between these models and their parameters have been observed and analysed. Also, the relations between parameters of the hysteresis model and the parameters of the energy loss separation models have been analysed and discussed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Plates of solution annealed Maraging-350 steel were submitted to aging under an inert atmosphere, varying the time and temperature. The aged samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction and Mössbauer spectroscopy. The results revealed that the aging treatments induced the reversion of austenite, in amounts that vary with the time and the temperature of the heat treatment. The lattice parameters of the martensite and austenite phases, as well as their hyperfine parameters, were obtained at all aging conditions. No intermetallic compounds were identified in any of the aged samples, but a poorly crystallized phase fraction, the consequence of an incomplete martensite ⇒ austenite reversion transformation, was observed for some samples. The tetragonal distortion from cubic symmetry presented by the martensite in the solution annealed steel was not eliminated after aging.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Fe3O4@HA@Ag magnetic nanocomposites (MNCs) were successfully synthesized by the simple reflux method for the removal of azo dyes from the industrial aqueous media. Fe3O4@HA@AgMNCs exhibited high catalytic activity to reduce MB within 20 min from the waste water. The obtained materials were characterized by the means of different techniques. Powder X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis confirmed the single-phase of Fe3O4 spinel structure. SEM and TEM analysis indicated that Fe3O4@HA@AgMNCs were nanoparticles like structure with small agglomeration. TG result showed that the products contained 9% of HA. The characteristic peaks of HA at 1601 cm−1 and 1703 cm−1 was observed by the means of FT-IR spectra of Fe3O4@HA@AgMNCs. The hysteresis (σ–H) curves revealed Fe3O4@HA@Ag MNCs exhibit a typical superparamagnetic characteristic with a saturation magnetization of 59.11 emu/g and measured magnetic moment is 2.45 µB. The average magnetic particle dimension (Dmag) is 13.25 nm. In accordance, the average crystallite and particle dimensions were obtained as 11.50 nm and 13.10 nm from XRD and TEM measurements, respectively. Magnetocrystalline anisotropy was offered as uniaxial and calculated effective anisotropy constant (Keff) is 2.96×105 Erg/g. The blocking temperature was estimated as 522 K. The size-dependent saturation magnetization suggests the existence of a magnetically dead layer as 0.793 nm for Fe3O4@HA@Ag MNCs. The UV–vis diffuse reflectance spectroscopy (DRS) and Kubelka–Munk theory were applied to determine the optical properties of powder samples. The direct optical energy band gap (Eg) values were estimated from Tauc plots between 1.62 eV and 2.12 eV.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Electrostatic discharge (ESD) has been an important issue in the manufacturing processes of hard disk drive. It can also generate electromagnetic interference (EMI) which could possibly damage magnetic recording heads. The aims of this work are to measure the EMI from ESD events and to examine the effects of EMI on the heads. The discharge current and the EMI generated by an ESD simulator were experimentally measured. Also, the EMI was applied to the heads to determine if this can cause changes of head parameters. Our results show that the discharge current waveform is consistent with the theoretical waveform of the IEC ESD standard. Additionally, we found that the EMI applied due to ESD at distances greater than 2 cm does not have any significant effect on the head parameters. Hence, further detailed experiments are proposed to evaluate the EMI effects on recording head parameters in order to improve the measurement methodologies to prevent the degradation of the heads performance and to increase the robustness of the heads.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic composite material composed of magnetic nanoparticles and clay encapsulated in cross-linked chitosan beads was prepared, characterized and used as a magsorbent for the removal of a cationic dye, methylene blue (MB), from aqueous solutions. The magnetic properties of these beads represent an advantage to recover them at the end of the depollution process. The optimal weight ratio R=clay:chitosan for the removal of MB in a large range of pH was determined. For beads without clay, the maximal adsorption capacity of MB occurs in the pH range [9–12], while for beads with clay, the pH range extends by increasing the amount of clay to reach [3–12] for R>0.5. Adsorption isotherms show that the adsorption capacity of magnetic beads is equal to 82 mg/g. Moreover, the kinetics of dye adsorption is relatively fast since 50% of the dye is removed in the first 13 min for an initial MB concentration equal to 100 mg/L. The estimation of the number of adsorption sites at a given pH shows that the main driving force for adsorption of MB in a large range of pH is the electrostatic interaction between the positively charged dye and the permanent negative charges of clay.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This paper proposes a novel integrated radial hybrid magnetic bearing (RHMB) for application with the small-sized magnetically suspended control moment gyroscope (MSCMG), which can control four degrees of freedom (4-DOFs), including two radial translational DOFs and two radial tilting DOFs, and provide the axial passive resilience. The configuration and working principle of the RHMB are introduced. Mathematical models of radial force, axial resilience and moment are established by using equivalent magnetic circuit method (EMCM), from which the radial force–radial displacement, radial force–current relationships are derived, as well as axial resilience–axial displacement, moment–tilting angle and moment–current. Finite element method (FEM) is also applied to analyze the performance and characteristics of the RHMB. The analysis results are in good agreement with that calculated by the EMCM, which is helpful in designing, optimizing and controlling the RHMB. The comparisons between the performances of the integrated 4-DOF RHMB and the traditional 4-DOF RHMB are made. The contrast results indicate that the proposed integrated 4-DOF RHMB possesses better performance compared to the traditional structure, such as copper loss, current stiffness, and tilting current stiffness.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nickelferrite (NiFe2O4)powders were synthesized via sol–gel auto-combustion method and the corresponding temperature dependence of microstructure, dielectric and magnetic properties have been investigated. Results of XRD and SEM indicate that the NiFe2O4 samples exhibit a typical single phase spinel structure and a uniform particle distribution. The dielectric constant and dielectric loss measurements show strong frequency dependence of all the samples. The peak observed in frequency dependence of dielectric loss measurements shifts to higher frequency with the increasing sintering temperature, indicating a Debye-like dielectric relaxation. The remanent magnetization increases with the increasing grain size while the coercivity is just the opposite. The saturation magnetization can achieve 50 emu/g when the sintering temperature is more than 1000 °C, and the lowest coercivity (159.49 Oe) was observed in the NFO sample sintered at 1300 °C for 2 h.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The aim of this work was to synthesize a single-phase spinel structure from a mixture of zinc, iron and nickel powders by plasma arc discharge method. A mixture of zinc, iron and nickel powders with the appropriate molar ratio was prepared and formed into a cylindrical shape. The synthesis process was performed in air, oxygen and argon atmospheres with the applied arc current of 400 A and pressure of 1 atm. After establishing an arc between the electrodes, the produced powders were collected and their structure and magnetic properties were examined by XRD and VSM, respectively. ZnO as an impurity was appeared in the as-produced powders owing to the high reactivity of zinc atoms, preventing the formation of Ni–Zn ferrite. A pure spinel structure with the highest saturation magnetization (43.8 emu/g) was observed as zinc powders removed completely from the initial mixture. Morphological evaluations using field emission scanning electron microscopy showed that the mean size of fabricated nanoparticles was in the range 100–200 nm and was dependent on the production conditions.© 2016A magnetorheological fluid (MRF) performs differently under different magnetic field strength. This study examined the fretting friction and wear characteristics of MRFs under a range of magnetic field strengths and oscillation frequencies. The fretting friction and wear behaviors of MRF are investigated using a fretting friction and wear tester. The surfaces of specimen are examined by optical microscopy and 3D surface profilometer before and after the tests and wear surface profiles, the wear volume loss and wear coefficient for each magnetic field strength are evaluated. The results show that the friction and wear properties of MRF change according to the magnetic field strength and oscillation frequency.© 2016 Elsevier LtdAn evolution of magnetoresistance (MR) mechanism with the film structure was discovered in nanostructured [C/FeCo]n thin films fabricated by magnetron sputtering. The discontinuous multilayer nanogranular structure was confirmed by microstructure characterization. As the layer number n increased, the MR value of the film changed from positive to negative. The fitting curves of lnR−T−1/2 and lnR−T−1/4 show that there is a transition of the conduction regime in the temperature range of 2–300 K. The significant different MR effects at various conduction regimes indicated that the type of transport regime plays an important role in MR origin.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Hydrogen storage in materials is among the most relevant fields when thinking about energy conversion and storage. In this work we present a study that responds to a couple of questions concerning induced electronic changes that H produces in ferromagnetic nickel (Ni) host. We calculate and explain the change of magnetic properties of Ni with different concentrations of H. Density functional theory calculations (DFT) were performed for super-cells of fcc Ni with interstitial H in octahedral sites at different concentrations. In order to physically explain the effect of magnetization diminishing as the hydrogen concentration increases, we propose a simple Stoner type of model to describe the influence of the H impurity on the magnetic properties of Ni. The exchange splitting reduction, as shown in first principles calculations, is clearly explained within this physical model. Using a paramagnetic Ni fcc band with variable number of electrons and a Stoner model allow us to obtain the correct trend for the magnetic moment of the system as a function of the H concentration.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study the magnetic properties of ferrimagnetic mixed spins with integer σ=2 and half-integer S=7/2 in a Blume–Capel model, using Monte Carlo simulations. The considered Hamiltonian includes the first nearest-neighbors and the exchange coupling interactions on the two sub-lattices. The effect of these coupling exchange interactions, in the presence of both the external magnetic field and the crystal field, are studied. The magnetizations and the corresponding susceptibilities are presented and discussed. Finally, we have interpreted the behaviors of the magnetic hysteresis of this model.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The structural transformation sequence in Ni49.1Mn38.9Sn12 ribbons is studied using calorimetric, thermomagnetic, resistivity and in-situ XRD measurements. It is confirmed that the ferromagnetic L21 austenite phase transforms into 4O martensite at 242 K. The austenite phase persists in the sample to well below the TC of martensite. Upon further cooling the 4O martensite phase is stable down to the low temperature range, what is ascribed to its limited Ni/Mn and e/a ratios. On heating lattice constants assume lower values resulting from stress relief upon thermal cycling.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.I present in details the SU(N) Schwinger boson formalism, also known as flavor wave theory, that has been used several times in the literature. I use the method to study the ferroquadrupolar phase of a quantum biquadratic Heisenberg model with spin S=1 on the triangular lattice with third-nearest-neighbor interactions. Results for the phase diagram at zero temperature and the static and dynamical quadrupolar structure factors are presented. In principle, the results could be applied to NiGa2S4.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ce100−xAlx (x=45 and 50) alloys were synthesized by rapid quenching technique in the form of ribbons composed of nanocrystalline phase of CeAl with the ClCs-type structure (Pm-3m space group) embedded in an amorphous matrix. The cubic CeAl phase is known as metastable with random distribution of Ce and Al atoms in the unit cell. The crystalline volume fraction is about 7.5% in Ce55Al45 and 3% in Ce50Al50. The alloy Ce55Al45 shows better thermal stability than Ce50Al50, indicated by higher effective activation energy and higher crystallization temperature. Small off-stoichiometry in Ce55Al45 results in degrading the glass forming ability and promotes formation of the cubic CeAl phase, as confirmed by magnetic measurements. In both alloys, the Ce ions are in stable trivalent state and order magnetically near 20 K. Another magnetic phase transition close to 10 K was found for Ce50Al50 and was attributed to the presence of the well-known stable orthorhombic CeAl phase. To the best of our knowledge, the magnetic behavior of the CeAl cubic phase is reported here for the first time.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The electronic structures and magnetic properties of the new Heusler alloys Hf2CoGa and Hf2CoIn have been studied by using the first-principles projector augmented wave (PAW) potential within the generalized gradient approximation (GGA). Both Hf2CoGa and Hf2CoIn Heusler alloys have the half-metallic character and completely (100%) spin polarization at the Fermi level (EF) and the indirect band gaps of 0.733 eV and 0.654 eV, respectively, in the minority spin channel. The total magnetic moments µt are all 2µB per formula unit, linearly scaled with the total number of valence electrons (Zt) by µt=Zt−18 and the atomic magnetic moments have localized character due to less affected by deformations. The origin of the indirect band gaps for these two new Heusler alloys is well understood. These two new Heusler alloys are the ideal candidates for spintronic devices.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectroscopy is applied for comparative analysis of granular (CoFeZ)x(Al2O3)100−x, (31 at%≤x≤47 at%) films containing pure FeCo-based nanoparticles (NPs) or “FeCo-based core – oxide shell” NPs inside Al2O3 matrix when deposited in oxygen-free or oxygen-containing atmosphere, correspondingly. It is established that g-factor extracted from the FMR spectra of films with core–shell NPs decreases with x below the value g =2.0023 for free electron that is untypical for metallic NPs. This effect is associated with the formation of the interface between ferromagnetic core and antiferromagnetic (ferrimagnetic) oxide shell of NPs.© 2016In the present work, we demonstrate that ferromagnetic resonance and magneto-permittivity resonance can be observed in appropriate microwave frequencies at room temperature for multiferroic nano-BiFeO3/paraffin composite sample with an appropriate sample-thickness (such as 2 mm). Ferromagnetic resonance originates from the room-temperature weak ferromagnetism of nano-BiFeO3. The observed magneto-permittivity resonance in multiferroic nano-BiFeO3 is connected with the dynamic magnetoelectric coupling through Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya (DM) magnetoelectric interaction or the combination of magnetostriction and piezoelectric effects. In addition, we experimentally observed the resonance of negative imaginary permeability for nano BiFeO3/paraffin toroidal samples with longer sample thicknesses D=3.7 and 4.9 mm. Such resonance of negative imaginary permeability belongs to sample-size resonance.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of pulsed laser deposited thin films of Ni1−xCrxFe2O4 (x=0.02 and 0.05) on Si (111) and Si (100) substrates. The films reveal single phase, polycrystalline structure with larger grain size on Si (111) substrate than that on Si (100) substrate. Contrary to the expected inverse spinel structure, x-ray photoemission (XPS) studies reveal the mixed spinel structure. XPS results suggest that Ni and Fe ions exist in 2+ and 3+ states, respectively, and they exist in tetrahedral as well as octahedral sites. The deviation from the inverse spinel leads to modified magnetic properties. It is observed that saturation magnetization drastically drops compared to the expected saturation value for inverse spinel structure. Strain in the films and lattice distortion produced by the Cr doping also appear to influence the magnetic properties.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Orthorhombic polycrystalline RCu2 (R=Tb, Dy, Ho and Er) compounds were synthesized and the magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effect (MCE) were investigated in detail. All of the RCu2 compounds are antiferromagnetic (AFM) ordered. As temperature increases, RCu2 compounds undergo an AFM to AFM transition at Tt and an AFM to paramagnetic (PM) transition at TN. Besides of the normal MCE around TN, large inverse MCE around Tt was found in TbCu2 compound. Under a field change of 0–7 T, the maximal value of inverse MCE is even larger than the value of normal MCE around TN for TbCu2 compound. Considering of the normal and inverse MCE, TbCu2 shows the largest refrigerant capacity among the RCu2 (R=Tb, Dy, Ho and Er) compounds indicating its potential applications in low temperature multistage refrigeration.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.LaFe12B6 (SrNi12B6-type) is an antiferromagnet with a low moment of 0.36 μB/Fe-atom in the ground state. The field-induced first-order transition takes place in a wide range of temperature including below and above the Néel temperature of 35 K. This transition results in a high moment of 1.6 μB/Fe-atom, being characteristics of the itinerant-electron metamagnetic transition. The critical magnetic field of the metamagnetic transition BC increases with increasing temperature except for low temperature ranges, in which the kinetic arrest occurs. Above the arrested temperature, the sign of the temperature dependence of dBC/dT is positive. The metamagnetic transition brings about large magnetocaloric effects, that is, a large negative value of the isothermal magnetic entropy change, ΔSm, and a large positive value of the adiabatic temperature change, ΔTad.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present the synthesis of α-Co3O4 porous nanoplatelets and hexagonal nanorings using microwave-assisted hydrothermal and conventional chemical reaction methods. The x-ray diffraction (XRD) and refinement analyses indicate the α-Co3O4 crystal structure, and the x-ray photoelectron spectrum (XPS) indicates the high purity of the samples. The M–T (including 1/χ–T) curves indicate an antiferromagnetic transition at about 35 K in both kind of samples but the interesting finding was made that a charge-ordered (CO) state appears at 250 K for the nanoplatelets sample whereas it is inattentive for the nanorings. The antiferromagnetic transition temperature TN is lower than that of the bulk α-Co3O4 single crystal due to the nanosized structures. We observed quite significant exchange bias for nanorings. The exchange bias behavior of the α-Co3O4 hexagonal nanorings is consistent with an antiferromagnetic (AFM) Co3O4 core and spin-glass like shell.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic measurements on variously hydrated nickel chlorides and bromides, including deuterated forms, are reported. Results include locations and sizes of susceptibility maxima, Tmax and χmax, ordering temperatures Tc, Curie constants and Weiss theta in the paramagnetic regime, and primary and secondary exchange interactions from analysis of low temperature data. For the latter a 2D Heisenberg model augmented by interlayer exchange in a mean-field approximation is applied. Magnetization data to 16 kG as a function of temperature show curvature and hysteresis characteristics quite system dependent. For four materials high field magnetization data to 70 kG at 2.00 K are also obtained. Comparison is made with theoretical relations for spin-1 models. Trends are apparent, primarily that Tmax of each bromide hydrate is less than for the corresponding chloride, and that for a given halide nD2O (n=1 or 2) deuterates exhibit lesser Tmax than do nH2O hydrates. A monoclinic unit cell determined from powder X-ray diffraction data on NiBr2·2D2O is different from and slightly larger than that of NiBr2·2H2O. This provides some rationale for the difference in magnetic properties between these.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nowadays, micromagnetic simulations are a common tool for studying a wide range of different magnetic phenomena, including the ferromagnetic resonance. A technique for evaluating reliability and validity of different micromagnetic simulation tools is the simulation of proposed standard problems. We propose a new standard problem by providing a detailed specification and analysis of a sufficiently simple problem. By analyzing the magnetization dynamics in a thin permalloy square sample, triggered by a well defined excitation, we obtain the ferromagnetic resonance spectrum and identify the resonance modes via Fourier transform. Simulations are performed using both finite difference and finite element numerical methods, with OOMMF and Nmag simulators, respectively. We report the effects of initial conditions and simulation parameters on the character of the observed resonance modes for this standard problem. We provide detailed instructions and code to assist in using the results for evaluation of new simulator tools, and to help with numerical calculation of ferromagnetic resonance spectra and modes in general.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of epitaxial Fe/MgO structures on Si(100) substrates are investigated over an Fe thickness range of 2–20 nm. Superparamagnetic behavior is observed at an Fe thickness of 2 nm, indicating that no continuous Fe thin film is formed. At Fe thicknesses of 5 nm and higher, a continuous two-dimensional layered structure is formed, which has a dominant epitaxial relationship of Fe[010](100)//MgO[011¯] (100)//Si[011¯](100) and a minor portion of Fe[010](100)//MgO[010](100)//Si[011¯](100). This structural feature is echoed by a four-fold magnetic anisotropy in the film plane, and this tendency increases with increasing Fe thickness. The strength of the first-order cubic magnetocrystalline anisotropy, which can only be extracted from the structures, is in the range of 3.87×105–4.04×105 erg/cm3, weaker than that of bulk Fe (4.8×105 erg/cm3).© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The Seebeck effect is investigated in double planar tunnel junctions consisting of nonmagnetic electrodes and the central layer separated by ferromagnetic barriers. Calculations are performed in the linear response theory using the free-electron model. The thermopower is analyzed as a function of the thickness of the central layer, temperature of the junctions and the relative orientation of magnetic moments of the barriers. It has been found that the thermopower can be significantly enhanced in the junction with special central layer thickness due to electron tunneling by resonant states. The thickness of the central layer for which the thermopower is enhanced depends not only on the temperature of the junction but also on the orientation of magnetic moments in the barriers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The M(T) and M(H) curves were measured to study the spin-ordered state in MnF3 at low temperatures. In order to obtain the temperature dependence of magnetization, Mn3+ NMR resonance frequency was measured as a function of temperature. The resulting curve fits well to the initial temperature dependence of the magnetization expected for antiferromagnets with magnetic anisotropy, T3/2exp(−EG/kBT), with an energy gap EG of about 30 K. From the comparison of the M(H) curve and classical theory, the relation between the anisotropy energy, Ka, and the exchange coupling constant between the nearest neighbors, J1, was found to be Ka∼−1.8J1+9.8 in the absolute temperature unit.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The spin transfer torque assisted magnetization switching in a pentalayer nanopillar device is theoretically studied for different biasing configurations. The magnetization switching time is calculated for three different configurations (standard(no biasing), pinned layer biasing and free layer biasing), by numerically solving the governing dynamical Landau–Lifshitz–Gilbert–Slonczewski (LLGS) equation. The corresponding switching time for an applied current density of 3×1011Am−2 is about 0.296 ns, 0.195 ns, and 0.108 ns respectively. Pinned layer biasing and free layer biasing increase the magnetization switching speed significantly. Reduction of switching time in the pinned layer biasing is due to the enhancement of spin transfer torque, whereas in the free layer biasing it is due to an additional magnetic torque which arises due to an applied magnetic field. The fastest magnetization switching is achieved for the free layer biasing configuration.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In the current study, Al substituted M-type Ca–Sr hexaferrites, with composition Ca0.6Sr0.1La0.3Fe12−xAlxO19 (0≤x≤1.4), have been prepared using the conventional ceramic techniques. The phase composition of the magnetic powders was characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD). The XRD data show that the magnetic powders with Al content (x) from 0 to 0.8 show α-Fe2O3 as a second phase, while the magnetic powders with x from 1.0 to 1.4 consist of pure magnetoplumbite without any other impurity phases. A field emission scanning electron microscopy (FE-SEM) was used to observe the morphologies of the magnetic powders. FE-SEM images of the magnetic powders show the hexagonal platelet-like shape. The magnetic properties of the magnetic powders were measured by a physical property measurement system-vibrating sample magnetometer (PPMS-VSM). The saturation magnetization (Ms) linearly decreases with Al content (x) from 0 to 1.4. While the remanent magnetization (Mr) first increases with Al content (x) from 0 to 0.2 and then decreases when Al content (x)≥0.2. However, the coercivity (Hc) increases with Al content (x) from 0 to 1.4.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We synthesize a novel and hitherto unreported class of colloidal suspensions for which the dispersed phase, which consists of multiwall carbon nanotubes (MWNTs) decorated with magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs), is both magnetoresponsive and electrically conductive. Synthesis of the dispersed phase merges processes for producing ferrofluids and magnetic MWNTs (mMWNTs). We explore means to tune the properties of these magnetic conductive colloids (MCCs) by varying the (1) MNP material composition, and (2) MNP:MWNT (w/w) magnetization weight ratio (γ). The mMWNTs are examined using XRD, TEM, EDX and SQUID and MCCs are by measuring their zeta potential and electric conductivity. Magnetite (Fe3O4) MNPs, which possess a high Curie temperature, produce mMWNTs with high saturation magnetization that respond relatively weakly to temperature variations. Mn0.2Cu0.2Zn0.6Fe2O4 and Cu0.4Zn0.6Fe2O4 MNPs with lower Curie temperatures are more sensitive to changing temperature. Increasing the MNP Cu content improves the electric conductivity of the corresponding MCC while increasing γ enhances its magnetic response. After γ is raised above a threshold value, mMWNT decoration on the CNT surface becomes nonuniform since the MNPs now agglomerate perpendicular to the nanotube surface. These colloidal suspensions are a promising new class of material that can be manipulated with a magnetic field to tune their electrical conductivity.© 2016MnAu2 films ranging from 60 to 200 nm thickness are deposited by co-sputtering from elemental targets. X-ray diffraction confirmed these films to be nearly single phase with tetragonal lattice parameters of a=0.336 nm and c=0.872 nm that compare well to the bulk values of a=0.336 nm and c=0.876 nm. The density of the films is analyzed using x-ray reflectivity to be 14.95 g/cm3 and within experimental error of previously determined value of 15.00 g/cm3. The films grown on c-plane sapphire, (100)MgO and (100)MgF2 are randomly oriented polycrystalline, while the films grown on a-plane sapphire, (111)MgO and (111)Si/(0001)AlN showed that the (110) plane is parallel to the film plane and there are three sets of domains in equal amount differing by 60° in-plane rotation. Magnetic order is found to become paramagnetic near 360 K which is in close proximity to the bulk value. There are deviations in the slope of hysteresis loops observed at 10 K around 10 kOe that indicate complex magnetic switching.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.RE3+(RE=La, Ce, Pr, Nd, Eu, Gd) doped cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) have been studied systematically by the first-principles calculations based on density functional theory within the generalized gradient approximation with Hubbard corrections (GGA+U) . The significant effects of RE3+doping on the crystal structure, electronic and magnetic properties of CoFe2O4 have been explored. The calculated results show that the RE ions prefer substituting Fe3+ located at the octahedral sites. And the lattice constant of CoFe1.875RE0.125O4 (RE=La, Ce, Pr, Nd, Eu and Gd) decreases due to the decreasing ionic radius of RE as the atomic number increases. The magnetic properties depend on the unpaired 4f electrons of RE3+ ions. The net magnetic moment of CoFe2O4 increases by doping with Eu and Gd, the reason is that there are more unpaired 4f electrons for Eu3+and Gd3+. However, the net magnetic moment of CoFe2O4 decreases by doping with La, Ce, Pr, and Nd, due to the reason that these RE ions prefer their low spin configurations.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt microspheres with diameters of 1.5–3.5 µm were synthesized by a liquid phase reduction method. The effects of hydrogen annealing on microstructure evolution and electromagnetic properties of Co microspheres were investigated. The influence of filling ratio on the electromagnetic properties of specimens containing Co microspheres as fillers was also examined. The results indicated that the annealing leads to increase in Co microspheres' permittivity as the improved conductivity that developed during annealing contributes to enhanced dielectric relaxation. High filling ratio is found to be favorable for achieving high electromagnetic properties and thus higher electromagnetic absorbing performances, which is of technical significant for application in low frequency band. Coatings containing 30, 45 and 50 vol% Co particles as fillers present excellent EMA performance, even very thin thickness is applied. High electromagnetic wave absorbing efficiency of −10 dB was observed at thickness of 1.5 mm in C band and the electromagnetic wave absorption bandwidth reaches up to 6.3 GHz (6.7–13 GHz) when the filling volume is 45 vol%.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.An iron containing magnesium borate glass with the mol% composition 51.7 B2O3/9.3 K2O /1 P2O5/27.6MgO/10.4Fe2O3was prepared by the conventional melts quenching method followed by a thermal treatment process at temperatures in the range from 530 to 604 °C.The thermally treated samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction, scanning and transmission electron microscopy. It was shown that superparamagnetic MgFe2O4 nanoparticles were formed during thermal treatment. The size of the spinel type crystals was in the range from 6 to 15 nm. Mössbauer spectra of the powdered glass ceramic samples and the extracted nanoparticles after dissolving the glass matrix in diluted acid were recorded at room temperature. The deconvolution of the spectra revealed the crystallization of two spinel phases MgFe2O4 (as a dominant phase) and superparamagnetic maghemite, γ-Fe2O3 (as a secondary phase). Room temperature magnetic measurements showed that, increasing the crystallization temperature changed the superparamagnetic behavior of the samples to ferrimagnetic behavior. The Curie temperatures of the samples were measured and showed a higher value than that of the pure bulk MgFe2O4.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The electric polarization hysteresis loops and remanent polarization were revealed in multiferroics RMn2O5 with R=Gd and Bi at wide temperature interval from 5 K up to 330 K. Until recently, the long-range ferroelectric order having an exchange-striction magnetic nature had been observed in RMn2O5 only at low temperatures (T≤TC=30–35K). We believe that the polarization we observed was caused by the frozen superparaelectric state which was formed by the restricted polar domains resulting from phase separation and charge carriers self-organization. At some sufficiently high temperatures T⪢TC the frozen superparaelectric state was destroyed, and the conventional superparaelectric state occurred. This happened when the potential barriers of the restricted polar domain reorientations become equal to the kinetic energy of the itinerant electrons (leakage). The hysteresis loops were measured by the so-called PUND method which allowed us to correctly subtract the contribution of conductivity from the measured polarization. The correlations between properties of the phase separation domains and polarization were revealed and studied. The high-temperature polarization also had a magnetic nature and was controlled by the magnetic field because the double exchange between pairs of Mn ions with different valences (Mn3+ and Mn4+) in RMn2O5 was the basic interaction resulting in phase separation.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of Ni0.35Cu0.15Zn0.5Fe2O4 and Mg0.35Cu0.15Zn0.5Fe2O4, have been synthesized by citrate precursor method. Then some of the prepared samples have been irradiated by γ-rays of 60Co radioactive source at room temperature with doses of 1 Mrad and 2 Mrad, at a dose rate of 0.1 Mrad/h to study the effect of γ-rays irradiation on some structural, magnetic and electrical properties of the samples. The X-ray diffraction analysis (XRD), transmission electron microscopy, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy and vibrating sample magnetometer measurements have been used to investigate the samples. The XRD results show that the irradiation has caused a decrease in the crystallite size and the measured density and an increase in the porosity, specific surface area, and microstrain in the case of Ni–Cu–Zn ferrite whereas in the case of Mg–Cu–Zn ferrite the reverse trend has been noticed. The lattice constant of the investigated samples has been increased with the increase of irradiation due to the conversion of Fe3+ (0.67 Å) to Fe2+ (0.76 Å). The magnetization results show an increase in saturation and remnant magnetizations for the two prepared ferrites after γ-rays irradiation. The main reason of this behavior is most probably due to the redistribution of the cations between A and B sites. The cation distribution has been proposed such that the values of theoretical and experimental magnetic moment are identical and increase as the magnetization increases. Moreover, a theoretical estimation of the lattice constant has been calculated on the basis of the proposed cation distribution for each sample and compared with the corresponding experimental values obtained by XRD analysis; where they have been found in a good agreement with each other. This can be considered as another confirmation of the validity of the cation distribution. Moreover, the cation distribution is thought to play an important role in increasing the values of dc conductivity of all samples with increasing the irradiation dose. The frequency dependence of ac conductivity, dielectric constant and dielectric loss of all samples have been studied. The Cole–Cole plots of (Z″ vs. Z′) give different two overlapping incomplete semi-circles depending upon the electrical parameters. Also, The Cole–Cole plots of (M″ vs. M′) insure that the electric stiffness is the dominant property of the investigated samples.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Optimum Fe/Ba mole ratio is determined in doped Ba-hexaferrite prepared via mechanical activation. X-ray diffractometer (XRD), scanning electron microscope (SEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analyzer are used to analyze phases, structures, electromagnetic and microwave absorption properties. The mole ratio of Fe/Ba=10 is detected to be optimum for doping and synthesizing the Ba-hexaferrite. In order to achieve high absorption in X band the ions of Zr4+–Sn4+–Ti4+–M2+ (M=Mg2+, Zn2+, Cu2+, Co2+) are used as dopants. The results indicate the formation of single phase Ba-hexaferrite in either pure or doped compounds without any non-magnetic intermediate phases and with spherical and hexagonal morphologies respectively for the pure and doped ferrite. It is found out that BaCo2Zr(SnTi)0.5Fe8O19 compound has the maximum saturation magnetization (49.80 emu/g). Also the composite of BaCo2Zr(SnTi)0.5Fe8O19 50 wt% in epoxy resin exhibits a minimum reflection loss of −29 dB at 12.2 GHz with 2.6 GHz bandwidth.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Concerns over cancer treatment have largely focused on chemotherapy and its consequent side effects. Utilizing nanocarriers is thought to be a panacea for mitigating the limitations of chemotherapy, and increasing its safety and efficacy. Magnetically driven Paclitaxel delivery systems are among the commonly investigated types of nanocarriers over the last two decades. In this context, we tried to highlight the application of an AC magnetic field and validate its consequential effects on drug delivery pattern and cell death in such nanodevices. So the aim of this study is to develop an appropriate matrix (Palmitoyl chitosan) co-encapsulated with superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) and anticancer drug, Paclitaxel (PTX) via the nanoprecipitation process. Synthesized nanoparticles were characterized by Dynamic Light Scattering (DLS) and their magnetic properties were investigated by Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM). At initial loading of 10 wt% Paclitaxel, the maximum loading efficiency of nanoparticles with and without SPIONs was in the range of 69% and 72.3%, respectively. In addition, in vitro release data revealed that by the application of a magnetic field, release kinetic changed to the magnetic responsive pattern. Encapsulating anticancer drug in a synthesized nanosystem not only increased the amount of drug in cancer cells but also enhanced cell death (MCF-7) due to hyperthermic effects of SPIONs in the presence of an external magnetic field. In summary, these findings indicate that the resultant nanoparticles may serve as a biocompatible and biodegradable carrier for the precise delivery of powerful cytotoxic anticancer agents such as PTX.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we report an investigation of magnetic fluid hyperthermia (MFH) using combined calorimetric and newly implemented dynamic hysteresis measurements for two sets of well characterized size-sorted maghemite nanoparticles (with diameters of about 10 nm and 20 nm) dispersed in water and in glycerol. Our primary goal was to assess the influence of viscosity on the heating efficiency of magnetic nanoparticles described in terms of specific loss power (SLP or specific absorption rate, SAR) and dynamic hysteresis. In particular, we aimed to investigate how this SLP depends on the transition from Néelian to Brownian behavior of nanoparticles expected to occur between 10 nm and 20 nm (for maghemite) and dependent on the viscosity. While we observed a good agreement between calorimetric and dynamic hysteresis measurements, we found that the SLP measured for the different systems do not depend noticeably on the viscosity of solvent. Calculations performed according to Rosensweig's linear model [1] allow us to quantitatively reproduce our results at low field intensities, provided we use a value for the magnetic anisotropy constant much smaller than the one commonly used in the literature. This raises the question of the temperature dependance of the magnetic anisotropy constant and its relevance for a quantitative description of MFH.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The first concept of an integrated isolator was based on nonreciprocal TE–TM mode conversion, the nonreciprocal coupling between these modes is caused by the Faraday rotation if the magnetization is aligned along the z–axis, parallel to mode propagation. We propose to study this magneto-optical phenomenon, by the simulation of magneto photonic crystal fibre (MPCF), it consists of a periodic triangular lattice of air-holes filled with magnetic fluid which consists of magnetic nanoparticles into a BIG (Bismuth Iron Garnet) fibre. We simulated the influence of gyrotropy and the wavelength, and calculated Faraday rotation and modal birefringence. In this fibre the light is guided by internal total reflection, like classical fibres. However it was shown that they could function on a mode conversion much stronger than conventional fibres.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We present a simple and rapid method for the synthesis of small magnetic nanoparticles (diameters in the order of 5–20 nm) and narrow size distributions (CV's of 20–40%). The magnetite nanoparticles were synthesized in green solvents within minutes and the saturation magnetization of the particles was tunable by changes in the reaction conditions. We show that this particle synthesis method requires minimal processing steps and we present the successful coating of the particles with reactive bisphosphonates after synthesis without washing or centrifugation. We found minimal batch-to-batch variability and show the scalability of the particle synthesis method. We present a full characterization of the particle properties and believe that this synthesis method holds great promise for facile and rapid generation of magnetic nanoparticles with defined surface coatings for magnetic targeting applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Static, regular polygonal and close-packed clusters of spherical magnetic particles and their energy-minimizing magnetic moments are investigated in a two-dimensional setting. This study focuses on a simple particle system which is solely described by the dipole-dipole interaction energy, both without and in the presence of an in-plane magnetic field. For a regular polygonal structure of n sides with n≥3, and in the absence of an external field, it is proved rigorously that the magnetic moments given by the roots of unity, i.e. tangential to the polygon, are a minimizer of the dipole–dipole interaction energy. Also, for zero external field, new multiple local minima are discovered for the regular polygonal agglomerates. The number of found local extrema is proportional to [n/2] and these critical points are characterized by the presence of a pair of magnetic moments with a large deviation from the tangential configuration and whose particles are at least three diameters apart. The changes induced by an in-plane external magnetic field on the minimal energy, tangential configurations are investigated numerically. The two critical fields, which correspond to a crossover with the linear chain minimal energy and with the break-up of the agglomerate, respectively are examined in detail. In particular, the numerical results are compared directly with the asymptotic formulas of Danilov et al. (2012) [23] and a remarkable agreement is found even for moderate to large fields. Finally, three examples of close-packed structures are investigated: a triangle, a centered hexagon, and a 19-particle close packed cluster. The numerical study reveals novel, illuminating characteristics of these compact clusters often seen in ferrofluids. The centered hexagon is energetically favorable to the regular hexagon and the minimal energy for the larger 19-particle cluster is even lower than that of the close packed hexagon. In addition, this larger close packed agglomerate has two distinctive regimes in the magnetization, which corresponds to two very different susceptibilities, in marked contrast to the behavior observed in regular polygonal structures.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this work diluted magnetopolymer elastic composites based on magnetic microparticles are experimentally studied. Considered samples have varied concentration of the magnetic powder and different structural anisotropy. Experimental data on magnetic properties are accomplished by microstructural observations performed using X-Ray tomography. Influence of the particles amount and structuring effects on the initial magnetic susceptibility of the composites as well as the applicability of the Maxwell-Garnett approximation, which is widely used in considerations of magnetopolymer elastic composites, are evaluated. It is demonstrated that the approximation works well for diluted samples containing randomly distributed magnetic particles and for the diluted samples with chain-like structures oriented perpendicular to an externally applied field, while it fails to predict the susceptibility of the samples with structures oriented parallel to the field. Moreover, it is shown, that variation of the chains morphology does not significantly change the composite initial magnetic susceptibility.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The exchange bias effect was investigated, in the 5–300 K temperature range, in samples of IrMn [100 Å]/NiFe [50 Å] (set A) and in samples with inverted layer-stacking sequence (set B), produced at room temperature by DC magnetron sputtering in a static magnetic field of 400 Oe. The samples of each set differ for the nominal thickness (tCu) of a Cu spacer, grown at the interface between the antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic layers, which was varied between 0 and 2 Å. It has been found out that the Cu insertion reduces the values of the exchange field and of the coercivity and can also affect their thermal evolution, depending on the stack configuration. Indeed, the latter also determines a peculiar variation of the exchange bias properties with time, shown and discussed with reference to the samples without Cu of the two sets. The results have been explained considering that, in this system, the exchange coupling mechanism is ruled by the glassy magnetic behavior of the IrMn spins located at the interface with the NiFe layer. Varying the stack configuration and tCu results in a modulation of the structural and magnetic features of the interface, which ultimately affects the spins dynamics of the glassy IrMn interfacial component.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report the improvement of electric and magnetic properties of the chemical routed samples of Co1.25Fe1.75O4 ferrite. Synchrotron X-ray diffraction pattern confirmed the cubic spinel structure in all samples. Raman spectroscopy provided the information of mixed-type cubic spinel structure, where Co2+ and Fe3+ ions order both in octahedral and tetrahedral sites. The thermal heat treatment has brought a systematic change in electric polarization and magnetic parameters. At a critical annealing temperature (TAN) of 800 °C, the sample has shown the highest magnetic coercivity ~596 Oe and relatively large squareness ~0.5. The electrical conductivity, dielectric loss and dielectric constant have decreased with increase of TAN. The dielectric constant becomes stable for TAN above 800 °C. The samples annealed in the temperature range 900–1000 °C have shown a good signature of ferroelectric polarization, although it is under saturation value and leakage of polarization due to conductive effect is observed. This work shows the scope of the improvement of electric polarization due to capacitive effect on increasing the annealing temperature of as-prepared Co ferrite sample.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The available results from the inelastic neutron scattering experiment performed on the quasi-two dimensional spin 12 anti-ferromagnetic material La2CuO4 have been analysed theoretically. The formalism of ours is based on a semi-classical like treatment involving a model of an ideal gas of mobile vortices and anti-vortices built on the background of the Néel state, using the bipartite classical spin configuration corresponding to an XY-anisotropic Heisenberg anti-ferromagnet on a square lattice. The results for the integrated intensities for our spin 12 model corresponding to different temperatures, show occurrence of vigorous unphysical oscillations, when convoluted with a realistic spectral window function. These results indicate failure of the conventional semi-classical theoretical model of ideal vortex/anti-vortex gas arising in the Berezinskii–Kosterlitz–Thouless theory for the low spin magnetic systems. A full fledged quantum mechanical formalism and calculations seem crucial for the understanding of topological excitations in such low spin systems. Furthermore, a severe disagreement is found to occur at finite values of energy transfer between the integrated intensities obtained theoretically from the conventional formalism and those obtained experimentally. This further suggests strongly that the full quantum treatment should also incorporate the interaction between the fragile-magnons and the topological excitations. This is quite plausible in view of the recent work establishing such a process in XXZ quantum ferromagnet on 2D lattice. The high spin XXZ quasi-two dimensional antiferromagnet like MnPS3 however follows the conventional theory quite well.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Mechanical stress occurring during the manufacturing process of electrical machines detrimentally alters the magnetic properties (iron losses and magnetizability). This affects the efficiency and performance of the machine. Improvement of the manufacturing process in terms of reduced magnetic property deterioration enables the full potential of the magnetic materials to be exploited, and as a result, the performance of the machine to be improved. A high quantity of electrical machine components is needed, with shear cutting (punching, blanking) being the most efficient manufacturing technology. The cutting process leads to residual stresses inside the non-oriented electrical sheet metal, resulting in increased iron losses. This paper studies the residual stresses induced by punching with different shear cutting parameters, taking a qualitative approach using finite element analysis. In order to calibrate the finite element analysis, shear cutting experiments are performed. A single sheet tester analysis of the cut blanks allows the correlation between residual stresses, micro hardness measurements, cutting surface parameters and magnetic properties to be studied.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The influence of Cu substitution on the structural and morphological characteristics of Ni–Zn nanocrystalline ferrites have been discussed in this work. The detailed and systematic magnetic characterizations were also done for Cu substituted Ni–Zn nanoferrites. The nanocrystalline ferrites of Cu substituted CuxZn0.5−xNi0.5Fe2O4 ferrites (x=0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4 and 0.5) were synthesized using sol gel self-combustion hybrid method. X-ray diffraction (XRD), Field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM), Transmission electron microscope (TEM) and Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) were used to investigate the properties of Cu substituted nanocrystalline ferrites. Single phase structure of Cu substituted in Ni–Zn nanocrystalline ferrites were investigated for all the samples. Crystallite size, lattice constant and volume of the cell were found to increase by increasing Cu contents in spinel structure. The better morphology with well-organized nanocrystals of Cu–Zn–Ni ferrites at x=0 and 0.5 were observed from both FESEM and TEM analysis. The average grain size was 35–46 nm for all prepared nanocrystalline samples. Magnetic properties such as coercivity, saturation, remanence, magnetic squareness, magneto crystalline anisotropy constant (K) and Bohr magneton were measured from the recorded M–H loops. The magnetic saturation and remanence were increased by the incorporation of Cu contents. However, coercivity follow the Stoner-Wolforth model except for x=0.3 which may be due to the site occupancy and replacement of Cu contents from octahedral site. The squareness ratio confirmed the super paramgnetic behaviour of the Cu substituted in Ni–Zn nanocrystalline ferrites. Furthermore, Cu substituted Ni–Zn nanocrystalline ferrites may be suitable for many industrial and domestic applications such as components of transformers, core, switching, and MLCI's due to variety of the soft magnetic characteristics.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic resonance in an array of Co nanowires electrolytically deposited into nanoporous alumina template is investigated at four microwave frequencies in the range from 9.3 to 69.7 GHz. The array consists of highly textured hcp Co with hexagonal axes perpendicular to the nanowires. The spectra measured at higher frequencies can be decomposed into four wide resonances peaks. Different mechanisms, which can lead to the multi-peak resonance, are discussed.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.We report the magneto-thermal and resistive properties of rare-earth dialuminide NdAl2, including spin reorientation transition. To this purpose, we used a theoretical model that considers the interactions of exchange and Zeeman, besides the anisotropy due to the electrical crystal field. The theoretical results obtained were compared to experimental data of the NdAl2 in single crystal and bulk forms. Explicitly, we have calculated the anisotropic variation of magnetic entropy with the magnetic field oriented along the three principal crystallographic directions: [100], [110], and [111] of NdAl2 single crystal, where a signature of the spin reorientation is observed in the [110] and [111] directions. Moreover, of magnetoresistivity we consider the applied magnetic field along the crystallographic directions [100] and [110]. In turn, for the polycrystalline form, the good agreement between theory and experiment confirms the presence of spin reorientation, which was predicted theoretically in magnetization curves.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates synthesis of FexNi(1−x) bimetallic nanoparticles by microemulsion method. Through studying the mechanism of nanoparticles formation, it is indicated that synthesis of nanoparticles took placed by simultaneous reduction of metal ions and so nanoparticles structure is homogeneous alloy. FexNi(1−x) nanoparticles with different sizes, morphologies and compositions were synthesized by changing the microemulsion parameters such as water/surfactant/oil ratio, presence of co-surfactant and NiCl2·6H2O to FeCl2·4H2O molar ratio. Synthesized nanoparticles were characterized by transmission electron microscopy, particle size analysis, X-ray diffraction, atomic absorption and thermogravimetric analyses. The results indicated that, presence of butanol as co-surfactant led to chain-like arrangement of nanoparticles. Also, finer nanoparticles were synthesized by decreasing the amount of oil and water and increasing the amount of CTAB. The results of vibrating sample magnetometer suggested that magnetic properties of FexNi(1−x) alloy nanoparticles were affected by composition, size and morphology of the particles. Spherical and chain-like FexNi(1−x) alloy nanoparticles were superparamagnetic and ferromagnetic, respectively. Furthermore, higher iron in the composition of nanoparticles increases the magnetic properties.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Skewness of Magnetic Barkhausen Noise (MBN) signal is used as a new feature for applied stress determination. After experimental studies, skewness presents its ability for measuring applied tensile stress compared with conventional feature, meanwhile, a non-linear behavior of this new feature and an independence of the excitation conditions under compressive stress are found and discussed. Effective damping during domain wall motion influencing the asymmetric shape of the MBN statistical distribution function is discussed under compressive and tensile stress variation. Domain wall (DW) energy and distance between pinning edges of the DW are considered altering the characteristic relaxation time, which is the reason for the non-linear phenomenon of skewness.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Temperature-dependent magnetic anisotropy due to grain boundaries in nanocrystalline Ni has been studied by simulating experimental magnetization data with the stochastic Landau–Lifshitz–Gilbert theory. In the model the grain boundary magnetic anisotropy energy is expressed as the sum of the uniaxial anisotropy and the cubic anisotropy, characterized by Kua and Kca anisotropy constants. By comparing the calculated magnetization with the experimental magnetization measurements at finite temperatures, the values of Kua and Kca can be determined. For nanocrystalline Ni it is found that with increasing temperature Kua decreases and Kca increases. At low temperatures Kua dominates the grain boundary anisotropy energy, whereas Kca is very small and it can be neglected. At room temperature Kua and Kca are of the same order with the corresponding ratio Kua/Kca≈1.9, both coefficients are much larger than the magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The dipolar interaction is known to substantially affect the properties of magnetic nanoparticles. This is particularly important when the particles are kept in a fluid suspension or packed within nano-carriers. In addition to its usual long-range nature, in these cases the dipolar interaction may also induce the formation of clusters of particles, thereby strongly modifying their magnetic anisotropies. In this paper we show how AC susceptibility may be used to obtain information regarding the influence of the dipolar interaction in a sample. We develop a model which includes both aspects of the dipolar interaction and may be fitted directly to the susceptibility data. The usual long-range nature of the interaction is implemented using a mean-field approximation, whereas the particle-particle aggregation is modeled using a distribution of anisotropy constants. The model is then applied to two samples studied at different concentrations. One consists of spherical magnetite nanoparticles dispersed in oil and the other of cubic magnetite nanoparticles embedded on polymeric nanospheres. We also introduce a simple technique to address the presence of the dipolar interaction in a given sample, based on the height of the AC susceptibility peaks for different driving frequencies.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we investigated the momentum and heat transfer characteristics of Casson nanofluid flow over a rotating cone in a rotating frame filled with water based CoFe2O4 nano particles. Heat flux conditions and wall temperature conditions are very important in controlling of up and down heat transport phenomena's in industrial as well as engineering application. Resulting set of coupled nonlinear governing equations are solved numerically using Runge–Kutta based shooting technique. In graphical results we presented dual solutions for the prescribed wall temperature (PWT) and prescribed heat flux (PHF) cases. The effect of governing parameters on velocity and temperature fields along with the skin friction coefficient and the heat transfer rate are presented with the help of graphs and tables. Results indicate that the rising values of the volume fraction of ferro particles and buoyancy parameter have tendency to improve the skin friction coefficient as well as the heat transfer rate for both the prescribed wall temperature (PWT) and prescribed heat flux (PHF) cases.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The purpose of this work was to study the influence of different kinds of rolling on the magnetic properties of NOG steel, an electric steel widely used in electrical motors. These properties are highly correlated with the crystallographic texture of the material, which can be changed by rolling. Three kinds of rolling were examined: conventional rolling, cross-rolling and asymmetrical rolling. The crystallographic texture was determined by X-ray diffraction and the magnetic properties were calculated from a theoretical model that related the magnetic induction to crystallographic texture through the anisotropy energy. The results show that cross-rolling yields higher values of magnetic induction than the other processes.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and the magnetoresistance behavior were investigated for electrodeposited nanoscale Co films, Co/Cu/Co sandwiches and Co/Cu multilayers with individual Co layer thicknesses ranging from 1 nm to 20 nm. The measured saturation magnetization values confirmed that the nominal and actual layer thicknesses are in fairly good agreement. All three types of layered structure exhibited anisotropic magnetoresistance for thick magnetic layers whereas the Co/Cu/Co sandwiches and Co/Cu multilayers with thinner magnetic layers exhibited giant magnetoresistance (GMR), the GMR magnitude being the largest for the thinnest Co layers. The decreasing values of the relative remanence and the coercive field when reducing the Co layer thickness down to below about 3 nm indicated the presence of superparamagnetic (SPM) regions in the magnetic layers which could be more firmly evidenced for these samples by a decomposition of the magnetoresistance vs. field curves into a ferromagnetic and an SPM contribution. For thicker magnetic layers, the dependence of the coercivity (Hc) on magnetic layer thickness (d) could be described for each of the layered structure types by the usual equation Hc=Hco+a/d n with an exponent around n=1. The common value of n suggests a similar mechanism for the magnetization reversal by domain wall motion in all three structure types and hints also at the absence of coupling between magnetic layers in the Co/Cu/Co sandwiches and Co/Cu multilayers.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Room temperature I–V characteristics study, both in presence and absence of magnetic field (1800 Oe), has been performed on NiFe2O4 nanoparticles, having different particle size (Ф~14, 21 and 31 nm). Our experiments on these nanoparticles provide evidences for: (1) electrical irreversibility or hysteretic behaviour; (2) positive magnetoresistance and (3) magnetic field dependent electrical irreversibility or hysteresis in the sample. “Hysteretic” nature of I–V curve reveals the existence of electrical memory effect in the sample. Significantly, such hysteresis has been found to be tuned by magnetic field. In order to explain the observed electrical irreversibility, we have proposed a phenomenological model on the light of induced polarization in the sample. Both the positive magnetoresistance and the observed magnetic field dependence of electrical irreversibility have been explained through magnetostriction phenomenon. Interestingly, such effects are found to get reduced with increasing particle size. For NiFe2O4 nanoparticles having Ф=31 nm, we did not observe any irreversibility effect. This feature has been attributed to the enhanced grain surface effect that in turn gives rise to the residual polarization and hence electrical memory effect in NiFe2O4 nanoparticles, having small nanoscopic particle size.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In this study, cobalt ferrite and bismuth substituted cobalt ferrite (CoFe2−xBixO4 x=0, 0.1) nanoparticles were synthesized by two different methods viz combustion and co-precipitation. The nanoparticles were characterized by powder X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR), diffuse reflectance spectroscopy (DRS), scanning electron microscopy-energy dispersive X-ray analyzer (SEM-EDX) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The results of powder XRD pattern showed an increase in lattice parameter and decrease in particle size of cobalt ferrite by the substitution of bismuth. Catalytic activity of cobalt ferrite and bismuth substituted cobalt ferrite nanoparticles synthesized by two different methods were compared for the reduction of 4-nitrophenol to 4-aminophenol using NaBH4 as a reducing agent.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The stability of the conduction regime of natural convection in an electrically conducting fluid saturated porous vertical slab is investigated in the presence of a uniform external transverse magnetic field. The flow in the porous medium is described by modified Brinkman-extended Darcy equation with fluid viscosity different from effective viscosity. The boundaries of the vertical porous slab are assumed to be rigid-isothermal and electrically non-conducting. The resulting stability equations are solved numerically using Galerkin method. The critical Grashof number Gc, the critical wave number αc and the critical wave speed cc are computed for a wide range of porous parameter σp, the ratio of effective viscosity to the fluid viscosity Λ, the Prandtl number Pr and the Hartmann numberM. Based on these parameters, the stability characteristics of the system are discussed in detail. The presence of advective inertia is to instill instability on the flow in a porous medium and found that the magnetic field, porous parameter and ratio of viscosities have a stabilizing effect on both stationary and oscillatory wave instabilities. Besides, the value of Pr at which transition occurs from stationary to oscillatory mode of instability decreases with increasing M,σpandΛ.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The paper describes investigation of ferromagnetism at low temperatures. We explored the magneto-optical properties, influenced by photon–magnon interactions, of a ferromagnetic Co/Pd multilayered thin film below and above the magnon Bose–Einstein Condensation (BEC) temperature. Analyses of SQUID and MOKE low temperature experimental results reveal a noticeable phase transition in both magnetic and magneto-optical properties of the material at the BEC temperature.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic field (H) sweeping direction dependences of the mixed voltage Vmix induced by the inverse-spin Hall effect(ISHE) and spin-rectified effect (SRE) in a CoFeB (5 nm)/Pt (10 nm) bilayer structure are investigated using the ferromagnetic resonance in the TE mode cavities and coplanar waveguide methods. Conventionally, the magnitude of ISHE voltage VISH (symmetric) excluding the SRE (antisymmetric component) was unavoidably separated from the fitting curve of Vmix (a sum of a symmetric and an antisymmetric part) for one direction of H-source. By studying the ratio of the two voltage parts with the bi-directional H sweeping, the optimized VISH (no SRE condition) value which also include a well-defined spin Hall angle can be obtained via the linear response relation of ISHE and SRE components.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Active control of droplet generation in a microfluidic platform attracts interest for development of digital microfluidic devices ranging from biosensors to micro-reactors to point-of-care diagnostic devices. The present paper characterizes, through an unsteady three-dimensional Volume of Fluid (VOF) simulation, the active control of ferrofluid droplet generation in a microfluidic T-junction in presence of a non-uniform magnetic field created by an external magnetic dipole. Two distinctly different positions of the dipole were considered – one upstream of the junction and one downstream. While keeping the ferrofluid flow rate fixed, a parametric variation of the continuous phase capillary number, dipole strength, and dipole position was carried out. Differences in the flow behaviour in terms of dripping or jetting and the droplet characteristics in terms of droplet formation time period and droplet size were studied. The existence of a threshold dipole strength, below which the magnetic force was not able to influence the flow behaviour, was identified. It was also observed that, for dipoles placed upstream of the junction, droplet formation was suppressed at some higher dipole strengths, and this value was found to increase with increasing capillary number. Droplet time period was also found to increase with increasing dipole strength, along with droplet size, i.e. an increase in droplet volume.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.Skyrmions are nanoscopic whirls of spins that reside in chiral magnets. It is only fairly recent that a plethora of applications for these quasiparticles emerges, especially in data storage. On the other hand, spin spirals are the periodic analogs of skyrmions, and are equally imperative in the course of exploration to enhance our understanding of helimagnetism. In this study, a new infrastructure based on the B20 compound, MnSi is propounded as a hosting material for spin spirals; alternating thin layers of CoSi and MnSi in the superlattice form provides a facile way of varying the properties of the spin spirals across a continuum. Using first-principles calculations based on full-potential linearized augmented plane-wave (FLAPW)-based density functional theory (DFT), the spin order of bulk MnSi, MnSi film, and the CoSi/MnSi superlattice is investigated. Spin dispersion plots as a function of propagation vectors show that the spiral size changes in the presence of CoSi – we find that the size of the spiral is reduced in the superlattice with thin CoSi layers (CoSi:MnSi=1:1 thickness ratio), whilst at a larger CoSi:MnSi=2:1 thickness ratio, the material behaves as a ferromagnet. In a similar fashion, the spin moment and orbital occupancy depend significantly on the thickness of the CoSi layers. However, the exchange interaction between Mn atoms appears to be generally impervious to the presence of CoSi. Succinctly, the CoSi/MnSi superlattice could be an excellent functional material in data storage applications.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The further development of magnetic biosensors requires a better understanding of the interaction between living systems and magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs). We describe our experience of fabrication of stable ferrofluids (FF) using electrostatic or steric stabilization of iron oxide MNPs obtained by laser target evaporation. Controlled amounts of FF were used for in vitro experiments with human mesenchymal stem cells. Their morphofunctional responses in the Fe concentration range 2–1000 maximum tolerated dose revealed no cytotoxicity.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.The CoFe/Cu magnetic multilayers were produced by changing CoFe ferromagnetic layers from 3 nm to 10 nm using electrodeposition. By now, the thinnest Cu (0.5 nm) layer thicknesses were used to see whether the GMR effect in the multilayers can be obtained or not since the pinning of non-magnetic layer between the ferromagnetic layers is required. For the proper depositions, the cyclic voltammograms was used, and the current–time transients were obtained. The Cu and CoFe layers were deposited at a cathode potential of −0.3 and −1.5 V with respect to saturated calomel electrode, respectively. From the XRD patterns, the multilayers were shown to be fcc crystal structures. For the magnetization measurements, saturation magnetization increases from 160 to 600 kA/m from 3 to 8 nm ferromagnetic layer thicknesses. And, the coercivity values increase until the 8 nm of the CoFe layer thickness. It is seen that the thin Cu layer (fixed at 0.5 nm) and pinholes support the random magnetization orientation and thus all multilayers exhibited the giant magnetoresistance (GMR) effect, and the highest GMR value was observed about 5.5%. And, the variation of GMR field sensitivity was calculated. The results show that the GMR and GMR sensitivity are compatible among the multilayers. The CoFe/Cu magnetic multilayers having GMR properties are used in GMR sensors and hard disk drive of the nano-technological devices.